e they display their proper colour.464.A place is most luminous when it is most remote from mountains.On the tre
atment of light for views of towns (465-469).465.OF LIGHT AND SHADOW IN A TOWN.When the sun is in the East and the eye i
s above the centre of atown, the eye will see the Southern part of the town with its roofshalf in shade and half in ligh
t, and the same towards the North; theEastern side will be all in shadow and the Western will be all inlight.466.Of the
houses of a town, in which the divisions between the housesmay be distinguished by the light which fall on the mist at t
hebottom. If the eye is above the houses the light seen in the spacethat is between one house and the next sinks by degr
ees into thickermist; and yet, being less transparent, it appears whiter; and if thehouses are some higher than the othe
rs, since the true [colour] isalways more discernible through the thinner atmosphere, the houseswill look darker in prop
ortion as they are higher up. Let _n o p q_represent the various density of the atmosphere thick with moisture,_a_ being
 the eye, the house _b c_ will look lightest at the bottom,because it is in a thicker atmosphere; the lines _c d f_ will
 appearequally light, for although _f_ is more distant than _c_, it israised into a thinner atmosphere, if the houses _b
 e_ are of thesame height, because they cross a brightness which is varied bymist, but this is only because the line of
the eye which starts fromabove ends by piercing a lower and denser atmosphere at _d_ than at_b_. Thus the line a _f_ is
lower at _f_ than at _c_; and the house_f_ will be seen darker at _e_ from the line _e k_ as far as _m_,than the tops of
 the houses standing in front of it.467.OF TOWNS OR OTHER BUILDINGS SEEN IN THE EVENING OR THE MORNINGTHROUGH THE MIST.O
f buildings seen at a great distance in the evening or the morning,as in mist or dense atmosphere, only those portions a
re seen inbrightness which are lighted up by the sun which is near thehorizon; and those portions which are not lighted
up by the sunremain almost of the same colour and medium tone as the mist.WHY OBJECTS WHICH ARE HIGH UP AND AT A DISTANC
E ARE DARKER THAN THELOWER ONES, EVEN IF THE MIST IS UNIFORMLY DENSE.Of objects standing in a mist or other dense atmosp
here, whetherfrom vapour or smoke or distance, those will be most visible whichare the highest. And among objects of equ
al height that will be thedarkest [strongest] which has for background the deepest mist. Thusthe eye _h_ looking at _a b
 c_, towers of equal height, one withanother, sees _c_ the top of the first tower at _r_, at two degreesof depth in the
mist; and sees the height of the middle tower _b_through one single degree of mist. Therefore the top of the tower_c_ ap
pears stronger than the top of the tower _b_, &c.468.OF THE SMOKE OF A TOWN.Smoke is seen better and more distinctly on
the Eastern side than onthe Western when the sun is in the East; and this arises from twocauses; the first is that the s
un, with its rays, shines through theparticles of the smoke and lights them up and makes them visible.The second is that
 the roofs of the houses seen in the East at thistime are in shadow, because their obliquity does not allow of theirbein
g illuminated by the sun. And the same thing occurs with dust;and both one and the other look the lighter in proportion
as theyare denser, and they are densest towards the middle.469.OF SMOKE AND DUST.If the sun is in the East the smoke of
cities will not be visible inthe West, because on that side it is not seen penetrated by thesolar rays, nor on a dark ba
ckground; since the roofs of the housesturn the same side to the eye as they turn towards the sun, and onthis light back
ground the smoke is not very visible.But dust, under the same aspect, will look darker than smoke beingof denser materia
l than smoke which is moist.The effect of wind on trees (470-473).470.OF REPRESENTING WIND.In representing wind, besides
 the bending of the boughs and thereversing of their leaves towards the quarter whence the wind comes,you should also re
present them amid clouds of fine dust mingled withthe troubled air.471.Describe landscapes with the wind, and the water,
 and the settingand rising of the sun.THE WIND.All the leaves which hung towards the earth by the bending of theshoots w
ith their branches, are turned up side down by the gusts ofwind, and here their perspective is reversed; for, if the tre
e isbetween you and the quarter of the wind, the leaves which aretowards you remain in their natural aspect, while those
 on theopposite side which ought to have their points in a contrarydirection have, by being turned over, their points tu
rned towardsyou.472.Trees struck by the force of the wind bend to the side towards whichthe wind is blowing; and the win
d being past they bend in thecontrary direction, that is in reverse motion.473.That portion of a tree which is farthest
from the force whichstrikes it is the most injured by the blow because it bears moststrain; thus nature has foreseen thi
s case by thickening them inthat part where they can be most hurt; and most in such trees asgrow to great heights, as pi
nes and the like. [Footnote: Compare thesketch drawn with a pen and washed with Indian ink on Pl. XL, No. 1.In the Vatic
an copy we find, under a section entitled '_del fumo_',the following remark: _Era sotto di questo capitulo un rompimento
 dimontagna, per dentro delle quali roture scherzaua fiame di fuoco,disegnate di penna et ombrate d'acquarella, da ueder
e cosa mirabileet uiua (Ed. MANZI, p. 235. Ed. LUDWIG, Vol. I, 460). This appearsto refer to the left hand portion of th
e drawing here given from theWindsor collection, and from this it must be inferred, that the leafas it now exists in the
 library of the Queen of England, was alreadyseparated from the original MS. at the time when the Vatican copywas made.]
Light and shade on clouds (474-477).474.Describe how the clouds are formed and how they dissolve, and whatcause raises v
apour.475.The shadows in clouds are lighter in proportion as they are nearerto the horizon.[Footnote: The drawing belong
ing to this was in black chalk and istotally effaced.]476.When clouds come between the sun and the eye all the upper edg
es oftheir round forms are light, and towards the middle they are dark,and this happens because towards the top these ed
ges have the sunabove them while you are below them; and the same thing happens withthe position of the branches of tree
s; and again the clouds, likethe trees, being somewhat transparent, are lighted up in part, andat the edges they show th
inner.But, when the eye is between the cloud and the sun, the cloud hasthe contrary effect to the former, for the edges
of its mass aredark and it is light towards the middle; and this happens becauseyou see the same side as faces the sun,
and because the edges havesome transparency and reveal to the eye that portion which is hiddenbeyond them, and which, as
 it does not catch the sunlight like thatportion turned towards it, is necessarily somewhat darker. Again, itmay be that
 you see the details of these rounded masses from thelower side, while the sun shines on the upper side and as they aren
ot so situated as to reflect the light of the sun, as in the firstinstance they remain dark.The black clouds which are o
ften seen higher up than those which areilluminated by the sun are shaded by other clouds, lying betweenthem and the sun
.Again, the rounded forms of the clouds that face the sun, show theiredges dark because they lie against the light backg
round; and to seethat this is true, you may look at the top of any cloud that iswholly light because it lies against the
 blue of the atmosphere,which is darker than the cloud.[Footnote: A drawing in red chalk from the Windsor collection (se
ePl. XXIX), representing a landscape with storm-clouds, may serve toillustrate this section as well as the following one
.]477.OF CLOUDS, SMOKE AND DUST AND THE FLAMES OF A FURNACE OR OF ABURNING KILN.The clouds do not show their rounded for
ms excepting on the sideswhich face the sun; on the others the roundness is imperceptiblebecause they are in the shade.
[Footnote: The text of this chapteris given in facsimile on Pls. XXXVI and XXXVII. The two halves ofthe leaf form but on
e in the original. On the margin close to lines4 and 5 is the note: _rossore d'aria inverso l'orizonte_--(of theredness
of the atmosphere near the horizon). The sketches on thelower portion of the page will be spoken of in No. 668.]If the s
un is in the East and the clouds in the West, the eye placedbetween the sun and the clouds sees the edges of the rounded
 formscomposing these clouds as dark, and the portions which aresurrounded by this dark [edge] are light. And this occur
s becausethe edges of the rounded forms of these clouds are turned towardsthe upper or lateral sky, which is reflected i
n them.Both the cloud and the tree display no roundness at all on theirshaded side.On images reflected in water.478.Pain
ters often deceive themselves, by representing water in whichthey make the water reflect the objects seen by the man. Bu
t thewater reflects the object from one side and the man sees it from theother; and it often happens that the painter se
es an object frombelow, and thus one and the same object is seen from hind partbefore and upside down, because the water
 shows the image of theobject in one way, and the eye sees it in another.Of rainbows and rain (479. 480).479.The colours
 in the middle of the rainbow mingle together.The bow in itself is not in the rain nor in the eye that sees it;though it
 is generated by the rain, the sun, and the eye. Therainbow is always seen by the eye that is between the rain and thebo
dy of the sun; hence if the sun is in the East and the rain is inthe West it will appear on the rain in the West.480.Whe
n the air is condensed into rain it would produce a vacuum if therest of the air did not prevent this by filling its pla
ce, as itdoes with a violent rush; and this is the wind which rises in thesummer time, accompanied by heavy rain.Of flow
er seeds.481.All the flowers which turn towards the sun perfect their seeds; butnot the others; that is to say those whi
ch get only the reflectionof the sun.IX._The Practice of Painting.__It is hardly necessary to offer any excuses for the
divisioncarried out in the arrangement of the text into practicalsuggestions and theoretical enquiries. It was evidently
 intended byLeonardo himself as we conclude from incidental remarks in the MSS.(for instance No_ 110_). The fact that th
is arrangement was nevercarried out either in the old MS. copies or in any edition since, iseasily accounted for by the
general disorder which results from theprovisional distribution of the various chapters in the old copies.We have every
reason to believe that the earliest copyists, indistributing the materials collected by them, did not in the leastconsid
er the order in which the original MS.lay before them.__It is evident that almost all the chapters which refer to thecal
ling and life of the painter--and which are here brought togetherin the first section (Nos._ 482-508_)--may be referred
to twodistinct periods in Leonardo's life; most of them can be dated asbelonging to the year_ 1492 _or to_ 1515. _At abo
ut this later timeLeonardo may have formed the project of completing his Libro dellaPittura, after an interval of some y
ears, as it would seem, duringwhich his interest in the subject had fallen somewhat into thebackground.__In the second s
ection, which treats first of the artist's studio,the construction of a suitable window forms the object of carefulinves
tigations; the special importance attached to this by Leonardois sufficiently obvious. His theory of the incidence of li
ght whichwas fully discussed in a former part of this work, was to him by nomeans of mere abstract value, but, being ded
uced, as he says, fromexperience (or experiment) was required to prove its utility inpractice. Connected with this we fi
nd suggestions for the choice ofa light with practical hints as to sketching a picture and someother precepts of a pract
ical character which must come underconsideration in the course of completing the painting. In all thisI have followed t
he same principle of arrangement in the text as wascarried out in the Theory of Painting, thus the suggestions for thePe
rspective of a picture, (Nos._ 536-569_), are followed by thetheory of light and shade for the practical method of optic
s (Nos._548--566_) and this by the practical precepts or the treatment ofaerial perspective (_567--570_).__In the passag
e on Portrait and Figure Painting the principles ofpainting as applied to a bust and head are separated and placedfirst,
 since the advice to figure painters must have some connectionwith the principles of the treatment of composition by whi
ch theyare followed.__But this arrangement of the text made it seem advisable not to pickout the practical precepts as t
o the representation of trees andlandscape from the close connection in which they were originallyplaced--unlike the res
t of the practical precepts--with the theoryof this branch of the subject. They must therefore be sought underthe sectio
n entitled Botany for Painters.__As a supplement to the_ Libro di Pittura _I have here added thosetexts which treat of t
he Painter's materials,--as chalk, drawingpaper, colours and their preparation, of the management of oils andvarnishes;
in the appendix are some notes on chemical substances.Possibly some of these, if not all, may have stood in connectionwi
th the preparation of colours. It is in the very nature of thingsthat Leonardo's incidental indications as to colours an
d the likeshould be now-a-days extremely obscure and could only be explainedby professional experts--by them even in but
 few instances. It mighttherefore have seemed advisable to reproduce exactly the originaltext without offering any trans
lation. The rendering here given ismerely an attempt to suggest what Leonardo's meaning may have been.__LOMAZZO tells us
 in his_ Trattato dell'arte della Pittura, Sculturaed Architettura (Milano 1584, libro II, Cap. XIV): "Va discorrendoed
argomentando Leonardo Vinci in un suo libro letto da me (?)questi anni passati, ch'egli scrisse di mano stanca ai priegh
i diLUDOVICO SFORZA duca di Milano, in determinazione di questaquestione, se e piu nobile la pittura o la scultura; dice
ndo chequanto piu un'arte porta seco fatica di corpo, e sudore, tanto piu evile, e men pregiata". _But the existence of
any book speciallywritten for Lodovico il Moro on the superiority of Painting oversculpture is perhaps mythical. The var
ious passages in praise ofPainting as compared not merely with Sculpture but with Poetry, arescattered among MSS. of ver
y different dates.__Besides, the way, in which the subject is discussed appears not tosupport the supposition, that thes
e texts were prepared at a specialrequest of the Duke._I.MORAL PRECEPTS FOR THE STUDENT OF PAINTING.How to ascertain the
 dispositions for an artistic career.482.A WARNING CONCERNING YOUTHS WISHING TO BE PAINTERS.Many are they who have a tas
te and love for drawing, but no talent;and this will be discernible in boys who are not diligent and neverfinish their d
rawings with shading.The course of instruction for an artist (483-485).483.The youth should first learn perspective, the
n the proportions ofobjects. Then he may copy from some good master, to accustom himselfto fine forms. Then from nature,
 to confirm by practice the rules hehas learnt. Then see for a time the works of various masters. Thenget the habit of p
utting his art into practice and work.[Footnote: The Vatican copy and numerous abridgements all place thischapter at the
 beginning of the _Trattato_, and in consequenceDUFRESNE and all subsequent editors have done the same. In theVatican co
py however all the general considerations on the relationof painting to the other arts are placed first, as introductory
.]484.OF THE ORDER OF LEARNING TO DRAW.First draw from drawings by good masters done from works of art andfrom nature, a
nd not from memory; then from plastic work, with theguidance of the drawing done from it; and then from good naturalmode
ls and this you must put into practice.485.PRECEPTS FOR DRAWING.The artist ought first to exercise his hand by copying d
rawings fromthe hand of a good master. And having acquired that practice, underthe criticism of his master, he should ne
xt practise drawing objectsin relief of a good style, following the rules which will presentlybe given.The study of the
antique (486. 487).486.OF DRAWING.Which is best, to draw from nature or from the antique? and which ismore difficult to
do outlines or light and shade?487.It is better to imitate [copy] the antique than modern work.[Footnote 486, 487: These
 are the only two passages in whichLeonardo alludes to the importance of antique art in the training ofan artist. The qu
estion asked in No. 486 remains unanswered by himand it seems to me very doubtful whether the opinion stated in No.487 i
s to be regarded as a reply to it. This opinion stands in theMS. in a connection--as will be explained later on--which s
eems torequire us to limit its application to a single special case. At anyrate we may suspect that when Leonardo put th
e question, he feltsome hesitation as to the answer. Among his very numerous drawings Ihave not been able to find a sing
le study from the antique, though adrawing in black chalk, at Windsor, of a man on horseback (PI.LXXIII) may perhaps be
a reminiscence of the statue of MarcusAurelius at Rome. It seems to me that the drapery in a pen and inkdrawing of a bus
t, also at Windsor, has been borrowed from anantique model (Pl. XXX). G. G. Rossi has, I believe, correctlyinterpreted L
eonardo's feeling towards the antique in the followingnote on this passage in manzi's edition, p. 501: "Sappiamo dallast
oria, che i valorosi artisti Toscani dell'et├ι dell'oro dell'artestudiarono sugli antichi marmi raccolti dal Magnifico L
ORENZO DE'MEDICI. Pare che il Vinci a tali monumenti non si accostasse. Quest'uomo sempre riconosce per maestra la natur
a, e questo principio lostringeva alla sola imitazione d├υ essa"--Compare No. 10, 26--28footnote.]The necessity of anato
mical knowledge (488. 489).488.OF PAINTING.It is indispensable to a Painter who would be thoroughly familiarwith the lim
bs in all the positions and actions of which they arecapable, in the nude, to know the anatomy of the sinews, bones,musc
les and tendons so that, in their various movements andexertions, he may know which nerve or muscle is the cause of each
movement and show those only as prominent and thickened, and not theothers all over [the limb], as many do who, to seem
greatdraughtsmen, draw their nude figures looking like wood, devoid ofgrace; so that you would think you were looking at
 a sack of walnutsrather than the human form, or a bundle of radishes rather than themuscles of figures.489.HOW IT IS NE
CESSARY TO A PAINTER THAT HE SHOULD KNOW THE INTRINSICFORMS [STRUCTURE] OF MAN.The painter who is familiar with the natu
re of the sinews, muscles,and tendons, will know very well, in giving movement to a limb, howmany and which sinews cause
 it; and which muscle, by swelling,causes the contraction of that sinew; and which sinews, expandedinto the thinnest car
tilage, surround and support the said muscle.Thus he will variously and constantly demonstrate the differentmuscles by m
eans of the various attitudes of his figures, and willnot do, as many who, in a variety of movements, still display thev
ery same things [modelling] in the arms, back, breast and legs. Andthese things are not to be regarded as minor faults.H
ow to acquire practice.490.OF STUDY AND THE ORDER OF STUDY.I say that first you ought to learn the limbs and their mecha
nism,and having this knowledge, their actions should come next, accordingto the circumstances in which they occur in man
. And thirdly tocompose subjects, the studies for which should be taken from naturalactions and made from time to time,
as circumstances allow; and payattention to them in the streets and _piazze_ and fields, and notethem down with a brief
indication of the forms; [Footnote 5: Lines5-7 explained by the lower portion of the sketch No. 1 on Pl. XXXI.]thus for
a head make an o, and for an arm a straight or a bent line,and the same for the legs and the body, [Footnote 7: Lines 5-
7explained by the lower portion of the sketch No. 1 on Pl. XXXI.] andwhen you return home work out these notes in a comp
lete form. TheAdversary says that to acquire practice and do a great deal of workit is better that the first period of s
tudy should be employed indrawing various compositions done on paper or on walls by diversmasters, and that in this way
practice is rapidly gained, and goodmethods; to which I reply that the method will be good, if it isbased on works of go
od composition and by skilled masters. But sincesuch masters are so rare that there are but few of them to be found,it i
s a surer way to go to natural objects, than to those which areimitated from nature with great deterioration, and so for
m badmethods; for he who can go to the fountain does not go to thewater-jar.[Footnote: This passage has been published b
y Dr. M. JORDAN, _DasMalerbuck des L. da Vinci_, p. 89; his reading however variesslightly from mine.]Industry and thoro
ughness the first conditions (491-493.)491.WHAT RULES SHOULD BE GIVEN TO BOYS LEARNING TO PAINT.We know for certain that
 sight is one of the most rapid actions wecan perform. In an instant we see an infinite number of forms, stillwe only ta
ke in thoroughly one object at a time. Supposing that you,Reader, were to glance rapidly at the whole of this written pa
ge,you would instantly perceive that it was covered with variousletters; but you could not, in the time, recognise what
the letterswere, nor what they were meant to tell. Hence you would need to seethem word by word, line by line to be able
 to understand theletters. Again, if you wish to go to the top of a building you mustgo up step by step; otherwise it wi
ll be impossible that you shouldreach the top. Thus I say to you, whom nature prompts to pursue thisart, if you wish to
have a sound knowledge of the forms of objectsbegin with the details of them, and do not go on to the second[step] till
you have the first well fixed in memory and in practice.And if you do otherwise you will throw away your time, or certai
nlygreatly prolong your studies. And remember to acquire diligencerather than rapidity.492.HOW THAT DILIGENCE [ACCURACY]
 SHOULD FIRST BE LEARNT RATHER THANRAPID EXECUTION.If you, who draw, desire to study well and to good purpose, alwaysgo
slowly to work in your drawing; and discriminate in. the lights,which have the highest degree of brightness, and to what
 extent andlikewise in the shadows, which are those that are darker than theothers and in what way they intermingle; the
n their masses and therelative proportions of one to the other. And note in theiroutlines, which way they tend; and whic
h part of the lines is curvedto one side or the other, and where they are more or lessconspicuous and consequently broad
 or fine; and finally, that yourlight and shade blend without strokes and borders [but] looking likesmoke. And when you
have thus schooled your hand and your judgmentby such diligence, you will acquire rapidity before you are aware.The arti
st's private life and choice of company (493-494).493.OF THE LIFE OF THE PAINTER IN THE COUNTRY.A painter needs such mat
hematics as belong to painting. And theabsence of all companions who are alienated from his studies; hisbrain must be ea
sily impressed by the variety of objects, whichsuccessively come before him, and also free from other cares[Footnote 6:
Leonardo here seems to be speaking of his own method ofwork as displayed in his MSS. and this passage explains, at least
 inpart, the peculiarities in their arrangement.]. And if, whenconsidering and defining one subject, a second subjectint
ervenes--as happens when an object occupies the mind, then hemust decide which of these cases is the more difficult to w
ork out,and follow that up until it becomes quite clear, and then work outthe explanation of the other [Footnote 11: Leo
nardo here seems to bespeaking of his own method of work as displayed in his MSS. and thispassage explains, at least in
part, the peculiarities in theirarrangement.]. And above all he must keep his mind as clear as thesurface of a mirror, w
hich assumes colours as various as those ofthe different objects. And his companions should be like him as totheir studi
es, and if such cannot be found he should keep hisspeculations to himself alone, so that at last he will find no moreuse
ful company [than his own].[Footnote: In the title line Leonardo had originally written _delpictore filosofo_ (the philo
sophical painter), but he himself struckout_filosofo_. Compare in No. 363 _pictora notomista_ (anatomicalpainter). The o
riginal text is partly reproduced on Pl. CI.]494.OF THE LIFE OF THE PAINTER IN HIS STUDIO.To the end that well-being of
the body may not injure that of themind, the painter or draughtsman must remain solitary, andparticularly when intent on
 those studies and reflections which willconstantly rise up before his eye, giving materials to be wellstored in the mem
ory. While you are alone you are entirely your own[master] and if you have one companion you are but half your own,and t
he less so in proportion to the indiscretion of his behaviour.And if you have many companions you will fall deeper into
the sametrouble. If you should say: "I will go my own way and withdrawapart, the better to study the forms of natural ob
jects", I tellyou, you will not be able to help often listening to their chatter.And so, since one cannot serve two mast
ers, you will badly fill thepart of a companion, and carry out your studies of art even worse.And if you say: "I will wi
thdraw so far that their words cannotreach me and they cannot disturb me", I can tell you that you willbe thought mad. B
ut, you see, you will at any rate be alone. And ifyou must have companions ship find it in your studio. This mayassist y
ou to have the advantages which arise from variousspeculations. All other company may be highly mischievous.The distribu
tion of time for studying (495-497).495.OF WHETHER IT IS BETTER TO DRAW WITH COMPANIONS OR NOT.I say and insist that dra
wing in company is much better than alone,for many reasons. The first is that you would be ashamed to be seenbehindhand
among the students, and such shame will lead you tocareful study. Secondly, a wholesome emulation will stimulate you tob
e among those who are more praised than yourself, and this praiseof others will spur you on. Another is that you can lea
rn from thedrawings of others who do better than yourself; and if you arebetter than they, you can profit by your contem
pt for their defects,while the praise of others will incite you to farther merits.[Footnote: The contradiction by this p
assage of the foregoingchapter is only apparent. It is quite clear, from the nature of thereasoning which is here used t
o prove that it is more improving towork with others than to work alone, that the studies of pupils onlyare under consid
eration here.]496.OF STUDYING, IN THE DARK, WHEN YOU WAKE, OR IN BED BEFORE YOU GO TOSLEEP.I myself have proved it to be
 of no small use, when in bed in thedark, to recall in fancy the external details of forms previouslystudied, or other n
oteworthy things conceived by subtle speculation;and this is certainly an admirable exercise, and useful forimpressing t
hings on the memory.497.OF THE TIME FOR STUDYING SELECTION OF SUBJECTS.Winter evenings ought to be employed by young stu
dents in lookingover the things prepared during the summer; that is, all thedrawings from the nude done in the summer sh
ould be brought togetherand a choice made of the best [studies of] limbs and bodies amongthem, to apply in practice and
commit to memory.OF POSITIONS.After this in the following summer you should select some one who iswell grown and who has
 not been brought up in doublets, and so maynot be of stiff carriage, and make him go through a number of agileand grace
ful actions; and if his muscles do not show plainly withinthe outlines of his limbs that does not matter at all. It is e
noughthat you can see good attitudes and you can correct [the drawing of]the limbs by those you studied in the winter.[F
ootnote: An injunction to study in the evening occurs also in No.524.]On the productive power of minor artists (498-501)
.498.He is a poor disciple who does not excel his master.499.Nor is the painter praiseworthy who does but one thing well
, as thenude figure, heads, draperies, animals, landscapes or other suchdetails, irrespective of other work; for there c
an be no mind soinept, that after devoting itself to one single thing and doing itconstantly, it should fail to do it we
ll.[Footnote: In MANZI'S edition (p. 502) the painter G. G. Bossiindignantly remarks on this passage. "_Parla il Vince i
n questoluogo come se tutti gli artisti avessero quella sublimita d'ingegnocapace di abbracciare tutte le cose, di cui e
ra egli dotato"_ And hethen mentions the case of CLAUDE LORRAIN. But he overlooks the factthat in Leonardo's time landsc
ape painting made no pretensions toindependence but was reckoned among the details (_particulari_,lines 3, 4).]500.THAT
A PAINTER IS NOT ADMIRABLE UNLESS HE IS UNIVERSAL.Some may distinctly assert that those persons are under a delusionwho
call that painter a good master who can do nothing well but ahead or a figure. Certainly this is no great achievement; a
fterstudying one single thing for a life-time who would not haveattained some perfection in it? But, since we know that
paintingembraces and includes in itself every object produced by nature orresulting from the fortuitous actions of men,
in short, all that theeye can see, he seems to me but a poor master who can only do afigure well. For do you not perceiv
e how many and various actionsare performed by men only; how many different animals there are, aswell as trees, plants,
flowers, with many mountainous regions andplains, springs and rivers, cities with public and privatebuildings, machines,
 too, fit for the purposes of men, diverscostumes, decorations and arts? And all these things ought to beregarded as of
equal importance and value, by the man who can betermed a good painter.501.OF THE MISERABLE PRETENCES MADE BY THOSE WHO
FALSELY AND UNWORTHILYACQUIRE THE NAME OF PAINTERS.Now there is a certain race of painters who, having studied butlittle
, must need take as their standard of beauty mere gold andazure, and these, with supreme conceit, declare that they will
 notgive good work for miserable payment, and that they could do as wellas any other if they were well paid. But, ye foo
lish folks! cannotsuch artists keep some good work, and then say: this is a costlywork and this more moderate and this i
s average work and show thatthey can work at all prices?A caution against one-sided study.502.HOW, IN IMPORTANT WORKS, A
 MAN SHOULD NOT TRUST ENTIRELY TO HISMEMORY WITHOUT CONDESCENDING TO DRAW FROM NATURE.Any master who should venture to b
oast that he could remember allthe forms and effects of nature would certainly appear to me to begraced with extreme ign
orance, inasmuch as these effects areinfinite and our memory is not extensive enough to retain them.Hence, O! painter, b
eware lest the lust of gain should supplant inyou the dignity of art; for the acquisition of glory is a muchgreater thin
g than the glory of riches. Hence, for these and otherreasons which might be given, first strive in drawing to represent
your intention to the eye by expressive forms, and the ideaoriginally formed in your imagination; then go on taking out
orputting in, until you have satisfied yourself. Then have living men,draped or nude, as you may have purposed in your w
ork, and take carethat in dimensions and size, as determined by perspective, nothingis left in the work which is not in
harmony with reason and theeffects in nature. And this will be the way to win honour in yourart.How to acquire universal
ity (503-506).503.OF VARIETY IN THE FIGURES.The painter should aim at universality, because there is a greatwant of self
-respect in doing one thing well and another badly, asmany do who study only the [rules of] measure and proportion in th
enude figure and do not seek after variety; for a man may be wellproportioned, or he may be fat and short, or tall and t
hin, ormedium. And a painter who takes no account of these varieties alwaysmakes his figures on one pattern so that they
 might all be taken forbrothers; and this is a defect that demands stern reprehension.504.HOW SOMETHING MAY BE LEARNT EV
ERYWHERE.Nature has beneficently provided that throughout the world you mayfind something to imitate.505.OF THE MEANS OF
 ACQUIRING UNIVERSALITY.It is an easy matter to men to acquire universality, for allterrestrial animals resemble each ot
her as to their limbs, that isin their muscles, sinews and bones; and they do not vary exceptingin length or in thicknes
s, as will be shown under Anatomy. But thenthere are aquatic animals which are of great variety; I will not tryto convin
ce the painter that there is any rule for them for they areof infinite variety, and so is the insect tribe.506.PAINTING.
The mind of the painter must resemble a mirror, which always takesthe colour of the object it reflects and is completely
 occupied bythe images of as many objects as are in front of it. Therefore youmust know, Oh Painter! that you cannot be
a good one if you are notthe universal master of representing by your art every kind of formproduced by nature. And this
 you will not know how to do if you donot see them, and retain them in your mind. Hence as you go throughthe fields, tur
n your attention to various objects, and, in turnlook now at this thing and now at that, collecting a store of diversfac
ts selected and chosen from those of less value. But do not dolike some painters who, when they are wearied with exercis
ing theirfancy dismiss their work from their thoughts and take exercise inwalking for relaxation, but still keep fatigue
 in their mind which,though they see various objects [around them], does not apprehendthem; but, even when they meet fri
ends or relations and are salutedby them, although they see and hear them, take no more cognisance ofthem than if they h
ad met so much empty air.Useful games and exercises (507. 508).507.OF GAMES TO BE PLAYED BY THOSE WHO DRAW.When, Oh drau
ghtsmen, you desire to find relaxation in games youshould always practise such things as may be of use in yourprofession
, by giving your eye good practice in judging accuratelyof the breadth and length of objects. Thus, to accustom your min
d tosuch things, let one of you draw a straight line at random on awall, and each of you, taking a blade of grass or of
straw in hishand, try to cut it to the length that the line drawn appears to himto be, standing at a distance of 10 brac
cia; then each one may go upto the line to measure the length he has judged it to be. And he whohas come nearest with hi
s measure to the length of the pattern isthe best man, and the winner, and shall receive the prize you havesettled befor
ehand. Again you should take forshortened measures:that is take a spear, or any other cane or reed, and fix on a pointat
 a certain distance; and let each one estimate how many times hejudges that its length will go into that distance. Again
, who willdraw best a line one braccio long, which shall be tested by athread. And such games give occasion to good prac
tice for the eye,which is of the first importance in painting.508.A WAY OF DEVELOPING AND AROUSING THE MIND TO VARIOUS I
NVENTIONS.I cannot forbear to mention among these precepts a new device forstudy which, although it may seem but trivial
 and almost ludicrous,is nevertheless extremely useful in arousing the mind to variousinventions. And this is, when you
look at a wall spotted withstains, or with a mixture of stones, if you have to devise somescene, you may discover a rese
mblance to various landscapes,beautified with mountains, rivers, rocks, trees, plains, widevalleys and hills in varied a
rrangement; or again you may seebattles and figures in action; or strange faces and costumes, and anendless variety of o
bjects, which you could reduce to complete andwell drawn forms. And these appear on such walls confusedly, likethe sound
 of bells in whose jangle you may find any name or word youchoose to imagine.II.THE ARTIST'S STUDIO.--INSTRUMENTS AND HE
LPS FOR THE APPLICATION OFPERSPECTIVE.--ON JUDGING OF A PICTURE.On the size of the studio.509.Small rooms or dwellings d
iscipline the mind, large ones weaken it.On the construction of windows (510-512).510.The larger the wall the less the l
ight will be.511.The different kinds of light afforded in cellars by various forms ofwindows. The least useful and the c
oldest is the window at _a_. Themost useful, the lightest and warmest and most open to the sky isthe window at _b_. The
window at _c_ is of medium utility.[Footnote: From a reference to the notes on the right light forpainting it becomes ev
ident that the observations made oncellar-windows have a direct bearing on the construction of thestudio-window. In the
diagram _b_ as well as in that under No. 510the window-opening is reduced to a minimum, but only, it would seem,in order
 to emphasize the advantage of walls constructed on the planthere shown.]512.OF THE PAINTER'S WINDOW AND ITS ADVANTAGE.T
he painter who works from nature should have a window, which he canraise and lower. The reason is that sometimes you wil
l want tofinish a thing you are drawing, close to the light.Let _a b c d_ be the chest on which the work may be raised o
rlowered, so that the work moves up and down and not the painter. Andevery evening you can let down the work and shut it
 up above so thatin the evening it may be in the fashion of a chest which, when shutup, may serve the purpose of a bench
.[Footnote: See Pl. XXXI, No. 2. In this plate the lines haveunfortunately lost their sharpness, for the accidental loss
 of thenegative has necessitated a reproduction from a positive. But havingformerly published this sketch by another pro
cess, in VON LUTZOW'S_Zeitschrift fur bildende Kunst_ (Vol. XVII, pg. 13) I havereproduced it here in the text. The shar
pness of the outline in theoriginal sketch is here preserved but it gives it from the reversedside.]On the best light fo
r painting (513-520).513.Which light is best for drawing from nature; whether high or low, orlarge or small, or strong a
nd broad, or strong and small, or broadand weak or small and weak?[Footnote: The question here put is unanswered in the
original MS.]514.OF THE QUALITY OF THE LIGHT.A broad light high up and not too strong will render the details ofobjects
very agreeable.515.THAT THE LIGHT FOR DRAWING FROM NATURE SHOULD BE HIGH UP.The light for drawing from nature should com
e from the North inorder that it may not vary. And if you have it from the South, keepthe window screened with cloth, so
 that with the sun shining thewhole day the light may not vary. The height of the light should beso arranged as that eve
ry object shall cast a shadow on the groundof the same length as itself.516.THE KIND OF LIGHT REQUISITE FOR PAINTING LIG
HT AND SHADE.An object will display the greatest difference of light and shadewhen it is seen in the strongest light, as
 by sunlight, or, atnight, by the light of a fire. But this should not be much used inpainting because the works remain
crude and ungraceful.An object seen in a moderate light displays little difference in thelight and shade; and this is th
e case towards evening or when theday is cloudy, and works then painted are tender and every kind offace becomes gracefu
l. Thus, in every thing extremes are to beavoided: Too much light gives crudeness; too little prevents ourseeing. The me
dium is best.OF SMALL LIGHTS.Again, lights cast from a small window give strong differences oflight and shade, all the m
ore if the room lighted by it be large,and this is not good for painting.517.PAINTING.The luminous air which enters by p
assing through orifices in wallsinto dark rooms will render the place less dark in proportion as theopening cuts into th
e walls which surround and cover in thepavement.518.OF THE QUALITY OF LIGHT.In proportion to the number of times that _a
 b_ goes into _c d_ willit be more luminous than _c d_. And similarly, in proportion as thepoint _e_ goes into _c d_ wil
l it be more luminous than _c d;_ andthis light is useful for carvers of delicate work. [Footnote 5: Forthe same reason
a window thus constructed would be convenient for anilluminator or a miniature painter.][Footnote: M. RAVAISSON in his e
dition of the Paris MS. A remarks onthis passage: _"La figure porte les lettres_ f _et_ g, _auxquellesrien ne renvoie da
ns l'explication; par consequent, cetteexplication est incomplete. La figure semblerait, d'ailleurs, serapporter a l'eff
et de la reflexion par un miroir concave."_ So faras I can see the text is not imperfect, nor is the sense obscure. Itis
 hardly necessary to observe that _c d_ here indicate the wall ofthe room opposite to the window _e_ and the semicircle
described by_f g_ stands for the arch of the sky; this occurs in variousdiagrams, for example under 511. A similar semic
ircle, Pl III, No. 2(and compare No. 149) is expressly called '_orizonte_' in writing.]519.That the light should fall up
on a picture from one window only. Thismay be seen in the case of objects in this form. If you want torepresent a round
ball at a certain height you must make it oval inthis shape, and stand so far off as that by foreshortening itappears ro
und.520.OF SELECTING THE LIGHT WHICH GIVES MOST GRACE TO FACES.If you should have a court yard that you can at pleasure
cover witha linen awning that light will be good. Or when you want to take aportrait do it in dull weather, or as evenin
g falls, making thesitter stand with his back to one of the walls of the court yard.Note in the streets, as evening fall
s, the faces of the men andwomen, and when the weather is dull, what softness and delicacy youmay perceive in them. Henc
e, Oh Painter! have a court arranged withthe walls tinted black and a narrow roof projecting within thewalls. It should
be 10 braccia wide and 20 braccia long and 10braccia high and covered with a linen awning; or else paint a worktowards e
vening or when it is cloudy or misty, and this is a perfectlight.On various helps in preparing a picture (521-530).521.T
o draw a nude figure from nature, or any thing else, hold in yourhand a plumb-line to enable you to judge of the relativ
e positionof objects.522.OF DRAWING AN OBJECT.When you draw take care to set up a principal line which you mustobserve a
ll throughout the object you are drawing; every thingshould bear relation to the direction of this principal line.523.OF
 A MODE OF DRAWING A PLACE ACCURATELY.Have a piece of glass as large as a half sheet of royal folio paperand set thus fi
rmly in front of your eyes that is, between your eyeand the thing you want to draw; then place yourself at a distance of
2/3 of a braccia from the glass fixing your head with a machine insuch a way that you cannot move it at all. Then shut o
r entirelycover one eye and with a brush or red chalk draw upon the glass thatwhich you see beyond it; then trace it on
paper from the glass,afterwards transfer it onto good paper, and paint it if you like,carefully attending to the arial p
erspective.HOW TO LEARN TO PLACE YOUR FIGURES CORRECTLY.If you want to acquire a practice of good and correct attitudes
foryour figures, make a square frame or net, and square it out withthread; place this between your eye and the nude mode
l you aredrawing, and draw these same squares on the paper on which you meanto draw the figure, but very delicately. The
n place a pellet of waxon a spot of the net which will serve as a fixed point, which,whenever you look at your model, mu
st cover the pit of the throat;or, if his back is turned, it may cover one of the vertebrae of theneck. Thus these threa
ds will guide you as to each part of the bodywhich, in any given attitude will be found below the pit of thethroat, or t
he angles of the shoulders, or the nipples, or hips andother parts of the body; and the transverse lines of the net will
show you how much the figure is higher over the leg on which it isposed than over the other, and the same with the hips,
 and the kneesand the feet. But always fix the net perpendicularly so that all thedivisions that you see the model divid
ed into by the net workcorrespond with your drawing of the model on the net work you havesketched. The squares you draw
may be as much smaller than those ofthe net as you wish that your figure should be smaller than nature.Afterwards rememb
er when drawing figures, to use the rule of thecorresponding proportions of the limbs as you have learnt it fromthe fram
e and net. This should be 3 braccia and a half high and 3braccia wide; 7 braccia distant from you and 1 braccio from the
model.[Footnote: Leonardo is commonly credited with the invention of thearrangement of a plate of glass commonly known a
s the "verticalplane." Professor E. VON BRUCKE in his _"Bruchstucke aus der Theorieder bildenden Kunste,"_ Leipzig 1877,
 pg. 3, writes on thiscontrivance. _"Unsere Glastafel ist die sogenannte Glastafel desLeonardo da Vinci, die in Gestalt
einer Glastafel vorgestellteBildflache."_]524.A METHOD OF DRAWING AN OBJECT IN RELIEF AT NIGHT.Place a sheet of not too
transparent paper between the relievo andthe light and you can draw thus very well.[Footnote: Bodies thus illuminated wi
ll show on the surface of thepaper how the copyist has to distribute light and shade.]525.If you want to represent a fig
ure on a wall, the wall beingforeshortened, while the figure is to appear in its proper form, andas standing free from t
he wall, you must proceed thus: have a thinplate of iron and make a small hole in the centre; this hole must beround. Se
t a light close to it in such a position as that it shinesthrough the central hole, then place any object or figure you
pleaseso close to the wall that it touches it and draw the outline of theshadow on the wall; then fill in the shade and
add the lights; placethe person who is to see it so that he looks through that same holewhere at first the light was; an
d you will never be able to persuadeyourself that the image is not detached from the wall.[Footnote: _uno piccolo spirac
elo nel mezzo_. M. RAVAISSON, in hisedition of MS. A (Paris), p. 52, reads _nel muro_--evidently amistake for _nel mezzo
_ which is quite plainly written; and hetranslates it _"fait lui une petite ouverture dans le mur,"_ addingin a note: _"
les mots 'dans le mur' paraissent etre de trop.Leonardo a du les ecrire par distraction"_ But _'nel mezzo'_ isclearly le
gible even on the photograph facsimile given by Ravaissonhimself, and the objection he raises disappears at once. It is
notalways wise or safe to try to prove our author's absence of mind orinadvertence by apparent difficulties in the sense
 or connection ofthe text.]526.TO DRAW A FIGURE ON A WALL 12 BRACCIA HIGH WHICH SHALL LOOK 24BRACCIA HIGH.If you wish to
 draw a figure or any other object to look 24 bracciahigh you must do it in this way. First, on the surface _m r_ drawha
lf the man you wish to represent; then the other half; then put onthe vault _m n_ [the rest of] the figure spoken of abo
ve; first setout the vertical plane on the floor of a room of the same shape asthe wall with the coved part on which you
 are to paint your figure.Then, behind it, draw a figure set out in profile of whatever sizeyou please, and draw lines f
rom it to the point _f_ and, as theselines cut _m n_ on the vertical plane, so will the figure come onthe wall, of which
 the vertical plane gives a likeness, and you willhave all the [relative] heights and prominences of the figure. Andthe
breadth or thickness which are on the upright wall _m n_ are tobe drawn in their proper form, since, as the wall recedes
 the figurewill be foreshortened by itself; but [that part of] the figure whichgoes into the cove you must foreshorten,
as if it were standingupright; this diminution you must set out on a flat floor and theremust stand the figure which is
to be transferred from the verticalplane _r n_[Footnote 17: _che leverai dalla pariete r n_. Theletters refer to the lar
ger sketch, No. 3 on Pl. XXXI.] in its realsize and reduce it once more on a vertical plane; and this will be agood meth
od [Footnote 18: Leonardo here says nothing as to how theimage foreshortened by perspective and thus produced on the ver
ticalplane is to be transferred to the wall; but from what is said inNos. 525 and 523 we may conclude that he was famili
ar with theprocess of casting the enlarged shadow of a squaring net on thesurface of a wall to guide him in drawing the
figure._Pariete di rilieuo; "sur une parai en relief"_ (RAVAISSON). _"Aufeiner Schnittlinie zum Aufrichten"_ (LUDWIG). T
he explanation ofthis puzzling expression must be sought in No. 545, lines 15-17.].[Footnote: See Pl. XXXI. 3. The secon
d sketch, which in the plate isincomplete, is here reproduced and completed from the original toillustrate the text. In
the original the larger diagram is placedbetween lines 5 and 6.1. 2. C. A. 157a; 463a has the similar heading: '_del cre
sscieredella figura_', and the text begins: "_Se voli fare 1a figuragrande_ b c" but here it breaks off. The translation
 here givenrenders the meaning of the passage as I think it must be understood.The MS. is perfectly legible and the cons
truction of the sentence issimple and clear; difficulties can only arise from the very fullnessof the meaning, particula
rly towards the end of the passage.]527.If you would to draw a cube in an angle of a wall, first draw theobject in its o
wn proper shape and raise it onto a vertical planeuntil it resembles the angle in which the said object is to berepresen
ted.528.Why are paintings seen more correctly in a mirror than out of it?529.HOW THE MIRROR IS THE MASTER [AND GUIDE] OF
 PAINTERS.When you want to see if your picture corresponds throughout with theobjects you have drawn from nature, take a
 mirror and look in thatat the reflection of the real things, and compare the reflectedimage with your picture, and cons
ider whether the subject of the twoimages duly corresponds in both, particularly studying the mirror.You should take the
 mirror for your guide--that is to say a flatmirror--because on its surface the objects appear in many respectsas in a p
ainting. Thus you see, in a painting done on a flatsurface, objects which appear in relief, and in the mirror--also afla
t surface--they look the same. The picture has one plane surfaceand the same with the mirror. The picture is intangible,
 in so faras that which appears round and prominent cannot be grasped in thehands; and it is the same with the mirror. A
nd since you can seethat the mirror, by means of outlines, shadows and lights, makesobjects appear in relief, you, who h
ave in your colours far strongerlights and shades than those in the mirror, can certainly, if youcompose your picture we
ll, make that also look like a natural scenereflected in a large mirror.[Footnote: I understand the concluding lines of
this passage asfollows: If you draw the upper half a figure on a large sheet ofpaper laid out on the floor of a room (_s
ala be piana_) to the samescale (_con le sue vere grosseze_) as the lower half, already drawnupon the wall (lines 10, 11
)you must then reduce them on a '_parietedi rilievo_,' a curved vertical plane which serves as a model toreproduce the f
orm of the vault.]530.OF JUDGING YOUR OWN PICTURES.We know very well that errors are better recognised in the works ofot
hers than in our own; and that often, while reproving littlefaults in others, you may ignore great ones in yourself. To
avoidsuch ignorance, in the first place make yourself a master ofperspective, then acquire perfect knowledge of the prop
ortions ofmen and other animals, and also, study good architecture, that is sofar as concerns the forms of buildings and
 other objects which areon the face of the earth; these forms are infinite, and the betteryou know them the more admirab
le will your work be. And in caseswhere you lack experience do not shrink from drawing them fromnature. But, to carry ou
t my promise above [in the title]--I saythat when you paint you should have a flat mirror and often look atyour work as
reflected in it, when you will see it reversed, and itwill appear to you like some other painter's work, so you will beb
etter able to judge of its faults than in any other way. Again, itis well that you should often leave off work and take
a littlerelaxation, because, when you come back to it you are a betterjudge; for sitting too close at work may greatly d
eceive you. Again,it is good to retire to a distance because the work looks smallerand your eye takes in more of it at a
 glance and sees more easilythe discords or disproportion in the limbs and colours of theobjects.On the management of wo
rks (531. 532).531.OF A METHOD OF LEARNING WELL BY HEART.When you want to know a thing you have studied in your memorypr
oceed in this way: When you have drawn the same thing so manytimes that you think you know it by heart, test it by drawi
ng itwithout the model; but have the model traced on flat thin glass andlay this on the drawing you have made without th
e model, and notecarefully where the tracing does not coincide with your drawing, andwhere you find you have gone wrong;
 and bear in mind not to repeatthe same mistakes. Then return to the model, and draw the part inwhich you were wrong aga
in and again till you have it well in yourmind. If you have no flat glass for tracing on, take some very thinkidts-kin p
archment, well oiled and dried. And when you have used itfor one drawing you can wash it clean with a sponge and make as
econd.532.THAT A PAINTER OUGHT TO BE CURIOUS TO HEAR THE OPINIONS OF EVERY ONEON HIS WORK.Certainly while a man is paint
ing he ought not to shrink fromhearing every opinion. For we know very well that a man, though hemay not be a painter, i
s familiar with the forms of other men andvery capable of judging whether they are hump backed, or have oneshoulder high
er or lower than the other, or too big a mouth or nose,and other defects; and, as we know that men are competent to judg
eof the works of nature, how much more ought we to admit that theycan judge of our errors; since you know how much a man
 may bedeceived in his own work. And if you are not conscious of this inyourself study it in others and profit by their
faults. Therefore becurious to hear with patience the opinions of others, consider andweigh well whether those who find
fault have ground or not forblame, and, if so amend; but, if not make as though you had notheard, or if he should be a m
an you esteem show him by argument thecause of his mistake.On the limitations of painting (533-535)533.HOW IN SMALL OBJE
CTS ERRORS ARE LESS EVIDENT THAN IN LARGE ONES.In objects of minute size the extent of error is not so perceptibleas in
large ones; and the reason is that if this small object is arepresentation of a man or of some other animal, from the im
mensediminution the details cannot be worked out by the artist with thefinish that is requisite. Hence it is not actuall
y complete; and,not being complete, its faults cannot be determined. For instance:Look at a man at a distance of 300 bra
ccia and judge attentivelywhether he be handsome or ugly, or very remarkable or of ordinaryappearance. You will find tha
t with the utmost effort you cannotpersuade yourself to decide. And the reason is that at such adistance the man is so m
uch diminished that the character of thedetails cannot be determined. And if you wish to see how much thisman is diminis
hed [by distance] hold one of your fingers at a span'sdistance from your eye, and raise or lower it till the top jointto
uches the feet of the figure you are looking at, and you will seean incredible reduction. For this reason we often doubt
 as to theperson of a friend at a distance.534.WHY A PAINTING CAN NEVER APPEAR DETACHED AS NATURAL OBJECTS DO.Painters o
ften fall into despair of imitating nature when they seetheir pictures fail in that relief and vividness which objects h
avethat are seen in a mirror; while they allege that they have colourswhich for brightness or depth far exceed the stren
gth of light andshade in the reflections in the mirror, thus displaying their ownignorance rather than the real cause, b
ecause they do not know it.It is impossible that painted objects should appear in such reliefas to resemble those reflec
ted in the mirror, although both are seenon a flat surface, unless they are seen with only one eye; and thereason is tha
t two eyes see one object behind another as _a_ and _b_see _m_ and _n_. _m_ cannot exactly occupy [the space of] _n_beca
use the base of the visual lines is so broad that the secondbody is seen beyond the first. But if you close one eye, as
at _s_the body _f_ will conceal _r_, because the line of sight proceedsfrom a single point and makes its base in the fir
st body, whence thesecond, of the same size, can never be seen.[Footnote: This passage contains the solution of the prob
lemproposed in No. 29, lines 10-14. Leonardo was evidently familiarwith the law of optics on which the construction of t
he stereoscopedepends. Compare E. VON BRUCKE, _Bruchstucke aus der Theorie derbildenden Kunste_, pg. 69: "_Schon Leonard
o da Vinci wusste, dassein noch so gut gemaltes Bild nie den vollen Eindruck derKorperlichkeit geben kann, wie ihn die N
atur selbst giebt. Ererklart dies auch in Kap. LIII und Kap. CCCXLI_ (ed. DU FRESNE)_des_ 'Trattato' _in sachgemasser We
ise aus dem Sehen mit beidenAugen_."Chap. 53 of DU FRESNE'S edition corresponds to No. 534 of thiswork.]535.WHY OF TWO O
BJECTS OF EQUAL SIZE A PAINTED ONE WILL LOOK LARGER THANA SOLID ONE.The reason of this is not so easy to demonstrate as
many others.Still I will endeavour to accomplish it, if not wholly, at any ratein part. The perspective of diminution de
monstrates by reason, thatobjects diminish in proportion as they are farther from the eye, andthis reasoning is confirme
d by experience. Hence, the lines of sightthat extend between the object and the eye, when they are directedto the surfa
ce of a painting are all intersected at uniform limits,while those lines which are directed towards a piece of sculpture
are intersected at various limits and are of various lengths. Thelines which are longest extend to a more remote limb th
an the othersand therefore that limb looks smaller. As there are numerous lineseach longer than the others--since there
are numerous parts, eachmore remote than the others and these, being farther off,necessarily appear smaller, and by appe
aring smaller it follows thattheir diminution makes the whole mass of the object look smaller.But this does not occur in
 painting; since the lines of sight allend at the same distance there can be no diminution, hence the partsnot being dim
inished the whole object is undiminished, and for thisreason painting does not diminish, as a piece of sculpture does.On
 the choice of a position (536-537)536.HOW HIGH THE POINT OF SIGHT SHOULD BE PLACED.The point of sight must be at the le
vel of the eye of an ordinaryman, and the farthest limit of the plain where it touches the skymust be placed at the leve
l of that line where the earth and skymeet; excepting mountains, which are independent of it.537.OF THE WAY TO DRAW FIGU
RES FOR HISTORICAL PICTURES.The painter must always study on the wall on which he is to picturea story the height of the
 position where he wishes to arrange hisfigures; and when drawing his studies for them from nature he mustplace himself
with his eye as much below the object he is drawingas, in the picture, it will have to be above the eye of thespectator.
 Otherwise the work will look wrong.The apparent size of figures in a picture (538-539)538.OF PLACING A FIGURE IN THE FO
REGROUND OF A HISTORICAL PICTURE.You must make the foremost figure in the picture less than the sizeof nature in proport
ion to the number of braccia at which you placeit from the front line, and make the others in proportion by theabove rul
e.539.PERSPECTIVE.You are asked, O Painter, why the figures you draw on a small scaleaccording to the laws of perspectiv
e do not appear--notwithstandingthe demonstration of distance--as large as real ones--their heightbeing the same as in t
hose painted on the wall.And why [painted] objects seen at a small distance appear largerthan the real ones?The right po
sition of the artist, when painting, and of thespectator (540-547)540.OF PAINTING.When you draw from nature stand at a d
istance of 3 times the heightof the object you wish to draw.541.OF DRAWING FROM RELIEF.In drawing from the round the dra
ughtsman should so place himselfthat the eye of the figure he is drawing is on a level with his own.This should be done
with any head he may have to represent fromnature because, without exception, the figures or persons you meetin the stre
ets have their eyes on the same level as your own; and ifyou place them higher or lower you will see that your drawing w
illnot be true.542.WHY GROUPS OF FIGURES ONE ABOVE ANOTHER ARE TO BE AVOIDED.The universal practice which painters adopt
 on the walls of chapelsis greatly and reasonably to be condemned. Inasmuch as theyrepresent one historical subject on o
ne level with a landscape andbuildings, and then go up a step and paint another, varying thepoint [of sight], and then a
 third and a fourth, in such a way asthat on one wall there are 4 points of sight, which is supreme follyin such painter
s. We know that the point of sight is opposite theeye of the spectator of the scene; and if you would [have me] tellyou
how to represent the life of a saint divided into severalpictures on one and the same wall, I answer that you must set o
utthe foreground with its point of sight on a level with the eye ofthe spectator of the scene, and upon this plane repre
sent the moreimportant part of the story large and then, diminishing by degreesthe figures, and the buildings on various
 hills and open spaces, youcan represent all the events of the history. And on the remainder ofthe wall up to the top pu
t trees, large as compared with thefigures, or angels if they are appropriate to the story, or birds orclouds or similar
 objects; otherwise do not trouble yourself with itfor your whole work will be wrong.543.A PICTURE OF OBJECTS IN PERSPEC
TIVE WILL LOOK MORE LIFELIKE WHENSEEN FROM THE POINT FROM WHICH THE OBJECTS WERE DRAWN.If you want to represent an objec
t near to you which is to have theeffect of nature, it is impossible that your perspective should notlook wrong, with ev
ery false relation and disagreement of proportionthat can be imagined in a wretched work, unless the spectator, whenhe l
ooks at it, has his eye at the very distance and height anddirection where the eye or the point of sight was placed in d
oingthis perspective. Hence it would be necessary to make a window, orrather a hole, of the size of your face through wh
ich you can lookat the work; and if you do this, beyond all doubt your work, if itis correct as to light and shade, will
 have the effect of nature;nay you will hardly persuade yourself that those objects arepainted; otherwise do not trouble
 yourself about it, unless indeedyou make your view at least 20 times as far off as the greatestwidth or height of the o
bjects represented, and this will satisfyany spectator placed anywhere opposite to the picture.If you want the proof bri
efly shown, take a piece of wood in theform of a little column, eight times as high as it is thick, like acolumn without
 any plinth or capital; then mark off on a flat wall40 equal spaces, equal to its width so that between them they make40
 columns resembling your little column; you then must fix,opposite the centre space, and at 4 braccia from the wall, a t
hinstrip of iron with a small round hole in the middle about as largeas a big pearl. Close to this hole place a light to
uching it. Thenplace your column against each mark on the wall and draw the outlineof its shadow; afterwards shade it an
d look through the hole in theiron plate.[Footnote: In the original there is a wide space between lines 3 and4 in which
we find two sketches not belonging to the text. It isunnecessary to give prominence to the points in which my readingdif
fers from that of M. RAVAISSON or to justify myself, since theyare all of secondary importance and can also be immediate
ly verifiedfrom the photograph facsimile in his edition.]544.A diminished object should be seen from the same distance,
heightand direction as the point of sight of your eye, or else yourknowledge will produce no good effect.And if you will
 not, or cannot, act on this principle--because asthe plane on which you paint is to be seen by several persons youwould
 need several points of sight which would make it lookdiscordant and wrong--place yourself at a distance of at least 10t
imes the size of the objects.The lesser fault you can fall into then, will be that ofrepresenting all the objects in the
 foreground of their proper size,and on whichever side you are standing the objects thus seen willdiminish themselves wh
ile the spaces between them will have nodefinite ratio. For, if you place yourself in the middle of astraight row [of ob
jects], and look at several columns arranged in aline you will see, beyond a few columns separated by intervals, thatthe
 columns touch; and beyond where they touch they cover eachother, till the last column projects but very little beyond t
he lastbut one. Thus the spaces between the columns are by degrees entirelylost. So, if your method of perspective is go
od, it will produce thesame effect; this effect results from standing near the line inwhich the columns are placed. This
 method is not satisfactory unlessthe objects seen are viewed from a small hole, in the middle ofwhich is your point of
sight; but if you proceed thus your work willbe perfect and will deceive the beholder, who will see the columnsas they a
re here figured.Here the eye is in the middle, at the point _a_ and near to thecolumns.[Footnote: The diagram which stan
ds above this chapter in theoriginal with the note belonging to it: "a b _e la ripruova_" (_a b_is the proof) has obviou
sly no connection with the text. The secondsketch alone is reproduced and stands in the original between lines22 and 23.
]545.If you cannot arrange that those who look at your work should standat one particular point, when constructing your
work, stand backuntil your eye is at least 20 times as far off as the greatestheight and width of your work. This will m
ake so little differencewhen the eye of the spectator moves, that it will be hardlyappreciable, and it will look very go
od.If the point of sight is at _t_ you would make the figures on thecircle _d b e_ all of one size, as each of them bear
s the samerelation to the point _t_. But consider the diagram given below andyou will see that this is wrong, and why I
shall make _b_ smallerthan _d e_ [Footnote 8: The second diagram of this chapter stands inthe original between lines 8 a
nd 9.].It is easy to understand that if 2 objects equal to each other areplaced side by side the one at 3 braccia distan
ce looks smaller thanthat placed at 2 braccia. This however is rather theoretical thanfor practice, because you stand cl
ose by [Footnote 11: Instead of'_se preso_' (=_sie presso_) M. RAVAISSON reads '_sempre se_' whichgives rise to the unme
aning rendering: '_parceque toujours_ ...'].All the objects in the foreground, whether large or small, are to bedrawn of
 their proper size, and if you see them from a distance theywill appear just as they ought, and if you see them close th
ey willdiminish of themselves.[Footnote 15: Compare No. 526 line 18.] Take care that the verticalplan on which you work
out the perspective of the objects seen is ofthe same form as the wall on which the work is to be executed.546.OF PAINTI
NG.The size of the figures represented ought to show you the distancethey are seen from. If you see a figure as large as
 nature you knowit appears to be close to the eye.547.WHERE A SPECTATOR SHOULD STAND TO LOOK AT A PICTURE.Supposing _a b
_ to be the picture and _d_ to be the light, I saythat if you place yourself between _c_ and _e_ you will notunderstand
the picture well and particularly if it is done in oils,or still more if it is varnished, because it will be lustrous an
dsomewhat of the nature of a mirror. And for this reason the neareryou go towards the point _c_, the less you will see,
because therays of light falling from the window on the picture are reflectedto that point. But if you place yourself be
tween _e_ and _d_ youwill get a good view of it, and the more so as you approach thepoint _d_, because that spot is leas
t exposed to these reflectedrays of light.III.THE PRACTICAL METHODS OF LIGHT AND SHADE AND AERIAL PERSPECTIVE.Gradations
 of light and shade.548.OF PAINTING: OF THE DARKNESS OF THE SHADOWS, OR I MAY SAY, THEBRIGHTNESS OF THE LIGHTS.Although
practical painters attribute to all shaded objects--trees,fields, hair, beards and skin--four degrees of darkness in eac
hcolour they use: that is to say first a dark foundation, secondly aspot of colour somewhat resembling the form of the d
etails, thirdlya somewhat brighter and more defined portion, fourthly the lightswhich are more conspicuous than other pa
rts of the figure; still tome it appears that these gradations are infinite upon a continuoussurface which is in itself
infinitely divisible, and I prove itthus:--[Footnote 7: See Pl. XXXI, No. 1; the two upper sketches.]Let _a g_ be a cont
inuous surface and let _d_ be the light whichilluminates it; I say--by the 4th [proposition] which says that thatside of
 an illuminated body is most highly lighted which is nearestto the source of light--that therefore _g_ must be darker th
an _c_in proportion as the line _d g_ is longer than the line _d c_, andconsequently that these gradations of light--or
rather of shadow,are not 4 only, but may be conceived of as infinite, because _c d_is a continuous surface and every con
tinuous surface is infinitelydivisible; hence the varieties in the length of lines extendingbetween the light and the il
luminated object are infinite, and theproportion of the light will be the same as that of the length ofthe lines between
 them; extending from the centre of the luminousbody to the surface of the illuminated object.On the choice of light for
 a picture (549-554).549.HOW THE PAINTER MUST PLACE HIMSELF WITH REFERENCE TO THE LIGHT, TOGIVE THE EFFECT OF RELIEF.Let
 _a b_ be the window, _m_ the point of light. I say that onwhichever side the painter places himself he will be well pla
ced ifonly his eye is between the shaded and the illuminated portions ofthe object he is drawing; and this place you wil
l find by puttingyourself between the point _m_ and the division between the shadowand the light on the object to be dra
wn.550.THAT SHADOWS CAST BY A PARTICULAR LIGHT SHOULD BE AVOIDED, BECAUSETHEY ARE EQUALLY STRONG AT THE ENDS AND AT THE
BEGINNING.The shadows cast by the sun or any other particular light have not apleasing effect on the body to which they
belong, because the partsremain confuse, being divided by distinct outlines of light andshade. And the shadows are of eq
ual strength at the end and at thebeginning.551.HOW LIGHT SHOULD BE THROWN UPON FIGURES.The light must be arranged in ac
cordance with the natural conditionsunder which you wish to represent your figures: that is, if yourepresent them in the
 sunshine make the shadows dark with largespaces of light, and mark their shadows and those of all thesurrounding object
s strongly on the ground. And if you representthem as in dull weather give little difference of light and shade,without
any shadows at their feet. If you represent them as withindoors, make a strong difference between the lights and shadows
, withshadows on the ground. If the window is screened and the wallswhite, there will be little difference of light. If
it is lighted byfirelight make the high lights ruddy and strong, and the shadowsdark, and those cast on the walls and on
 the floor will be clearlydefined and the farther they are from the body the broader andlonger will they be. If the ligh
t is partly from the fire and partlyfrom the outer day, that of day will be the stronger and that of thefire almost as r
ed as fire itself. Above all see that the figuresyou paint are broadly lighted and from above, that is to say allliving
persons that you paint; for you will see that all the peopleyou meet out in the street are lighted from above, and you m
ust knowthat if you saw your most intimate friend with a light [on his face]from below you would find it difficult to re
cognise him.552.OF HELPING THE APPARENT RELIEF OF A PICTURE BY GIVING IT ARTIFICIALLIGHT AND SHADE.To increase relief of
 a picture you may place, between your figureand the solid object on which its shadow falls, a line of brightlight, divi
ding the figure from the object in shadow. And on thesame object you shall represent two light parts which will surround
the shadow cast upon the wall by the figure placed opposite [6]; anddo this frequently with the limbs which you wish sho
uld stand outsomewhat from the body they belong to; particularly when the armscross the front of the breast show, betwee
n the shadow cast by thearms on the breast and the shadow on the arms themselves, a littlelight seeming to fall through
a space between the breast and thearms; and the more you wish the arm to look detached from the breastthe broader you mu
st make the light; always contrive also to arrangethe figures against the background in such a way as that the partsin s
hadow are against a light background and the illuminatedportions against a dark background.[Footnote 6: Compare the two
diagrams under No. 565.]553.OF SITUATION.Remember [to note] the situation of your figures; for the light andshade will b
e one thing if the object is in a dark place with aparticular light, and another thing if it is in a light place withdir
ect sunlight; one thing in a dark place with a diffused eveninglight or a cloudy sky, and another in the diffused light
of theatmosphere lighted by the sun.554.OF THE JUDGMENT TO BE MADE OF A PAINTER'S WORK.First you must consider whether t
he figures have the relief requiredby their situation and the light which illuminates them; for theshadows should not be
 the same at the extreme ends of thecomposition as in the middle, because it is one thing when figuresare surrounded by
shadows and another when they have shadows only onone side. Those which are in the middle of the picture aresurrounded b
y shadows, because they are shaded by the figures whichstand between them and the light. And those are lighted on one si
deonly which stand between the principal group and the light, becausewhere they do not look towards the light they face
the group and thedarkness of the group is thrown on them: and where they do not facethe group they face the brilliant li
ght and it is their own darknessshadowing them, which appears there.In the second place observe the distribution or arra
ngement offigures, and whether they are distributed appropriately to thecircumstances of the story. Thirdly, whether the
 figures areactively intent on their particular business.555.OF THE TREATMENT OF THE LIGHTS.First give a general shadow
to the whole of that extended part whichis away from the light. Then put in the half shadows and the strongshadows, comp
aring them with each other and, in the same way givethe extended light in half tint, afterwards adding the half lightsan
d the high lights, likewise comparing them together.The distribution of light and shade (556-559)556.OF SHADOWS ON BODIE
S.When you represent the dark shadows in bodies in light and shade,always show the cause of the shadow, and the same wit
h reflections;because the dark shadows are produced by dark objects and thereflections by objects only moderately lighte
d, that is withdiminished light. And there is the same proportion between thehighly lighted part of a body and the part
lighted by a reflectionas between the origin of the lights on the body and the origin ofthe reflections.557.OF LIGHTS AN
D SHADOWS.I must remind you to take care that every portion of a body, andevery smallest detail which is ever so little
in relief, must begiven its proper importance as to light and shade.558.OF THE WAY TO MAKE THE SHADOW ON FIGURES CORRESP
OND TO THE LIGHT ANDTO [THE COLOUR] OF THE BODY.When you draw a figure and you wish to see whether the shadow is theprop
er complement to the light, and neither redder nor yellower thanis the nature of the colour you wish to represent in sha
de, proceedthus. Cast a shadow with your finger on the illuminated portion, andif the accidental shadow that you have ma
de is like the naturalshadow cast by your finger on your work, well and good; and byputting your finger nearer or farthe
r off, you can make darker orlighter shadows, which you must compare with your own.559.OF SURROUNDING BODIES BY VARIOUS
FORMS OF SHADOW.Take care that the shadows cast upon the surface of the bodies bydifferent objects must undulate accordi
ng to the various curves ofthe limbs which cast the shadows, and of the objects on which theyare cast.The juxtaposition
of light and shade (560, 561).560.ON PAINTING.The comparison of the various qualities of shadows and lights notinfrequen
tly seems ambiguous and confused to the painter who desiresto imitate and copy the objects he sees. The reason is this:
If yousee a white drapery side by side with a black one, that part of thewhite drapery which lies against the black one
will certainly lookmuch whiter than the part which lies against something whiter thanitself. [Footnote: It is evident fr
om this that so early as in 1492Leonardo's writing in perspective was so far advanced that he couldquote his own stateme
nts.--As bearing on this subject compare whatis said in No. 280.] And the reason of this is shown in my [book on]perspec
tive.561.OF SHADOWS.Where a shadow ends in the light, note carefully where it is paleror deeper and where it is more or
less indistinct towards the light;and, above all, in [painting] youthful figures I remind you not tomake the shadow end
like a stone, because flesh has a certaintransparency, as may be seen by looking at a hand held between theeye and the s
un, which shines through it ruddy and bright. Place themost highly coloured part between the light and shadow. And to se
ewhat shadow tint is needed on the flesh, cast a shadow on it withyour finger, and according as you wish to see it light
er or darkerhold your finger nearer to or farther from your picture, and copythat [shadow].On the lighting of the backgr
ound (562-565).562.OF THE BACKGROUNDS FOR PAINTED FIGURES.The ground which surrounds the forms of any object you paint s
houldbe darker than the high lights of those figures, and lighter thantheir shadowed part: &c.563.OF THE BACKGROUND THAT
 THE PAINTER SHOULD ADOPT IN HIS WORKS.Since experience shows us that all bodies are surrounded by lightand shade it is
necessary that you, O Painter, should so arrangethat the side which is in light shall terminate against a dark bodyand l
ikewise that the shadow side shall terminate against a lightbody. And by [following] this rule you will add greatly to t
herelief of your figures.564.A most important part of painting consists in the backgrounds of theobjects represented; ag
ainst these backgrounds the outlines ofthose natural objects which are convex are always visible, and alsothe forms of t
hese bodies against the background, even though thecolours of the bodies should be the same as that of the background.Th
is is caused by the convex edges of the objects not beingilluminated in the same way as, by the same light, the backgrou
nd isilluminated, since these edges will often be lighter or darker thanthe background. But if the edge is of the same c
olour as thebackground, beyond a doubt it will in that part of the pictureinterfere with your perception of the outline,
 and such a choice ina picture ought to be rejected by the judgment of good painters,inasmuch as the purpose of the pain
ter is to make his figures appeardetached from the background; while in the case here described thecontrary occurs, not
only in the picture, but in the objectsthemselves.565.That you ought, when representing objects above the eye and on one
side--if you wish them to look detached from the wall--to show,between the shadow on the object and the shadow it casts
a middlelight, so that the body will appear to stand away from the wall.On the lighting of white objects.566.HOW WHITE B
ODIES SHOULD BE REPRESENTED.If you are representing a white body let it be surrounded by amplespace, because as white ha
s no colour of its own, it is tinged andaltered in some degree by the colour of the objects surrounding it.If you see a
woman dressed in white in the midst of a landscape,that side which is towards the sun is bright in colour, so much sotha
t in some portions it will dazzle the eyes like the sun itself;and the side which is towards the atmosphere,--luminous t
hroughbeing interwoven with the sun's rays and penetrated by them--sincethe atmosphere itself is blue, that side of the
woman's figure willappear steeped in blue. If the surface of the ground about her bemeadows and if she be standing betwe
en a field lighted up by the sunand the sun itself, you will see every portion of those folds whichare towards the meado
w tinged by the reflected rays with the colourof that meadow. Thus the white is transmuted into the colours of thelumino
us and of the non-luminous objects near it.The methods of aerial (567--570).567.WHY FACES [SEEN] AT A DISTANCE LOOK DARK
.We see quite plainly that all the images of visible objects that liebefore us, whether large or small, reach our sense
by the minuteaperture of the eye; and if, through so small a passage the imagecan pass of the vast extent of sky and ear
th, the face of aman--being by comparison with such large images almost nothing byreason of the distance which diminishe
s it,--fills up so little ofthe eye that it is indistinguishable. Having, also, to betransmitted from the surface to the
 sense through a dark medium,that is to say the crystalline lens which looks dark, this image,not being strong in colour
 becomes affected by this darkness on itspassage, and on reaching the sense it appears dark; no other reasoncan in any w
ay be assigned. If the point in the eye is black, it isbecause it is full of a transparent humour as clear as air and ac
tslike a perforation in a board; on looking into it it appears darkand the objects seen through the bright air and a dar
k one becomeconfused in this darkness.WHY A MAN SEEN AT A CERTAIN DISTANCE IS NOT RECOGNISABLE.The perspective of diminu
tion shows us that the farther away anobject is the smaller it looks. If you look at a man at a distancefrom you of an a
rrow's flight, and hold the eye of a small needleclose to your own eye, you can see through it several men whoseimages a
re transmitted to the eye and will all be comprised withinthe size of the needle's eye; hence, if the man who is at thed
istance of an arrow's flight can send his whole image to your eye,occupying only a small space in the needle's eye how c
an you[expect] in so small a figure to distinguish or see the nose ormouth or any detail of his person? and, not seeing
these you cannotrecognise the man, since these features, which he does not show, arewhat give men different aspects.568.
THE REASON WHY SMALL FIGURES SHOULD NOT BE MADE FINISHED.I say that the reason that objects appear diminished in size is
because they are remote from the eye; this being the case it isevident that there must be a great extent of atmosphere b
etween theeye and the objects, and this air interferes with the distinctnessof the forms of the object. Hence the minute
 details of theseobjects will be indistinguishable and unrecognisable. Therefore, OPainter, make your smaller figures me
rely indicated and not highlyfinished, otherwise you will produce effects the opposite to nature,your supreme guide. The
 object is small by reason of the greatdistance between it and the eye, this great distance is filled withair, that mass
 of air forms a dense body which intervenes andprevents the eye seeing the minute details of objects.569.Whenever a figu
re is placed at a considerable distance you losefirst the distinctness of the smallest parts; while the larger partsare
left to the last, losing all distinctness of detail and outline;and what remains is an oval or spherical figure with con
fused edges.570.OF PAINTING.The density of a body of smoke looks white below the horizon whileabove the horizon it is da
rk, even if the smoke is in itself of auniform colour, this uniformity will vary according to the varietyin the ground o
n which it is seen.IV.OF PORTRAIT AND FIGURE PAINTING.Of sketching figures and portraits (571-572).571.OF THE WAY TO LEA
RN TO COMPOSE FIGURES [IN GROUPS] IN HISTORICALPICTURES.When you have well learnt perspective and have by heart the part
sand forms of objects, you must go about, and constantly, as you go,observe, note and consider the circumstances and beh
aviour of men intalking, quarrelling or laughing or fighting together: the action ofthe men themselves and the actions o
f the bystanders, who separatethem or who look on. And take a note of them with slight strokesthus, in a little book whi
ch you should always carry with you. Andit should be of tinted paper, that it may not be rubbed out, butchange the old [
when full] for a new one; since these things shouldnot be rubbed out but preserved with great care; for the forms, andpo
sitions of objects are so infinite that the memory is incapable ofretaining them, wherefore keep these [sketches] as you
r guides andmasters.[Footnote: Among Leonardo's numerous note books of pocket size notone has coloured paper, so no sket
ches answering to this descriptioncan be pointed out. The fact that most of the notes are written inink, militates again
st the supposition that they were made in theopen air.]572.OF A METHOD OF KEEPING IN MIND THE FORM OF A FACE.If you want
 to acquire facility for bearing in mind the expressionof a face, first make yourself familiar with a variety of [forms
of]several heads, eyes, noses, mouths, chins and cheeks and necks andshoulders: And to put a case: Noses are of 10 types
: straight,bulbous, hollow, prominent above or below the middle, aquiline,regular, flat, round or pointed. These hold go
od as to profile. Infull face they are of 11 types; these are equal thick in the middle,thin in the middle, with the tip
 thick and the root narrow, ornarrow at the tip and wide at the root; with the nostrils wide ornarrow, high or low, and
the openings wide or hidden by the point;and you will find an equal variety in the other details; whichthings you must d
raw from nature and fix them in your mind. Or else,when you have to draw a face by heart, carry with you a little bookin
 which you have noted such features; and when you have cast aglance at the face of the person you wish to draw, you can
look, inprivate, which nose or mouth is most like, or there make a littlemark to recognise it again at home. Of grotesqu
e faces I need saynothing, because they are kept in mind without difficulty.The position of the head.573.HOW YOU SHOULD
SET TO WORK TO DRAW A HEAD OF WHICH ALL THE PARTSSHALL AGREE WITH THE POSITION GIVEN TO IT.To draw a head in which the f
eatures shall agree with the turn andbend of the head, pursue this method. You know that the eyes,eyebrows, nostrils, co
rners of the mouth, and sides of the chin, thejaws, cheeks, ears and all the parts of a face are squarely andstraightly
set upon the face.[Footnote: Compare the drawings and the text belonging to them onPl. IX. (No. 315), Pl. X (No. 316), P
l. XL (No. 318) and Pl. XII.(No. 319).]Therefore when you have sketched the face draw lines passing fromone corner of th
e eye to the other; and so for the placing of eachfeature; and after having drawn the ends of the lines beyond the twosi
des of the face, look if the spaces inside the same parallel lineson the right and on the left are equal [12]. But be su
re to rememberto make these lines tend to the point of sight.[Footnote: See Pl. XXXI, No. 4, the slight sketch on the le
ft handside. The text of this passage is written by the side of it. In thissketch the lines seem intentionally incorrect
 and converging to theright (compare I. 12) instead of parallel. Compare too with thistext the drawing in red chalk from
 Windsor Castle which isreproduced on Pl. XL, No. 2.]Of the light on the face (574-576).574.HOW TO KNOW WHICH SIDE OF AN
 OBJECT IS TO BE MORE OR LESS LUMINOUSTHAN THE OTHER.Let _f_ be the light, the head will be the object illuminated by it
and that side of the head on which the rays fall most directly willbe the most highly lighted, and those parts on which
the rays fallmost aslant will be less lighted. The light falls as a blow might,since a blow which falls perpendicularly
falls with the greatestforce, and when it falls obliquely it is less forcible than theformer in proportion to the width
of the angle. _Exempli gratia_ ifyou throw a ball at a wall of which the extremities are equally farfrom you the blow wi
ll fall straight, and if you throw the ball atthe wall when standing at one end of it the ball will hit itobliquely and
the blow will not tell.[Footnote: See Pl. XXXI. No. 4; the sketch on the right hand side.]575.THE PROOF AND REASON WHY A
MONG THE ILLUMINATED PARTS CERTAINPORTIONS ARE IN HIGHER LIGHT THAN OTHERS.Since it is proved that every definite light
is, or seems to be,derived from one single point the side illuminated by it will haveits highest light on the portion wh
ere the line of radiance fallsperpendicularly; as is shown above in the lines _a g_, and also in_a h_ and in _l a_; and
that portion of the illuminated side will beleast luminous, where the line of incidence strikes it between twomore dissi
milar angles, as is seen at _b c d_. And by this means youmay also know which parts are deprived of light as is seen at
_m k_.Where the angles made by the lines of incidence are most equal therewill be the highest light, and where they are
most unequal it willbe darkest.I will make further mention of the reason of reflections.[Footnote: See Pl. XXXII. The te
xt, here given complete, is on theright hand side. The small circles above the beginning of lines 5and 11 as well as the
 circle above the text on Pl. XXXI, are in apaler ink and evidently added by a later hand in order todistinguish the tex
t as belonging to the _Libro di Pittura_ (seeProlegomena. No. 12, p. 3). The text on the left hand side of thispage is g
iven as Nos. 577 and 137.]576.Where the shadow should be on the face.General suggestions for historical pictures (577-58
1).577.When you compose a historical picture take two points, one the pointof sight, and the other the source of light;
and make this asdistant as possible.578.Historical pictures ought not to be crowded and confused with toomany figures.57
9.PRECEPTS IN PAINTING.Let you sketches of historical pictures be swift and the working outof the limbs not be carried t
oo far, but limited to the position ofthe limbs, which you can afterwards finish as you please and at yourleisure.[Footn
ote: See Pl. XXXVIII, No. 2. The pen and ink drawing giventhere as No. 3 may also be compared with this passage. It is i
n theWindsor collection where it is numbered 101.]580.The sorest misfortune is when your views are in advance of yourwor
k.581.Of composing historical pictures. Of not considering the limbs inthe figures in historical pictures; as many do wh
o, in the wish torepresent the whole of a figure, spoil their compositions. And whenyou place one figure behind another
take care to draw the whole ofit so that the limbs which come in front of the nearer figures maystand out in their natur
al size and place.How to represent the differences of age and sex (582-583).582.How the ages of man should be depicted:
that is, Infancy, Childhood,Youth, Manhood, Old age, Decrepitude.[Footnote: No answer is here given to this question, in
 the originalMS.]583.Old men ought to be represented with slow and heavy movements, theirlegs bent at the knees, when th
ey stand still, and their feet placedparallel and apart; bending low with the head leaning forward, andtheir arms but li
ttle extended.Women must be represented in modest attitudes, their legs closetogether, their arms closely folded, their
heads inclined andsomewhat on one side.Old women should be represented with eager, swift and furiousgestures, like infer
nal furies; but the action should be moreviolent in their arms and head than in their legs.Little children, with lively
and contorted movements when sitting,and, when standing still, in shy and timid attitudes.[Footnote: _bracci raccolte_.
Compare Pl. XXXIII. This drawing, insilver point on yellowish tinted paper, the lights heightened withwhite, represents
two female hands laid together in a lap. Above isa third finished study of a right hand, apparently holding a veilfrom t
he head across the bosom. This drawing evidently dates frombefore 1500 and was very probably done at Florence, perhaps a
s apreparatory study for some picture. The type of hand with itsslender thin forms is more like the style of the _Vierge
 auxRochers_ in the Louvre than any later works--as the Mona Lisa forinstance.]Of representing the emotions.584.THAT A F
IGURE IS NOT ADMIRABLE UNLESS IT EXPRESSES BY ITS ACTION THEPASSION OF ITS SENTIMENT.That figure is most admirable which
 by its actions best expressesthe passion that animates it.HOW AN ANGRY MAN IS TO BE FIGURED.You must make an angry pers
on holding someone by the hair, wrenchinghis head against the ground, and with one knee on his ribs; hisright arm and fi
st raised on high. His hair must be thrown up, hisbrow downcast and knit, his teeth clenched and the two corners ofhis m
outh grimly set; his neck swelled and bent forward as he leansover his foe, and full of furrows.HOW TO REPRESENT A MAN I
N DESPAIR.You must show a man in despair with a knife, having already tornopen his garments, and with one hand tearing o
pen the wound. Andmake him standing on his feet and his legs somewhat bent and hiswhole person leaning towards the earth
; his hair flying in disorder.Of representing imaginary animals.585.HOW YOU SHOULD MAKE AN IMAGINARY ANIMAL LOOK NATURAL
.You know that you cannot invent animals without limbs, each ofwhich, in itself, must resemble those of some other anima
l. Hence ifyou wish to make an animal, imagined by you, appear natural--let ussay a Dragon, take for its head that of a
mastiff or hound, with theeyes of a cat, the ears of a porcupine, the nose of a greyhound, thebrow of a lion, the temple
s of an old cock, the neck of a watertortoise.[Footnote: The sketch here inserted of two men on horseback fightinga drag
on is the facsimile of a pen and ink drawing belonging toBARON EDMOND DE ROTHSCHILD of Paris.]The selection of forms.586
.OF THE DELUSIONS WHICH ARISE IN JUDGING OF THE LIMBS.A painter who has clumsy hands will paint similar hands in hiswork
s, and the same will occur with any limb, unless long study hastaught him to avoid it. Therefore, O Painter, look carefu
lly whatpart is most ill-favoured in your own person and take particularpains to correct it in your studies. For if you
are coarse, yourfigures will seem the same and devoid of charm; and it is the samewith any part that may be good or poor
 in yourself; it will be shownin some degree in your figures.587.OF THE SELECTION OF BEAUTIFUL FACES.It seems to me to b
e no small charm in a painter when he gives hisfigures a pleasing air, and this grace, if he have it not by nature,he ma
y acquire by incidental study in this way: Look about you andtake the best parts of many beautiful faces, of which the b
eauty isconfirmed rather by public fame than by your own judgment; for youmight be mistaken and choose faces which have
some resemblance toyour own. For it would seem that such resemblances often please us;and if you should be ugly, you wou
ld select faces that were notbeautiful and you would then make ugly faces, as many painters do.For often a master's work
 resembles himself. So select beauties as Itell you, and fix them in your mind.588.Of the limbs, which ought to be caref
ully selected, and of all theother parts with regard to painting.589.When selecting figures you should choose slender on
es rather thanlean and wooden ones.590.OF THE MUSCLES OF ANIMALS.The hollow spaces interposed between the muscles must n
ot be of sucha character as that the skin should seem to cover two sticks laidside by side like _c_, nor should they see
m like two sticks somewhatremote from such contact so that the skin hangs in an empty loosecurve as at _f_; but it shoul
d be like _i_, laid over the spongy fatthat lies in the angles as the angle _n m o_; which angle is formedby the contact
 of the ends of the muscles and as the skin cannotfold down into such an angle, nature has filled up such angles witha s
mall quantity of spongy and, as I may say, vesicular fat, withminute bladders [in it] full of air, which is condensed or
 rarefiedin them according to the increase or the diminution of the substanceof the muscles; in which latter case the co
ncavity _i_ always has alarger curve than the muscle.591.OF UNDULATING MOVEMENTS AND EQUIPOISE IN FIGURES AND OTHER ANIM
ALS.When representing a human figure or some graceful animal, be carefulto avoid a wooden stiffness; that is to say make
 them move withequipoise and balance so as not to look like a piece of wood; butthose you want to represent as strong yo
u must not make so,excepting in the turn of the head.How to pose figures.592.OF GRACE IN THE LIMBS.The limbs should be a
dapted to the body with grace and withreference to the effect that you wish the figure to produce. And ifyou wish to pro
duce a figure that shall of itself look light andgraceful you must make the limbs elegant and extended, and withouttoo m
uch display of the muscles; and those few that are needed foryour purpose you must indicate softly, that is, not very pr
ominentand without strong shadows; the limbs, and particularly the armseasy; that is, none of the limbs should be in a s
traight line withthe adjoining parts. And if the hips, which are the pole of a man,are by reason of his position, placed
 so, that the right is higherthan the left, make the point of the higher shoulder in aperpendicular line above the highe
st prominence of the hip, and letthis right shoulder be lower than the left. Let the pit of thethroat always be over the
 centre of the joint of the foot on whichthe man is leaning. The leg which is free should have the knee lowerthan the ot
her, and near the other leg. The positions of the headand arms are endless and I shall therefore not enlarge on any rule
sfor them. Still, let them be easy and pleasing, with various turnsand twists, and the joints gracefully bent, that they
 may not looklike pieces of wood.Of appropriate gestures (593-600).593.A picture or representation of human figures, oug
ht to be done insuch a way as that the spectator may easily recognise, by means oftheir attitudes, the purpose in their
minds. Thus, if you have torepresent a man of noble character in the act of speaking, let hisgestures be such as natural
ly accompany good words; and, in the sameway, if you wish to depict a man of a brutal nature, give him fiercemovements;
as with his arms flung out towards the listener, and hishead and breast thrust forward beyond his feet, as if following
thespeaker's hands. Thus it is with a deaf and dumb person who, when hesees two men in conversation--although he is depr
ived ofhearing--can nevertheless understand, from the attitudes andgestures of the speakers, the nature of their discuss
ion. I once sawin Florence a man who had become deaf who, when you spoke very louddid not understand you, but if you spo
ke gently and without makingany sound, understood merely from the movement of the lips. Nowperhaps you will say that the
 lips of a man who speaks loudly do notmove like those of one speaking softly, and that if they were tomove them alike t
hey would be alike understood. As to this argument,I leave the decision to experiment; make a man speak to you gentlyand
 note [the motion of] his lips.[Footnote: The first ten lines of this text have already beenpublished, but with a slight
ly different reading by Dr. M. JORDAN:_Das Malerbuch Leonardo da Vinci's_ p. 86.]594.OF REPRESENTING A MAN SPEAKING TO A
 MULTITUDE.When you wish to represent a man speaking to a number of people,consider the matter of which he has to treat
and adapt his action tothe subject. Thus, if he speaks persuasively, let his action beappropriate to it. If the matter i
n hand be to set forth anargument, let the speaker, with the fingers of the right hand holdone finger of the left hand,
having the two smaller ones closed; andhis face alert, and turned towards the people with mouth a littleopen, to look as
 though he spoke; and if he is sitting let himappear as though about to rise, with his head forward. If yourepresent him
 standing make him leaning slightly forward with bodyand head towards the people. These you must represent as silent and
attentive, all looking at the orator's face with gestures ofadmiration; and make some old men in astonishment at the thi
ngs theyhear, with the corners of their mouths pulled down and drawn in,their cheeks full of furrows, and their eyebrows
 raised, andwrinkling the forehead where they meet. Again, some sitting withtheir fingers clasped holding their weary kn
ees. Again, some bentold man, with one knee crossed over the other; on which let him holdhis hand with his other elbow r
esting in it and the hand supportinghis bearded chin.[Footnote: The sketches introduced here are a facsimile of a pen an
dink drawing in the Louvre which Herr CARL BRUN considers as studiesfor the Last Supper in the church of _Santa Maria de
lle Grazie_ (seeLeonardo da Vinci, LXI, pp. 21, 27 and 28 in DOHME'S _Kunst undKunstler_, Leipzig, Seemann). I shall not
 here enter into anydiscussion of this suggestion; but as a justification forintroducing the drawing in this place, I ma
y point out that some ofthe figures illustrate this passage as perfectly as though they hadbeen drawn for that express p
urpose. I have discussed theprobability of a connection between this sketch and the picture ofthe Last Supper on p. 335.
 The original drawing is 27 3/4centimetres wide by 21 high.--The drawing in silver point on reddishpaper given on Pl. LI
I. No. 1--the original at Windsor Castle--mayalso serve to illustrate the subject of appropriate gestures,treated in Nos
. 593 and 594.]595.OF THE DISPOSITION OF LIMBS.As regards the disposition of limbs in movement you will have toconsider
that when you wish to represent a man who, by some chance,has to turn backwards or to one side, you must not make him mo
ve hisfeet and all his limbs towards the side to which he turns his head.Rather must you make the action proceed by degr
ees and through thedifferent joints; that is, those of the foot, the knee and the hipand the neck. And if you set him on
 the right leg, you must make theleft knee bend inwards, and let his foot be slightly raised on theoutside, and the left
 shoulder be somewhat lower than the right,while the nape of the neck is in a line directly over the outerancle of the l
eft foot. And the left shoulder will be in aperpendicular line above the toes of the right foot. And always setyour figu
res so that the side to which the head turns is not theside to which the breast faces, since nature for our convenience
hasmade us with a neck which bends with ease in many directions, theeye wishing to turn to various points, the different
 joints. And ifat any time you make a man sitting with his arms at work onsomething which is sideways to him, make the u
pper part of his bodyturn upon the hips.[Footnote: Compare Pl. VII, No. 5. The original drawing at WindsorCastle is numb
ered 104.]596.When you draw the nude always sketch the whole figure and thenfinish those limbs which seem to you the bes
t, but make them actwith the other limbs; otherwise you will get a habit of neverputting the limbs well together on the
body.Never make the head turn the same way as the torso, nor the arm andleg move together on the same side. And if the f
ace is turned to theright shoulder, make all the parts lower on the left side than onthe right; and when you turn the bo
dy with the breast outwards, ifthe head turns to the left side make the parts on the right sidehigher than those on the
left.[Footnote: In the original MS. a much defaced sketch is to be seenby the side of the second part of this chapter; i
ts faded conditionhas rendered reproduction impossible. In M. RAVAISSON'S facsimilethe outlines of the head have probabl
y been touched up. This passagehowever is fitly illustrated by the drawings on Pl. XXI.]597.OF PAINTING.Of the nature of
 movements in man. Do not repeat the same gesturesin the limbs of men unless you are compelled by the necessity oftheir
action, as is shown in _a b_.[Footnote: See Pl. V, where part of the text is also reproduced. Theeffaced figure to the e
xtreme left has evidently been cancelled byLeonardo himself as unsatisfactory.]598.The motions of men must be such as su
ggest their dignity or theirbaseness.599.OF PAINTING.Make your work carry out your purpose and meaning. That is when you
draw a figure consider well who it is and what you wish it to bedoing.OF PAINTING.With regard to any action which you gi
ve in a picture to an old manor to a young one, you must make it more energetic in the young manin proportion as he is s
tronger than the old one; and in the sameway with a young man and an infant.600.OF SETTING ON THE LIMBS.The limbs which
are used for labour must be muscular and those whichare not much used you must make without muscles and softly rounded.O
F THE ACTION OF THE FIGURES.Represent your figures in such action as may be fitted to expresswhat purpose is in the mind
 of each; otherwise your art will not beadmirable.V.SUGGESTIONS FOR COMPOSITIONS.Of painting battle pieces (601-603).601
.OF THE WAY OF REPRESENTING A BATTLE.First you must represent the smoke of artillery mingling in the airwith the dust an
d tossed up by the movement of horses and thecombatants. And this mixture you must express thus: The dust, beinga thing
of earth, has weight; and although from its fineness it iseasily tossed up and mingles with the air, it nevertheless rea
dilyfalls again. It is the finest part that rises highest; hence thatpart will be least seen and will look almost of the
 same colour asthe air. The higher the smoke mixed with the dust-laden air risestowards a certain level, the more it wil
l look like a dark cloud;and it will be seen that at the top, where the smoke is moreseparate from the dust, the smoke w
ill assume a bluish tinge and thedust will tend to its colour. This mixture of air, smoke and dustwill look much lighter
 on the side whence the light comes than onthe opposite side. The more the combatants are in this turmoil theless will t
hey be seen, and the less contrast will there be in theirlights and shadows. Their faces and figures and their appearanc
e,and the musketeers as well as those near them you must make of aglowing red. And this glow will diminish in proportion
 as it isremote from its cause.The figures which are between you and the light, if they be at adistance, will appear dar
k on a light background, and the lower partof their legs near the ground will be least visible, because therethe dust is
 coarsest and densest [19]. And if you introduce horsesgalloping outside the crowd, make the little clouds of dust dista
ntfrom each other in proportion to the strides made by the horses; andthe clouds which are furthest removed from the hor
ses, should beleast visible; make them high and spreading and thin, and the nearerones will be more conspicuous and smal
ler and denser [23]. The airmust be full of arrows in every direction, some shooting upwards,some falling, some flying l
evel. The balls from the guns must have atrain of smoke following their flight. The figures in the foregroundyou must ma
ke with dust on the hair and eyebrows and on other flatplaces likely to retain it. The conquerors you will make rushingo
nwards with their hair and other light things flying on the wind,with their brows bent down,[Footnote: 19--23. Compare 6
08. 57--75.]602.and with the opposite limbs thrust forward; that is where a man putsforward the right foot the left arm
must be advanced. And if youmake any one fallen, you must show the place where he has slippedand been dragged along the
dust into blood stained mire; and in thehalf-liquid earth arround show the print of the tramping of men andhorses who ha
ve passed that way. Make also a horse dragging the deadbody of his master, and leaving behind him, in the dust and mud,
thetrack where the body was dragged along. You must make the conqueredand beaten pale, their brows raised and knit, and
the skin abovetheir brows furrowed with pain, the sides of the nose with wrinklesgoing in an arch from the nostrils to t
he eyes, and make thenostrils drawn up--which is the cause of the lines of which Ispeak--, and the lips arched upwards a
nd discovering the upperteeth; and the teeth apart as with crying out and lamentation. Andmake some one shielding his te
rrified eyes with one hand, the palmtowards the enemy, while the other rests on the ground to supporthis half raised bod
y. Others represent shouting with their mouthsopen, and running away. You must scatter arms of all sorts among thefeet o
f the combatants, as broken shields, lances, broken swords andother such objects. And you must make the dead partly or e
ntirelycovered with dust, which is changed into crimson mire where it hasmingled with the flowing blood whose colour sho
ws it issuing in asinuous stream from the corpse. Others must be represented in theagonies of death grinding their teeth
, rolling their eyes, withtheir fists clenched against their bodies and their legs contorted.Some might be shown disarme
d and beaten down by the enemy, turningupon the foe, with teeth and nails, to take an inhuman and bitterrevenge. You mig
ht see some riderless horse rushing among the enemy,with his mane flying in the wind, and doing no little mischief withh
is heels. Some maimed warrior may be seen fallen to the earth,covering himself with his shield, while the enemy, bending
 over him,tries to deal him a deathstroke. There again might be seen a numberof men fallen in a heap over a dead horse.
You would see some of thevictors leaving the fight and issuing from the crowd, rubbing theireyes and cheeks with both ha
nds to clean them of the dirt made bytheir watering eyes smarting from the dust and smoke. The reservesmay be seen stand
ing, hopeful but cautious; with watchful eyes,shading them with their hands and gazing through the dense and murkyconfus
ion, attentive to the commands of their captain. The captainhimself, his staff raised, hurries towards these auxiliaries
,pointing to the spot where they are most needed. And there may be ariver into which horses are galloping, churning up t
he water allround them into turbulent waves of foam and water, tossed into theair and among the legs and bodies of the h
orses. And there must notbe a level spot that is not trampled with gore.603.OF LIGHTING THE LOWER PARTS OF BODIES CLOSE
TOGETHER, AS OF MEN INBATTLE.As to men and horses represented in battle, their different partswill be dark in proportion
 as they are nearer to the ground on whichthey stand. And this is proved by the sides of wells which growdarker in propo
rtion to their depth, the reason of which is that thedeepest part of the well sees and receives a smaller amount of thel
uminous atmosphere than any other part.And the pavement, if it be of the same colour as the legs of thesesaid men and ho
rses, will always be more lighted and at a moredirect angle than the said legs &c.604.OF THE WAY TO REPRESENT A NIGHT [S
CENE].That which is entirely bereft of light is all darkness; given anight under these conditions and that you want to r
epresent a nightscene,--arrange that there shall be a great fire, then the objectswhich are nearest to this fire will be
 most tinged with its colour;for those objects which are nearest to a coloured light participatemost in its nature; as t
herefore you give the fire a red colour, youmust make all the objects illuminated by it ruddy; while those whichare fart
her from the fire are more tinted by the black hue of night.The figures which are seen against the fire look dark in the
 glareof the firelight because that side of the objects which you see istinged by the darkness of the night and not by t
he fire; and thosewho stand at the side are half dark and half red; while those whoare visible beyond the edges of the f
lame will be fully lighted bythe ruddy glow against a black background. As to their gestures,make those which are near i
t screen themselves with their hands andcloaks as a defence against the intense heat, and with their facesturned away as
 if about to retire. Of those farther off representseveral as raising their hands to screen their eyes, hurt by theintol
erable glare.Of depicting a tempest (605. 606).605.Describe a wind on land and at sea. Describe a storm of rain.606.HOW
TO REPRESENT A TEMPEST.If you wish to represent a tempest consider and arrange well itseffects as seen, when the wind, b
lowing over the face of the sea andearth, removes and carries with it such things as are not fixed tothe general mass. A
nd to represent the storm accurately you mustfirst show the clouds scattered and torn, and flying with the wind,accompan
ied by clouds of sand blown up from the sea shore, andboughs and leaves swept along by the strength and fury of the blas
tand scattered with other light objects through the air. Trees andplants must be bent to the ground, almost as if they w
ould followthe course of the gale, with their branches twisted out of theirnatural growth and their leaves tossed and tu
rned about [Footnote11: See Pl. XL, No. 2.]. Of the men who are there some must havefallen to the ground and be entangle
d in their garments, and hardlyto be recognized for the dust, while those who remain standing maybe behind some tree, wi
th their arms round it that the wind may nottear them away; others with their hands over their eyes for thedust, bending
 to the ground with their clothes and hair streaming inthe wind. [Footnote 15: See Pl. XXXIV, the right hand lower sketc
h.]Let the sea be rough and tempestuous and full of foam whirled amongthe lofty waves, while the wind flings the lighter
 spray through thestormy air, till it resembles a dense and swathing mist. Of theships that are therein some should be s
hown with rent sails and thetatters fluttering through the air, with ropes broken and mastssplit and fallen. And the shi
p itself lying in the trough of the seaand wrecked by the fury of the waves with the men shrieking andclinging to the fr
agments of the vessel. Make the clouds driven bythe impetuosity of the wind and flung against the lofty mountaintops, an
d wreathed and torn like waves beating upon rocks; the airitself terrible from the deep darkness caused by the dust and
fogand heavy clouds.Of representing the deluge (607-609).607.TO REPRESENT THE DELUGE.The air was darkened by the heavy r
ain whose oblique descent drivenaslant by the rush of the winds, flew in drifts through the air nototherwise than as we
see dust, varied only by the straight lines ofthe heavy drops of falling water. But it was tinged with the colourof the
fire kindled by the thunder-bolts by which the clouds wererent and shattered; and whose flashes revealed the broad water
s ofthe inundated valleys, above which was seen the verdure of thebending tree tops. Neptune will be seen in the midst o
f the waterwith his trident, and [15] let AEolus with his winds be shownentangling the trees floating uprooted, and whir
ling in the hugewaves. The horizon and the whole hemisphere were obscure, but luridfrom the flashes of the incessant lig
htning. Men and birds might beseen crowded on the tall trees which remained uncovered by theswelling waters, originators
 of the mountains which surround thegreat abysses [Footnote 23: Compare Vol. II. No. 979.].608.OF THE DELUGE AND HOW TO
REPRESENT IT IN A PICTURE.Let the dark and gloomy air be seen buffeted by the rush of contrarywinds and dense from the c
ontinued rain mingled with hail andbearing hither and thither an infinite number of branches torn fromthe trees and mixe
d with numberless leaves. All round may be seenvenerable trees, uprooted and stripped by the fury of the winds; andfragm
ents of mountains, already scoured bare by the torrents,falling into those torrents and choking their valleys till thesw
ollen rivers overflow and submerge the wide lowlands and theirinhabitants. Again, you might have seen on many of the hil
l-topsterrified animals of different kinds, collected together and subduedto tameness, in company with men and women who
 had fled there withtheir children. The waters which covered the fields, with theirwaves were in great part strewn with
tables, bedsteads, boats andvarious other contrivances made from necessity and the fear ofdeath, on which were men and w
omen with their children amid soundsof lamentation and weeping, terrified by the fury of the winds whichwith their tempe
stuous violence rolled the waters under and over andabout the bodies of the drowned. Nor was there any object lightertha
n the water which was not covered with a variety of animalswhich, having come to a truce, stood together in a frightened
crowd--among them wolves, foxes, snakes and others--fleing fromdeath. And all the waters dashing on their shores seemed
to bebattling them with the blows of drowned bodies, blows which killedthose in whom any life remained [19]. You might h
ave seenassemblages of men who, with weapons in their hands, defended thesmall spots that remained to them against lions
, wolves and beastsof prey who sought safety there. Ah! what dreadful noises were heardin the air rent by the fury of th
e thunder and the lightnings itflashed forth, which darted from the clouds dealing ruin andstriking all that opposed its
 course. Ah! how many you might haveseen closing their ears with their hands to shut out the tremendoussounds made in th
e darkened air by the raging of the winds minglingwith the rain, the thunders of heaven and the fury of thethunder-bolts
. Others were not content with shutting their eyes, butlaid their hands one over the other to cover them the closer that
they might not see the cruel slaughter of the human race by thewrath of God. Ah! how many laments! and how many in their
 terrorflung themselves from the rocks! Huge branches of great oaks loadedwith men were seen borne through the air by th
e impetuous fury ofthe winds. How many were the boats upset, some entire, and somebroken in pieces, on the top of people
 labouring to escape withgestures and actions of grief foretelling a fearful death. Others,with desperate act, took thei
r own lives, hopeless of being able toendure such suffering; and of these, some flung themselves fromlofty rocks, others
 strangled themselves with their own hands, otherseized their own children and violently slew them at a blow; somewounde
d and killed themselves with their own weapons; others,falling on their knees recommended themselves to God. Ah! how man
ymothers wept over their drowned sons, holding them upon their knees,with arms raised spread out towards heaven and with
 words andvarious threatening gestures, upbraiding the wrath of the gods.Others with clasped hands and fingers clenched
gnawed them anddevoured them till they bled, crouching with their breast down ontheir knees in their intense and unbeara
ble anguish. Herds ofanimals were to be seen, such as horses, oxen, goats and swinealready environed by the waters and l
eft isolated on the high peaksof the mountains, huddled together, those in the middle climbing tothe top and treading on
 the others, and fighting fiercelythemselves; and many would die for lack of food. Already had thebirds begun to settle
on men and on other animals, finding no landuncovered which was not occupied by living beings, and already hadfamine, th
e minister of death, taken the lives of the greater numberof the animals, when the dead bodies, now fermented, where lea
vingthe depth of the waters and were rising to the top. Among thebuffeting waves, where they were beating one against th
e other, and,like as balls full of air, rebounded from the point of concussion,these found a resting place on the bodies
 of the dead. And abovethese judgements, the air was seen covered with dark clouds, rivenby the forked flashes of the ra
ging bolts of heaven, lighting up onall sides the depth of the gloom.The motion of the air is seen by the motion of the
dust thrown up bythe horse's running and this motion is as swift in again filling upthe vacuum left in the air which enc
losed the horse, as he is rapidin passing away from the air.Perhaps it will seem to you that you may reproach me with ha
vingrepresented the currents made through the air by the motion of thewind notwithstanding that the wind itself is not v
isible in the air.To this I must answer that it is not the motion of the wind but onlythe motion of the things carried a
long by it which is seen in theair.THE DIVISIONS. [Footnote 76: These observations, added at the bottomof the page conta
ining the full description of the doluge seem toindicate that it was Leonardo's intention to elaborate the subjectstill
farther in a separate treatise.]Darkness, wind, tempest at sea, floods of water, forests on fire,rain, bolts from heaven
, earthquakes and ruins of mountains,overthrow of cities [Footnote 81: _Spianamenti di citta_ (overthrowof cities). A co
nsiderable number of drawings in black chalk, atWindsor, illustrate this catastrophe. Most of them are much rubbed;one o
f the least injured is reproduced at Pl. XXXIX. Compare alsothe pen and ink sketch Pl. XXXVI.].Whirlwinds which carry wa
ter [spouts] branches of trees, and menthrough the air.Boughs stripped off by the winds, mingling by the meeting of thew
inds, with people upon them.Broken trees loaded with people.Ships broken to pieces, beaten on rocks.Flocks of sheep. Hai
l stones, thunderbolts, whirlwinds.People on trees which are unable to to support them; trees androcks, towers and hills
 covered with people, boats, tables, troughs,and other means of floating. Hills covered with men, women andanimals; and
lightning from the clouds illuminating every thing.[Footnote: This chapter, which, with the next one, is written on aloo
se sheet, seems to be the passage to which one of the compilersof the Vatican copy alluded when he wrote on the margin o
f fol. 36:"_Qua mi ricordo della mirabile discritione del Diluuio delloautore._" It is scarcely necessary to point out t
hat these chaptersare among those which have never before been published. Thedescription in No. 607 may be regarded as a
 preliminary sketch forthis one. As the MS. G. (in which it is to be found) must beattributed to the period of about 151
5 we may deduce from it theapproximate date of the drawings on Pl. XXXIV, XXXV, Nos. 2 and 3,XXXVI and XXXVII, since the
y obviously belong to this text. Thedrawings No. 2 on Pl. XXXV are, in the original, side by side withthe text of No. 60
8; lines 57 to 76 are shown in the facsimile. Inthe drawing in Indian ink given on Pl. XXXIV we see Wind-gods in thesky,
 corresponding to the allusion to Aeolus in No. 607 1.15.-Plates XXXVI and XXXVII form one sheet in the original. Thetex
ts reproduced on these Plates have however no connection with thesketches, excepting the sketches of clouds on the right
 hand side.These texts are given as No. 477. The group of small figures on Pl.XXXVII, to the left, seems to be intended
for a '_congregationed'uomini._' See No. 608, 1. 19.]609.DESCRIPTION OF THE DELUGE.Let there be first represented the su
mmit of a rugged mountain withvalleys surrounding its base, and on its sides let the surface ofthe soil be seen to slide
, together with the small roots of thebushes, denuding great portions of the surrounding rocks. Anddescending ruinous fr
om these precipices in its boisterous course,let it dash along and lay bare the twisted and gnarled roots oflarge trees
overthrowing their roots upwards; and let the mountains,as they are scoured bare, discover the profound fissures made in
them by ancient earthquakes. The base of the mountains may be ingreat part clothed and covered with ruins of shrubs, hur
led downfrom the sides of their lofty peaks, which will be mixed with mud,roots, boughs of trees, with all sorts of leav
es thrust in with themud and earth and stones. And into the depth of some valley may havefallen the fragments of a mount
ain forming a shore to the swollenwaters of its river; which, having already burst its banks, willrush on in monstrous w
aves; and the greatest will strike upon anddestroy the walls of the cities and farmhouses in the valley [14].Then the ru
ins of the high buildings in these cities will throw up agreat dust, rising up in shape like smoke or wreathed clouds ag
ainstthe falling rain; But the swollen waters will sweep round the poolwhich contains them striking in eddying whirlpool
s against thedifferent obstacles, and leaping into the air in muddy foam; then,falling back, the beaten water will again
 be dashed into the air.And the whirling waves which fly from the place of concussion, andwhose impetus moves them acros
s other eddies going in a contrarydirection, after their recoil will be tossed up into the air butwithout dashing off fr
om the surface. Where the water issues fromthe pool the spent waves will be seen spreading out towards theoutlet; and th
ere falling or pouring through the air and gainingweight and impetus they will strike on the water below piercing itand
rushing furiously to reach its depth; from which being thrownback it returns to the surface of the lake, carrying up the
 air thatwas submerged with it; and this remains at the outlet in foammingled with logs of wood and other matters lighte
r than water.Round these again are formed the beginnings of waves which increasethe more in circumference as they acquir
e more movement; and thismovement rises less high in proportion as they acquire a broaderbase and thus they are less con
spicuous as they die away. But ifthese waves rebound from various objects they then return in directopposition to the ot
hers following them, observing the same law ofincrease in their curve as they have already acquired in themovement they
started with. The rain, as it falls from the clouds isof the same colour as those clouds, that is in its shaded side;unl
ess indeed the sun's rays should break through them; in that casethe rain will appear less dark than the clouds. And if
the heavymasses of ruin of large mountains or of other grand buildings fallinto the vast pools of water, a great quantit
y will be flung intothe air and its movement will be in a contrary direction to that ofthe object which struck the water
; that is to say: The angle ofreflection will be equal to the angle of incidence. Of the objectscarried down by the curr
ent, those which are heaviest or ratherlargest in mass will keep farthest from the two opposite shores. Thewater in the
eddies revolves more swiftly in proportion as it isnearer to their centre. The crests of the waves of the sea tumble tot
heir bases falling with friction on the bubbles of their sides; andthis friction grinds the falling water into minute pa
rticles andthis being converted into a dense mist, mingles with the gale in themanner of curling smoke and wreathing clo
uds, and at last it, risesinto the air and is converted into clouds. But the rain which fallsthrough the atmosphere bein
g driven and tossed by the winds becomesrarer or denser according to the rarity or density of the winds thatbuffet it, a
nd thus there is generated in the atmosphere a moistureformed of the transparent particles of the rain which is near to
theeye of the spectator. The waves of the sea which break on the slopeof the mountains which bound it, will foam from th
e velocity withwhich they fall against these hills; in rushing back they will meetthe next wave as it comes and and afte
r a loud noise return in agreat flood to the sea whence they came. Let great numbers ofinhabitants--men and animals of a
ll kinds--be seen driven [54] bythe rising of the deluge to the peaks of the mountains in the midstof the waters aforesa
id.The wave of the sea at Piombino is all foaming water. [Footnote 55.56: These two lines are written below the bottom s
ketch on Pl. XXXV,3. The MS. Leic. being written about the year 1510 or later, it doesnot seem to me to follow that the
sketches must have been made atPiombino, where Leonardo was in the year 1502 and possibly returnedthere subsequently (se
e Vol. II. Topographical notes).]Of the water which leaps up from the spot where great masses fall onits surface. Of the
 winds of Piombino at Piombino. Eddies of windand rain with boughs and shrubs mixed in the air. Emptying the boatsof the
 rain water.[Footnote: The sketches on Pl. XXXV 3 stand by the side of lines 14to 54.]Of depicting natural phenomena (61
0. 611).610.The tremendous fury of the wind driven by the falling in of thehills on the caves within--by the falling of
the hills which servedas roofs to these caverns.A stone flung through the air leaves on the eye which sees it theimpress
ion of its motion, and the same effect is produced by thedrops of water which fall from the clouds when it [16] rains.[1
7] A mountain falling on a town, will fling up dust in the form ofclouds; but the colour of this dust will differ from t
hat of theclouds. Where the rain is thickest let the colour of the dust beless conspicuous and where the dust is thickes
t let the rain be lessconspicuous. And where the rain is mingled with the wind and withthe dust the clouds created by th
e rain must be more transparentthan those of dust [alone]. And when flames of fire are mingled withclouds of smoke and w
ater very opaque and dark clouds will be formed[Footnote 26-28: Compare Pl. XL, 1--the drawing in Indian ink on theleft
hand side, which seems to be a reminiscence of his observationsof an eruption (see his remarks on Mount Etna in Vol II).
]. And therest of this subject will be treated in detail in the book onpainting.[Footnote: See the sketches and text on
Pl. XXXVIII, No. 1. Lines1-16 are there given on the left hand side, 17-30 on the right. Thefour lines at the bottom on
the right are given as No. 472. Abovethese texts, which are written backwards, there are in the originalsixteen lines in
 a larger writing from left to right, but only halfof this is here visible. They treat of the physical laws of motionof
air and water. It does not seem to me that there is any reasonfor concluding that this writing from left to right is spu
rious.Compare with it the facsimile of the rough copy of Leonardo's letterto Ludovico il Moro in Vol. II.]611.People wer
e to be seen eagerly embarking victuals on various kindsof hastily made barks. But little of the waves were visible in t
hoseplaces where the dark clouds and rain were reflected.But where the flashes caused by the bolts of heaven were reflec
ted,there were seen as many bright spots, caused by the image of theflashes, as there were waves to reflect them to the
eye of thespectator.The number of the images produced by the flash of lightning on thewaves of the water were multiplied
 in proportion to the distance ofthe spectator's eye.So also the number of the images was diminished in proportion asthe
y were nearer the eye which saw them [Footnote 22. 23: _Com'eprovato_. See Vol. II, Nos. 874-878 and 892-901], as it has
 beenproved in the definition of the luminosity of the moon, and of ourmarine horizon when the sun's rays are reflected
in it and the eyewhich receives the reflection is remote from the sea.VI.THE ARTIST'S MATERIALS.Of chalk and paper (612-
-617).612.To make points [crayons] for colouring dry. Temper with a little waxand do not dry it; which wax you must diss
olve with water: so thatwhen the white lead is thus tempered, the water being distilled, maygo off in vapour and the wax
 may remain; you will thus make goodcrayons; but you must know that the colours must be ground with ahot stone.613.Chalk
 dissolves in wine and in vinegar or in aqua fortis and can berecombined with gum.614.PAPER FOR DRAWING UPON IN BLACK BY
 THE AID OF YOUR SPITTLE.Take powdered gall nuts and vitriol, powder them and spread them onpaper like a varnish, then w
rite on it with a pen wetted withspittle and it will turn as black as ink.615.If you want to make foreshortened letters
stretch the paper in adrawing frame and then draw your letters and cut them out, and makethe sunbeams pass through the h
oles on to another stretched paper,and then fill up the angles that are wanting.616.This paper should be painted over wi
th candle soot tempered withthin glue, then smear the leaf thinly with white lead in oil as isdone to the letters in pri
nting, and then print in the ordinary way.Thus the leaf will appear shaded in the hollows and lighted on theparts in rel
ief; which however comes out here just the contrary.[Footnote: This text, which accompanies a facsimile impression of al
eaf of sage, has already been published in the _Saggio delle Operedi L. da Vinci_, Milano 1872, p. 11. G. GOVI observes
on thispassage: "_Forse aveva egli pensato ancora a farsi un erbario, odalmeno a riprodurre facilmente su carta le forme
 e i particolaridelle foglie di diverse piante; poiche (modificando un metodo cheprobabilmente gli eia stato insegnato d
a altri, e che piu tardi silegge ripetuto in molti ricettarii e libri di segreti), accanto auna foglia di Salvia impress
a in nero su carta bianca, lascioscritto: Questa carta ...Erano i primi tentativi di quella riproduzione immediata delle
 partivegetali, che poi sotto il nome d'Impressione Naturale, fu condottaa tanta perfezione in questi ultimi tempi dal s
ignor de Hauer e daaltri_."]617.Very excellent will be a stiff white paper, made of the usualmixture and filtered milk o
f an herb called calves foot; and whenthis paper is prepared and damped and folded and wrapped up it maybe mixed with th
e mixture and thus left to dry; but if you break itbefore it is moistened it becomes somewhat like the thin pastecalled
_lasagne_ and you may then damp it and wrap it up and put itin the mixture and leave it to dry; or again this paper may
becovered with stiff transparent white and _sardonio_ and then dampedso that it may not form angles and then covered up
with strongtransparent size and as soon as it is firm cut it two fingers, andleave it to dry; again you may make stiff c
ardboard of _sardonio_and dry it and then place it between two sheets of papyrus and breakit inside with a wooden mallet
 with a handle and then open it withcare holding the lower sheet of paper flat and firm so that thebroken pieces be not
separated; then have a sheet of paper coveredwith hot glue and apply it on the top of all these pieces and letthem stick
 fast; then turn it upside down and apply transparent sizeseveral times in the spaces between the pieces, each time pour
ing infirst some black and then some stiff white and each time leaving itto dry; then smooth it and polish it.On the pre
paration and use of colours (618-627).618.To make a fine green take green and mix it with bitumen and you willmake the s
hadows darker. Then, for lighter [shades] green withyellow ochre, and for still lighter green with yellow, and for thehi
gh lights pure yellow; then mix green and turmeric together andglaze every thing with it. To make a fine red take cinnab
ar or redchalk or burnt ochre for the dark shadows and for the lighter onesred chalk and vermilion and for the lights pu
re vermilion and thenglaze with fine lake. To make good oil for painting. One part ofoil, one of the first refining and
one of the second.619.Use black in the shadow, and in the lights white, yellow, green,vermilion and lake. Medium shadows
; take the shadow as above and mixit with the flesh tints just alluded to, adding to it a littleyellow and a little gree
n and occasionally some lake; for theshadows take green and lake for the middle shades.[Footnote 618 and 619: If we may
judge from the flourishes withwhich the writing is ornamented these passages must have beenwritten in Leonardo's youth.]
620.You can make a fine ochre by the same method as you use to makewhite.621.A FINE YELLOW.Dissolve realgar with one par
t of orpiment, with aqua fortis.WHITE.Put the white into an earthen pot, and lay it no thicker than astring, and let it
stand in the sun undisturbed for 2 days; and inthe morning when the sun has dried off the night dews.622.To make reddish
 black for flesh tints take red rock crystals fromRocca Nova or garnets and mix them a little; again armenian bole isgoo
d in part.623.The shadow will be burnt ,terra-verte'.624.THE PROPORTIONS OF COLOURS.If one ounce of black mixed with one
 ounce of white gives a certainshade of darkness, what shade of darkness will be produced by 2ounces of black to 1 ounce
 of white?625.Remix black, greenish yellow and at the end blue.626.Verdigris with aloes, or gall or turmeric makes a fin
e green and soit does with saffron or burnt orpiment; but I doubt whether in ashort time they will not turn black. Ultra
marine blue and glassyellow mixed together make a beautiful green for fresco, that iswall-painting. Lac and verdigris ma
ke a good shadow for blue in oilpainting.627.Grind verdigris many times coloured with lemon juice and keep itaway from y
ellow (?).Of preparing the panel.628.TO PREPARE A PANEL FOR PAINTING ON.The panel should be cypress or pear or service-t
ree or walnut. Youmust coat it over with mastic and turpentine twice distilled andwhite or, if you like, lime, and put i
t in a frame so that it mayexpand and shrink according to its moisture and dryness. Then giveit [a coat] of aqua vitae i
n which you have dissolved arsenic or[corrosive] sublimate, 2 or 3 times. Then apply boiled linseed oilin such a way as
that it may penetrate every part, and before it iscold rub it well with a cloth to dry it. Over this apply liquidvarnish
 and white with a stick, then wash it with urine when it isdry, and dry it again. Then pounce and outline your drawing f
inelyand over it lay a priming of 30 parts of verdigris with one ofverdigris with two of yellow.[Footnote: M. RAVAISSON'
S reading varies from mine in the followingpassages:1._opero allor [?] bo [alloro?]_ = "_ou bien de [laurier]_."6. _freg
alo bene con un panno_. He reads _pane_ for _panno_ andrenders it. "_Frotte le bien avec un pain de facon [jusqu'a ce]qu
'il_" etc.7. _colla stecca po laua_. He reads "_polacca_" = "_avec le couteaude bois [?] polonais [?]_."]The preparation
 of oils (629--634).629.OIL.Make some oil of mustard seed; and if you wish to make it withgreater ease mix the ground se
eds with linseed oil and put it allunder the press.630.TO REMOVE THE SMELL OF OIL.Take the rank oil and put ten pints in
to a jar and make a mark onthe jar at the height of the oil; then add to it a pint of vinegarand make it boil till the o
il has sunk to the level of the mark andthus you will be certain that the oil is returned to its originalquantity and th
e vinegar will have gone off in vapour, carrying withit the evil smell; and I believe you may do the same with nut oil o
rany other oil that smells badly.631.Since walnuts are enveloped in a thin rind, which partakes of thenature of ..., if
you do not remove it when you make the oil fromthem, this skin tinges the oil, and when you work with it this skinsepara
tes from the oil and rises to the surface of the painting, andthis is what makes it change.632.TO RESTORE OIL COLOURS TH
AT HAVE BECOME DRY.If you want to restore oil colours that have become dry keep themsoaking in soft soap for a night and
, with your finger, mix them upwith the soft soap; then pour them into a cup and wash them withwater, and in this way yo
u can restore colours that have got dry.But take care that each colour has its own vessel to itself addingthe colour by
degrees as you restore it and mind that they arethoroughly softened, and when you wish to use them for tempera washthem
five and six times with spring water, and leave them to settle;if the soft soap should be thick with any of the colours
pass itthrough a filter. [Footnote: The same remark applies to thesesections as to No. 618 and 619.]633.OIL.Mustard seed
 pounded with linseed oil.634.... outside the bowl 2 fingers lower than the level of the oil, andpass it into the neck o
f a bottle and let it stand and thus all theoil will separate from this milky liquid; it will enter the bottleand be as
clear as crystal; and grind your colours with this, andevery coarse or viscid part will remain in the liquid. You must k
nowthat all the oils that have been created in seads or fruits arequite clear by nature, and the yellow colour you see i
n them onlycomes of your not knowing how to draw it out. Fire or heat by itsnature has the power to make them acquire co
lour. See for examplethe exudation or gums of trees which partake of the nature of rosin;in a short time they harden bec
ause there is more heat in them thanin oil; and after some time they acquire a certain yellow huetending to black. But o
il, not having so much heat does not do so;although it hardens to some extent into sediment it becomes finer.The change
in oil which occurs in painting proceeds from a certainfungus of the nature of a husk which exists in the skin which cov
ersthe nut, and this being crushed along with the nuts and being of anature much resembling oil mixes with it; it is of
so subtle anature that it combines with all colours and then comes to thesurface, and this it is which makes them change
. And if you want theoil to be good and not to thicken, put into it a little camphormelted over a slow fire and mix it w
ell with the oil and it willnever harden.[Footnote: The same remark applies to these sections as to No. 618and 619.]On v
arnishes [or powders] (635-637).635.VARNISH [OR POWDER].Take cypress [oil] and distil it and have a large pitcher, and p
utin the extract with so much water as may make it appear like amber,and cover it tightly so that none may evaporate. An
d when it isdissolved you may add in your pitcher as much of the said solution,as shall make it liquid to your taste. An
d you must know that amberis the gum of the cypress-tree.VARNISH [OR POWDER].And since varnish [powder] is the resin of
juniper, if you distiljuniper you can dissolve the said varnish [powder] in the essence,as explained above.636.VARNISH [
OR POWDER].Notch a juniper tree and give it water at the roots, mix the liquorwhich exudes with nut-oil and you will hav
e a perfect varnish[powder], made like amber varnish [powder], fine and of the bestquality make it in May or April.637.V
ARNISH [OR POWDER].Mercury with Jupiter and Venus,--a paste made of these must becorrected by the mould (?) continuously
, until Mercury separatesitself entirely from Jupiter and Venus. [Footnote: Here, and in No.641 _Mercurio_ seems to mean
 quicksilver, _Giove_ stands for iron,_Venere_ for copper and _Saturno_ for lead.]On chemical materials (638-650).638.No
te how aqua vitae absorbs into itself all the colours and smellsof flowers. If you want to make blue put iris flowers in
to it andfor red solanum berries (?)639.Salt may be made from human excrement burnt and calcined and madeinto lees, and
dried by a slow fire, and all dung in like manneryields salt, and these salts when distilled are very pungent.640.Sea wa
ter filtered through mud or clay, leaves all its saltness init. Woollen stuffs placed on board ship absorb fresh water.
If seawater is distilled under a retort it becomes of the first excellenceand any one who has a little stove in his kitc
hen can, with the samewood as he cooks with, distil a great quantity of water if theretort is a large one.641.MOULD(?).T
he mould (?) may be of Venus, or of Jupiter and Saturn and placedfrequently in the fire. And it should be worked with fi
ne emery andthe mould (?) should be of Venus and Jupiter impasted over (?)Venus. But first you will test Venus and Mercu
ry mixed with Jove,and take means to cause Mercury to disperse; and then fold them welltogether so that Venus or Jupiter
 be connected as thinly aspossible.[Footnote: See the note to 637.]642.Nitre, vitriol, cinnabar, alum, salt ammoniac, su
blimated mercury,rock salt, alcali salt, common salt, rock alum, alum schist (?),arsenic, sublimate, realgar, tartar, or
piment, verdegris.643.Pitch four ounces virgin wax, four ounces incense, two ounces oil ofroses one ounce.644.Four ounce
s virgin wax, four ounces Greek pitch, two ounces incense,one ounce oil of roses, first melt the wax and oil then the Gr
eekpitch then the other things in powder.645.Very thin glass may be cut with scissors and when placed over inlaidwork of
 bone, gilt, or stained of other colours you can saw itthrough together with the bone and then put it together and it wi
llretain a lustre that will not be scratched nor worn away by rubbingwith the hand.646.TO DILUTE WHITE WINE AND MAKE IT
PURPLE.Powder gall nuts and let this stand 8 days in the white wine; and inthe same way dissolve vitriol in water, and l
et the water stand andsettle very clear, and the wine likewise, each by itself, and strainthem well; and when you dilute
 the white wine with the water thewine will become red.647.Put marcasite into aqua fortis and if it turns green, know th
at ithas copper in it. Take it out with saltpetre and soft soap.648.A white horse may have the spots removed with the Sp
anish haematiteor with aqua fortis or with ... Removes the black hair on a whitehorse with the singeing iron. Force him
to the ground.649.FIRE.If you want to make a fire which will set a hall in a blaze withoutinjury do this: first perfume
the hall with a dense smoke of incenseor some other odoriferous substance: It is a good trick to play. Orboil ten pounds
 of brandy to evaporate, but see that the hall iscompletely closed and throw up some powdered varnish among the fumesand
 this powder will be supported by the smoke; then go into theroom suddenly with a lighted torch and at once it will be i
n ablaze.650.FIRE.Take away that yellow surface which covers oranges and distill themin an alembic, until the distillati
on may be said to be perfect.FIRE.Close a room tightly and have a brasier of brass or iron with firein it and sprinkle o
n it two pints of aqua vitae, a little at atime, so that it may be converted into smoke. Then make some onecome in with
a light and suddenly you will see the room in a blazelike a flash of lightning, and it will do no harm to any one.VII.PH
ILOSOPHY AND HISTORY OF THE ART OF PAINTING.The relation of art and nature (651. 652).651.What is fair in men, passes aw
ay, but not so in art.652.HE WHO DESPISES PAINTING LOVES NEITHER PHILOSOPHY NOR NATURE.If you condemn painting, which is
 the only imitator of all visibleworks of nature, you will certainly despise a subtle invention whichbrings philosophy a
nd subtle speculation to the consideration of thenature of all forms--seas and plains, trees, animals, plants andflowers
--which are surrounded by shade and light. And this is trueknowledge and the legitimate issue of nature; for painting is
 bornof nature--or, to speak more correctly, we will say it is thegrandchild of nature; for all visible things are produ
ced by nature,and these her children have given birth to painting. Hence we mayjustly call it the grandchild of nature a
nd related to God.Painting is superior to poetry (653. 654).653.THAT PAINTING SURPASSES ALL HUMAN WORKS BY THE SUBTLE CO
NSIDERATIONSBELONGING TO IT.The eye, which is called the window of the soul, is the principalmeans by which the central
sense can most completely and abundantlyappreciate the infinite works of nature; and the ear is the second,which acquire
s dignity by hearing of the things the eye has seen. Ifyou, historians, or poets, or mathematicians had not seen thingsw
ith your eyes you could not report of them in writing. And if you,0 poet, tell a story with your pen, the painter with h
is brush cantell it more easily, with simpler completeness and less tedious tobe understood. And if you call painting du
mb poetry, the painter maycall poetry blind painting. Now which is the worse defect? to beblind or dumb? Though the poet
 is as free as the painter in theinvention of his fictions they are not so satisfactory to men aspaintings; for, though
poetry is able to describe forms, actions andplaces in words, the painter deals with the actual similitude of theforms,
in order to represent them. Now tell me which is the nearerto the actual man: the name of man or the image of the man. T
he nameof man differs in different countries, but his form is never changedbut by death.654.And if the poet gratifies th
e sense by means of the ear, the painterdoes so by the eye--the worthier sense; but I will say no more ofthis but that,
if a good painter represents the fury of a battle,and if a poet describes one, and they are both together put beforethe
public, you will see where most of the spectators will stop, towhich they will pay most attention, on which they will be
stow mostpraise, and which will satisfy them best. Undoubtedly painting beingby a long way the more intelligible and bea
utiful, will please most.Write up the name of God [Christ] in some spot and setup His imageopposite and you will see whi
ch will be most reverenced. Paintingcomprehends in itself all the forms of nature, while you havenothing but words, whic
h are not universal as form is, and if youhave the effects of the representation, we have the representationof the effec
ts. Take a poet who describes the beauty of a lady toher lover and a painter who represents her and you will see to whic
hnature guides the enamoured critic. Certainly the proof should beallowed to rest on the verdict of experience. You have
 rankedpainting among the mechanical arts but, in truth, if painters wereas apt at praising their own works in writing a
s you are, it wouldnot lie under the stigma of so base a name. If you call itmechanical because it is, in the first plac
e, manual, and that it isthe hand which produces what is to be found in the imagination, youtoo writers, who set down ma
nually with the pen what is devised inyour mind. And if you say it is mechanical because it is done formoney, who falls
into this error--if error it can be called--morethan you? If you lecture in the schools do you not go to whoeverpays you
 most? Do you do any work without pay? Still, I do not saythis as blaming such views, for every form of labour looks for
 itsreward. And if a poet should say: "I will invent a fiction with agreat purpose," the painter can do the same, as Ape
lles paintedCalumny. If you were to say that poetry is more eternal, I say theworks of a coppersmith are more eternal st
ill, for time preservesthem longer than your works or ours; nevertheless they have not muchimagination [29]. And a pictu
re, if painted on copper with enamelcolours may be yet more permanent. We, by our arts may be called thegrandsons of God
. If poetry deals with moral philosophy, paintingdeals with natural philosophy. Poetry describes the action of themind,
painting considers what the mind may effect by the motions [ofthe body]. If poetry can terrify people by hideous fiction
s,painting can do as much by depicting the same things in action.Supposing that a poet applies himself to represent beau
ty, ferocity,or a base, a foul or a monstrous thing, as against a painter, he mayin his ways bring forth a variety of fo
rms; but will the painter notsatisfy more? are there not pictures to be seen, so like the actualthings, that they deceiv
e men and animals?Painting is superior to sculpture (655. 656).655.THAT SCULPTURE IS LESS INTELLECTUAL THAN PAINTING, AN
D LACKS MANYCHARACTERISTICS OF NATURE.I myself, having exercised myself no less in sculpture than inpainting and doing b
oth one and the other in the same degree, itseems to me that I can, without invidiousness, pronounce an opinionas to whi
ch of the two is of the greatest merit and difficulty andperfection. In the first place sculpture requires a certain lig
ht,that is from above, a picture carries everywhere with it its ownlight and shade. Thus sculpture owes its importance t
o light andshade, and the sculptor is aided in this by the nature, of therelief which is inherent in it, while the paint
er whose artexpresses the accidental aspects of nature, places his effects inthe spots where nature must necessarily pro
duce them. The sculptorcannot diversify his work by the various natural colours of objects;painting is not defective in
any particular. The sculptor when heuses perspective cannot make it in any way appear true; that of thepainter can appea
r like a hundred miles beyond the picture itself.Their works have no aerial perspective whatever, they cannotrepresent t
ransparent bodies, they cannot represent luminous bodies,nor reflected lights, nor lustrous bodies--as mirrors and the l
ikepolished surfaces, nor mists, nor dark skies, nor an infinite numberof things which need not be told for fear of tedi
um. As regards thepower of resisting time, though they have this resistance [Footnote19: From what is here said as to pa
inting on copper it is veryevident that Leonardo was not acquainted with the method of paintingin oil on thin copper pla
tes, introduced by the Flemish painters ofthe XVIIth century. J. LERMOLIEFF has already pointed out that inthe various c
ollections containing pictures by the great masters ofthe Italian Renaissance, those painted on copper (for instance the
famous reading Magdalen in the Dresden Gallery) are the works of amuch later date (see _Zeitschrift fur bildende Kunst_.
 Vol. X pg.333, and: _Werke italienischer Master in den Galerien von Munchen,Dresden und Berlin_. Leipzig 1880, pg. 158
and 159.)--Compare No.654, 29.], a picture painted on thick copper covered with whiteenamel on which it is painted with
enamel colours and then put intothe fire again and baked, far exceeds sculpture in permanence. Itmay be said that if a m
istake is made it is not easy to remedy it;it is but a poor argument to try to prove that a work be the noblerbecause ov
ersights are irremediable; I should rather say that itwill be more difficult to improve the mind of the master who makes
such mistakes than to repair the work he has spoilt.656.We know very well that a really experienced and good painter wil
lnot make such mistakes; on the contrary, with sound rules he willremove so little at a time that he will bring his work
 to a goodissue. Again the sculptor if working in clay or wax, can add orreduce, and when his model is finished it can e
asily be cast inbronze, and this is the last operation and is the most permanentform of sculpture. Inasmuch as that whic
h is merely of marble isliable to ruin, but not bronze. Hence a painting done on copperwhich as I said of painting may b
e added to or altered, resemblessculpture in bronze, which, having first been made in wax could thenbe altered or added
to; and if sculpture in bronze is durable, thiswork in copper and enamel is absolutely imperishable. Bronze is butdark a
nd rough after all, but this latter is covered with variousand lovely colours in infinite variety, as has been said abov
e; orif you will have me only speak of painting on panel, I am content topronounce between it and sculpture; saying that
 painting is the morebeautiful and the more imaginative and the more copious, whilesculpture is the more durable but it
has nothing else. Sculptureshows with little labour what in painting appears a miraculous thingto do; to make what is im
palpable appear palpable, flat objectsappear in relief, distant objects seem close. In fact painting isadorned with infi
nite possibilities which sculpture cannot command.Aphorisms (657-659).657.OF PAINTING.Men and words are ready made, and
you, O Painter, if you do not knowhow to make your figures move, are like an orator who knows not howto use his words.65
8.As soon as the poet ceases to represent in words what exists innature, he in fact ceases to resemble the painter; for
if the poet,leaving such representation, proceeds to describe the flowery andflattering speech of the figure, which he w
ishes to make thespeaker, he then is an orator and no longer a poet nor a painter.And if he speaks of the heavens he bec
omes an astrologer, andphilosopher; and a theologian, if he discourses of nature or God.But, if he restricts himself to
the description of objects, he wouldenter the lists against the painter, if with words he could satisfythe eye as the pa
inter does.659.Though you may be able to tell or write the exact description offorms, the painter can so depict them tha
t they will appear alive,with the shadow and light which show the expression of a face; whichyou cannot accomplish with
the pen though it can be achieved by thebrush.On the history of painting (660. 661).660.THAT PAINTING DECLINES AND DETER
IORATES FROM AGE TO AGE, WHENPAINTERS HAVE NO OTHER STANDARD THAN PAINTING ALREADY DONE.Hence the painter will produce p
ictures of small merit if he takesfor his standard the pictures of others. But if he will study fromnatural objects he w
ill bear good fruit; as was seen in the paintersafter the Romans who always imitated each other and so their artconstant
ly declined from age to age. After these came Giotto theFlorentine who--not content with imitating the works of Cimabue
hismaster--being born in the mountains and in a solitude inhabited onlyby goats and such beasts, and being guided by nat
ure to his art,began by drawing on the rocks the movements of the goats of which hewas keeper. And thus he began to draw
 all the animals which were tobe found in the country, and in such wise that after much study heexcelled not only all th
e masters of his time but all those of manybygone ages. Afterwards this art declined again, because everyoneimitated the
 pictures that were already done; thus it went on fromcentury to century until Tomaso, of Florence, nicknamed Masaccio,s
howed by his perfect works how those who take for their standardany one but nature--the mistress of all masters--weary t
hemselves invain. And, I would say about these mathematical studies that thosewho only study the authorities and not the
 works of nature aredescendants but not sons of nature the mistress of all good authors.Oh! how great is the folly of th
ose who blame those who learn fromnature [Footnote 22: _lasciando stare li autori_. In thisobservation we may detect an
indirect evidence that Leonardoregarded his knowledge of natural history as derived from his owninvestigations, as well
as his theories of perspective and optics.Compare what he says in praise of experience (Vol II; _XIX_).],setting aside t
hose authorities who themselves were the disciples ofnature.661.That the first drawing was a simple line drawn round the
 shadow of aman cast by the sun on a wall.The painter's scope.662.The painter strives and competes with nature._X.Studie
s and Sketches for Pictures and Decorations.An artist's manuscript notes can hardly be expected to contain anything more
 than incidental references to those masterpieces of hiswork of which the fame, sounded in the writings of hiscontempora
ries, has left a glorious echo to posterity. We need nottherefore be surprised to find that the texts here reproduced do
 notafford us such comprehensive information as we could wish. On theother hand, the sketches and studies prepared by Le
onardo for thetwo grandest compositions he ever executed: The Fresco of the LastSupper in the Refectory of Santa Maria d
elle Grazie at Milan, andthe Cartoon of the Battle of Anghiari, for the Palazzo dellaSignoria at Florence--have been pre
served; and, though far fromcomplete, are so much more numerous than the manuscript notes, thatwe are justified in asser
ting that in value and interest they amplycompensate for the meagerness of the written suggestions.The notes for the com
position of the Last Supper, which are givenunder nos._ 665 _and_ 666 _occur in a MS. at South Kensington, II2,written i
n the years_ 1494-1495. _This MS. sketch was noted down notmore than three or four years before the painting was execute
d,which justifies the inference that at the time when it was writtenthe painter had not made up his mind definitely even
 as to thegeneral scheme of the work; and from this we may also conclude thatthe drawings of apostles' heads at Windsor,
 in red chalk, must beascribed to a later date. They are studies for the head of St.Matthew, the fourth figure on Christ
's left hand--see Pl. XL VII,the sketch (in black chalk) for the head of St. Philip, the thirdfigure on the left hand--s
ee Pl. XL VIII, for St. Peter's rightarm--see Pl. XLIX, and for the expressive head of Judas which hasunfortunately some
what suffered by subsequent restoration ofoutlines,--see Pl. L. According to a tradition, as unfounded as itis improbabl
e, Leonardo made use of the head of Padre Bandelli, theprior of the convent, as the prototype of his Judas; this however
has already been contradicted by Amoretti "Memorie storiche" cap.XIV. The study of the head of a criminal on Pl. LI has,
 it seems tome, a better claim to be regarded as one of the preparatory sketchesfor the head of Judas. The Windsor colle
ction contains two oldcopies of the head of St. Simon, the figure to the extreme left ofChrist, both of about equal meri
t (they are marked as Nos._ 21 _and_36_)--the second was reproduced on Pl. VIII of the GrosvenorGallery Publication in_
1878. _There is also at Windsor a drawing inblack chalk of folded hands (marked with the old No._ 212; _No. LXIof the Gr
osvenor Gallery Publication) which I believe to be a copyof the hands of St. John, by some unknown pupil. A reproduction
 ofthe excellent drawings of heads of Apostles in the possession of H.R. H. the Grand Duchess of Weimar would have been
out of my provincein this work, and, with regard to them, I must confine myself topointing out that the difference in st
yle does not allow of ourplacing the Weimar drawings in the same category as those herereproduced. The mode of grouping
in the Weimar drawings is of itselfsufficient to indicate that they were not executed before thepicture was painted, but
, on the contrary, afterwards, and it is, onthe face of it, incredible that so great a master should thus havecopied fro
m his own work.The drawing of Christ's head, in the Brera palace at Milan wasperhaps originally the work of Leonardo's h
and; it has unfortunatelybeen entirely retouched and re-drawn, so that no decisive opinioncan be formed as to its genuin
eness.The red chalk drawing reproduced on Pl. XLVI is in the Accademia atVenice; it was probably made before the text, N
os._ 664 _and_ 665,_was written.The two pen and ink sketches on Pl. XLV seem to belong to an evenearlier date; the more
finished drawing of the two, on the righthand, represents Christ with only St. John and Judas and a thirddisciple whose
action is precisely that described in No._ 666,_Pl._ 4. _It is hardly necessary to observe that the other sketcheson thi
s page and the lines of text below the circle (containing thesolution of a geometrical problem) have no reference to the
 pictureof the Last Supper. With this figure of Christ may be compared asimilar pen and ink drawing reproduced on page_
297 _below on theleft hand; the original is in the Louvre. On this page again therest of the sketches have no direct bea
ring on the composition ofthe Last Supper, not even, as it seems to me, the group of four menat the bottom to the right
hand--who are listening to a fifth, intheir midst addressing them. Moreover the writing on this page (anexplanation of a
 disk shaped instrument) is certainly not in thesame style as we find constantly used by Leonardo after the year_1489._I
t may be incidentally remarked that no sketches are known for theportrait of "Mona Lisa", nor do the MS. notes ever allu
de to it,though according to Vasari the master had it in hand for fully fouryears.Leonardo's cartoon for the picture of
the battle of Anghiari hasshared the fate of the rival work, Michaelangelo's "Bathers summonedto Battle". Both have been
 lost in some wholly inexplicable manner.I cannot here enter into the remarkable history of this work; I canonly give an
 account of what has been preserved to us of Leonardo'sscheme and preparations for executing it. The extent of the mater
ialin studies and drawings was till now quite unknown. Theirpublication here may give some adequate idea of the grandeur
 of thisfamous work. The text given as No._ 669 _contains a description ofthe particulars of the battle, but for the rea
sons given in the noteto this text, I must abandon the idea of taking this passage as thebasis of my attempt to reconstr
uct the picture as the artistconceived and executed it.I may here remind the reader that Leonardo prepared the cartoon i
nthe Sala del Papa of Santa Maria Novella at Florence and workedthere from the end of October 1503 till February 1504, a
nd then wasbusied with the painting in the Sala del Consiglio in the Palazzodella Signoria, till the work was interrupte
d at the end of May1506. (See Milanesi's note to Vasari pp. 43--45 Vol. IV ed. 1880.)Vasari, as is well known, describes
 only one scene or episode of thecartoon--the Battle for the Standard in the foreground of thecomposition, as it would s
eem; and this only was ever finished as amural decoration in the Sala del Consiglio. This portion of thecomposition is f
amiliar to all from the disfigured copy engraved byEdelinck. Mariette had already very acutely observed that Edelinckmus
t surely have worked from a Flemish copy of the picture. There isin the Louvre a drawing by Rubens (No. 565) which also
representsfour horsemen fighting round a standard and which agrees withEdelinck's engraving, but the engraving reverses
the drawing. Anearlier Flemish drawing, such as may have served as the model forboth Rubens and Edelinck, is in the Uffi
zi collection (seePhilpots's Photograph, No. 732). It seems to be a work of the secondhalf of the XVIth century, a time
when both the picture and thecartoon had already been destroyed. It is apparently the productionof a not very skilled ha
nd. Raphael Trichet du Fresne, 1651,mentions that a small picture by Leonardo himself of the Battle ofthe Standard was t
hen extant in the Tuileries; by this he probablymeans the painting on panel which is now in the possession of MadameTimb
al in Paris, and which has lately been engraved by Haussoullieras a work by Leonardo. The picture, which is very careful
ly painted,seems to me however to be the work of some unknown Florentinepainter, and probably executed within the first
ten years of theXVIth century. At the same time, it would seem to be a copy not fromLeonardo's cartoon, but from his pic
ture in the Palazzo dellaSignoria; at any rate this little picture, and the small Flemishdrawing in Florence are the old
est finished copies of this episodein the great composition of the Battle of Anghiari.In his Life of Raphael, Vasari tel
ls us that Raphael copied certainworks of Leonardo's during his stay in Florence. Raphael's firstvisit to Florence laste
d from the middle of October 1504 till July1505, and he revisited it in the summer of 1506. The hasty sketch,now in the
possession of the University of Oxford and reproduced onpage 337 also represents the Battle of the Standard and seems to
have been made during his first stay, and therefore not from thefresco but from the cartoon; for, on the same sheet we a
lso find,besides an old man's head drawn in Leonardo's style, some studiesfor the figure of St. John the Martyr which Ra
phael used in 1505 inhis great fresco in the Church of San Severo at Perugia.Of Leonardo's studies for the Battle of Ang
hiari I must in the firstplace point to five, on three of which--Pl. LII 2, Pl. LIII, Pl.LVI--we find studies for the ep
isode of the Standard. The standardbearer, who, in the above named copies is seen stooping, holding onto the staff acros
s his shoulder, is immediately recognisable as theleft-hand figure in Raphael's sketch, and we find it in a similarattit
ude in Leonardo's pen and ink drawing in the BritishMuseum--Pl. LII, 2--the lower figure to the right. It is notdifficul
t to identify the same figure in two more complicated groupsin the pen and ink drawings, now in the Accademia at Venice-
-Pl.LIII, and Pl. LIV--where we also find some studies of foot soldiersfighting. On the sheet in the British Museum--Pl.
 LII, 2--we find,among others, one group of three horses galloping forwards: onehorseman is thrown and protects himself
with his buckler against thelance thrusts of two others on horseback, who try to pierce him asthey ride past. The same a
ction is repeated, with some variation, intwo sketches in pen and ink on a third sheet, in the Accademia atVenice, Pl. L
V; a coincidence which suggests the probability of suchan incident having actually been represented on the cartoon. We a
renot, it is true, in a position to declare with any certainty whichof these three dissimilar sketches may have been the
 nearest to thegroup finally adopted in executing the cartoon.With regard, however, to one of the groups of horsemen it
ispossible to determine with perfect certainty not only whicharrangement was preferred, but the position it occupied in
thecomposition. The group of horsemen on Pl. LVII is a drawing in blackchalk at Windsor, which is there attributed to Le
onardo, but whichappears to me to be the work of Cesare da Sesto, and theCommendatore Giov. Morelli supports me in this
view. It can hardlybe doubted that da Sesto, as a pupil of Leonardo's, made thisdrawing from his master's cartoon, if we
 compare it with the copymade by Raphael--here reproduced, for just above the fightinghorseman in Raphael's copy it is p
ossible to detect a horse which isseen from behind, going at a slower pace, with his tail flying outto the right and the
 same horse may be seen in the very sameattitude carrying a dimly sketched rider, in the foreground ofCesare da Sesto's
drawing.__If a very much rubbed drawing in black chalk at Windsor--Pl.LVI--is, as it appears to be, the reversed impress
ion of an originaldrawing, it is not difficult to supplement from it the portionsdrawn by Cesare da Sesto. Nay, it may p
rove possible to reconstructthe whole of the lost cartoon from the mass of materials we now haveat hand which we may reg
ard as the nucleus of the composition. Alarge pen and ink drawing by Raphael in the Dresden collection,representing thre
e horsemen fighting, and another, by Cesare daSesto, in the Uffizi, of light horsemen fighting are a furthercontribution
 which will help us to reconstruct it.__The sketch reproduced on Pl. LV gives a suggestive example of theway in which fo
ot-soldiers may have been introduced into the cartoonas fighting among the groups of horsemen; and I may here take theop
portunity of mentioning that, for reasons which it would be out ofplace to enlarge upon here, I believe the two genuine
drawings byRaphael's hand in his "Venetian sketch-book" as it is called--one ofa standard bearer marching towards the le
ft, and one of twofoot-soldiers armed with spears and fighting with a horseman--to beundoubtedly copies from the cartoon
 of the Battle of Anghiari.__Leonardo's two drawings, preserved in the museum at Buda-Pesth andreproduced on pages 338 a
nd 339 are preliminary studies for theheads of fighting warriors. The two heads drawn in black chalk (pg.338) and the on
e seen in profile, turned to the left, drawn in redchalk (pg. 339), correspond exactly with those of two horsemen inthe
scene of the fight round the standard as we see them in MadameTimbal's picture and in the other finished copies. An old
copy ofthe last named drawing by a pupil of Leonardo is in MS. C. A. 187b;561b (See Saggio, Tav. XXII). Leonardo used to
 make such finishedstudies of heads as those, drawn on detached sheets, beforebeginning his pictures from his drawings--
compare the preparatorystudies for the fresco of the Last Supper, given on Pl. XLVII andPl. L. Other drawings of heads,
all characterised by the expressionof vehement excitement that is appropriate to men fighting, are tobe seen at Windsor
(No. 44) and at the Accademia at Venice (IV, 13);at the back of one of the drawings at Buda-Pesth there is the bustof a
warrior carrying a spear on his left shoulder, holding up theleft arm (See Csatakepek a XVI--lk Szazadbol osszeallitotta
 PvlszkyKaroly). These drawings may have been made for other portions of thecartoon, of which no copies exist, and thus
we are unable toidentify these preparatory drawings. Finally I may add that a sketchof fighting horse and foot soldiers,
 formerly in the possession ofM. Thiers and published by Charles Blanc in his "Vies des Peintres"can hardly be accepted
as genuine. It is not to be found, as I aminformed, among the late President's property, and no one appears toknow where
 it now is.__An attempted reconstruction of the Cartoon, which is not onlyunsuccessful but perfectly unfounded, is to be
 seen in thelithograph by Bergeret, published in Charles Blanc's "Vies despeintres" and reprinted in "The great Artists.
 L. da Vinci", p. 80.This misleading pasticcio may now be rejected without hesitation.__There are yet a few original dra
wings by Leonardo which might bementioned here as possibly belonging to the cartoon of the Battle;such as the pen and in
k sketches on Pl. XXI and on Pl. XXXVIII, No.3, but we should risk too wide a departure from the domain ofascertained fa
ct.__With regard to the colours and other materials used by Leonardo thereader may be referred to the quotations from th
e accounts for thepicture in question given by Milanesi in his edition of Vasari (Vol.IV, p. 44, note) where we find ent
ries of a similar character tothose in Leonardo's note books for the year 1505; S. K. M. 12 (seeNo. 636).__That Leonardo
 was employed in designing decorations and otherpreparations for high festivals, particularly for the court ofMilan, we
learn not only from the writings of his contemporaries butfrom his own incidental allusions; for instance in MS. C. l5b
(1),l. 9. In the arrangement of the texts referring to this I haveplaced those first, in which historical personages are
 named--Nos.670-674. Among the descriptions of Allegorical subjects two textslately found at Oxford have been included,
Nos. 676 and 677. Theyare particularly interesting because they are accompanied by largesketches which render the meanin
g of the texts perfectly clear. Itis very intelligible that in other cases, where there are noillustrative sketches, the
 notes must necessarily remain obscure oradmit of various interpretations. The literature of the time affordsample evide
nce of the use of such allegorical representations,particularly during the Carnival and in Leonardo's notes we find theC
arnival expressly mentioned--Nos. 685 and 704. Vasari in his Lifeof Pontormo, particularly describes that artist's vario
usundertakings for Carnival festivities. These very graphicdescriptions appear to me to throw great light in more ways t
han oneon the meaning of Leonardo's various notes as to allegoricalrepresentations and also on mottoes and emblems--Nos.
 681-702. Inpassing judgment on the allegorical sketches and emblems it must notbe overlooked that even as pictures they
 were always accompanied byexplanations in words. Several finished drawings of allegoricalcompositions or figures have b
een preserved, but as they have nocorresponding explanation in the MSS. they had no claim to bereproduced here. The fema
le figure on Pl. XXVI may perhaps beregarded as a study for such an allegorical painting, of which thepurport would have
 been explained by an inscription._On Madonna pictures.663.[In the autumn of] 1478 I began the two Madonna [pictures].[F
ootnote: Photographs of this page have been published by BRAUN,No. 439, and PHILPOT, No. 718.1. _Incominciai_. We have n
o other information as to the twopictures of the Madonna here spoken of. As Leonardo here tells usthat he had begun two
Madonnas at the same time, the word'_incominciai_' may be understood to mean that he had begun at thesame time preparato
ry studies for two pictures to be painted later.If this is so, the non-existence of the pictures may be explained bysupp
osing that they were only planned and never executed. I may heremention a few studies for pictures of the Madonna which
probablybelong to this early time; particularly a drawing in silver-point onbluish tinted paper at Windsor--see Pl. XL,
No. 3--, a drawing ofwhich the details have almost disappeared in the original but havebeen rendered quite distinct in t
he reproduction; secondly a slightpen and ink sketch in, the Codex VALLARDI, in the Louvre, fol. 64,No. 2316; again a si
lver point drawing of a Virgin and child drawnover again with the pen in the His de la Salle collection also inthe Louvr
e, No. 101. (See Vicomte BOTH DE TAUZIA, _Notice desdessins de la collection His de la Salle, exposes au Louvre_. Paris1
881, pp. 80, 81.) This drawing is, it is true, traditionallyascribed to Raphael, but the author of the catalogue very ju
stlypoints out its great resemblance with the sketches for Madonnas inthe British Museum which are indisputably Leonardo
's. Some of thesehave been published by Mr. HENRY WALLIS in the Art Journal, New Ser.No. 14, Feb. 1882. If the non-exist
ence of the two pictures herealluded to justifies my hypothesis that only studies for suchpictures are meant by the text
, it may also be supposed that thedrawings were made for some comrade in VERROCCHIO'S atelier. (SeeVASARI, Sansoni's ed.
 Florence 1880. Vol. IV, p. 564): "_E perche aLerenzo piaceva fuor di modo la maniera di Lionardo, la seppe cosibene imi
tare, che niuno fu che nella pulitezza e nel finir l'operecon diligenza l'imitasse pi├╣ di lui_." Leonardo's notes give
me noopportunity of discussing the pictures executed by him in Florence,before he moved to Milan. So the studies for the
 unfinished pictureof the Adoration of the Magi--in the Uffizi, Florence--cannot bedescribed here, nor would any discuss
ion about the picture in theLouvre "_La Vierge aux Rochers_" be appropriate in the absence ofall allusion to it in the M
SS. Therefore, when I presently add a fewremarks on this painting in explanation of the Master's drawings forit, it will
 be not merely with a view to facilitate criticalresearches about the picture now in the National Gallery, London,which
by some critics has been pronounced to be a replica of theLouvre picture, but also because I take this opportunity ofpub
lishing several finished studies of the Master's which, even ifthey were not made in Florence but later in Milan, must h
ave beenprior to the painting of the Last Supper. The original picture inParis is at present so disfigured by dust and v
arnish that thecurrent reproductions in photography actually give evidence more ofthe injuries to which the picture has
been exposed than of theoriginal work itself. The wood-cut given on p. 344, is only intendedto give a general notion of
the composition. It must be understoodthat the outline and expression of the heads, which in the pictureis obscured but
not destroyed, is here altogether missed. Thefacsimiles which follow are from drawings which appear to me to bestudies f
or "_La Vierge aux Rochers_."1. A drawing in silver point on brown toned paper of a woman's headlooking to the left. In
the Royal Library at Turin, apparently astudy from nature for the Angel's head (Pl. XLII).2. A study of drapery for the
left leg of the same figure, done withthe brush, Indian ink on greenish paper, the lights heightened withwhite.The origi
nal is at Windsor, No. 223. The reproduction Pl. XLIII isdefective in the shadow on the upper part of the thigh, which i
s notso deep as in the original; it should also be observed that thefolds of the drapery near the hips are somewhat alte
red in thefinished work in the Louvre, while the London copy shows a greaterresemblance to this study in that particular
.3. A study in red chalk for the bust of the Infant Christ--No. 3 inthe Windsor collection (Pl. XLIV). The well-known si
lver-pointdrawing on pale green paper, in the Louvre, of a boy's head (No. 363in REISET, _Notice des dessins, Ecoles d'I
talie_) seems to me to bea slightly altered copy, either from the original picture or fromthis red chalk study.4. A silv
er-point study on greenish paper, for the head of John theBaptist, reproduced on p. 342. This was formerly in the CodexV
allardi and is now exhibited among the drawings in the Louvre. Thelights are, in the original, heightened with white; th
e outlines,particularly round the head and ear, are visibly restored.There is a study of an outstretched hand--No. 288 i
n the Windsorcollection--which was published in the Grosvenor GalleryPublication, 1878, simply under the title of: "No.
72 Study of ahand, pointing" which, on the other hand, I regard as a copy by apupil. The action occurs in the kneeling a
ngel of the Paris pictureand not in the London copy.These four genuine studies form, I believe, a valuable substitute in
the absence of any MS. notes referring to the celebrated Parispicture.]Bernardo di Bandino's Portrait.664.A tan-coloured
 small cap, A doublet of black serge, A black jerkinlined A blue coat lined, with fur of foxes' breasts, and the collaro
f the jerkin covered with black and white stippled velvet Bernardodi Bandino Baroncelli; black hose.[Footnote: These ele
ven lines of text are by the side of the pen andink drawing of a man hanged--Pl. LXII, No. 1. This drawing wasexhibited
in 1879 at the _Ecole des Beaux-Arts_ in Paris and thecompilers of the catalogue amused themselves by giving the victim'
sname as follows: "_Un pendu, vetu d'une longue robe, les mains li├σessur le dos ... Bernardo di Bendino Barontigni, mar
chand depantalons_" (see _Catalogue descriptif des Dessins de Mailresanciens exposes a l'Ecole des Beaux Arts_, Paris 18
79; No. 83, pp.9-10). Now, the criminal represented here, is none other thanBernardino di Bandino Baroncelli the murdere
r of Giuliano de'Medici,whose name as a coadjutor in the conspiracy of the Pazzi has gaineda melancholy notoriety by the
 tragedy of the 26th April 1478.Bernardo was descended from an ancient family and the son of the manwho, under King Ferr
ante, was President of the High Court of Justicein Naples. His ruined fortunes, it would seem, induced him to jointhe Pa
zzi; he and Francesco Pazzi were entrusted with the task ofmurdering Giuliano de'Medici on the fixed day. Their victim n
otappearing in the cathedral at the hour when they expected him, thetwo conspirators ran to the palace of the Medici and
 induced him toaccompany them. Giuliano then took his place in the chancel of theCathedral, and as the officiating pries
t raised the Host--the signagreed upon--Bernardo stabbed the unsuspecting Giuliano in thebreast with a short sword; Giul
iano stepped backwards and fell dead.The attempt on Lorenzo's life however, by the other conspirators atthe same moment,
 failed of success. Bernardo no sooner saw thatLorenzo tried to make his escape towards the sacristy, than herushed upon
 him, and struck down Francesco Nori who endeavoured toprotect Lorenzo. How Lorenzo then took refuge behind the brazendo
ors of the sacristy, and how, as soon as Giuliano's death was madeknown, the further plans of the conspirators were defe
ated, while aterrible vengeance overtook all the perpetrators and accomplices,this is no place to tell. Bernardo Bandini
 alone seemed to befavoured by fortune; he hid first in the tower of the Cathedral, andthen escaped undiscovered from Fl
orence. Poliziano, who was withLorenzo in the Cathedral, says in his 'Conjurationis PactianaeCommentarium': "_Bandinus f
ugitans in Tiphernatem incidit, a quo inaciem receptus Senas pervenit_." And Gino Capponi in summing up thereports of th
e numerous contemporary narrators of the event, says:"_Bernardo Bandini ricoverato in Costantinopoli, fu per ordine delS
ultano preso e consegnato a un Antonio di Bernardino dei Medici,che Lorenzo aveva mandato apposta in Turchia: cos├υ era
grande lapotenza di quest' uomo e grande la voglia di farne mostra e che nonrestasse in vita chi aveagli ucciso il frate
llo, fu egli applicatoappena giunto_" (_Storia della Republica di Firenze II_, 377, 378).Details about the dates may be
found in the _Chronichetta diBelfredello Strinati Alfieri_: "_Bernardo di Bandino Bandinisopradetto ne venne preso da Go
stantinopoti a d├υ 14. Dicembre 1479 edisaminato, che fu al Bargello, fu impiccato alle finestre di dettoBargello allato
 alla Doana a d├υ 29. Dicembre MCCCCLXXIX che pochi d├υstette_." It may however be mentioned with reference to the mode
ofwriting the name of the assassin that, though most of hiscontemporaries wrote Bernardo Bandini, in the _Breve Chronico
nCaroli Petri de Joanninis_ he is called Bernardo di BandiniBaroncelli; and, in the _Sententiae Domini Matthaei de Tosca
na_,Bernardus Joannis Bandini de Baroncellis, as is written onLeonardo's drawing of him when hanged. Now VASARI, in the
life of_Andrea del Castagno_ (Vol. II, 680; ed. Milanesi 1878), tells usthat in 1478 this painter was commissioned by or
der of the Signoriato represent the members of the Pazzi conspiracy as traitors, on thefacade of the Palazzo del Podest├
ι--the Bargello. This statement isobviously founded on a mistake, for Andrea del Castagno was alreadydead in 1457. He ha
d however been commissioned to paint Rinaldodegli Albizzi, when declared a rebel and exiled in 1434, and hisadherents, a
s hanging head downwards; and in consequence he hadacquired the nickname of Andrea degl' Impiccati. On the 21st July1478
 the Council of Eight came to the following resolution: "_itemservatis etc. deliberaverunt et santiaverunt Sandro Bottic
elli proejus labore in pingendo proditores flor. quadraginta largos_" (seeG. MILANESI, _Arch. star. VI_ (1862) p. 5 note
.)As has been told, Giuliano de' Medici was murdered on the 26th April1478, and we see by this that only three months la
ter Botticelli waspaid for his painting of the "_proditores_". We can however hardlysuppose that all the members of the
conspiracy were depicted by himin fresco on the facade of the palace, since no fewer than eightyhad been condemned to de
ath. We have no means of knowing whether,besides Botticelli, any other painters, perhaps Leonardo, wascommissioned, when
 the criminals had been hanged in person out ofthe windows of the Palazzo del Podest├ι to represent them thereafterwards
 in effigy in memory of their disgrace. Nor do we knowwhether the assassin who had escaped may at first not have beenpro
visionally represented as hanged in effigy. Now, when we try toconnect the historical facts with this drawing by Leonard
oreproduced on Pl. LXII, No. I, and the full description of theconspirator's dress and its colour on the same sheet, the
re seems tobe no reasonable doubt that Bernardo Bandini is here represented ashe was actually hanged on December 29th, 1
479, after his capture atConstantinople. The dress is certainly not that in which hecommitted the murder. A long furred
coat might very well be worn atConstantinople or at Florence in December, but hardly in April. Thedoubt remains whether
Leonardo described Bernardo's dress so fullybecause it struck him as remarkable, or whether we may not rathersuppose tha
t this sketch was actually made from nature with theintention of using it as a study for a wall painting to be executed.
It cannot be denied that the drawing has all the appearance ofhaving been made for this purpose. Be this as it may, the
sketchunder discussion proves, at any rate, that Leonardo was in Florencein December 1479, and the note that accompanies
 it is valuable asadding one more characteristic specimen to the very small number ofhis MSS. that can be proved to have
 been written between 1470 and1480.]Notes on the Last Supper (665-668).665.One who was drinking and has left the glass i
n its position andturned his head towards the speaker.Another, twisting the fingers of his hands together turns with ste
rnbrows to his companion [6]. Another with his hands spread open showsthe palms, and shrugs his shoulders up his ears ma
king a mouth ofastonishment [8].[9] Another speaks into his neighbour's ear and he, as he listens tohim, turns towards h
im to lend an ear [10], while he holds a knifein one hand, and in the other the loaf half cut through by theknife. [13]
Another who has turned, holding a knife in his hand,upsets with his hand a glass on the table [14].[Footnote 665, 666: I
n the original MS. there is no sketch toaccompany these passages, and if we compare them with those drawingsmade by Leon
ardo in preparation for the composition of thepicture--Pl. XLV, XLVI--, (compare also Pl. LII, 1 and the drawingson p. 2
97) it is impossible to recognise in them a faithfulinterpretation of the whole of this text; but, if we compare thesepa
ssages with the finished picture (see p. 334) we shall see that inmany places they coincide. For instance, compare No. 6
65, 1. 6--8,with the fourth figure on the right hand of Christ. The variousactions described in lines 9--10, 13--14 are
to be seen in the groupof Peter, John and Judas; in the finished picture however it is nota glass but a salt cellar that
 Judas is upsetting.]666.Another lays his hand on the table and is looking. Another blows hismouthful. [3] Another leans
 forward to see the speaker shading hiseyes with his hand. [5] Another draws back behind the one who leansforward, and s
ees the speaker between the wall and the man who isleaning [Footnote: 6. _chinato_. I have to express my regret forhavin
g misread this word, written _cinato_ in the original, andhaving altered it to _"ciclo"_ when I first published this tex
t, in'The Academy' for Nov. 8, 1879 immediately after I had discoveredit, and subsequently in the small biography of Leo
nardo da Vinci(Great Artists) p. 29.].[Footnote: In No. 666. Line I must refer to the furthest figure onthe left; 3, 5 a
nd 6 describe actions which are given to the groupof disciples on the left hand of Christ.]667.CHRIST.Count Giovanni, th
e one with the Cardinal of Mortaro.[Footnote: As this note is in the same small Manuscript as thepassage here immediatel
y preceding it, I may be justified inassuming that Leonardo meant to use the features of the person herenamed as a suita
ble model for the figure of Christ. The celebrateddrawing of the head of Christ, now hanging in the Brera Gallery atMila
n, has obviously been so much restored that it is now impossibleto say, whether it was ever genuine. We have only to com
pare it withthe undoubtedly genuine drawings of heads of the disciples in PI.XLVII, XLVIII and L, to admit that not a si
ngle line of the Milandrawing in its present state can be by the same hand.]668.Philip, Simon, Matthew, Thomas, James th
e Greater, Peter, Philip,Andrew, Bartholomew.[Footnote: See PI. XLVI. The names of the disciples are given in theorder i
n which they are written in the original, from right to left,above each head. The original drawing is here slightly redu
ced inscale; it measures 39 centimetres in length by 26 in breadth.]669.  On the battle of Anghiari.  Florentine  Neri d
i Gino Capponi  Bernardetto de' Medici  Micheletto,  Niccolo da Pisa  Conte Francesco                         Pietro Gia
n Paolo                         Guelfo Orsino,                         Messer  Rinaldo   degli
            AlbizziBegin with the address of Niccolo Piccinino to the soldiers and thebanished Florentines among whom ar
e Messer Rinaldo degli Albizzi andother Florentines. Then let it be shown how he first mounted onhorseback in armour; an
d the whole army came after him--40 squadronsof cavalry, and 2000 foot soldiers went with him. Very early in themorning
the Patriarch went up a hill to reconnoitre the country,that is the hills, fields and the valley watered by a river; and
from thence he beheld Niccolo Picinino coming from Borgo SanSepolcro with his people, and with a great dust; and perceiv
ing themhe returned to the camp of his own people and addressed them. Havingspoken he prayed to God with clasped hands,
when there appeared acloud in which Saint Peter appeared and spoke to the Patriarch.--500cavalry were sent forward by th
e Patriarch to hinder or check therush of the enemy. In the foremost troop Francesco the son ofNiccolo Piccinino [24] wa
s the first to attack the bridge which washeld by the Patriarch and the Florentines. Beyond the bridge to hisleft he sen
t forward some infantry to engage ours, who drove themback, among whom was their captain Micheletto [29] whose lot it wa
sto be that day at the head of the army. Here, at this bridge thereis a severe struggle; our men conquer and the enemy i
s repulsed.Here Guido and Astorre, his brother, the Lord of Faenza with a greatnumber of men, re-formed and renewed the
fight, and rushed upon theFlorentines with such force that they recovered the bridge andpushed forward as far as the ten
ts. But Simonetto advanced with 600horse, and fell upon the enemy and drove them back once more fromthe place, and recap
tured the bridge; and behind him came more menwith 2000 horse soldiers. And thus for a long time they fought withvarying
 fortune. But then the Patriarch, in order to divert theenemy, sent forward Niccolo da Pisa [44] and Napoleone Orsino, a
beardless lad, followed by a great multitude of men, and then wasdone another great feat of arms. At the same time Nicco
lo Piccininourged forward the remnant of his men, who once more made ours giveway; and if it had not been that the Patri
arch set himself at theirhead and, by his words and deeds controlled the captains, oursoldiers would have taken to fligh
t. The Patriarch had someartillery placed on the hill and with these he dispersed the enemy'sinfantry; and the disorder
was so complete that Niccolo began tocall back his son and all his men, and they took to flight towardsBorgo. And then b
egan a great slaughter of men; none escaped but theforemost of those who had fled or who hid themselves. The battleconti
nued until sunset, when the Patriarch gave his mind torecalling his men and burying the dead, and afterwards a trophy wa
serected.[Footnote: 669. This passage does not seem to me to be in Leonardo'shand, though it has hitherto been generally
 accepted as genuine. Notonly is the writing unlike his, but the spelling also is quitedifferent. I would suggest that t
his passage is a description of theevents of the battle drawn up for the Painter by order of theSignoria, perhaps by som
e historian commissioned by them, to serveas a scheme or programme of the work. The whole tenor of the styleseems to me
to argue in favour of this theory; and besides, it wouldbe in no way surprising that such a document should have beenpre
served among Leonardo's autographs.]Allegorical representations referring to the duke of Milan(670-673).670.Ermine with
blood Galeazzo, between calm weather and arepresentation of a tempest.[Footnote: 670. Only the beginning of this text is
 legible; thewriting is much effaced and the sense is consequently obscure. Itseems to refer like the following passage
to an allegoricalpicture.]671.Il Moro with spectacles, and Envy depicted with False Report andJustice black for il Moro.
Labour as having a branch of vine [_or_ a screw] in her hand.672.Il Moro as representing Good Fortune, with hair, and ro
bes, and hishands in front, and Messer Gualtieri taking him by the robes with arespectful air from below, having come in
 from the front [5].Again, Poverty in a hideous form running behind a youth. Il Morocovers him with the skirt of his rob
e, and with his gilt sceptre hethreatens the monster.A plant with its roots in the air to represent one who is at hislas
t;--a robe and Favour.Of tricks [_or_ of magpies] and of burlesque poems [_or_ ofstarlings].Those who trust themselves t
o live near him, and who will be a largecrowd, these shall all die cruel deaths; and fathers and motherstogether with th
eir families will be devoured and killed by cruelcreatures.[Footnote: 1--10 have already been published by _Amoretti_ in
_Memorie Storiche_ cap. XII. He adds this note with regard toGualtieri: "_A questo M. Gualtieri come ad uomo generoso e
beneficoscrive il Bellincioni un Sonetto (pag, 174) per chiedergli unpiacere; e 'l Tantio rendendo ragione a Lodovico il
 Moro, perchepubblicasse le Rime del Bellincioni; ci├▓ hammi imposto, gli dice:l'humano fidele, prudente e sollicito exe
cutore delli tuoicomandamenti Gualtero, che fa in tutte le cose ove tu possi farutile, ogni studio vi metti._" A somewha
t mysterious and evidentlyallegorical composition--a pen and ink drawing--at Windsor, see PLLVIII, contains a group of f
igures in which perhaps the idea isworked out which is spoken of in the text, lines 1-5.]673.He was blacker than a horne
t, his eyes were as red as a burning fireand he rode on a tall horse six spans across and more than 20 longwith six gian
ts tied up to his saddle-bow and one in his hand whichhe gnawed with his teeth. And behind him came boars with tusksstic
king out of their mouths, perhaps ten spans.Allegorical representations (674--678).674.Above the helmet place a half glo
be, which is to signify ourhemisphere, in the form of a world; on which let there be a peacock,richly decorated, and wit
h his tail spread over the group; and everyornament belonging to the horse should be of peacock's feathers on agold grou
nd, to signify the beauty which comes of the grace bestowedon him who is a good servant.On the shield a large mirror to
signify that he who truly desiresfavour must be mirrored in his virtues.On the opposite side will be represented Fortitu
de, in like mannerin her place with her pillar in her hand, robed in white, to signify... And all crowned; and Prudence
with 3 eyes. The housing of thehorse should be of plain cloth of gold closely sprinkled withpeacock's eyes, and this hol
ds good for all the housings of thehorse, and the man's dress. And the man's crest and his neck-chainare of peacock's fe
athers on golden ground.On the left side will be a wheel, the centre of which should beattached to the centre of the hor
se's hinder thigh piece, and in thecentre Prudence is seen robed in red, Charity sitting in a fierychariot and with a br
anch of laurel in her hand, to signify the hopewhich comes of good service.[21] Messer Antonio Grimani of Venice compani
on of Antonio Maria[23].[Footnote: _Messer Antonio Gri_. His name thus abbreviated is, therecan be no doubt, Grimani. An
tonio Grimani was the famous Doge who in1499 commanded the Venetian fleet in battle against the Turks. Butafter the abor
tive conclusion of the expedition--Ludovico being theally of the Turks who took possession of Friuli--, Grimani was driv
eninto exile; he went to live at Rome with his son Cardinal DomenicoGrimani. On being recalled to Venice he filled the o
ffice of Dogefrom 1521 to 1523. _Antonio Maria_ probably means Antonio MariaGrimani, the Patriarch of Aquileia.]675.Fame
 should be depicted as covered all over with tongues instead offeathers, and in the figure of a bird.676.Pleasure and Pa
in represent as twins, since there never is onewithout the other; and as if they were united back to back, sincethey are
 contrary to each other.[6] Clay, gold.[Footnote: 7. _oro. fango_: gold, clay. These words stand below theallegorical fi
gure.]If you take Pleasure know that he has behind him one who will dealyou Tribulation and Repentance.[9] This represen
ts Pleasure together with Pain, and show them astwins because one is never apart from the other. They are back toback be
cause they are opposed to each other; and they exist ascontraries in the same body, because they have the same basis,ina
smuch as the origin of pleasure is labour and pain, and thevarious forms of evil pleasure are the origin of pain. Theref
ore itis here represented with a reed in his right hand which is uselessand without strength, and the wounds it inflicts
 are poisoned. InTuscany they are put to support beds, to signify that it is herethat vain dreams come, and here a great
 part of life is consumed. Itis here that much precious time is wasted, that is, in the morning,when the mind is compose
d and rested, and the body is made fit tobegin new labours; there again many vain pleasures are enjoyed; bothby the mind
 in imagining impossible things, and by the body intaking those pleasures that are often the cause of the failing oflife
. And for these reasons the reed is held as their support.[Footnote: 676. The pen and ink drawing on PI. LIX belongs to
thispassage.][Footnote: 8. _tribolatione_. In the drawing caltrops may be seenlying in the old man's right hand, others
are falling and othersagain are shewn on the ground. Similar caltrops are drawn in MS.Tri. p. 98 and underneath them, as
 well as on page 96 the words_triboli di ferro_ are written. From the accompanying text itappears that they were intende
d to be scattered on the ground at thebottom of ditches to hinder the advance of the enemy. Count GiulioPorro who publis
hed a short account of the Trivulzio MS. in the"_Archivio Storico Lombardo_", Anno VIII part IV (Dec. 31, 1881) hasthis
note on the passages treating of "_triboli_": "_E quiaggiunger├▓ che anni sono quando venne fabbricata la nuovacavalleri
zza presso il castello di Milano, ne furono trovati due cheio ho veduto ed erano precisamente quali si trovano descritti
 edisegnati da Leonardo in questo codice_".There can therefore be no doubt that this means of defence was ingeneral use,
 whether it were originally Leonardo's invention or not.The play on the word "_tribolatione_", as it occurs in the drawi
ngat Oxford, must then have been quite intelligible.][Footnote: 9--22. These lines, in the original, are written on thel
eft side of the page and refer to the figure shown on PI. LXI. Nextto it is placed the group of three figures given in P
I. LX No. I.Lines 21 and 22, which are written under it, are the onlyexplanation given.]Evil-thinking is either Envy or
Ingratitude.677.Envy must be represented with a contemptuous motion of the handtowards heaven, because if she could she
would use her strengthagainst God; make her with her face covered by a mask of fairseeming; show her as wounded in the e
ye by a palm branch and by anolive-branch, and wounded in the ear by laurel and myrtle, tosignify that victory and truth
 are odious to her. Many thunderboltsshould proceed from her to signify her evil speaking. Let her belean and haggard be
cause she is in perpetual torment. Make her heartgnawed by a swelling serpent, and make her with a quiver withtongues se
rving as arrows, because she often offends with it. Giveher a leopard's skin, because this creature kills the lion out o
fenvy and by deceit. Give her too a vase in her hand full of flowersand scorpions and toads and other venomous creatures
; make her rideupon death, because Envy, never dying, never tires of ruling. Makeher bridle, and load her with divers ki
nds of arms because all herweapons are deadly.Toleration.Intolerable.No sooner is Virtue born than Envy comes into the w
orld to attackit; and sooner will there be a body without a shadow than Virtuewithout Envy.[Footnote: The larger of the
two drawings on PI. LXI is explained bythe first 21 lines of this passage. L. 22 and 23, which are writtenabove the spac
e between the two drawings, do not seem to have anyreference to either. L. 24-27 are below the allegorical twin figurewh
ich they serve to explain.]678.When Pluto's Paradise is opened, then there may be devils placed intwelve pots like openi
ngs into hell. Here will be Death, the Furies,ashes, many naked children weeping; living fires made of variouscolours...
.679.  John the Baptist  Saint Augustin  Saint Peter  Paul  Elisabeth  Saint Clara.  Bernardino  Our Lady  Louis  Bonave
ntura  Anthony of Padua.  Saint Francis.  Francis,  Anthony, a lily and book;  Bernardino with the [monogram of] Jesus,
 Louis with 3 fleur de lys on his breast and              the crown at his feet,  Bonaventura with Seraphim,  Saint Clar
a with the tabernacle,  Elisabeth with a Queen's crown.[Footnote: 679. The text of the first six lines is written within
 asquare space of the same size as the copy here given. The names arewritten in the margin following the order in which
they are hereprinted. In lines 7--12 the names of those saints are repeated ofwhom it seemed necessary to point out the
emblems.]List of drawings.680.  A head, full face, of a young man  with fine flowing hair,  Many flowers drawn from natu
re,  A head, full face, with curly hair,  Certain figures of Saint Jerome,  [6] The measurements of a figure,  Drawings
of furnaces.  A head of the Duke,  [9] many designs for knots,  4 studies for the panel of Saint Angelo  A small composi
tion of Girolamo da Fegline,  A head of Christ done with the pen,  [13] 8 Saint Sebastians,  Several compositions of Ang
els,  A chalcedony,  A head in profile with fine hair,  Some pitchers seen in(?) perspective,  Some machines for ships,
 Some machines for waterworks,  A head, a portrait of Atalanta raising her  face;  The head of Geronimo da Fegline,  The
 head of Gian Francisco Borso,  Several throats of old women,  Several heads of old men,  Several nude figures, complete
,  Several arms, eyes, feet, and positions,  A Madonna, finished,  Another, nearly in profile,  Head of Our Lady ascendi
ng into Heaven,  A head of an old man with long chin,  A head of a gypsy girl,  A head with a hat on,  A representation
of the Passion, a cast,  A head of a girl with her hair gathered in a knot,  A head, with the brown hair dressed.[Footno
te: 680. This has already been published by AMORETTI _Memoriestoriche_ cap. XVI. His reading varies somewhat from that h
eregiven, _e. g._ l. 5 and 6. _Certi Sangirolami in su d'una figura_;and instead of I. 13. _Un San Bastiano_.][Footnote:
 680. 9. _Molti disegni di gruppi_. VASARI in his life ofLeonardo (IV, 21, ed. MILANESI 1880) says: "_Oltrech├σ perse te
mpofino a disegnare_ gruppi _di corde fatti con ordine, e che da uncapo seguissi tutto il resto fino all' altro, tanto c
he s'empiessiun tondo; che se ne vede in istampa uno difficilissimo e moltobello, e nel mezzo vi sono queste parole: Leo
nardus VinciAccademia_". _Gruppi_ must here be understood as a technicalexpression for those twisted ornaments which are
 well known throughwood cuts. AMORETTI mentions six different ones in the AmbrosianLibrary. I am indebted to M. DELABORD
E for kindly informing me thatthe original blocks of these are preserved in his department in theBiblioth├ρque Nationale
 in Paris. On the cover of these volumes is acopy from one of them. The size of the original is 23 1/2centimetres by 26
1/4. The centre portion of another is given on p.361. G. Govi remarks on these ornaments (_Saggio_ p. 22): "_Codestigrup
pi eran probabilmente destinati a servir di modello a ferri darilegatori per adornar le cartelle degli scolari (?). Freg
isomigliantissimi a questi troviamo infatti impressi in oro suicartoni di vari volumi contemporanei, e li vediam pur fig
urare nellelettere iniziali di alcune edizioni del tempo._"D├╝rer who copied them, omitting the inscription, added to th
e secondimpressions his own monogram. In his diary he designates them simplyas "_Die sechs Knoten_" (see THAUSING, Life
of A. D├╝rer I, 362,363). In Leonardo's MSS. we find here and there little sketches orsuggestions for similar ornaments.
 Compare too G. MONGERI, _L'Artein Milano_, p. 315 where an ornament of the same character is givenfrom the old decorati
ons of the vaulted ceiling of the Sacristy ofS. Maria delle Grazie.][Footnote: 680, 17. The meaning in which the word _c
oppi_, literallypitchers, is here used I am unable to determine; but a change to_copie_ seems to me too doubtful to be r
isked.]681.  Stubborn rigour.  Doomed rigour.[Footnote: See PI. LXII, No. 2, the two upper pen and ink drawings.The orig
inals, in the Windsor collection are slightly washed withcolour. The background is blue sky; the plough and the instrume
ntwith the compass are reddish brown, the sun is tinted yellow].682.  Obstacles cannot crush me  Every obstacle yields t
o stern resolve  He who is fixed to a star does not change  his mind.[Footnote: This text is written to elucidate two sk
etches which wereobviously the first sketches for the drawings reproduced on PL LXII,No. 2.]683.Ivy is [a type] of longe
vity.[Footnote: In the original there is, near this text, a sketch of acoat wreathed above the waist with ivy.]684.  Tru
th      the sun.  falsehood   a mask.  innocence,  malignity.  Fire destroys falsehood,  that is sophistry, and  restore
s truth, driving out  darkness.  Fire may be represented as the destroy of  all sophistry, and as the  image and demonst
ration of truth;  because it is light and drives  out darkness which conceals  all essences [or subtle things].[Footnote
: See PI. LXIII. L. 1-8 are in the middle of the page; 1.9-14 to the right below; 1. 15-22 below in the middle column. T
herest of the text is below the sketches on the left. There are someother passages on this page relating to geometry.]TR
UTH.  Fire destroys all sophistry, that is deceit;  and maintains truth alone, that is gold.  Truth at last cannot be hi
dden.  Dissimulation  is of no avail. Dissimulation is  to no purpose before  so great a judge.  Falsehood puts on a mas
k.  Nothing is hidden under the sun.  Fire is to represent truth because it  destroys all sophistry and lies; and the  m
ask is for lying and falsehood  which conceal truth.685.  Movement will cease before we are  weary  of being useful.  Mo
vement will fail sooner than usefulness.  Death sooner than        I am never weary   of  weariness.               being
 useful,  In serving others I      is a motto for carnval.  cannot do enough.        Without fatigue.  No labour is  suf
ficient to tire me.  Hands into which  ducats and precious  stones fall like snow; they  never become tired by serving,
 but this  service is only for its  utility and not for our      I am never weary  own benefit.                 of being
 useful.  Naturally  nature has so disposed me.686.  This shall be placed in the  hand of Ingratitude.  Wood nourishes t
he fire that  consumes it.687.TO REPRESENT INGRATITUDE.  When the sun appears  which dispels darkness in  general, you p
ut out the  light which dispelled it  for you in particular  for your need and convenience.688.  On this side Adam and E
ve on the other;  O misery of mankind, of how many things do  you make yourself the slave for money![Footnote: See PI. L
XIV. The figures of Adam and Eve in the cloudshere alluded to would seem to symbolise their superiority to allearthly ne
eds.]689.Thus are base unions sundered.[Footnote: A much blurred sketch is on the page by this text. Itseems to represen
t an unravelled plait or tissue.]690.  Constancy does not begin, but is that  which perseveres.[Footnote: A drawing in r
ed chalk, also rubbed, which stands in theoriginal in the middle of this text, seems to me to be intended fora sword hil
t, held in a fist.]691.  Love, Fear, and Esteem,--  Write these on three stones. Of servants.692.Prudence Strength.693.
 Fame alone raises herself to Heaven,  because virtuous things are in favour with God.  Disgrace should be represented u
pside  down, because all her deeds are contrary to  God and tend to hell.694.Short liberty.695.  Nothing is so much to b
e feared as Evil  Report.  This Evil Report is born of life.696.Not to disobey.697.  A felled tree which is shooting  ag
ain.  I am still hopeful.  A falcon,  Time.[Footnote: I. _Albero tagliato_. This emblem was displayed duringthe Carnival
 at Florence in 1513. See VASARI VI, 251, ed. MILANESI1881. But the coincidence is probably accidental.]698.  Truth here
 makes Falsehood torment  lying tongues.699.  Such as harm is when it hurts me not,  is good which avails me not.[Footno
te: See PI. LX, No. 2. Compare this sketch with that on PI.LXII, No. 2. Below the two lines of the text there are two mo
relines: _li g├╣chi (giunchi) che rit├σg├▓ le paglucole (pagliucole)chelli (che li) anniegano_.]700.He who offends other
s, does not secure himself.[Footnote: See PI. LX, No. 3.]701.Ingratitude.[Footnote: See PI. LX, No. 4. Below the bottom
sketches are theunintelligible words "_sta stilli_." For "_Ingratitudo_" comparealso Nos. 686 and 687.]702.One's thought
s turn towards Hope.[Footnote: 702. By the side of this passage is a sketch ofa cage with a bird sitting in it.]Ornament
s and Decorations for feasts (703-705).703.A bird, for a comedy.[Footnote: The biographies say so much, and the author's
 notes sayso little of the invention attributed to Leonardo of makingartificial birds fly through the air, that the text
 here given is ofexceptional interest from being accompanied by a sketch. It is avery slight drawing of a bird with outs
pread wings, which appears tobe sliding down a stretched string. Leonardo's flying machines andhis studies of the flight
 of birds will be referred to later.]704.A DRESS FOR THE CARNIVAL.To make a beautiful dress cut it in thin cloth and giv
e it anodoriferous varnish, made of oil of turpentine and of varnish ingrain, with a pierced stencil, which must be wett
ed, that it may notstick to the cloth; and this stencil may be made in a pattern ofknots which afterwards may be filled
up with black and the groundwith white millet.[Footnote 7: The grains of black and white milletwould stick to the varnis
h and look like embroidery.][Footnote: Ser Giuliano, da Vinci the painter's brother, had beencommissioned, with some oth
ers, to order and to execute the garmentsof the Allegorical figures for the Carnival at Florence in 1515--16;VASARI howe
ver is incorrect in saying of the Florentine Carnival of1513: "_equelli che feciono ed ordinarono gli abiti delle figure
furono Ser Piero da Vinci, padre di Lonardo, e Bernardino diGiordano, bellissimi ingegni_" (See MILANESI'S ed. Voi. VI,
pg.251.)]705.Snow taken from the high peaks of mountains might be carried to hotplaces and let to fall at festivals in o
pen places at summer time.*** End of Volume 1The Notebooks of Leonardo Da VinciVolume 2Translated by Jean Paul Richter18
88XI.The notes on Sculpture.Compared with the mass of manuscript treating of Painting, a verysmall number of passages be
aring on the practice and methods ofSculpture are to be found scattered through the note books; theseare here given at t
he beginning of this section (Nos. 706-709).There is less cause for surprise at finding that the equestrianstatue of Fra
ncesco Sforza is only incidentally spoken of; for,although Leonardo must have worked at it for a long succession ofyears
, it is not in the nature of the case that it could have givenrise to much writing. We may therefore regard it as partic
ularlyfortunate that no fewer than thirteen notes in the master'shandwriting can be brought together, which seem to thro
w light onthe mysterious history of this famous work. Until now writers onLeonardo were acquainted only with the passage
s numbered 712, 719,720, 722 and 723.In arranging these notes on sculpture I have given the precedence tothose which tre
at of the casting of the monument, not merely becausethey are the fullest, but more especially with a view toreconstruct
ing the monument, an achievement which really almost lieswithin our reach by combining and comparing the whole of themat
erials now brought to light, alike in notes and in sketches.A good deal of the first two passages, Nos. 710 and 711, whi
ch referto this subject seems obscure and incomprehensible; still, theysupplement each other and one contributes in no s
mall degree to thecomprehension of the other. A very interesting and instructivecommentary on these passages may be foun
d in the fourth chapter ofVasari's Introduzione della Scultura under the title "Come si fannoi modelli per fare di bronz
o le figure grandi e picciole, e come leforme per buttarle; come si armino di ferri, e come si gettino dimetallo," &c. A
mong the drawings of models of the moulds for castingwe find only one which seems to represent the horse in the act ofga
lloping--No. 713. All the other designs show the horse as pacingquietly and as these studies of the horse are accompanie
d by copiousnotes as to the method of casting, the question as to the positionof the horse in the model finally selected
, seems to be decided bypreponderating evidence. "Il cavallo dello Sforza"--C. Boito remarksvery appositely in the Saggi
o on page 26, "doveva sembrare fratelloal cavallo del Colleoni. E si direbbe che questo fosse figlio delcavallo del Gatt
amelata, il quale pare figlio di uno dei quattrocavalli che stavano forse sull' Arco di Nerone in Roma" (now atVenice).
The publication of the Saggio also contains thereproduction of a drawing in red chalk, representing a horse walkingto th
e left and supported by a scaffolding, given here on Pl. LXXVI,No. 1. It must remain uncertain whether this represents t
he model asit stood during the preparations for casting it, or whether--asseems to me highly improbable--this sketch sho
ws the model as it wasexhibited in 1493 on the Piazza del Castello in Milan under atriumphal arch, on the occasion of th
e marriage of the EmperorMaximilian to Bianca Maria Sforza. The only important point here isto prove that strong evidenc
e seems to show that, of the numerousstudies for the equestrian statue, only those which represent thehorse pacing agree
 with the schemes of the final plans.The second group of preparatory sketches, representing the horse asgalloping, must
therefore be considered separately, a distinctionwhich, in recapitulating the history of the origin of the monumentseems
 justified by the note given under No. 720.Galeazza Maria Sforza was assassinated in 1476 before his scheme forerecting
a monument to his father Francesco Sforza could be carriedinto effect. In the following year Ludovico il Moro the younga
spirant to the throne was exiled to Pisa, and only returned toMilan in 1479 when he was Lord (Governatore) of the State
of Milan,in 1480 after the minister Cecco Simonetta had been murdered. It mayhave been soon after this that Ludovico il
Moro announced acompetition for an equestrian statue, and it is tolerably certainthat Antonio del Pollajuolo took part i
n it, from this passage inVasari's Life of this artist: "E si trovo, dopo la morte sua, ildisegno e modello che a Lodovi
co Sforza egli aveva fatto per lastatua a cavallo di Francesco Sforza, duca di Milano; il qualedisegno e nel nostro Libr
o, in due modi: in uno egli ha sottoVerona; nell'altro, egli tutto armato, e sopra un basamento pieno dibattaglie, fa sa
ltare il cavallo addosso a un armato; ma la cagioneperche non mettesse questi disegni in opera, non ho gia potutosapere.
" One of Pollajuolo's drawings, as here described, has latelybeen discovered by Senatore Giovanni Morelli in the MunichP
inacothek. Here the profile of the horseman is a portrait ofFrancesco Duke of Milan, and under the horse, who is gallopi
ng tothe left, we see a warrior thrown and lying on the ground; preciselythe same idea as we find in some of Leonardo's
designs for themonument, as on Pl. LXVI, LXVII, LXVIII, LXIX and LXXII No. 1; and,as it is impossible to explain this re
markable coincidence bysupposing that either artist borrowed it from the other, we can onlyconclude that in the terms of
 the competition the subject proposedwas the Duke on a horse in full gallop, with a fallen foe under itshoofs.Leonardo m
ay have been in the competition there and then, but themeans for executing the monument do not seem to have been at once
forthcoming. It was not perhaps until some years later that Leonardoin a letter to the Duke (No. 719) reminded him of th
e project forthe monument. Then, after he had obeyed a summons to Milan, the planseems to have been so far modified, per
haps in consequence of aremonstrance on the part of the artist, that a pacing horse wassubstituted for one galloping, an
d it may have been at the same timethat the colossal dimensions of the statue were first decided on.The designs given on
 Pl. LXX, LXXI, LXXII, 2 and 3, LXXIII and LXXIVand on pp. 4 and 24, as well as three sketches on Pl. LXIX may bestudied
 with reference to the project in its new form, though it ishardly possible to believe that in either of these we see th
e designas it was actually carried out. It is probable that in MilanLeonardo worked less on drawings, than in making sma
ll models of waxand clay as preparatory to his larger model. Among the drawingsenumerated above, one in black chalk, Pl.
 LXXIII--the upper sketchon the right hand side, reminds us strongly of the antique statue ofMarcus Aurelius. If, as it
would seem, Leonardo had not until thenvisited Rome, he might easily have known this statue from drawingsby his former m
aster and friend Verrocchio, for Verrocchio had beenin Rome for a long time between 1470 and 1480. In 1473 Pope SixtusIV
 had this antique equestrian statue restored and placed on a newpedestal in front of the church of San Giovanni in Luter
ano.Leonardo, although he was painting independently as early as in 1472is still spoken of as working in Verrocchio's st
udio in 1477. Twoyears later the Venetian senate decided on erecting an equestrianstatue to Colleoni; and as Verrocchio,
 to whom the work wasentrusted, did not at once move from Florence to Venice--where hedied in 1488 before the casting wa
s completed--but on the contraryremained in Florence for some years, perhaps even till 1485,Leonardo probably had the op
portunity of seeing all his designs forthe equestrian statue at Venice and the red chalk drawing on Pl.LXXIV may be a re
miniscence of it.The pen and ink drawing on Pl. LXXII, No. 3, reminds us ofDonatello's statue of Gattamelata at Padua. H
owever it does notappear that Leonardo was ever at Padua before 1499, but we mayconclude that he took a special interest
 in this early bronze statueand the reports he could procure of it, form an incidental remarkwhich is to be found in C.
A. 145a; 432a, and which will be given inVol. II under Ricordi or Memoranda. Among the studies--in the widestsense of th
e word--made in preparation statue we may include theAnatomy of the Horse which Lomazzo and Vas mention; the mostimporta
nt parts of this work still exist in the Queen's Li Windsor.It was beyond a doubt compiled by Leonardo when at Milan; on
lyinteresting records to be found among these designs are reproducedin Nos. 716a but it must be pointed out that out of
40 sheets ofstudies of the movements of the belonging to that treatise, a horsein full gallop occurs but once.If we may
trust the account given by Paulus Jovius--about l527--Leonardo's horse was represented as "vehementer incitatus etanhela
tus". Jovius had probably seen the model exhibited at Milan;but, need we, in fact, infer from this description that the
horsewas galloping? Compare Vasari's description of the Gattamelatamonument at Padua: "Egli [Donatello] vi ando ben vole
ntieri, e feceil cavallo di bronzo, che e in sulla piazza di Sant Antonio, nelquale si dimostra lo sbuffamento ed il fre
mito del cavallo, ed ilgrande animo e la fierezza vivacissimamente espressa dall'arte nellafigura che lo cavalca".These
descriptions, it seems to me, would only serve to mark thedifference between the work of the middle ages and that of the
renaissance.We learn from a statement of Sabba da Castiglione that, when Milanwas taken by the French in 1499, the model
 sustained some injury;and this informant, who, however is not invariably trustworthy, addsthat Leonardo had devoted ful
ly sixteen years to this work (la formadel cavallo, intorno a cui Leonardo avea sedici anni continuiconsumati). This oft
en-quoted passage has given ground for anassumption, which has no other evidence to support it, that Leonardohad lived i
n Milan ever since 1483. But I believe it is nearer thetruth to suppose that this author's statement alludes to the fact
that about sixteen years must have past since the competition inwhich Leonardo had taken part.I must in these remarks co
nfine myself strictly to the task in handand give no more of the history of the Sforza monument than isneeded to explain
 the texts and drawings I have been able toreproduce. In the first place, with regard to the drawings, I mayobserve that
 they are all, with the following two exceptions, in theQueen's Library at Windsor Castle; the red chalk drawing on Pl.L
XXVI No. 1 is in the MS. C. A. (see No. 7l2) and the fragmentarypen and ink drawing on page 4 is in the Ambrosian Librar
y. Thedrawings from Windsor on Pl. LXVI have undergone a triflingreduction from the size of the originals.There can no l
onger be the slightest doubt that the well-knownengraving of several horsemen (Passavant, Le Peintre-Graveur, Vol.V, p.
181, No. 3) is only a copy after original drawings byLeonardo, executed by some unknown engraver; we have only to compar
ethe engraving with the facsimiles of drawings on Pl. LXV, No. 2, Pl.LXVII, LXVIII and LXIX which, it is quite evident,
have served asmodels for the engraver.On Pl. LXV No. 1, in the larger sketch to the right hand, only thebase is distinct
ly visible, the figure of the horseman is effaced.Leonardo evidently found it unsatisfactory and therefore rubbed itout.
The base of the monument--the pedestal for the equestrian statue--isrepeatedly sketched on a magnificent plan. In the sk
etch justmentioned it has the character of a shrine or aedicula to contain asarcophagus. Captives in chains are here rep
resented on theentablature with their backs turned to that portion of the monumentwhich morestrictly constitutes the ped
estal of the horse. The lower portion ofthe aedicula is surrounded by columns. In the pen and ink drawingPl. LXVI--the l
ower drawing on the right hand side--the sarcophagusis shown between the columns, and above the entablature is a plintho
n which the horse stands. But this arrangement perhaps seemed toLeonardo to lack solidity, and in the little sketch on t
he lefthand, below, the sarcophagus is shown as lying under an archedcanopy. In this the trophies and the captive warrio
rs are detachedfrom the angles. In the first of these two sketches the place forthe trophies is merely indicated by a fe
w strokes; in the thirdsketch on the left the base is altogether broader, buttresses andpinnacles having been added so a
s to form three niches. The blackchalk drawing on Pl. LXVIII shows a base in which the angles areformed by niches with p
ilasters. In the little sketch to the extremeleft on Pl. LXV, No. 1, the equestrian statue serves to crown acircular tem
ple somewhat resembling Bramante's tempietto of SanPietro in Montario at Rome, while the sketch above to the rightdispla
ys an arrangement faintly reminding us of the tomb of theScaligers in Verona. The base is thus constructed of two platfo
rmsor slabs, the upper one considerably smaller than the lower onewhich is supported on flying buttresses with pinnacles
.On looking over the numerous studies in which the horse is notgalloping but merely walking forward, we find only one dr
awing forthe pedestal, and this, to accord with the altered character of thestatue, is quieter and simpler in style (Pl.
 LXXIV). It rises almostvertically from the ground and is exactly as long as the pacinghorse. The whole base is here arr
anged either as an independentbaldaquin or else as a projecting canopy over a recess in which thefigure of the deceased
Duke is seen lying on his sarcophagus; in thelatter case it was probably intended as a tomb inside a church.Here, too, i
t was intended to fill the angles with trophies orcaptive warriors. Probably only No. 724 in the text refers to thework
for the base of the monument.If we compare the last mentioned sketch with the description of aplan for an equestrian mon
ument to Gian Giacomo Trivulzio (No. 725)it seems by no means impossible that this drawing is a preparatorystudy for the
 very monument concerning which the manuscript gives usdetailed information. We have no historical record regarding this
sketch nor do the archives in the Trivulzio Palace give us anyinformation. The simple monument to the great general in S
an NazaroMaggiore in Milan consists merely of a sarcophagus placed in recesshigh on the wall of an octagonal chapel. The
 figure of the warrioris lying on the sarcophagus, on which his name is inscribed; a pieceof sculpture which is certainl
y not Leonardo's work. Gian GiacomoTrivulzio died at Chartres in 1518, only five months beforeLeonardo, and it seems to
me highly improbable that this should havebeen the date of this sketch; under these circumstances it wouldhave been done
 under the auspices of Francis I, but the Italiangeneral was certainly not in favour with the French monarch at thetime.
 Gian Giacomo Trivulzio was a sworn foe to Ludovico il Moro,whom he strove for years to overthrow. On the 6th September
1499 hemarched victorious into Milan at the head of a French army. In ashort time, however, he was forced to quit Milan
again when Ludovicoil Moro bore down upon the city with a force of Swiss troops. On the15th of April following, after de
feating Lodovico at Novara,Trivulzio once more entered Milan as a Conqueror, but his hopes ofbecoming _Governatore_ of t
he place were soon wrecked by intrigue.This victory and triumph, historians tell us, were signalised byacts of vengeance
 against the dethroned Sforza, and it might havebeen particularly flattering to him that the casting andconstruction of
the Sforza monument were suspended for the time.It must have been at this moment--as it seems to me--that hecommissioned
 the artist to prepare designs for his own monument,which he probably intended should find a place in the Cathedral orin
 some other church. He, the husband of Margherita di NicolinoColleoni, would have thought that he had a claim to the sam
edistinction and public homage as his less illustrious connection hadreceived at the hands of the Venetian republic. It
was at this verytime that Trivulzio had a medal struck with a bust portrait ofhimself and the following remarkable inscr
iption on the reverse:_DEO FAVENTE--1499--DICTVS--10--IA--EXPVLIT--LVDOVICV--SF--(Sfortiam) DVC-- (ducem) MLI (Mediolani
)--NOIE(nomine)--REGIS--FRANCORVM--EODEM--ANN --(anno) RED'T (redit)--LVS(Ludovicus)--SVPERATVS ET CAPTVS--EST--AB--EO.
_In the Library ofthe Palazzo Trivulzio there is a MS. of Callimachus Siculus writtenat the end of the XVth or beginning
 of the XVIth century. At thebeginning of this MS. there is an exquisite illuminated miniature ofan equestrian statue wi
th the name of the general on the base; it ishowever very doubtful whether this has any connection withLeonardo's design
.Nos. 731-740, which treat of casting bronze, have probably a veryindirect bearing on the arrangements made for casting
the equestrianstatue of Francesco Sforza. Some portions evidently relate to thecasting of cannon. Still, in our research
es about Leonardo's work onthe monument, we may refer to them as giving us some clue to theprocess of bronze casting at
that period.Some practical hints (706-709).7O6.OF A STATUE.If you wish to make a figure in marble, first make one of cla
y, andwhen you have finished it, let it dry and place it in a case whichshould be large enough, after the figure is take
n out of it, toreceive also the marble, from which you intend to reveal the figurein imitation of the one in clay. After
 you have put the clay figureinto this said case, have little rods which will exactly slip in tothe holes in it, and thr
ust them so far in at each hole that eachwhite rod may touch the figure in different parts of it. And colourthe portion
of the rod that remains outside black, and mark each rodand each hole with a countersign so that each may fit into itspl
ace. Then take the clay figure out of this case and put in yourpiece of marble, taking off so much of the marble that al
l your rodsmay be hidden in the holes as far as their marks; and to be thebetter able to do this, make the case so that
it can be lifted up;but the bottom of it will always remain under the marble and in thisway it can be lifted with tools
with great ease.707.Some have erred in teaching sculptors to measure the limbs of theirfigures with threads as if they t
hought that these limbs wereequally round in every part where these threads were wound aboutthem.708.MEASUREMENT AND DIV
ISION OF A STATUE.Divide the head into 12 degrees, and each degree divide into 12points, and each point into 12 minutes,
 and the minutes into minimsand the minims into semi minims.Degree--point--minute--minim.709.Sculptured figures which ap
pear in motion, will, in their standingposition, actually look as if they were falling forward.[Footnote: _figure di ril
ievo_. Leonardo applies this termexclusively to wholly detached figures, especially to those standingfree. This note app
arently refers to some particular case, though wehave no knowledge of what that may have been. If we suppose it torefer
to the first model of the equestrian statue of FrancescoSforza (see the introduction to the notes on Sculpture) thisobse
rvation may be regarded as one of his arguments for abandoningthe first scheme of the Sforza Monument, in which the hors
e was tobe galloping (see page 2). It is also in favour of this theory thatthe note is written in a manuscript volume al
ready completed in1492. Leonardo's opinions as to the shortcomings of plastic workswhen compared with paintings are give
n under No. 655 and 656.]Notes on the casting of the Sforza monument (710-715).710.Three braces which bind the mould.[If
 you want to make simple casts quickly, make them in a box ofriver sand wetted with vinegar.][When you shall have made t
he mould upon the horse you must make thethickness of the metal in clay.]Observe in alloying how many hours are wanted f
or eachhundredweight. [In casting each one keep the furnace and its firewell stopped up.] [Let the inside of all the mou
lds be wetted withlinseed oil or oil of turpentine, and then take a handful ofpowdered borax and Greek pitch with aqua v
itae, and pitch the mouldover outside so that being under ground the damp may not [damageit?][To manage the large mould
make a model of the small mould, make asmall room in proportion.][Make the vents in the mould while it is on the horse.]
Hold the hoofs in the tongs, and cast them with fish glue. Weigh theparts of the mould and the quantity of metal it will
 take to fillthem, and give so much to the furnace that it may afford to eachpart its amount of metal; and this you may
know by weighing the clayof each part of the mould to which the quantity in the furnace mustcorrespond. And this is done
 in order that the furnace for the legswhen filled may not have to furnish metal from the legs to help outthe head, whic
h would be impossible. [Cast at the same casting asthe horse the little door][Footnote: The importance of the notes incl
uded under this number isnot diminished by the fact that they have been lightly crossed outwith red chalk. Possibly they
 were the first scheme for some fullerobservations which no longer exist; or perhaps they were crossed outwhen Leonardo
found himself obliged to give up the idea of castingthe equestrian statue. In the original the first two sketches areabo
ve l. 1, and the third below l. 9.]711.THE MOULD FOR THE HORSE.Make the horse on legs of iron, strong and well set on a
goodfoundation; then grease it and cover it with a coating, leaving eachcoat to dry thoroughly layer by layer; and this
will thicken it bythe breadth of three fingers. Now fix and bind it with iron as maybe necessary. Moreover take off the
mould and then make thethickness. Then fill the mould by degrees and make it goodthroughout; encircle and bind it with i
ts irons and bake it insidewhere it has to touch the bronze.OF MAKING THE MOULD IN PIECES.Draw upon the horse, when fini
shed, all the pieces of the mould withwhich you wish to cover the horse, and in laying on the clay cut itin every piece,
 so that when the mould is finished you can take itoff, and then recompose it in its former position with its joins, byt
he countersigns.The square blocks _a b_ will be between the cover and the core, thatis in the hollow where the melted br
onze is to be; and these squareblocks of bronze will support the intervals between the mould andthe cover at an equal di
stance, and for this reason these squaresare of great importance.The clay should be mixed with sand.Take wax, to return
[what is not used] and to pay for what is used.Dry it in layers.Make the outside mould of plaster, to save time in dryin
g and theexpense in wood; and with this plaster enclose the irons [props]both outside and inside to a thickness of two f
ingers; make terracotta. And this mould can be made in one day; half a boat load ofplaster will serve you.Good.Dam it up
 again with glue and clay, or white of egg, and bricks andrubbish.[Footnote: See Pl. LXXV. The figure "40," close to the
 sketch in themiddle of the page between lines 16 and 17 has been added by acollector's hand.In the original, below line
 21, a square piece of the page has beencut out about 9 centimetres by 7 and a blank piece has been gummedinto the place
.Lines 22-24 are written on the margin. l. 27 and 28 are close to thesecond marginal sketch. l. 42 is a note written abo
ve the thirdmarginal sketch and on the back of this sheet is the text given asNo. 642. Compare also No. 802.]712.All the
 heads of the large nails.[Footnote: See Pl. LXXVI, No. i. This drawing has already beenpublished in the "_Saggio delle
Opere di L. da Vinci_." Milano 1872,Pl. XXIV, No. i. But, for various reasons I cannot regard theeditor's suggestions as
 satisfactory. He says: "_Veggonsi learmature di legname colle quali forse venne sostenuto il modello,quando per le nozz
e di Bianca Maria Sforza con Massimilianoimperatore, esso fu collocato sotto un arco trionfale davanti alCastello_."713.
These bindings go inside.714.Salt may be made from human excrements, burnt and calcined, madeinto lees and dried slowly
at a fire, and all the excrements producesalt in a similar way and these salts when distilled, are verystrong.[Footnote:
 VASARI repeatedly states, in the fourth chapter of his_Introduzione della Scultura_, that in preparing to cast bronzest
atues horse-dung was frequently used by sculptors. If,notwithstanding this, it remains doubtful whether I am justified i
nhaving introduced here this text of but little interest, no suchdoubt can be attached to the sketch which accompanies i
t.]715.METHOD OF FOUNDING AGAIN.This may be done when the furnace is made [Footnote: this note iswritten below the sketc
hes.] strong and bruised.Models for the horse of the Sforza monument (716-718).7l6.Messer Galeazzo's big genet717.Messer
 Galeazzo's Sicilian horse.[Footnote: These notes are by the side of a drawing of a horse withfigured measurements.]718.
Measurement of the Sicilian horse the leg from behind, seen infront, lifted and extended.[Footnote: There is no sketch b
elonging to this passage. Galeazzehere probably means Galeazze di San Severino, the famous captain whomarried Bianca the
 daughter of Ludovico il Moro.]Occasional references to the Sforza monument (719-724).719.Again, the bronze horse may be
 taken in hand, which is to be to theimmortal glory and eternal honour of the happy memory of the princeyour father, and
 of the illustrious house of Sforza.[Footnote: The letter from which this passage is here extracted willbe found complet
e in section XXI. (see the explanation of it, onpage 2).]720.On the 23rd of April 1490 I began this book, and recommence
d thehorse.721.There is to be seen, in the mountains of Parma and Piacenza, amultitude of shells and corals full of hole
s, still sticking to therocks, and when I was at work on the great horse for Milan, a largesackful of them, which were f
ound thereabout, was brought to me intomy workshop, by certain peasants.722.Believe me, Leonardo the Florentine, who has
 to do the equestrianbronze statue of the Duke Francesco that he does not need to careabout it, because he has work for
all his life time, and, being sogreat a work, I doubt whether he can ever finish it. [Footnote: Thispassage is quoted fr
om a letter to a committee at Piacenza for whomLeonardo seems to have undertaken to execute some work. The letteris give
n entire in section XXL; in it Leonardo remonstrates as tosome unreasonable demands.]723.Of the horse I will say nothing
 because I know the times. [Footnote:This passage occurs in a rough copy of a letter to Ludovico il Moro,without date (s
ee below among the letters).]724.During ten years the works on the marbles have been going on I willnot wait for my paym
ent beyond the time, when my works are finished.[Footnote: This possibly refers to the works for the pedestal of theeque
strian statue concerning which we have no farther information inthe MSS. See p. 6.]The project of the Trivulzio monument
.725.THE MONUMENT TO MESSER GIOVANNI JACOMO DA TREVULZO.[2] Cost of the making and materials for the horse [5].[Footnote
: In the original, lines 2-5, 12-14, 33-35, are written onthe margin. This passage has been recently published by G. Gov
i inVol. V, Ser. 3a, of _Transunti, Reale Accademia dei Linea, sed. del5 Giugno, 1881,_ with the following introductory
note: _"Desiderointanto che siano stampati questi pochi frammenti perche so che sonostati trascritti ultimamente, e verr
anno messi in luce tra pocofuori d'Italia. Li ripubblichi pure chi vuole, ma si sappia almenoche anche tra noi si conosc
evano, e s'eran raccolti da anni percomporne, quando che fosse, una edizione ordinata degli scritti diLeonardo."_The lea
rned editor has left out line 22 and has written 3 _pie_ for8 _piedi_ in line 25. There are other deviations of less imp
ortancefrom the original.]A courser, as large as life, with the rider requires for the cost ofthe metal, duc. 500.And fo
r cost of the iron work which is inside the model, andcharcoal, and wood, and the pit to cast it in, and for binding the
mould, and including the furnace where it is to be cast ... duc.200.To make the model in clay and then in wax......... d
uc. 432.To the labourers for polishing it when it is cast. ....... duc. 450.in all. . duc. 1582.[12] Cost of the marble
of the monument [14].Cost of the marble according to the drawing. The piece of marbleunder the horse which is 4 braccia
long, 2 braccia and 2 inches wideand 9 inches thick 58 hundredweight, at 4 Lire and 10 Soldi perhundredweight.. duc. 58.
And for 13 braccia and 6 inches of cornice, 7 in. wide and 4 in.thick, 24 hundredweight....... duc. 24.And for the friez
e and architrave, which is 4 br. and 6 in. long, 2br. wide and 6 in. thick, 29 hundredweight., duc. 20.And for the capit
als made of metal, which are 8, 5 inches in. squareand 2 in. thick, at the price of 15 ducats each, will come to......du
c. 122.And for 8 columns of 2 br. 7 in., 4 1/2 in. thick, 20 hundredweightduc. 20.And for 8 bases which are 5 1/2 in. sq
uare and 2 in. high 5 hund'..duc. 5.And for the slab of the tombstone 4 br. io in. long, 2 br. 4 1/2 in.wide 36 hundredw
eight....... duc. 36.And for 8 pedestal feet each 8 br. long and 6 1/2 in. wide and 6 1/2in. thick, 20 hundredweight com
e to... duc. 20.And for the cornice below which is 4 br. and 10 in. long, and 2 br.and 5 in. wide, and 4 in. thick, 32 h
und'.. duc. 32.And for the stone of which the figure of the deceased is to be madewhich is 3 br. and 8 in. long, and 1 b
r. and 6 in. wide, and 9 in.thick, 30 hund'.. duc. 30.And for the stone on which the figure lies which is 3 br. and 4 in
.long and 1 br. and 2 in., wide and 4 1/2 in. thick duc. 16.And for the squares of marble placed between the pedestals w
hich are8 and are 9 br. long and 9 in. wide, and 3 in. thick, 8hundredweight . . . duc. 8. in all. . duc. 389.[33]Cost o
f the work in marble[35].Round the base on which the horse stands there are 8 figures at 25ducats each ............ duc.
 200.And on the same base there are 8 festoons with some other ornaments,and of these there are 4 at the price of 15 duc
ats each, and 4 atthe price of 8 ducats each ....... duc. 92.And for squaring the stones duc. 6.Again, for the large cor
nice which goes below the base on which thehorse stands, which is 13 br. and 6 in., at 2 due. per br. ......duc. 27.And
for 12 br. of frieze at 5 due. per br. ........... duc. 60.And for 12 br. of architrave at 1 1/2 duc. per br. ....... du
c. 18.And for 3 rosettes which will be the soffit of the monument, at 20ducats each .......... duc. 60.And for 8 fluted
columns at 8 ducats each ......... duc. 64.And for 8 bases at 1 ducat each, duc. 8.And for 8 pedestals, of which 4 are a
t 10 duc. each, which go abovethe angles; and 4 at 6 duc. each .. duc. 64.And for squaring and carving the moulding of t
he pedestals at 2 duc.each, and there are 8 .... duc. 16.And for 6 square blocks with figures and trophies, at 25 duc. e
ach.. duc. 150.And for carving the moulding of the stone under the figure of thedeceased .......... duc. 40.For the stat
ue of the deceased, to do it well .......... duc. 100.For 6 harpies with candelabra, at 25 ducats each ......... duc. 15
0.For squaring the stone on which the statue lies, and carving themoulding ............ duc. 20.in all .. duc. 1075.The
sum total of every thing added together amount to ...... duc.3046.726.MINT AT ROME.It can also be made without a spring.
 But the screw above mustalways be joined to the part of the movable sheath: [Margin note:The mint of Rome.] [Footnote:
See Pl. LXXVI. This passage is takenfrom a note book which can be proved to have been used in Rome.]All coins which do n
ot have the rim complete, are not to be acceptedas good; and to secure the perfection of their rim it is requisitethat,
in the first place, all the coins should be a perfect circle;and to do this a coin must before all be made perfect in we
ight, andsize, and thickness. Therefore have several plates of metal made ofthe same size and thickness, all drawn throu
gh the same gauge so asto come out in strips. And out of [24] these strips you will stampthe coins, quite round, as siev
es are made for sorting chestnuts[27]; and these coins can then be stamped in the way indicatedabove; &c.[31] The hollow
 of the die must be uniformly wider than the lower,but imperceptibly [35].This cuts the coins perfectly round and of the
 exact thickness, andweight; and saves the man who cuts and weighs, and the man who makesthe coins round. Hence it passe
s only through the hands of thegauger and of the stamper, and the coins are very superior.[Footnote: See Pl. LXXVI No. 2
. The text of lines 31-35 standsparallel 1. 24-27.Farther evidence of Leonardo's occupations and engagements at Romeunde
r Pope Leo X. may be gathered from some rough copies of letterswhich will be found in this volume. Hitherto nothing has
been knownof his work in Rome beyond some doubtful, and perhaps mythical,statements in Vasari.]727.POWDER FOR MEDALS.The
 incombustible growth of soot on wicks reduced to powder, burnttin and all the metals, alum, isinglass, smoke from a bra
ss forge,each ingredient to be moistened, with aqua vitae or malmsey orstrong malt vinegar, white wine or distilled extr
act of turpentine,or oil; but there should be little moisture, and cast in moulds.[Margin note: On the coining of medals
 (727. 728).] [Footnote: Themeaning of _scagliuolo_ in this passage is doubtful.]728.OF TAKING CASTS OF MEDALS.A paste o
f emery mixed with aqua vitae, or iron filings withvinegar, or ashes of walnut leaves, or ashes of straw very finelypowd
ered.[Footnote: The meaning of _scagliuolo_ in this passage is doubtful.]The diameter is given in the lead enclosed; it
is beaten with ahammer and several times extended; the lead is folded and keptwrapped up in parchment so that the powder
 may not be spilt; thenmelt the lead, and the powder will be on the top of the melted lead,which must then be rubbed bet
ween two plates of steel till it isthoroughly pulverised; then wash it with aqua fortis, and theblackness of the iron wi
ll be dissolved leaving the powder clean.Emery in large grains may be broken by putting it on a cloth manytimes doubled,
 and hit it sideways with the hammer, when it willbreak up; then mix it little by little and it can be founded withease;
 but if you hold it on the anvil you will never break it, whenit is large.Any one who grinds smalt should do it on plate
s of tempered steelwith a cone shaped grinder; then put it in aqua fortis, which meltsaway the steel that may have been
worked up and mixed with thesmalt, and which makes it black; it then remains purified and clean;and if you grind it on p
orphyry the porphyry will work up and mixwith the smalt and spoil it, and aqua fortis will never remove itbecause it can
not dissolve the porphyry.If you want a fine blue colour dissolve the smalt made with tartar,and then remove the salt.Vi
trified brass makes a fine red.729.STUCCO.Place stucco over the prominence of the..... which may be composedof Venus and
 Mercury, and lay it well over that prominence of thethickness of the side of a knife, made with the ruler and cover thi
swith the bell of a still, and you will have again the moisture withwhich you applied the paste. The rest you may dry [M
argin note: Onstucco (729. 730).] [Footnote: In this passage a few words have beenwritten in a sort of cipher--that is t
o say backwards; as in l. 3_erenev_ for _Venere_, l. 4 _oirucrem_ for Mercurio, l. 12 _ilorreve co ecarob_ for _il everr
o (?) co borace_. The meaning of theword before _"di giesso"_ in l. 1 is unknown; and the sense, inwhich _sagoma_ is use
d here and in other passages is obscure.--_Venere_ and _Mercurio_ may mean 'marble' and 'lime', of whichstucco is compos
ed.12. The meaning of _orreve_ is unknown.]well; afterwards fire it, and beat it or burnish it with a goodburnisher, and
 make it thick towards the side.STUCCO.Powder ... with borax and water to a paste, and make stucco of it,and then heat i
t so that it may dry, and then varnish it, with fire,so that it shines well.730.STUCCO FOR MOULDING.Take of butter 6 par
ts, of wax 2 parts, and as much fine flour aswhen put with these 2 things melted, will make them as firm as waxor modell
ing clay.GLUE.Take mastic, distilled turpentine and white lead.On bronze casting generally (731-740).731.TO CAST.Tartar
burnt and powdered with plaster and cast cause the plaster tohold together when it is mixed up again; and then it will d
issolvein water.732.TO CAST BRONZE IN PLASTER.Take to every 2 cups of plaster 1 of ox-horns burnt, mix themtogether and
make your cast with it.733.When you want to take a cast in wax, burn the scum with a candle,and the cast will come out w
ithout bubbles.734.2 ounces of plaster to a pound of metal;-- walnut, which makes itlike the curve.[Footnote: The second
 part of this is quite obscure.]735.[Dried earth 16 pounds, 100 pounds of metal wet clay 20,--of wet100,-half,- which in
creases 4 Ibs. of water,--1 of wax, 1 Ib. ofmetal, a little less,-the scrapings of linen with earth, measure formeasure.
] [Footnote: The translation is given literally, but themeaning is quite obscure.]736.Such as the mould is, so will the
cast be.737.HOW CASTS OUGHT TO BE POLISHED.Make a bunch of iron wire as thick as thread, and scrub them with[this and] w
ater; hold a bowl underneath that it may not make a mudbelow.HOW TO REMOVE THE ROUGH EDGES FROM BRONZE.Make an iron rod,
 after the manner of a large chisel, and with thisrub over those seams on the bronze which remain on the casts of thegun
s, and which are caused by the joins in the mould; but make thetool heavy enough, and let the strokes be long and broad.
TO FACILITATE MELTING.First alloy part of the metal in the crucible, then put it in thefurnace, and this being in a molt
en state will assist in beginningto melt the copper.TO PREVENT THE COPPER COOLING IN THE FURNACE.When the copper cools i
n the furnace, be ready, as soon as youperceive it, to cut it with a long stick while it is still in apaste; or if it is
 quite cold cut it as lead is cut with broad andlarge chisels.IF YOU HAVE TO MAKE A LARGE CAST.If you have to make a cas
t of a hundred thousand pounds do it withtwo furnaces and with 2000 pounds in each, or as much as 3000 poundsat most.738
.HOW TO PROCEED TO BREAK A LARGE MASS OF BRONZE.If you want to break up a large mass of bronze, first suspend it,and the
n make round it a wall on the four sides, like a trough ofbricks, and make a great fire therein. When it is quite red ho
t giveit a blow with a heavy weight raised above it, and with great force.739.TO COMBINE LEAD WITH OTHER METAL.If you wi
sh for economy in combining lead with the metal in order tolessen the amount of tin which is necessary in the metal, fir
stalloy the lead with the tin and then add the molten copper.How TO MELT [METAL] IN A FURNACE.The furnace should be betw
een four well founded pillars.OF THE THICKNESS OF THE COATING.The coating should not be more than two fingers thick, it
should belaid on in four thicknesses over fine clay and then well fixed, andit should be fired only on the inside and th
en carefully coveredwith ashes and cow's dung.OF THE THICKNESS OF THE GUN.The gun being made to carry 600 Ibs. of ball a
nd more, by this ruleyou will take the measure of the diameter of the ball and divide itinto 6 parts and one of these pa
rts will be its thickness at themuzzle; but at the breech it must always be half. And if the ball isto be 700 lbs., 1/7t
h of the diameter of the ball must be itsthickness in front; and if the ball is to be 800, the eighth of itsdiameter in
front; and if 900, 1/8th and 1/2 [3/16], and if 1000,1/9th.OF THE LENGTH OF THE BODY OF THE GUN.If you want it to throw
a ball of stone, make the length of the gunto be 6, or as much as 7 diameters of the ball; and if the ball isto be of ir
on make it as much as 12 balls, and if the ball is to beof lead, make it as much as 18 balls. I mean when the gun is to
havethe mouth fitted to receive 600 lbs. of stone ball, and more.OF THE THICKNESS OF SMALL GUNS.The thickness at the muz
zle of small guns should be from a half toone third of the diameter of the ball, and the length from 30 to 36balls.740.O
F LUTING THE FURNACE WITHIN.The furnace must be luted before you put the metal in it, with earthfrom Valenza, and over t
hat with ashes.[Footnote 1. 2.: _Terra di Valenza_.--Valenza is north ofAlessandria on the Po.]OF RESTORING THE METAL WH
EN IT IS BECOMING COOL.When you see that the bronze is congealing take some willow-wood cutin small chips and make up th
e fire with it.THE CAUSE OF ITS CURDLING.I say that the cause of this congealing often proceeds from too muchfire, or fr
om ill-dried wood.TO KNOW THE CONDITION OF THE FIRE.You may know when the fire is good and fit for your purpose by aclea
r flame, and if you see the tips of the flames dull and endingin much smoke do not trust it, and particularly when the f
lux metalis almost fluid.OF ALLOYING THE METAL.Metal for guns must invariably be made with 6 or even 8 per cent,that is
6 of tin to one hundred of copper, for the less you put in,the stronger will the gun be.WHEN THE TIN SHOULD BE ADDED TO
THE COPPER.The tin should be put in with the copper when the copper is reducedto a fluid.HOW TO HASTEN THE MELTING.You c
an hasten the melting when 2/3ds of the copper is fluid; youcan then, with a stick of chestnut-wood, repeatedly stir wha
t ofcopper remains entire amidst what is melted._Introductory Observations on the Architectural Designs (XII), andWritin
gs on Architecture (XIII).__Until now very little has been known regarding Leonardo's laboursin the domain of Architectu
re. No building is known to have beenplanned and executed by him, though by some contemporary writersincidental allusion
 is made to his occupying himself witharchitecture, and his famous letter to Lodovico il Moro,--which haslong been a wel
l-known document,--in which he offers his service asan architect to that prince, tends to confirm the belief that he was
something more than an amateur of the art. This hypothesis haslately been confirmed by the publication of certain docume
nts,preserved at Milan, showing that Leonardo was not only employed inpreparing plans but that he took an active part, w
ith much credit,as member of a commission on public buildings; his name remainslinked with the history of the building o
f the Cathedral at Paviaand that of the Cathedral at Milan.__Leonardo's writings on Architecture are dispersed among a l
argenumber of MSS., and it would be scarcely possible to master theircontents without the opportunity of arranging, sort
ing and comparingthe whole mass of materials, so as to have some comprehensive ideaof the whole. The sketches, when isol
ated and considered bythemselves, might appear to be of but little value; it is not tillwe understand their general purp
ort, from comparing them with eachother, that we can form any just estimate of their true worth.__Leonardo seems to have
 had a project for writing a complete andseparate treatise on Architecture, such as his predecessors andcontemporaries h
ad composed--Leon Battista Alberti, Filarete,Francesco di Giorgio and perhaps also Bramante. But, on the otherhand, it c
annot be denied that possibly no such scheme was connectedwith the isolated notes and researches, treating on specialque
stions, which are given in this work; that he was merely workingat problems in which, for some reason or other he took a
 specialinterest.__A great number of important buildings were constructed in Lombardyduring the period between 1472 and
1499, and among them there areseveral by unknown architects, of so high an artistic merit, that itis certainly not impro
bable that either Bramante or Leonardo daVinci may have been, directly or indirectly, concerned in theirerection.__Havin
g been engaged, for now nearly twenty years, in a thoroughstudy of Bramante's life and labours, I have taken a particula
rinterest in detecting the distinguishing marks of his style ascompared with Leonardo's. In 1869 I made researches about
 thearchitectural drawings of the latter in the Codex Atlanticus atMilan, for the purpose of finding out, if possible th
e originalplans and sketches of the churches of Santa Maria delle Grazie atMilan, and of the Cathedral at Pavia, which b
uildings have beensupposed to be the work both of Bramante and of Leonardo. Since 1876I have repeatedly examined Leonard
o's architectural studies in thecollection of his manuscripts in the Institut de France, and some ofthese I have already
 given to the public in my work on_ "Les ProjetsPrimitifs pour la Basilique de St. Pierre de Rome", _P1. 43. In 1879I ha
d the opportunity of examining the manuscript in the PalazzoTrivulzio at Milan, and in 1880 Dr Richter showed me in Lond
on themanuscripts in the possession of Lord Ashburnham, and those in theBritish Museum. I have thus had opportunities of
 seeing most ofLeonardo's architectural drawings in the original, but of themanuscripts tliemselves I have deciphered on
ly the notes whichaccompany the sketches. It is to Dr Richter's exertions that we owethe collected texts on Architecture
 which are now published, andwhile he has undertaken to be responsible for the correct reading ofthe original texts, he
has also made it his task to extract thewhole of the materials from the various MSS. It has been my task toarrange and e
lucidate the texts under the heads which have beenadopted in this work. MS. B. at Paris and the Codex Atlanticus atMilan
 are the chief sources of our knowledge of Leonardo as anarchitect, and I have recently subjected these to a thoroughre-
investigation expressly with a view to this work.__A complete reproduction of all Leonardo's architectural sketcheshas n
ot, indeed, been possible, but as far as the necessarilyrestricted limits of the work have allowed, the utmost completen
esshas been aimed at, and no efforts have been spared to include everything that can contribute to a knowledge of Leonar
do's style. Itwould have been very interesting, if it had been possible, to givesome general account at least of Leonard
o's work and studies inengineering, fortification, canal-making and the like, and it isonly on mature reflection that we
 have reluctantly abandoned thisidea. Leonardo's occupations in these departments have by no meansso close a relation to
 literary work, in the strict sense of theword as we are fairly justified in attributing to his numerous noteson Archite
cture.__Leonardo's architectural studies fall naturally under two heads:__I. Those drawings and sketches, often accompan
ied by short remarksand explanations, which may be regarded as designs for buildings ormonuments intended to be built. W
ith these there are occasionallyexplanatory texts.__II. Theoretical investigations and treatises. A special interestatta
ches to these because they discuss a variety of questions whichare of practical importance to this day. Leonardo's theor
y as to theorigin and progress of cracks in buildings is perhaps to beconsidered as unique in its way in the literature
of Architecture.__HENRY DE GEYMULLER__XII.__Architectural Designs.__I. Plans for towns.__A. Sketches for laying out a ne
w town with a double system of high-level and low-level road-ways.__Pl. LXXVII, No. 1 (MS. B, 15b). A general view of a
town, with theroads outside it sloping up to the high-level ways within.__Pl. LXXVII, No. 3 (MS. B, 16b. see No. 741; an
d MS. B. 15b, see No.742) gives a partial view of the town, with its streets and houses,with explanatory references.__Pl
. LXXVII, No. 2 (MS. B, 15b; see No. 743). View of a doublestaircaise with two opposite flights of steps.__Pl. LXXVIII,
Nos. 2 and 3 (MS. B, 37a). Sketches illustrating theconnection of the two levels of roads by means of steps. The lowerga
lleries are lighted by openings in the upper roadway.__B. Notes on removing houses (MS. Br. M., 270b, see No. 744)._741.
The roads _m_ are 6 braccia higher than the roads _p s_, and eachroad must be 20 braccia wide and have 1/2 braccio slope
 from thesides towards the middle; and in the middle let there be at everybraccio an opening, one braccio long and one f
inger wide, where therain water may run off into hollows made on the same level as _p s_.And on each side at the extremi
ty of the width of the said road letthere be an arcade, 6 braccia broad, on columns; and understand thathe who would go
through the whole place by the high level streetscan use them for this purpose, and he who would go by the low levelcan
do the same. By the high streets no vehicles and similar objectsshould circulate, but they are exclusively for the use o
f gentlemen.The carts and burdens for the use and convenience of the inhabitantshave to go by the low ones. One house mu
st turn its back to theother, leaving the lower streets between them. Provisions, such aswood, wine and such things are
carried in by the doors _n_, andprivies, stables and other fetid matter must be emptied awayunderground. From one arch t
o the next742.must be 300 braccia, each street receiving its light through theopenings of the upper streets, and at each
 arch must be a windingstair on a circular plan because the corners of square ones arealways fouled; they must be wide,
and at the first vault there mustbe a door entering into public privies and the said stairs lead fromthe upper to the lo
wer streets and the high level streets beginoutside the city gates and slope up till at these gates they haveattained th
e height of 6 braccia. Let such a city be built near thesea or a large river in order that the dirt of the city may beca
rried off by the water.743.The construction of the stairs: The stairs _c d_ go down to _f g_,and in the same way _f g_ g
oes down to _h k_.744.ON MOVING HOUSES.Let the houses be moved and arranged in order; and this will be donewith facility
 because such houses are at first made in pieces on theopen places, and can then be fitted together with their timbers i
nthe site where they are to be permanent.[9] Let the men of the country [or the village] partly inhabit thenew houses wh
en the court is absent [12].[Footnote: On the same page we find notes referring to Romolontinoand Villafranca with a ske
tch-map of the course of the "Sodro" andthe "(Lo)cra" (both are given in the text farther on). There canhardly be a doub
t that the last sentence of the passage given above,refers to the court of Francis I. King of France.--L.9-13 arewritten
 inside the larger sketch, which, in the original, is on theright hand side of the page by the side of lines 1-8. The th
reesmaller sketches are below. J. P. R.]_II. Plans for canals and streets in a town.Pl. LXXIX, 1. and 2, (MS. B, 37b, se
e No. 745, and MS. B. 36a, seeNo. 746). A Plan for streets and canals inside a town, by which thecellars of the houses a
re made accessible in boats.The third text given under No. 747 refers to works executed byLeonardo in France._745.The fr
ont _a m_ will give light to the rooms; _a e_ will be 6braccia--_a b_ 8 braccia --_b e_ 30 braccia, in order that the ro
omsunder the porticoes may be lighted; _c d f_ is the place where theboats come to the houses to be unloaded. In order t
o render thisarrangement practicable, and in order that the inundation of therivers may not penetrate into the cellars,
it is necessary to chosean appropriate situation, such as a spot near a river which can bediverted into canals in which
the level of the water will not varyeither by inundations or drought. The construction is shown below;and make choice of
 a fine river, which the rains do not rendermuddy, such as the Ticino, the Adda and many others. [Footnote 12:_Tesino, A
dda e molti altri, i.e._ rivers coming from the mountainsand flowing through lakes.] The construction to oblige the wate
rs tokeep constantly at the same level will be a sort of dock, as shownbelow, situated at the entrance of the town; or b
etter still, someway within, in order that the enemy may not destroy it [14].[Footnote: L. 1-4 are on the left hand side
 and within the sketchgiven on Pl. LXXIX, No. I. Then follows after line 14, the drawingof a sluicegate--_conca_--of whi
ch the use is explained in the textbelow it. On the page 38a, which comes next in the original MS. isthe sketch of an ov
al plan of a town over which is written "_modo dicanali per la citta_" and through the longer axis of it "_canalemagior_
" is written with "_Tesino_" on the prolongation of thecanal. J. P. R.]746.Let the width of the streets be equal to the
average height of thehouses.747.The main underground channel does not receive turbid water, but thatwater runs in the di
tches outside the town with four mills at theentrance and four at the outlet; and this may be done by damming thewater a
bove Romorantin.[11]There should be fountains made in each piazza[13].[Footnote: In the original this text comes immedia
tely after thepassage given as No. 744. The remainder of the writing on the samepage refers to the construction of canal
s and is given later, in the"Topographical Notes".Lines 1-11 are written to the right of the plan lines 11-13underneath
it. J. P. R.][Footnote 10: _Romolontino_ is Romorantin, South of Orleans inFrance.]_III. Castles and Villas.A. Castles.P
l. LXXX, No. 1 (P. V. fol. 39b; No. d'ordre 2282). The fortifiedplace here represented is said by Vallardi to be the_ "c
astello" _atMilan, but without any satisfactory reason. The high tower behindthe_ "rivellino" _ravelin--seems to be inte
nded as a watch-tower.Pl. LXXX, No. 2 (MS. B, 23b). A similarly constructed tower probablyintended for the same use.Pl.
LXXX, No. 3 (MS. B). Sketches for corner towers with steps for acitadel.Pl. LXXX, No. 4 (W. XVI). A cupola crowning a co
rner tower; aninteresting example of decorative fortification. In thisreproduction of the original pen and ink drawing i
t appearsreversed.B. Projects for Palaces.Pl. LXXXI, No. 2 (MS. C. A, 75b; 221a, see No. 748). Project for aroyal reside
nce at Amboise in France.Pl. LXXXII, No. 1 (C. A 308a; 939a). A plan for a somewhat extensiveresidence, and various deta
ils; but there is no text to elucidateit; in courts are written the three names:Sam                   cosi
     giova       _(St. Mark)_           _(Cosmo)_               _(John)_,arch                   mo                     n
inoC. Plans for small castles or Villas.The three following sketches greatly resemble each other. Pl.LXXXII, No. 2 (MS.
K3 36b; see No. 749).__Pl. LXXXII, No. 3 (MS. B 60a; See No. 750).Pl. LXXXIII (W. XVII). The text on this sheet refers t
o Cyprus (seeTopographical Notes No. 1103), but seems to have no directconnection with the sketches inserted between.Pl.
 LXXXVIII, Nos. 6 and 7 (MS. B, 12a; see No. 751). A section of acircular pavilion with the plan of a similar building b
y the side ofit. These two drawings have a special historical interest becausethe text written below mentions the Duke a
nd Duchess of Milan.The sketch of a villa on a terrace at the end of a garden occurs inC. A. 150; and in C. A. 77b; 225b
 is another sketch of a villasomewhat resembling the_ Belvedere _of Pope Innocent VIII, at Rome.In C. A. 62b; 193b there
 is a Loggia.Pl. LXXXII, No. 4 (C. A. 387a; 1198a) is a tower-shaped_ Loggia_above a fountain. The machinery is very ing
eniously screened fromview._748.The Palace of the prince must have a piazza in front of it.Houses intended for dancing o
r any kind of jumping or any othermovements with a multitude of people, must be on the ground- floor;for I have already
witnessed the destruction of some, causing deathto many persons, and above all let every wall, be it ever so thin,rest o
n the ground or on arches with a good foundation.Let the mezzanines of the dwellings be divided by walls made of verythi
n bricks, and without wood on account of fire.Let all the privies have ventilation [by shafts] in the thickness ofthe wa
lls, so as to exhale by the roofs.The mezzanines should be vaulted, and the vaults will be stronger inproportion as they
 are of small size.The ties of oak must be enclosed in the walls in order to beprotected from fire.[Footnote: The remark
s accompanying the plan reproduced on Pl.LXXXI, No. 2 are as follows: Above, to the left: "_in_ a _angholostia la guardi
a de la sstalla_" (in the angle _a_ may be the keeperof the stable). Below are the words "_strada dabosa_" (road toAmboi
se), parallel with this "_fossa br 40_" (the moat 40 braccia)fixing the width of the moat. In the large court surrounded
 by aportico "_in terre No.--Largha br.80 e lugha br 120_." To the rightof the castle is a large basin for aquatic sport
s with the words"_Giostre colle nave cioe li giostra li stieno sopra le na_"(Jousting in boats that is the men are to be
 in boats). J. P. R.]The privies must be numerous and going one into the other in orderthat the stench may not penetrate
 into the dwellings., and all theirdoors must shut off themselves with counterpoises.The main division of the facade of
this palace is into two portions;that is to say the width of the court-yard must be half the wholefacade; the 2nd ...749
.30 braccia wide on each side; the lower entrance leads into a hall10 braccia wide and 30 braccia long with 4 recesses e
ach with achimney.[Footnote: On each side of the castle, Pl. LXXXII. No. 2 there aredrawings of details, to the left "_C
amino_" a chimney, to the rightthe central lantern, sketched in red "_8 lati_" _i.e._ an octagon.]750.The firststorey [o
r terrace] must be entirely solid.751.The pavilion in the garden of the Duchess of Milan.The plan of the pavilion which
is in the middle of the labyrinth ofthe Duke of Milan.[Footnote: This passage was first published by AMORETTI in _Memori
eStoriche_ Cap. X: Una sua opera da riportarsi a quest' anno fu ilbagno fatto per la duchessa Beatrice nel parco o giard
ino delCastello. Lionardo non solo ne disegno il piccolo edifizio a foggiadi padiglione, nel cod. segnato Q. 3, dandone
anche separatamente lapianta; ma sotto vi scrisse: Padiglione del giardino della duchessa;e sotto la pianta: Fondamento
del padiglione ch'e nel mezzo dellabirinto del duca di Milano; nessuna data e presso il padiglione,disegnato nella pagin
a 12, ma poco sopra fra molti circoliintrecciati vedesi = 10 Luglio 1492 = e nella pagina 2 presso adalcuni disegni di l
egumi qualcheduno ha letto Settembre 1482 in vecedi 1492, come dovea scriverevi, e probabilmente scrisse Lionardo.The or
iginal text however hardly bears the interpretation put uponit by AMORETTI. He is mistaken as to the mark on the MS. as
well asin his statements as to the date, for the MS. in question has nodate; the date he gives occurs, on the contrary,
in anothernote-book. Finally, it appears to me quite an open question whetherLeonardo was the architect who carried out
the construction of thedome-like Pavilion here shown in section, or of the ground plan ofthe Pavilion drawn by the side
of it. Must we, in fact, suppose that"_il duca di Milano_" here mentioned was, as has been generallyassumed, Ludovico il
 Moro? He did not hold this title from theEmperor before 1494; till that date he was only called _Governatore_and Leonar
do in speaking of him, mentions him generally as "_ilMoro_" even after 1494. On January 18, 1491, he married Beatriced'E
ste the daughter of Ercole I, Duke of Ferrara. She died on the2nd January 1497, and for the reasons I have given it seem
simprobable that it should be this princess who is here spoken of asthe "_Duchessa di Milano_". From the style of the ha
ndwriting itappears to me to be beyond all doubt that the MS. B, from which thispassage is taken, is older than the date
d MSS. of 1492 and 1493. Inthat case the Duke of Milan here mentioned would be Gian Galeazzo(1469-1494) and the Duchess
would be his wife Isabella of Aragon, towhom he was married on the second February 1489. J. P. R.]752.The earth that is
dug out from the cellars must be raised on oneside so high as to make a terrace garden as high as the level of thehall;
but between the earth of the terrace and the wall of thehouse, leave an interval in order that the damp may not spoil th
eprincipal walls._IV. Ecclesiastical Architecture.A. General Observations._753.A building should always be detached on a
ll sides so that its formmay be seen.[Footnote: The original text is reproduced on Pl. XCII, No. 1 to theleft hand at th
e bottom.]754.Here there cannot and ought not to be any _campanile_; on thecontrary it must stand apart like that of the
 Cathedral and of SanGiovanni at Florence, and of the Cathedral at Pisa, where thecampanile is quite detached as well as
 the dome. Thus each candisplay its own perfection. If however you wish to join it to thechurch, make the lantern serve
for the campanile as in the church atChiaravalle.[Footnote: This text is written by the side of the plan given on Pl.XCI
. No. 2.][Footnote 12: The Abbey of Chiaravalle, a few miles from Milan, hasa central tower on the intersection of the c
ross in the style ofthat of the Certosa of Pavia, but the style is mediaeval (A. D.1330). Leonardo seems here to mean, t
hat in a building, in which thecircular form is strongly conspicuous, the campanile must either beseparated, or rise fro
m the centre of the building and thereforetake the form of a lantern.]755.It never looks well to see the roofs of a chur
ch; they should ratherbe flat and the water should run off by gutters made in the frieze.[Footnote: This text is to the
left of the domed church reproducedon Pl. LXXXVII, No. 2.]_B. The theory of Dome Architecture.This subject has been more
 extensively treated by Leonardo indrawings than in writing. Still we may fairly assume that it was hispurpose, ultimate
ly to embody the results of his investigation in a_"Trattato delle Cupole." _The amount of materials is remarkablyextens
ive. MS. B is particularly rich in plans and elevations ofchurches with one or more domes--from the simplest form to the
 mostcomplicated that can be imagined. Considering the evident connexionbetween a great number of these sketches, as wel
l as theimpossibility of seeing in them designs or preparatory sketches forany building intended to be erected, the conc
lusion is obvious thatthey were not designed for any particular monument, but weretheoretical and ideal researches, made
 in order to obtain a clearunderstanding of the laws which must govern the construction of agreat central dome, with sma
ller ones grouped round it; and with orwithout the addition of spires, so that each of these parts byitself and in its j
uxtaposition to the other parts should producethe grandest possible effect.In these sketches Leonardo seems to have exha
usted every imaginablecombination. [Footnote 1: In MS. B, 32b (see Pl. C III, No. 2) wefind eight geometrical patterns,
each drawn in a square; and in MS.C.A., fol. 87 to 98 form a whole series of patterns done with thesame intention.] The
results of some of these problems are perhapsnot quite satisfactory; still they cannot be considered to giveevidence of
a want of taste or of any other defect in Leonardo sarchitectural capacity. They were no doubt intended exclusively forh
is own instruction, and, before all, as it seems, to illustrate thefeatures or consequences resulting from a given princ
iple.__I have already, in another place,_ [Footnote 1: Les ProjetsPrimitifs pour la Basilique de St. Pierre de Rome, par
 Bramante,Raphael etc.,Vol. I, p. 2.] _pointed out the law of construction forbuildings crowned by a large dome: namely,
 that such a dome, toproduce the greatest effect possible, should rise either from thecentre of a Greek cross, or from t
he centre of a structure of whichthe plan has some symmetrical affinity to a circle, this circlebeing at the same time t
he centre of the whole plan of the building.Leonardo's sketches show that he was fully aware, as was to beexpected, of t
his truth. Few of them exhibit the form of a Latincross, and when this is met with, it generally gives evidence of thede
termination to assign as prominent a part as possible to the domein the general effect of the building.While it is evide
nt, on the one hand, that the greater number ofthese domes had no particular purpose, not being designed forexecution, o
n the other hand several reasons may be found forLeonardo's perseverance in his studies of the subject.Besides the theor
etical interest of the question for Leonardo andhis_ Trattato _and besides the taste for domes prevailing at thattime, i
t seems likely that the intended erection of some building ofthe first importance like the Duomos of Pavia and Como, the
 churchof Sta. Maria delle Grazie at Milan, and the construction of a Domeor central Tower_ (Tiburio) _on the cathedral
of Milan, may havestimulated Leonardo to undertake a general and thoroughinvestigation of the subject; whilst Leonardo's
 intercourse withBramante for ten years or more, can hardly have remained withoutinfluence in this matter. In fact now t
hat some of this greatArchitect's studies for S. Peter's at Rome have at last becomeknown, he must be considered hencefo
rth as the greatest master ofDome-Architecture that ever existed. His influence, direct orindirect even on a genius like
 Leonardo seems the more likely, sinceLeonardo's sketches reveal a style most similar to that of Bramante,whose name ind
eed, occurs twice in Leonardo's manuscript notes. Itmust not be forgotten that Leonardo was a Florentine; thecharacteris
tic form of the two principal domes of Florence, Sta.Maria del Fiore and the Battisterio, constantly appear as leadingfe
atures in his sketches.The church of San Lorenzo at Milan, was at that time still intact.The dome is to this day one of
the most wonderful cupolas everconstructed, and with its two smaller domes might well attract theattention and study of
a never resting genius such as Leonardo. Awhole class of these sketches betray in fact the direct influence ofthe church
 of S. Lorenzo, and this also seems to have suggested theplan of Bramante's dome of St. Peter's at Rome.In the following
 pages the various sketches for the construction ofdomes have been classified and discussed from a general point ofview.
 On two sheets: Pl. LXXXIV (C.A. 354b; 118a) and Pl. LXXXV,Nos. 1-11 (Ash. II, 6b) we see various dissimilar types, grou
pedtogether; thus these two sheets may be regarded as a sort ofnomenclature of the different types, on which we shall no
w have totreat.__1. Churches formed on the plan of a Greek cross.Group I.Domes rising from a circular base.The simplest
type of central building is a circular edifice.Pl. LXXXIV, No. 9. Plan of a circular building surrounded by acolonnade.P
l. LXXXIV, No. 8. Elevation of the former, with a conical roof.Pl. XC. No. 5. A dodecagon, as most nearly approaching th
e circle.Pl. LXXXVI, No. 1, 2, 3. Four round chapels are added at theextremities of the two principal axes;--compare thi
s plan with fig.1 on p. 44 and fig. 3 on p. 47 (W. P. 5b) where the outer wall isoctagonal.Group II.Domes rising from a
square base.The plan is a square surrounded by a colonnade, and the dome seemsto be octagonal.Pl. LXXXIV. The square pla
n below the circular building No. 8, andits elevation to the left, above the plan: here the ground-plan issquare, the up
per storey octagonal. A further development of thistype is shown in two sketches C. A. 3a (not reproduced here), and inP
l. LXXXVI, No. 5 (which possibly belongs to No. 7 on Pl. LXXXIV).Pl, LXXXV, No. 4, and p. 45, Fig. 3, a Greek cross, rep
eated p. 45,Fig. 3, is another development of the square central plan.The remainder of these studies show two different
systems; in thefirst the dome rises from a square plan,--in the second from anoctagonal base.__Group III.Domes rising fr
om a square base and four pillars. [Footnote 1: Theancient chapel San Satiro, via del Falcone, Milan, is a specimen ofth
is type.]_a) First type. _A Dome resting on four pillars in the centre of asquare edifice, with an apse in the middle, o
f each of the foursides. We have eleven variations of this type.aa) Pl. LXXXVIII, No. 3.bb) Pl. LXXX, No. 5.cc) Pl. LXXX
V, Nos. 2, 3, 5.dd) Pl. LXXXIV, No. 1 and 4 beneath.ee) Pl. LXXXV, Nos. 1, 7, 10, 11._b) Second type. _This consists in
adding aisles to the whole plan ofthe first type; columns are placed between the apses and the aisles;the plan thus obta
ined is very nearly identical with that of S.Lorenzo at Milan.Fig. 1 on p. 56. (MS. B, 75a) shows the result of this tre
atmentadapted to a peculiar purpose about which we shall have to say a fewwords later on.Pl. XCV, No. 1, shows the same
plan but with the addition of a shortnave. This plan seems to have been suggested by the generalarrangement of S. Sepolc
ro at Milan.MS. B. 57b (see the sketch reproduced on p.51). By adding towers inthe four outer angles to the last named p
lan, we obtain a plan whichbears the general features of Bramante's plans for S. Peter's atRome. [Footnote 2: See_ Les p
rojets primitifs _etc., Pl. 9-12.] (Seep. 51 Fig. 1.)Group IV.Domes rising from an octagonal base.This system, developed
 according to two different schemes, has givenrise to two classes with many varieties.In a) On each side of the octagon
chapels of equal form are added.In b) The chapels are dissimilar; those which terminate theprincipal axes being differen
t in form from those which are added onthe diagonal sides of the octagon.a. First Class.The Chapel_ "degli Angeli," _at
Florence, built only to a height ofabout 20 feet by Brunellesco, may be considered as the prototype ofthis group; and, i
ndeed it probably suggested it. The fact that wesee in MS. B. 11b (Pl. XCIV, No. 3) by the side of Brunellesco'splan for
 the Basilica of Sto. Spirito at Florence, a plan almostidentical with that of the_ Capella degli Angeli, _confirms this
supposition. Only two small differences, or we may say improvements,have been introduced by Leonardo. Firstly the back o
f the chapelscontains a third niche, and each angle of the Octagon a foldedpilaster like those in Bramante's_ Sagrestia
di S. M. presso SanSatiro _at Milan, instead of an interval between the two pilastersas seen in the Battistero at Floren
ce and in the Sacristy of Sto.Spirito in the same town and also in the above named chapel byBrunellesco.The first set of
 sketches which come under consideration have atfirst sight the appearance of mere geometrical studies. They seem tohave
 been suggested by the plan given on page 44 Fig. 2 (MS. B, 55a)in the centre of which is written_ "Santa Maria in perti
cha daPavia", _at the place marked A on the reproduction.a) (MS. B, 34b, page 44 Fig. 3). In the middle of each side a c
olumnis added, and in the axes of the intercolumnar spaces a second rowof columns forms an aisle round the octagon. Thes
e are placed at theintersection of a system of semicircles, of which the sixteencolumns on the sides of the octagon are
the centres.b) The preceding diagram is completed and becomes more monumental instyle in the sketch next to it (MS. B, 3
5a, see p. 45 Fig. 1). Anouter aisle is added by circles, having for radius the distancebetween the columns in the middl
e sides of the octagon.c) (MS. B. 96b, see p. 45 Fig. 2). Octagon with an aisle round it;the angles of both are formed b
y columns. The outer sides are formedby 8 niches forming chapels. The exterior is likewise octagonal,with the angles cor
responding to the centre of each of the interiorchapels.Pl. XCII, No. 2 (MS. B. 96b). Detail and modification of theprec
eding plan--half columns against piers--an arrangement by whichthe chapels of the aisle have the same width of opening a
s the innerarches between the half columns. Underneath this sketch thefollowing note occurs:_ questo vole - avere 12 fac
ce - co 12tabernaculi - come - _a_ - _b_. _(This will have twelve sides withtwelve tabernacles as_ a b._) In the remaini
ng sketches of thisclass the octagon is not formed by columns at the angles.The simplest type shows a niche in the middl
e of each side and isrepeated on several sheets, viz: MS. B 3; MS. C.A. 354b (see Pl.LXXXIV, No. 11) and MS. Ash II 6b;
(see Pl. LXXXV, No. 9 and theelevations No. 8; Pl. XCII, No. 3; MS. B. 4b [not reproduced here]and Pl. LXXXIV, No. 2).__
Pl. XCII, 3 (MS. B, 56b) corresponds to a plan like the one in MS.B 35a, in which the niches would be visible outside or
, as in thefollowing sketch, with the addition of a niche in the middle of eachchapel.Pl. XC, No. 6. The niches themselv
es are surrounded by smallerniches (see also No. 1 on the same plate).Octagon expanded on each side.A. by a square chape
l:MS. B. 34b (not reproduced here).B. by a square with 3 niches:MS. B. 11b (see Pl. XCIV, No. 3).C. by octagonal chapels
:a) MS. B, 21a; Pl. LXXXVIII, No. 4.b) No. 2 on the same plate. Underneath there is the remark:_"quest'e come le 8 cappe
le ano a essere facte" _(this is how theeight chapels are to be executed).c) Pl. LXXXVIII, No. 5. Elevation to the plans
 on the same sheet, itis accompanied by the note:_ "ciasscuno de' 9 tiburi no'uole -passare l'alteza - di - 2 - quadri"
_(neither of the 9 domes mustexceed the height of two squares).d) Pl. LXXXVIII, No. 1. Inside of the same octagon. MS. B
, 30a, and34b; these are three repetitions of parts of the same plan with veryslight variations.D. by a circular chapel:
MS. B, 18a (see Fig. 1 on page 47) gives the plan of thisarrangement in which the exterior is square on the ground floor
 withonly four of the chapels projecting, as is explained in the nextsketch.Pl. LXXXIX, MS. B, 17b. Elevation to the pre
ceding plan sketched onthe opposite side of the sheet, and also marked A. It is accompaniedby the following remark, indi
cating the theoretical character ofthese studies:_ questo - edifitio - anchora - starebbe - beneaffarlo dalla linja - _a
_ - _b_ - _c_ - _d_ - insu. _("This edificewould also produce a good effect if only the part above the lines_ ab, c d, _
were executed").Pl. LXXXIV, No. 11. The exterior has the form of an octagon, but thechapels project partly beyond it. On
 the left side of the sketchthey appear larger than on the right side.Pl. XC, No. 1, (MS. B, 25b); Repetition of Pl. LXX
XIV, No. 11.Pl. XC, No. 2. Elevation to the plan No. 1, and also to No. 6 of thesame sheet.__E. By chapels formed by fou
r niches:Pl. LXXXIV, No. 7 (the circular plan on the left below) shows thisarrangement in which the central dome has bec
ome circular inside andmight therefore be classed after this group. [Footnote 1: This planand some others of this class
remind us of the plan of the Mausoleumof Augustus as it is represented for instance by Durand. See_ Cab.des Estampes, Bi
bliotheque Nationale, Paris, Topographie de Rome, V,6, 82._]The sketch on the right hand side gives most likely the elev
ationfor the last named plan.F. By chapels of still richer combinations, which necessitate anoctagon of larger dimension
s:Pl. XCI, No. 2 (MS. Ash. 11. 8b) [Footnote 2: The note accompanyingthis plan is given under No. 754.]; on this plan th
e chapelsthemselves appear to be central buildings formed like the first typeof the third group. Pl. LXXXVIII, No. 3.Pl.
 XCI, No. 2 above; the exterior of the preceding figure,particularly interesting on account of the alternation of apses
andniches, the latter containing statues of a gigantic size, inproportion to the dimension of the niches.b. Second Class
.Composite plans of this class are generally obtained by combiningtwo types of the first class--the one worked out on th
e principalaxes, the other on the diagonal ones.MS. B. 22 shows an elementary combination, without any additions onthe d
iagonal axes, but with the dimensions of the squares on the twoprincipal axes exceeding those of the sides of the octago
n.In the drawing W. P. 5b (see page 44 Fig. 1) the exterior only ofthe edifice is octagonal, the interior being formed b
y a circularcolonnade; round chapels are placed against the four sides of theprincipal axes.The elevation, drawn on the
same sheet (see page 47 Fig. 3), showsthe whole arrangement which is closely related with the one on Pl.LXXXVI No. 1, 2.
MS. B. 21a shows:a) four sides with rectangular chapels crowned by pediments Pl.LXXXVII No. 3 (plan and elevation);b) fo
ur sides with square chapels crowned by octagonal domes. Pl.LXXXVII No. 4; the plan underneath.MS. B. 18a shows a variat
ion obtained by replacing the round chapelsin the principal axes of the sketch MS. B. l8a by square ones, withan apse. L
eonardo repeated both ideas for better comparison side byside, see page 47. Fig. 2.Pl. LXXXIX (MS. B. 17b). Elevation fo
r the preceding figure. Thecomparison of the drawing marked M with the plan on page 47 Fig. 2,bearing the same mark, and
 of the elevation on Pl. LXXXIX below(marked A) with the corresponding plan on page 47 is highlyinstructive, as illustra
ting the spirit in which Leonardo pursuedthese studies.Pl. LXXXIV No. 12 shows the design Pl. LXXXVII No. 3 combined wit
hapses, with the addition of round chapels on the diagonal sides.Pl. LXXXIV No. 13 is a variation of the preceding sketc
h.Pl. XC No. 3. MS. B. 25b. The round chapels of the preceding sketchare replaced by octagonal chapels, above which rise
 campaniles.Pl. XC No. 4 is the elevation for the preceding plan.Pl. XCII No. 1. (MS. B. 39b.); the plan below. On the p
rincipal aswell as on the diagonal axes are diagonal chapels, but the latterare separated from the dome by semicircular
recesses. Thecommunication between these eight chapels forms a square aisle roundthe central dome.Above this figure is t
he elevation, showing four campaniles on theangles. [Footnote 1: The note accompanying this drawing isreproduced under N
o. 753.]Pl. LXXXIV No. 3. On the principal axes are square chapels withthree niches; on the diagonals octagonal chapels
with niches. Cod.Atl. 340b gives a somewhat similar arrangement.MS. B. 30. The principal development is thrown on the di
agonal axesby square chapels with three niches; on the principal axes are innerrecesses communicating with outer ones.Th
e plan Pl. XCIII No. 2 (MS. B. 22) differs from this only in sofar as the outer semicircles have become circular chapels
,projecting from the external square as apses; one of them serves asthe entrance by a semicircular portico.The elevation
 is drawn on the left side of the plan.MS. B. 19. A further development of MS. B. 18, by employing for thefour principal
 chapels the type Pl. LXXXVIII No. 3, as we havealready seen in Pl. XCI No. 2; the exterior presents two varieties.a) Th
e outer contour follows the inner. [Footnote 2: These chapelsare here sketched in two different sizes; it is the smaller
 typewhich is thus formed.]b) It is semicircular.Pl. LXXXVII No. 2 (MS. B. 18b) Elevation to the first variation MS.B. 1
9. If we were not certain that this sketch was by Leonardo, wemight feel tempted to take it as a study by Bramante for S
t. Peter'sat Rome. [Footnote 3: See_ Les projets primitifs Pl. 43._]__MS. P. V. 39b. In the principal axes the chapels o
f MS. B. 19, andsemicircular niches on the diagonals. The exterior of the wholeedifice is also an octagon, concealing th
e form of the interiorchapels, but with its angles on their axes.Group V.Suggested by San Lorenzo at Milan.In MS. C. A.
266 IIb, 8l2b there is a plan almost identical withthat of San Lorenzo. The diagonal sides of the irregular octagon aren
ot indicated.If it could be proved that the arches which, in the actual church,exist on these sides in the first story,
were added in 1574 byMartimo Bassi, then this plan and the following section would bestill nearer the original state of
San Lorenzo than at present. Areproduction of this slightly sketched plan has not been possible.It may however be unders
tood from Pl. LXXXVIII No. 3, by suppressingthe four pillars corresponding to the apses.Pl. LXXXVII No. 1 shows the sect
ion in elevation corresponding withthe above-named plan. The recessed chapels are decorated with largeshells in the half
domes like the arrangement in San Lorenzo, butwith proportions like those of Bramante's Sacristy of Santa Mariapresso S.
 Satiro.MS. C. A. 266; a sheet containing three views of exteriors of Domes.On the same sheet there is a plan similar to
 the one above-named butwith uninterrupted aisles and with the addition of round chapels inthe axes (compare Pl. XCVII N
o. 3 and page 44 Fig. 1), perhaps areminiscence of the two chapels annexed to San Lorenzo.--Leonardohas here sketched th
e way of transforming this plan into a Latincross by means of a nave with side aisles.Pl. XCI No. 1. Plan showing a type
 deprived of aisles and comprisedin a square building which is surrounded by a portico. It isaccompanied by the followin
g text:_756.This edifice is inhabited [accessible] below and above, like SanSepolcro, and it is the same above as below,
 except that the upperstory has the dome _c d_; and the [Footnote: The church of SanSepolcro at Milan, founded in 1030 a
nd repeatedly rebuilt after themiddle of the XVIth century, still stands over the crypt of theoriginal structure.] lower
 has the dome _a b_, and when you enterinto the crypt, you descend 10 steps, and when you mount into theupper you ascend
 20 steps, which, with 1/3 braccio for each, make 10braccia, and this is the height between one floor of the church andt
he other._Above the plan on the same sheet is a view of the exterior. By theaid of these two figures and the description
, sections of theedifice may easily be reconstructed. But the section drawn on theleft side of the building seems not to
 be in keeping with the sameplan, notwithstanding the explanatory note written underneath it:"dentro il difitio di sopra
" (interior of the edificeabove)[Footnote 1: _The small inner dome corresponds to_ a b _on theplan--it rises from the lo
wer church into the upper-- above, andlarger, rises the dome_ c d. _The aisles above and below thuscorrespond_ (e di sop
ra come di sotto, salvoche etc.). _The onlydifference is, that in the section Leonardo has not taken thetrouble to make
the form octagonal, but has merely sketched circularlines in perspective._ J. P. R._]._Before leaving this group, it is
well to remark that the germ of itseems already indicated by the diagonal lines in the plans Pl. LXXXVNo. 11 and No. 7.
We shall find another application of the same typeto the Latin cross in Pl. XCVII No. 3._2. Churches formed on the plan
of a Latin cross.We find among Leonardo's studies several sketches for churches onthe plan of the Latin cross; we shall
begin by describing them, andshall add a few observations.A. Studies after existing Monuments.Pl. XCIV No. 2. (MS. B. 11
b.) Plan of Santo Spirito at Florence, abasilica built after the designs of Brunellesco.--Leonardo has addedthe indicati
on of a portico in front, either his own invention orthe reproduction of a now lost design.Pl. XCV No. 2. Plan accompani
ed by the words: "A_ e santo sepolcrodi milano di sopra"(A _is the upper church of S. Sepolcro at Milan);although since
Leonardo's time considerably spoilt, it is still thesame in plan.The second plan with its note: "B_ e la sua parte socto
 tera" (B _isits subterranean part [the crypt]) still corresponds with thepresent state of this part of the church as I
have ascertained byvisiting the crypt with this plan. Excepting the addition of a fewinsignificant walls, the state of t
his interesting part of thechurch still conforms to Leonardo's sketch; but in the Vestibolo thetwo columns near the entr
ance of the winding stairs are absent.B. Designs or Studies.PL. XCV No. 1. Plan of a church evidently suggested by that
of SanSepolcro at Milan. The central part has been added to on theprinciple of the second type of Group III. Leonardo ha
s placed the_"coro" _(choir) in the centre.__Pl. XCVI No. 2. In the plan the dome, as regards its interior,belongs to th
e First Class of Group IV, and may be grouped with theone in MS. B. 35a. The nave seems to be a development of the typer
epresented in Pl. XCV No. 2, B. by adding towers and two lateralporticos[Footnote 1: Already published in Les projets pr
imitifs Pl.XLIII.].On the left is a view of the exterior of the preceding plan. It isaccompanied by the following note:_
757.This building is inhabited below and above; the way up is by thecampaniles, and in going up one has to use the platf
orm, where thedrums of the four domes are, and this platform has a parapet infront, and none of these domes communicate
with the church, but theyare quite separate._Pl. XCVI No. 1 (MS. C. A. 16b; 65a). Perspective view of a churchseen from
behind; this recalls the Duomo at Florence, but with twocampaniles[Footnote 2: Already published in the Saggio Pl. IX.].
Pl. XCVII No. 3 (MS. B. 52a). The central part is a development ofS. Lorenzo at Milan, such as was executed at the Duomo
 of Pavia.There is sufficient analogy between the building actually executedand this sketch to suggest a direct connecti
on between them.Leonardo accompanied Francesco di Giorgio[Footnote 3: See MALASPINA,il Duomo di Pavia. Documents.] when
the latter was consulted on June21st, 1490 as to this church; the fact that the only wordaccompanying the plan is:_ "sag
restia", _seems to confirm oursupposition, for the sacristies were added only in 1492, i. e. fouryears after the beginni
ng of the Cathedral, which at that time wasmost likely still sufficiently unfinished to be capable of receivingthe form
of the present sketch.Pl. XCVII No. 2 shows the exterior of this design. Below is thenote:_ edifitio al proposito del fo
dameto figurato di socto_(edifice proper for the ground plan figured below).Here we may also mention the plan of a Latin
 cross drawn in MS. C.A. fol. 266 (see p. 50).Pl. XCIV No. 1 (MS. L. 15b). External side view of Brunellesco'sFlorentine
 basilica San Lorenzo, seen from the North.Pl. XCIV No. 4 (V. A. V, 1). Principal front of a nave, most likelyof a churc
h on the plan of a Latin cross. We notice here not onlythe principal features which were employed afterwards in Alberti'
sfront of S. Maria Novella, but even details of a more advancedstyle, such as we are accustomed to meet with only after
the year1520.In the background of Leonardo's unfinished picture of St. Jerome(Vatican Gallery) a somewhat similar church
 front is indicated (seethe accompanying sketch).[Illustration with caption: The view of the front of a temple,apparentl
y a dome in the centre of four corinthian porticos bearingpediments (published by Amoretti Tav. II. B as being by Leonar
do),is taken from a drawing, now at the Ambrosian Gallery. We cannotconsider this to be by the hand of the master.]__C.
Studies for a form of a Church most proper for preaching.The problem as to what form of church might answer the requirem
entsof acoustics seems to have engaged Leonardo's very particularattention. The designation of_ "teatro" _given to some
of thesesketches, clearly shows which plan seemed to him most favourable forhearing the preacher's voice.Pl. XCVII, No.
1 (MS. B, 52). Rectangular edifice divided into threenaves with an apse on either side, terminated by a semicircularthea
tre with rising seats, as in antique buildings. The pulpit is inthe centre. Leonardo has written on the left side of the
 sketch_:"teatro da predicare" _(Theatre for preaching).MS. B, 55a (see page 56, Fig. 1). A domed church after the type
ofPl. XCV, No. 1, shows four theatres occupying the apses and facingthe square_ "coro" _(choir), which is in the centre
between the fourpillars of the dome.[Footnote 1: The note_ teatro de predicar, _onthe right side is, I believe, in the h
andwriting of Pompeo Leoni. J.P. R.] The rising arrangement of the seats is shown in the sketchabove. At the place marke
d_ B _Leonardo wrote_ teatri per uldiremessa _(rows of seats to hear mass), at_ T teatri,_ and at_ C coro_(choir).In MS.
 C.A. 260, are slight sketches of two plans for rectangularchoirs and two elevations of the altar and pulpit which seem
to bein connection with these plans.In MS. Ash II, 8a (see p. 56 and 57. Fig. 2 and 3)._ "Locho dove sipredica" _(Place
for preaching). A most singular plan for abuilding. The interior is a portion of a sphere, the centre of whichis the sum
mit of a column destined to serve as the preacher'spulpit. The inside is somewhat like a modern theatre, whilst theexter
ior and the galleries and stairs recall the ancientamphitheatres.[Illustration with caption: Page 57, Fig. 4. A plan acc
ompanying thetwo preceding drawings. If this gives the complete form Leonardointended for the edifice, it would have com
prised only about twothirds of the circle. Leonardo wrote in the centre_ "fondamento", _aword he often employed for plan
s, and on the left side of the viewof the exterior:_ locho dove si predicha _(a place for preachingin)._]_D. Design for
a Mausoleum.Pl. XCVIII (P. V., 182._ No. d'ordre 2386). In the midst of a hillylandscape rises an artificial mountain in
 the form of a giganticcone, crowned by an imposing temple. At two thirds of the height aterrace is cut out with six doo
rways forming entrances to galleries,each leading to three sepulchral halls, so constructed as to containabout five hund
red funeral urns, disposed in the customary antiquestyle. From two opposite sides steps ascend to the terrace in asingle
 flight and beyond it to the temple above. A large circularopening, like that in the Pantheon, is in the dome above what
 may bethe altar, or perhaps the central monument on the level of theterrace below.The section of a gallery given in the
 sketch to the right belowshows the roof to be constructed on the principle of superimposedhorizontal layers, projecting
 one beyond the other, and eachfurnished with a sort of heel, which appears to be undercut, so asto give the appearance
of a beam from within. Granite alone would beadequate to the dimensions here given to the key stone, as thethickness of
the layers can hardly be considered to be less than afoot. In taking this as the basis of our calculation for thedimensi
ons of the whole construction, the width of the chamber wouldbe about 25 feet but, judging from the number of urns itcon
tains--and there is no reason to suppose that these urns werelarger than usual--it would seem to be no more than about 8
 or 10feet.The construction of the vaults resembles those in the galleries ofsome etruscan tumuli, for instance the Regu
lini Galeassi tomb atCervetri (lately discovered) and also that of the chamber andpassages of the pyramid of Cheops and
of the treasury of Atreus atMycenae.The upper cone displays not only analogies with the monumentsmentioned in the note,
but also with Etruscan tumuli, such as theCocumella tomb at Vulci, and the Regulini Galeassi tomb_[Footnote 1:_See_ FERS
GUSON, _Handbook of Architecture, I,_ 291.]. _The wholescheme is one of the most magnificent in the history ofArchitectu
re.It would be difficult to decide as to whether any monument he hadseen suggested this idea to Leonardo, but it is wort
h while toenquire, if any monument, or group of monuments of an earlier datemay be supposed to have done so._[Footnote 2
: _There are, inAlgiers, two Monuments, commonly called_ "Le Madracen" _and_ "Letombeau de la Chretienne," _which somewh
at resemble Leonardo'sdesign. They are known to have served as the Mausolea of the Kingsof Mauritania. Pomponius Mela, t
he geographer of the time of theEmperor Claudius, describes them as having been_ "Monumentum communeregiae gentis." _See
_ Le Madracen, Rapport fait par M. le GrandRabbin AB. CAHEN, Constantine 1873--Memoire sur les fouillesexecutees au Madr
as'en .. par le Colonel BRUNON, Constantinel873.--Deux Mausolees Africains, le Madracen et le tombeau de laChretienne pa
r M. J. DE LAURIERE, Tours l874.--Le tombeau de laChretienne, Mausolee des rois Mauritaniens par M. BERBRUGGER, Alger186
7.--_I am indebted to M. LE BLANC, of the Institut, and M. LUD,LALANNE, Bibliothecaire of the Institut for having first
pointed outto me the resemblance between these monuments; while M. ANT. HERONDE VlLLEFOSSE of the Louvre was kind enough
 to place theabovementioned rare works at my disposal. Leonardo's observations onthe coast of Africa are given later in
this work. The Herodium nearBethlehem in Palestine_ (Jebel el Fureidis, _the Frank Mountain)was, according to the latest
 researches, constructed on a verysimilar plan. See_ Der Frankenberg, von Baurath C. SCHICK inJerusalem, Zeitschrift des
 Deutschen Palastina-Vereins, _Leipzag_1880, _Vol. III, pages_ 88-99 _and Plates IV and V._ J. P. R.]_E. Studies for the
 Central Tower, or Tiburio of Milan Cathedral.Towards the end of the fifteenth century the Fabbricceria del Duomohad to
settle on the choice of a model for the crowning and centralpart of this vast building. We learn from a notice published
 by G.L. Calvi [Footnote: G. L. CALVI, Notizie sulla vita e sulle operedei principali architetti scultori e pittori che
fiorirono inMilano, Part III, 20. See also: H. DE GEYMULLER, Les projetsprimitifs etc. I, 37 and 116-119.--The Fabbricce
ria of the Duomo haslately begun the publication of the archives, which may possiblytell us more about the part taken by
 Leonardo, than has hithertobeen known.] that among the artists who presented models in the year1488 were: Bramante, Pie
tro da Gorgonzola, Luca Paperio (Fancelli),and Leonardo da Vinci.--Several sketches by Leonardo refer to this important
project:Pl. XCIX, No. 2 (MS. S. K. III, No. 36a) a small plan of the wholeedifice.--The projecting chapels in the middle
 of the transept arewanting here. The nave appears to be shortened and seems to beapproached by an inner "vestibolo".--P
l. C, No. 2 (Tr. 21). Plan of the octagon tower, giving thedisposition of the buttresses; starting from the eight pillar
sadjoining the four principal piers and intended to support the eightangles of the Tiburio. These buttresses correspond
exactly withthose described by Bramante as existing in the model presented byOmodeo. [Footnote: Bramante's opinion was f
irst published by G.MONGERl, Arch. stor. Lomb. V, fasc. 3 and afterwards by me in thepublication mentioned in the preced
ing note.]Pl. C, 3 (MS. Tr. 16). Two plans showing different arrangements ofthe buttresses, which seem to be formed part
ly by the intersectionof a system of pointed arches such as that seen in **Pl. C, No. 5 (MS. B, 27a) destined to give a
broader base to thedrum. The text underneath is given under No. 788.MS. B, 3--three slight sketches of plans in connexio
n with thepreceding ones.__Pl. XCIX, No.1 (MS. Tr. 15) contains several small sketches ofsections and exterior views of
the Dome; some of them showbuttress-walls shaped as inverted arches. Respecting these Leonardonotes:_758.L'arco rivescio
 e migliore per fare spalla che l'ordinario, percheil rovescio trova sotto se muro resistete alla sua debolezza, el'ordi
nario no trova nel suo debole se non ariaThe inverted arch is better for giving a shoulder than the ordinaryone, because
 the former finds below it a wall resisting itsweakness, whilst the latter finds in its weak part nothing but air.[Footn
ote: _Three slight sketches of sections on the sameleaf--above those reproduced here--are more closely connected withthe
 large drawing in the centre of Pl. C, No. 4 (M.S, Tr. 41) whichshows a section of a very elevated dome, with double vau
lts,connected by ribs and buttresses ingeniously disposed, so as tobring the weight of the lantern to bear on the base o
f the dome.A sketch underneath it shows a round pillar on which is indicatedwhich part of its summit is to bear the weig
ht: "il pilastro saracharicho in . a . b." (The column will bear the weight at a b.)Another note is above on the right s
ide:_ Larcho regiera tanto sottoasse chome di sopra se _(The arch supports as much below it [i. e. ahanging weight] as a
bove it).Pl. C, No. 1 (C. A. 303a). Larger sketch of half section of theDome, with a very complicated system of arches,
and a double vault.Each stone is shaped so as to be knit or dovetailed to itsneighbours. Thus the inside of the Dome can
not be seen from below.MS. C. A. 303b. A repetition of the preceding sketch with veryslight modifications._][Figs. 1. an
d Fig. 2. two sketeches of the dome]MS. Tr. 9 (see Fig. 1 and 2). Section of the Dome with revertedbuttresses between th
e windows, above which iron anchors or chainsseem to be intended. Below is the sketch of the outside.__PI. XCIX, No. 3 (
C. A., 262a) four sketches of the exterior of theDome.C. A. 12. Section, showing the points of rupture of a gothic vault
,in evident connection with the sketches described above.It deserves to be noticed how easily and apparently without eff
ort,Leonardo manages to combine gothic details and structure with themore modern shape of the Dome.The following notes a
re on the same leaf,_ oni cosa poderosa, _and_oni cosa poderosa desidera de(scendere); _farther below, severalmultiplica
tions most likely intended to calculate the weight of someparts of the Dome, thus 16 x 47 = 720; 720 x 800 = 176000, nex
t towhich is written:_ peso del pilastro di 9 teste _(weight of thepillar 9 diameters high).Below:_ 176000 x 8 = 1408000
; _and below:_Semjlio e se ce 80 (?) il peso del tiburio _(six millions sixhundred (?) 80 the weight of the Dome).Bossi
hazarded the theory that Leonardo might have been thearchitect who built the church of Sta. Maria delle Grazie, but ther
eis no evidence to support this, either in documents or in thematerials supplied by Leonardos manuscripts and drawings.
The sketchgiven at the side shows the arrangement of the second and thirdsocle on the apses of the choir of that church;
 and it is remarkablethat those sketches, in MS. S. K. M. II2, 2a and Ib, occur with thepassage given in Volume I as No.
 665 and 666 referring to thecomposition of the Last Supper in the Refectory of that church._]_F. The Project for liftin
g up the Battistero of Florence andsetting it on a basement.__Among the very few details Vasari gives as to the architec
turalstudies of Leonardo, we read: "And among these models and designsthere was one by way of which he showed several ti
mes to manyingenious citizens who then governed Florence, his readiness to liftup without ruining it, the church of San
Giovanni in Florence (theBattistero, opposite the Duomo) in order to place under it themissing basement with steps; he s
upported his assertions withreasons so persuasive, that while he spoke the undertaking seemedfeasable, although every on
e of his hearers, when he had departed,could see by himself the impossibility of so vast an undertaking."_[Footnote: _Th
is latter statement of Vasari's must be considered tobe exaggerated. I may refer here to some data given by_ LIBRI,Histo
ire des sciences mathematiques en Italie (II, 216, 217): "On acru dans ces derniers temps faire un miracle en mecanique
eneffectuant ce transport, et cependant des l'annee 1455, Gaspard Nadiet Aristote de Fioravantio avaient transporte, a u
ne distanceconsiderable, la tour de la Magione de Bologne, avec ses fondements,qui avait presque quatre-vingts pieds de
haut. Le continuateur de lachronique de Pugliola dit que le trajet fut de 35 pieds et quedurant le transport auquel le c
hroniqueur affirme avoir assiste, ilarriva un accident grave qui fit pencher de trois pieds la tourpendant qu'elle etait
 suspendue, mais que cet accident futpromptement repare (Muratori, Scriptores rer. ital. Tom. XVIII, col.717, 718). Alid
osi a rapporte une note ou Nadi rend compte de cetransport avec une rare simplicite. D'apres cette note, on voit queles
operations de ce genre n'etaient pas nouvelles. Celle-ci necouta que 150 livres (monnaie d'alors) y compris le cadeau qu
e leLegat fit aux deux mecaniciens. Dans la meme annee, Aristoteredressa le clocher de Cento, qui penchait de plus de ci
nq pieds(Alidosi, instruttione p. 188-- Muratori, Scriptores rer. ital.,tom. XXIII, col. 888.--Bossii, chronica Mediol.,
 1492, in-fol. adann. 1455). On ne concoit pas comment les historiens des beaux-artsont pu negliger de tels hommes." J.
P. R.]_In the MS. C. A. fol. 293, there are two sketches which possiblymight have a bearing on this bold enterprise. We
find there a planof a circular or polygonal edifice surrounded by semicircular archesin an oblique position. These may b
e taken for the foundation of thesteps and of the new platform. In the perspective elevation the sameedifice, forming a
polygon, is shown as lifted up and resting on acircle of inverted arches which rest on an other circle of arches inthe o
rdinary position, but so placed that the inverted arches aboverest on the spandrels of the lower range.__What seems to c
onfirm the supposition that the lifting up of abuilding is here in question, is the indication of engines forwinding up,
 such as jacks, and a rack and wheel. As the liftingapparatus represented on this sheet does not seem particularlyapplic
able to an undertaking of such magnitude, we may consider itto be a first sketch or scheme for the engines to be used.__
G. Description of an unknown Temple._759.Twelve flights of steps led up to the great temple, which was eighthundred brac
cia in circumference and built on an octagonal plan. Atthe eight corners were eight large plinths, one braccia and a hal
fhigh, and three wide, and six long at the bottom, with an angle inthe middle; on these were eight great pillars, standi
ng on theplinths as a foundation, and twenty four braccia high. And on thetop of these were eight capitals three braccia
 long and six wide,above which were the architrave frieze and cornice, four braccia anda half high, and this was carried
 on in a straight line from onepillar to the next and so, continuing for eight hundred braccia,surrounded the whole temp
le, from pillar to pillar. To support thisentablature there were ten large columns of the same height as thepillars, thr
ee braccia thick above their bases which were onebraccia and a half high.The ascent to this temple was by twelve flights
 of steps, and thetemple was on the twelfth, of an octagonal form, and at each anglerose a large pillar; and between the
 pillars were placed ten columnsof the same height as the pillars, rising at once from the pavementto a height of twenty
 eight braccia and a half; and at this heightthe architrave, frieze and cornice were placed which surrounded thetemple h
aving a length of eight hundred braccia. At the same height,and within the temple at the same level, and all round the c
entre ofthe temple at a distance of 24 braccia farther in, are pillarscorresponding to the eight pillars in the angles,
and columnscorresponding to those placed in the outer spaces. These rise to thesame height as the former ones, and over
these the continuousarchitrave returns towards the outer row of pillars and columns.[Footnote: Either this description i
s incomplete, or, as seems to mehighly probable, it refers to some ruin. The enormous dimensionsforbid our supposing thi
s to be any temple in Italy or Greece. Syriawas the native land of colossal octagonal buildings, in the earlycenturies A
. D. The Temple of Baalbek, and others are even largerthan that here described. J. P. R.]_V. Palace architecture.But a s
mall number of Leonardo's drawings refer to the architectureof palaces, and our knowledge is small as to what style Leon
ardomight have adopted for such buildings.Pl. CII No. 1 (W. XVIII). A small portion of a facade of a palacein two storie
s, somewhat resembling Alberti's PalazzoRucellai.--Compare with this Bramante's painted front of the CasaSilvestri, and
a painting by Montorfano in San Pietro in Gessate atMilan, third chapel on the left hand side and also with Bramante'spa
laces at Rome. The pilasters with arabesques, the rustica betweenthem, and the figures over the window may be painted or
 insgraffito. The original is drawn in red chalk.Pl. LXXXI No. 1 (MS. Tr. 42). Sketch of a palace with battlementsand de
corations, most likely graffiti; the details remind us ofthose in the Castello at Vigevano._ [Footnote 1: _Count GIULIOP
ORRO, in his valuable contribution to the_ Archivio StoricoLombardo, Anno VIII, Fasc. IV (31 Dec. 1881): Leonardo da Vin
ci,Libro di Annotazioni e Memorie, _refers to this in the followingnote:_ "Alla pag. 41 vi e uno schizzo di volta ed acc
anto scrisse:'il pilastro sara charicho in su 6' e potrebbe darsi che siriferisse alla cupola della chiesa delle Grazie
tanto piu che apag. 42 vi e un disegno che rassomiglia assai al basamento che oggisi vede nella parte esterna del coro d
i quella chiesa." _This mayhowever be doubted. The drawing, here referred to, on page 41 of thesame manuscript, is repro
duced on Pl. C No. 4 and described on page61 as being a study for the cupola of the Duomo of Milan._ J. P. R.]_MS. Mz. 0
", contains a design for a palace or house with a loggiain the middle of the first story, over which rises an attic with
 aPediment reproduced on page 67. The details drawn close by on theleft seem to indicate an arrangement of coupled colum
ns against thewall of a first story.Pl. LXXXV No. 14 (MS. S. K. M. Ill 79a) contains a very slightsketch in red chalk, w
hich most probably is intended to representthe facade of a palace. Inside is the short note 7 he 7 (7 and 7).__MS. J2 8a
 (see pages 68 Fig. 1 and 2) contains a view of an unknownpalace. Its plan is indicated at the side.__In MS. Br. M. 126a
(see Fig. 3 on page 68) there is a sketch of ahouse, on which Leonardo notes; casa con tre terrazi (house withthree terr
aces).__Pl. CX, No. 4 (MS. L. 36b) represents the front of a fortifiedbuilding drawn at Cesena in 1502 (see No. 1040).__
Here we may also mention the singular building in the allegoricalcomposition represented on Pl. LVIII in Vol. I. In fron
t of itappears the head of a sphinx or of a dragon which seems to becarrying the palace away.__The following texts refer
 to the construction of palaces and otherbuildings destined for private use:_760.In the courtyard the walls must be half
 the height of its width,that is if the court be 40 braccia, the house must be 20 high asregards the walls of the said c
ourtyard; and this courtyard must behalf as wide as the whole front.[Footnote: See Pl. CI, no. 1, and compare the dimens
ions here given,with No. 748 lines 26-29; and the drawing belonging to it Pl. LXXXI,no. 2.]On the dispositions of a stab
le.761.FOR MAKING A CLEAN STABLE.The manner in which one must arrange a stable. You must first divideits width in 3 part
s, its depth matters not; and let these 3divisions be equal and 6 braccia broad for each part and 10 high,and the middle
 part shall be for the use of the stablemasters; the 2side ones for the horses, each of which must be 6 braccia in width
and 6 in length, and be half a braccio higher at the head thanbehind. Let the manger be at 2 braccia from the ground, to
 thebottom of the rack, 3 braccia, and the top of it 4 braccia. Now, inorder to attain to what I promise, that is to mak
e this place,contrary to the general custom, clean and neat: as to the upper partof the stable, i. e. where the hay is,
that part must have at itsouter end a window 6 braccia high and 6 broad, through which bysimple means the hay is brought
 up to the loft, as is shown by themachine _E_; and let this be erected in a place 6 braccia wide, andas long as the sta
ble, as seen at _k p_. The other two parts, whichare on either side of this, are again divided; those nearest to thehay-
loft are 4 braccia, _p s_, and only for the use and circulationof the servants belonging to the stable; the other two wh
ich reachto the outer walls are 2 braccia, as seen at _s k_, and these aremade for the purpose of giving hay to the mang
ers, by means offunnels, narrow at the top and wide over the manger, in order thatthe hay should not choke them. They mu
st be well plastered and cleanand are represented at 4 _f s_. As to the giving the horses water,the troughs must be of s
tone and above them [cisterns of] water. Themangers may be opened as boxes are uncovered by raising the lids.[Footnote:
See Pl. LXXVIII, No.1.]Decorations for feasts.762.THE WAY TO CONSTRUCT A FRAME-WORK FOR DECORATING BUILDINGS.The way in
which the poles ought to be placed for tying bunches ofjuniper on to them. These poles must lie close to the framework o
fthe vaulting and tie the bunches on with osier withes, so as to clipthem even afterwards with shears.Let the distance f
rom one circle to another be half a braccia; andthe juniper [sprigs] must lie top downwards, beginning from below.Round
this column tie four poles to which willows about as thick asa finger must be nailed and then begin from the bottom and
workupwards with bunches of juniper sprigs, the tops downwards, that isupside down. [Footnote: See Pl. CII, No. 3. The w
ords here given asthe title line, lines 1--4, are the last in the original MS.--Lines5--16 are written under fig. 4.]763
.The water should be allowed to fall from the whole circle _a b_.[Footnote: Other drawings of fountains are given on Pl.
 CI (W. XX);the original is a pen and ink drawing on blue paper; on Pl. CIII(MS. B.) and Pl. LXXXII.]_VI. Studies of arc
hitectural details.__Several of Leonardo's drawings of architectural details prove that,like other great masters of that
 period, he had devoted hisattention to the study of the proportion of such details. As everyorganic being in nature has
 its law of construction and growth,these masters endeavoured, each in his way, to discover and prove alaw of proportion
 in architecture. The following notes in Leonardo'smanuscripts refer to this subject.__MS. S. K. M. Ill, 47b (see Fig. 1
). A diagram, indicating the rulesas given by Vitruvius and by Leon Battista Alberti for theproportions of the Attic bas
e of a column.__MS. S. K. M. Ill 55a (see Fig. 2). Diagram showing the same rules._764.B toro superiore  .  .  .  .  .
  toro superiore2B nestroli    .  .  .  .  .  .  astragali quadre3B orbiculo    .  .  .  .  .  .   .   .   troclea4B nes
troli    .  .  .  .  .  .  astragali quadre5B toro iferiore  .  .  .  .  .  .  toro iferiore6B latastro    .  .  .  .  .
  .  .   .    plintho[Footnote: No explanation can be offered of the meaning of theletter B, which precedes each name. I
t may be meant for _basa_(base). Perhaps it refers to some author on architecture or anarchitect (Bramante?) who employe
d the designations, thus marked forthe mouldings. 3. _troclea._ Philander: _Trochlea sive trochalia autrechanum._ 6. _La
terculus_ or _latastrum_ is the Latin name for_Plinthus_ (pi lambda Xiv) but Vitruvius adopted this Greek nameand "latas
tro" seems to have been little in use. It is to be foundbesides the text given above, as far as I am aware, only twodraw
ings of the Uffizi Collection, where in one instance, itindicates the _abacus_ of a Doric capital.]765.STEPS OF URRBINO.
The plinth must be as broad as the thickness of the wall againstwhich the plinth is built. [Footnote: See Pl. CX No. 3.
The hastysketch on the right hand side illustrates the unsatisfactory effectproduced when the plinth is narrower than th
e wall.]766.The ancient architects ...... beginning with the Egyptians (?) who,as Diodorus Siculus writes, were the firs
t to build and constructlarge cities and castles, public and private buildings of fine form,large and well proportioned
.....The column, which has its thickness at the third part .... The onewhich would be thinnest in the middle, would brea
k ...; the onewhich is of equal thickness and of equal strength, is better for theedifice. The second best as to the use
fulness will be the one whosegreatest thickness is where it joins with the base.[Footnote: See Pl. CIII, No. 3, where th
e sketches belonging tolines 10--16 are reproduced, but reversed. The sketch of columns,here reproduced by a wood cut, s
tands in the original close to lines5--8.]The capital must be formed in this way. Divide its thickness at thetop into 8;
 at the foot make it 5/7, and let it be 5/7 high and youwill have a square; afterwards divide the height into 8 parts as
 youdid for the column, and then take 1/8 for the echinus and anothereighth for the thickness of the abacus on the top o
f the capital.The horns of the abacus of the capital have to project beyond thegreatest width of the bell 2/7, i. e. sev
enths of the top of thebell, so 1/7 falls to the projection of each horn. The truncatedpart of the horns must be as broa
d as it is high. I leave the rest,that is the ornaments, to the taste of the sculptors. But to returnto the columns and
in order to prove the reason of their strength orweakness according to their shape, I say that when the linesstarting fr
om the summit of the column and ending at its base andtheir direction and length ..., their distance apart or width may
beequal; I say that this column ...767.The cylinder of a body columnar in shape and its two opposite endsare two circles
 enclosed between parallel lines, and through thecentre of the cylinder is a straight line, ending at the centre ofthese
 circles, and called by the ancients the axis.[Footnote: Leonardo wrote these lines on the margin of a page of theTratta
to di Francesco di Giorgio, where there are several drawingsof columns, as well as a head drawn in profile inside an out
linesketch of a capital.]768._a b_ is 1/3 of _n m_; _m o_ is 1/6 of _r o_. The ovolo projects 1/6of _r o_; _s_ 7 1/5 of
_r o_, _a b_ is divided into 9 1/2; theabacus is 3/9 the ovolo 4/9, the bead-moulding and the fillet 2/9and 1/2.[Footnot
e: See Pl. LXXXV, No. 16. In the original the drawing andwriting are both in red chalk.]_Pl. LXXXV No. 6 (MS. Ash. II 6b
) contains a small sketch of acapital with the following note, written in three lines:_ I chornidel capitelo deono esser
e la quarta parte d'uno quadro _(The hornsof a capital must measure the fourth part of a square).__MS. S. K. M. III 72b
contains two sketches of ornamentations ofwindows.__In MS. C. A. 308a; 938a (see Pl. LXXXII No. 1) there are severalsket
ches of columns. One of the two columns on the right is similarto those employed by Bramante at the Canonica di S. Ambro
gio. Thesame columns appear in the sketch underneath the plan of a castle.There they appear coupled, and in two stories
one above the other.The archivolls which seem to spring out of the columns, are shapedlike twisted cords, meant perhaps
to be twisted branches. The wallsbetween the columns seem to be formed out of blocks of wood, thepedestals are ornamente
d with a reticulated pattern. From all thiswe may suppose that Leonardo here had in mind either some festivedecoration,
or perhaps a pavilion for some hunting place or park.The sketch of columns marked "35" gives an example of columns shape
dlike candelabra, a form often employed at that time, particularly inMilan, and the surrounding districts for instance i
n the Cortile diCasa Castiglione now Silvestre, in the cathedral of Como, at Portadella Rana &c._769.CONCERNING ARCHITRA
VES OF ONE OR SEVERAL PIECES.An architrave of several pieces is stronger than that of one singlepiece, if those pieces a
re placed with their length in the directionof the centre of the world. This is proved because stones have theirgrain or
 fibre generated in the contrary direction i. e. in thedirection of the opposite horizons of the hemisphere, and this is
contrary to fibres of the plants which have ...[Footnote: The text is incomplete in the original.]_The Proportions of th
e stories of a building are indicated by asketch in MS. S. K. M. II2 11b (see Pl. LXXXV No. 15). The measuresare written
 on the left side, as follows: br 1 1/2--6 3/4--br1/12--2 br--9 e 1/2--1 1/2--br 5--o 9--o 3 [br=braccia; o=oncie].Pl. L
XXXV No. 13 (MS. B. 62a) and Pl. XCIII No. 1. (MS. B. 15a) givea few examples of arches supported on piers.__XIII.Theore
tical writings on Architecture.Leonardo's original writings on the theory of Architecture have comedown to us only in a
fragmentary state; still, there seems to be nodoubt that he himself did not complete them. It would seem thatLeonardo en
tertained the idea of writing a large and connected bookon Architecture; and it is quite evident that the materials wepo
ssess, which can be proved to have been written at differentperiods, were noted down with a more or less definite aim an
dpurpose. They might all be collected under the one title: "Studieson the Strength of Materials". Among them the investi
gations on thesubject of fissures in walls are particularly thorough, and veryfully reported; these passages are also es
pecially interesting,because Leonardo was certainly the first writer on architecture whoever treated the subject at all.
 Here, as in all other casesLeonardo carefully avoids all abstract argument. His data are notderived from the principles
 of algebra, but from the laws ofmechanics, and his method throughout is strictly experimental.Though the conclusions dr
awn from his investigations may not havethat precision which we are accustomed to find in Leonardo'sscientific labours,
their interest is not lessened. They prove atany rate his deep sagacity and wonderfully clear mind. No oneperhaps, who h
as studied these questions since Leonardo, hascombined with a scientific mind anything like the artistic delicacyof perc
eption which gives interest and lucidity to his observations.I do not assert that the arrangement here adopted for the p
assagesin question is that originally intended by Leonardo; but theirdistribution into five groups was suggested by the
titles, orheadings, which Leonardo himself prefixed to most of these notes.Some of the longer sections perhaps should no
t, to be in strictagreement with this division, have been reproduced in their entiretyin the place where they occur. But
 the comparatively small amount ofthe materials we possess will render them, even so, sufficientlyintelligible to the re
ader; it did not therefore seem necessary ordesirable to subdivide the passages merely for the sake of strictclassificat
ion.__The small number of chapters given under the fifth class, treatingon the centre of gravity in roof-beams, bears no
 proportion to thenumber of drawings and studies which refer to the same subject. Onlya small selection of these are rep
roduced in this work since themajority have no explanatory text._I.ON FISSURES IN WALLS.770.First write the treatise on
the causes of the giving way of wallsand then, separately, treat of the remedies.Parallel fissures constantly occur in b
uildings which are erected ona hill side, when the hill is composed of stratified rocks with anoblique stratification, b
ecause water and other moisture oftenpenetrates these oblique seams carrying in greasy and slippery soil;and as the stra
ta are not continuous down to the bottom of thevalley, the rocks slide in the direction of the slope, and themotion does
 not cease till they have reached the bottom of thevalley, carrying with them, as though in a boat, that portion of theb
uilding which is separated by them from the rest. The remedy forthis is always to build thick piers under the wall which
 isslipping, with arches from one to another, and with a good scarp andlet the piers have a firm foundation in the strat
a so that they maynot break away from them.In order to find the solid part of these strata, it is necessary tomake a sha
ft at the foot of the wall of great depth through thestrata; and in this shaft, on the side from which the hill slopes,s
mooth and flatten a space one palm wide from the top to the bottom;and after some time this smooth portion made on the s
ide of theshaft, will show plainly which part of the hill is moving.[Footnote: See Pl. CIV.]771.The cracks in walls will
 never be parallel unless the part of thewall that separates from the remainder does not slip down.WHAT IS THE LAW BY WH
ICH BUILDINGS HAVE STABILITY.The stability of buildings is the result of the contrary law to thetwo former cases. That i
s to say that the walls must be all built upequally, and by degrees, to equal heights all round the building,and the who
le thickness at once, whatever kind of walls they may be.And although a thin wall dries more quickly than a thick one it
 willnot necessarily give way under the added weight day by day and thus,[16] although a thin wall dries more quickly th
an a thick one, itwill not give way under the weight which the latter may acquire fromday to day. Because if double the
amount of it dries in one day, oneof double the thickness will dry in two days or thereabouts; thusthe small addition of
 weight will be balanced by the smallerdifference of time [18].The adversary says that _a_ which projects, slips down.An
d here the adversary says that _r_ slips and not _c_.HOW TO PROGNOSTICATE THE CAUSES OF CRACKS IN ANY SORT OF WALL.The p
art of the wall which does not slip is that in which theobliquity projects and overhangs the portion which has parted fr
omit and slipped down.ON THE SITUATION OF FOUNDATIONS AND IN WHAT PLACES THEY ARE A CAUSEOF RUIN.When the crevice in the
 wall is wider at the top than at the bottom,it is a manifest sign, that the cause of the fissure in the wall isremote f
rom the perpendicular line through the crevice.[Footnote: Lines 1-5 refer to Pl. CV, No. 2. Line 9 _alle dueanteciedete_
, see on the same page.Lines 16-18. The translation of this is doubtful, and the meaning inany case very obscure.Lines 1
9-23 are on the right hand margin close to the two sketcheson Pl. CII, No. 3.]772.OF CRACKS IN WALLS, WHICH ARE WIDE AT
THE BOTTOM AND NARROW AT THETOP AND OF THEIR CAUSES.That wall which does not dry uniformly in an equal time, alwayscrack
s.A wall though of equal thickness will not dry with equal quicknessif it is not everywhere in contact with the same med
ium. Thus, ifone side of a wall were in contact with a damp slope and the otherwere in contact with the air, then this l
atter side would remain ofthe same size as before; that side which dries in the air willshrink or diminish and the side
which is kept damp will not dry. Andthe dry portion will break away readily from the damp portionbecause the damp part n
ot shrinking in the same proportion does notcohere and follow the movement of the part which dries continuously.OF ARCHE
D CRACKS, WIDE AT THE TOP, AND NARROW BELOW.Arched cracks, wide at the top and narrow below are found inwalled-up doors,
 which shrink more in their height than in theirbreadth, and in proportion as their height is greater than theirwidth, a
nd as the joints of the mortar are more numerous in theheight than in the width.The crack diminishes less in _r o_ than
in _m n_, in proportion asthere is less material between _r_ and _o_ than between _n_ and _m_.Any crack made in a concav
e wall is wide below and narrow at thetop; and this originates, as is here shown at _b c d_, in the sidefigure.1. That w
hich gets wet increases in proportion to the moisture itimbibes.2. And a wet object shrinks, while drying, in proportion
 to theamount of moisture which evaporates from it.[Footnote: The text of this passage is reproduced in facsimile onPl.
CVI to the left. L. 36-40 are written inside the sketch No. 2.L. 41-46 are partly written over the sketch No. 3 to which
 theyrefer.]773.OF THE CAUSES OF FISSURES IN [THE WALLS OF] PUBLIC AND PRIVATEBUILDINGS.The walls give way in cracks, so
me of which are more or lessvertical and others are oblique. The cracks which are in a verticaldirection are caused by t
he joining of new walls, with old walls,whether straight or with indentations fitting on to those of the oldwall; for, a
s these indentations cannot bear the too great weight ofthe wall added on to them, it is inevitable that they should bre
ak,and give way to the settling of the new wall, which will shrink onebraccia in every ten, more or less, according to t
he greater orsmaller quantity of mortar used between the stones of the masonry,and whether this mortar is more or less l
iquid. And observe, thatthe walls should always be built first and then faced with thestones intended to face them. For,
 if you do not proceed thus, sincethe wall settles more than the stone facing, the projections left onthe sides of the w
all must inevitably give way; because the stonesused for facing the wall being larger than those over which they arelaid
, they will necessarily have less mortar laid between thejoints, and consequently they settle less; and this cannot happ
en ifthe facing is added after the wall is dry._a b_ the new wall, _c_ the old wall, which has already settled; andthe p
art _a b_ settles afterwards, although _a_, being founded on_c_, the old wall, cannot possibly break, having a stable fo
undationon the old wall. But only the remainder _b_ of the new wall willbreak away, because it is built from top to bott
om of the building;and the remainder of the new wall will overhang the gap above thewall that has sunk.774.A new tower f
ounded partly on old masonry.775.OF STONES WHICH DISJOIN THEMSELVES FROM THEIR MORTAR.Stones laid in regular courses fro
m bottom to top and built up withan equal quantity of mortar settle equally throughout, when themoisture that made the m
ortar soft evaporates.By what is said above it is proved that the small extent of the newwall between _A_ and _n_ will s
ettle but little, in proportion tothe extent of the same wall between _c_ and _d_. The proportion willin fact be that of
 the thinness of the mortar in relation to thenumber of courses or to the quantity of mortar laid between thestones abov
e the different levels of the old wall.[Footnote: See Pl. CV, No. 1. The top of the tower is wanting inthis reproduction
, and with it the letter _n_ which, in theoriginal, stands above the letter _A_ over the top of the tower,while _c_ stan
ds perpendicularly over _d_.]776.This wall will break under the arch _e f_, because the seven wholesquare bricks are not
 sufficient to sustain the spring of the archplaced on them. And these seven bricks will give way in their middleexactly
 as appears in _a b_. The reason is, that the brick _a_ hasabove it only the weight _a k_, whilst the last brick under t
he archhas above it the weight _c d x a_._c d_ seems to press on the arch towards the abutment at the point_p_ but the w
eight _p o_ opposes resistence to it, whence the wholepressure is transmitted to the root of the arch. Therefore the foo
tof the arch acts like 7 6, which is more than double of _x z_.II.ON FISSURES IN NICHES.777.ON FISSURES IN NICHES.An arc
h constructed on a semicircle and bearing weights on the twoopposite thirds of its curve will give way at five points of
 thecurve. To prove this let the weights be at _n m_ which will breakthe arch _a_, _b_, _f_. I say that, by the foregoin
g, as theextremities _c_ and _a_ are equally pressed upon by the thrust _n_,it follows, by the 5th, that the arch will g
ive way at the pointwhich is furthest from the two forces acting on them and that is themiddle _e_. The same is to be un
derstood of the opposite curve, _d gb_; hence the weights _n m_ must sink, but they cannot sink by the7th, without comin
g closer together, and they cannot come togetherunless the extremities of the arch between them come closer, and ifthese
 draw together the crown of the arch must break; and thus thearch will give way in two places as was at first said &c.I
ask, given a weight at _a_ what counteracts it in the direction_n_ _f_ and by what weight must the weight at _f_ be coun
teracted.778.ON THE SHRINKING OF DAMP BODIES OF DIFFERENT THICKNESS AND WIDTH.The window _a_ is the cause of the crack a
t _b_; and this crack isincreased by the pressure of _n_ and _m_ which sink or penetrateinto the soil in which foundatio
ns are built more than the lighterportion at _b_. Besides, the old foundation under _b_ has alreadysettled, and this the
 piers _n_ and _m_ have not yet done. Hence thepart _b_ does not settle down perpendicularly; on the contrary, itis thro
wn outwards obliquely, and it cannot on the contrary bethrown inwards, because a portion like this, separated from the m
ainwall, is larger outside than inside and the main wall, where it isbroken, is of the same shape and is also larger out
side than inside;therefore, if this separate portion were to fall inwards the largerwould have to pass through the small
er--which is impossible. Henceit is evident that the portion of the semicircular wall whendisunited from the main wall w
ill be thrust outwards, and notinwards as the adversary says.When a dome or a half-dome is crushed from above by an exce
ss ofweight the vault will give way, forming a crack which diminishestowards the top and is wide below, narrow on the in
ner side and wideoutside; as is the case with the outer husk of a pomegranate,divided into many parts lengthwise; for th
e more it is pressed inthe direction of its length, that part of the joints will open most,which is most distant from th
e cause of the pressure; and for thatreason the arches of the vaults of any apse should never be moreloaded than the arc
hes of the principal building. Because that whichweighs most, presses most on the parts below, and they sink into thefou
ndations; but this cannot happen to lighter structures like thesaid apses.[Footnote: The figure on Pl. CV, No. 4 belongs
 to the firstparagraph of this passage, lines 1-14; fig. 5 is sketched by theside of lines l5--and following. The sketch
 below of a pomegranaterefers to line 22. The drawing fig. 6 is, in the original, over line37 and fig. 7 over line 54.]W
hich of these two cubes will shrink the more uniformly: the cube_A_ resting on the pavement, or the cube _b_ suspended i
n the air,when both cubes are equal in weight and bulk, and of clay mixed withequal quantities of water?The cube placed
on the pavement diminishes more in height than inbreadth, which the cube above, hanging in the air, cannot do. Thusit is
 proved. The cube shown above is better shown here below.The final result of the two cylinders of damp clay that is _a_
and_b_ will be the pyramidal figures below _c_ and _d_. This is provedthus: The cylinder _a_ resting on block of stone b
eing made of claymixed with a great deal of water will sink by its weight, whichpresses on its base, and in proportion a
s it settles and spreads allthe parts will be somewhat nearer to the base because that ischarged with the whole weight.I
II.ON THE NATURE OF THE ARCH.779.WHAT IS AN ARCH?The arch is nothing else than a force originated by two weaknesses,for
the arch in buildings is composed of two segments of a circle,each of which being very weak in itself tends to fall; but
 as eachopposes this tendency in the other, the two weaknesses combine toform one strength.OF THE KIND OF PRESSURE IN AR
CHES.As the arch is a composite force it remains in equilibrium becausethe thrust is equal from both sides; and if one o
f the segmentsweighs more than the other the stability is lost, because thegreater pressure will outweigh the lesser.OF
DISTRIBUTING THE PRESSURE ABOVE AN ARCH.Next to giving the segments of the circle equal weight it isnecessary to load th
em equally, or you will fall into the samedefect as before.WHERE AN ARCH BREAKS.An arch breaks at the part which lies be
low half way from thecentre.SECOND RUPTURE OF THE ARCH.If the excess of weight be placed in the middle of the arch at th
epoint _a_, that weight tends to fall towards _b_, and the archbreaks at 2/3 of its height at _c e_; and _g e_ is as man
y timesstronger than _e a_, as _m o_ goes into _m n_.ON ANOTHER CAUSE OF RUIN.The arch will likewise give way under a tr
ansversal thrust, for whenthe charge is not thrown directly on the foot of the arch, the archlasts but a short time.780.
ON THE STRENGTH OF THE ARCH.The way to give stability to the arch is to fill the spandrils withgood masonry up to the le
vel of its summit.ON THE LOADING OF ROUND ARCHES.ON THE PROPER MANNER OF LOADING THE POINTED ARCH.ON THE EVIL EFFECTS OF
 LOADING THE POINTED ARCH DIRECTLY ABOVE ITSCROWN.ON THE DAMAGE DONE TO THE POINTED ARCH BY THROWING THE PRESSURE ONTHE
FLANKS.An arch of small curve is safe in itself, but if it be heavilycharged, it is necessary to strengthen the flanks w
ell. An arch of avery large curve is weak in itself, and stronger if it be charged,and will do little harm to its abutme
nts, and its places of givingway are _o p_.[Footnote: Inside the large figure on the righi is the note: _Dapesare la for
za dell' archo_.]781.ON THE REMEDY FOR EARTHQUAKES.The arch which throws its pressure perpendicularly on the abutmentswi
ll fulfil its function whatever be its direction, upside down,sideways or upright.The arch will not break if the chord o
f the outer arch does nottouch the inner arch. This is manifest by experience, becausewhenever the chord _a o n_ of the
outer arch _n r a_ approaches theinner arch _x b y_ the arch will be weak, and it will be weaker inproportion as the inn
er arch passes beyond that chord. When an archis loaded only on one side the thrust will press on the top of theother si
de and be transmitted to the spring of the arch on thatside; and it will break at a point half way between its twoextrem
es, where it is farthest from the chord.782.A continuous body which has been forcibly bent into an arch, thrustsin the d
irection of the straight line, which it tends to recover.783.In an arch judiciously weighted the thrust is oblique, so t
hat thetriangle _c n b_ has no weight upon it.784.I here ask what weight will be needed to counterpoise and resist thete
ndency of each of these arches to give way?[Footnote: The two lower sketches are taken from the MS. S. K. M.III, 10a; th
ey have there no explanatory text.]785.ON THE STRENGTH OF THE ARCH IN ARCHITECTURE.The stability of the arch built by an
 architect resides in the tieand in the flanks.ON THE POSITION OF THE TIE IN THE ABOVE NAMED ARCH.The position of the ti
e is of the same importance at the beginningof the arch and at the top of the perpendicular pier on which itrests. This
is proved by the 2nd "of supports" which says: that partof a support has least resistance which is farthest from its sol
idattachment; hence, as the top of the pier is farthest from themiddle of its true foundation and the same being the cas
e at theopposite extremities of the arch which are the points farthest fromthe middle, which is really its [upper] attac
hment, we haveconcluded that the tie _a b_ requires to be in such a position asthat its opposite ends are between the fo
ur above-mentionedextremes.The adversary says that this arch must be more than half a circle,and that then it will not n
eed a tie, because then the ends will notthrust outwards but inwards, as is seen in the excess at _a c_, _bd_. To this i
t must be answered that this would be a very poordevice, for three reasons. The first refers to the strength of thearch,
 since it is proved that the circular parallel being composedof two semicircles will only break where these semicircles
crosseach other, as is seen in the figure _n m;_ besides this it followsthat there is a wider space between the extremes
 of the semicirclethan between the plane of the walls; the third reason is that theweight placed to counterbalance the s
trength of the arch diminishesin proportion as the piers of the arch are wider than the spacebetween the piers. Fourthly
 in proportion as the parts at _c a b d_turn outwards, the piers are weaker to support the arch above them.The 5th is th
at all the material and weight of the arch which are inexcess of the semicircle are useless and indeed mischievous; andh
ere it is to be noted that the weight placed above the arch will bemore likely to break the arch at _a b_, where the cur
ve of theexcess begins that is added to the semicircle, than if the pier werestraight up to its junction with the semici
rcle [spring of thearch].AN ARCH LOADED OVER THE CROWN WILL GIVE WAY AT THE LEFT HAND ANDRIGHT HAND QUARTERS.This is pro
ved by the 7th of this which says: The opposite ends ofthe support are equally pressed upon by the weight suspended toth
em; hence the weight shown at _f_ is felt at _b c_, that is halfat each extremity; and by the third which says: in a sup
port ofequal strength [throughout] that portion will give way soonest whichis farthest from its attachment; whence it fo
llows that _d_ beingequally distant from _f, e_ .....If the centering of the arch does not settle as the arch settles,th
e mortar, as it dries, will shrink and detach itself from thebricks between which it was laid to keep them together; and
 as itthus leaves them disjoined the vault will remain loosely built, andthe rains will soon destroy it.786.ON THE STREN
GTH AND NATURE OF ARCHES, AND WHERE THEY ARE STRONG ORWEAK; AND THE SAME AS TO COLUMNS.That part of the arch which is ne
arer to the horizontal offers leastresistance to the weight placed on it.When the triangle _a z n_, by settling, drives
backwards the 2/3 ofeach 1/2 circle that is _a s_ and in the same way _z m_, the reasonis that _a_ is perpendicularly ov
er _b_ and so likewise _z_ is above_f_.Either half of an arch, if overweighted, will break at 2/3 of itsheight, the poin
t which corresponds to the perpendicular line abovethe middle of its bases, as is seen at _a b_; and this happensbecause
 the weight tends to fall past the point _r_.--And if,against its nature it should tend to fall towards the point _s_ th
earch _n s_ would break precisely in its middle. If the arch _n s_were of a single piece of timber, if the weight placed
 at _n_ shouldtend to fall in the line _n m_, the arch would break in the middleof the arch _e m_, otherwise it will bre
ak at one third from the topat the point a because from _a_ to _n_ the arch is nearer to thehorizontal than from _a_ to
_o_ and from _o_ to _s_, in proportionas _p t_ is greater than _t n_, _a o_ will be stronger than _a n_and likewise in p
roportion as _s o_ is stronger than _o a_, _r p_will be greater than _p t_.The arch which is doubled to four times of it
s thickness will bearfour times the weight that the single arch could carry, and more inproportion as the diameter of it
s thickness goes a smaller number oftimes into its length. That is to say that if the thickness of thesingle arch goes t
en times into its length, the thickness of thedoubled arch will go five times into its length. Hence as thethickness of
the double arch goes only half as many times into itslength as that of the single arch does, it is reasonable that itsho
uld carry half as much more weight as it would have to carry ifit were in direct proportion to the single arch. Hence as
 thisdouble arch has 4 times the thickness of the single arch, it wouldseem that it ought to bear 4 times the weight; bu
t by the above ruleit is shown that it will bear exactly 8 times as much.THAT PIER, WHICH is CHARGED MOST UNEQUALLY, WIL
L SOONEST GIVE WAY.The column _c b_, being charged with an equal weight, [on each side]will be most durable, and the oth
er two outward columns require onthe part outside of their centre as much pressure as there is insideof their centre, th
at is, from the centre of the column, towards themiddle of the arch.Arches which depend on chains for their support will
 not be verydurable.THAT ARCH WILL BE OF LONGER DURATION WHICH HAS A GOOD ABUTMENTOPPOSED TO ITS THRUST.The arch itself
tends to fall. If the arch be 30 braccia and theinterval between the walls which carry it be 20, we know that 30cannot p
ass through the 20 unless 20 becomes likewise 30. Hence thearch being crushed by the excess of weight, and the walls off
eringinsufficient resistance, part, and afford room between them, for thefall of the arch.But if you do not wish to stre
ngthen the arch with an iron tie youmust give it such abutments as can resist the thrust; and you can dothis thus: fill
up the spandrels _m n_ with stones, and direct thelines of the joints between them to the centre of the circle of thearc
h, and the reason why this makes the arch durable is this. Weknow very well that if the arch is loaded with an excess of
 weightabove its quarter as _a b_, the wall _f g_ will be thrust outwardsbecause the arch would yield in that direction;
 if the other quarter_b c_ were loaded, the wall _f g_ would be thrust inwards, if itwere not for the line of stones _x
y_ which resists this.787.PLAN.Here it is shown how the arches made in the side of the octagonthrust the piers of the an
gles outwards, as is shown by the line _hc_ and by the line _t d_ which thrust out the pier _m_; that is theytend to for
ce it away from the centre of such an octagon.788.An Experiment to show that a weight placed on an arch does notdischarg
e itself entirely on its columns; on the contrary thegreater the weight placed on the arches, the less the arch transmit
sthe weight to the columns. The experiment is the following. Let aman be placed on a steel yard in the middle of the sha
ft of a well,then let him spread out his hands and feet between the walls of thewell, and you will see him weigh much le
ss on the steel yard; givehim a weight on the shoulders, you will see by experiment, that thegreater the weight you give
 him the greater effort he will make inspreading his arms and legs, and in pressing against the wall andthe less weight
will be thrown on the steel yard.IV.ON FOUNDATIONS, THE NATURE OF THE GROUND AND SUPPORTS.789.The first and most importa
nt thing is stability.As to the foundations of the component parts of temples and otherpublic buildings, the depths of t
he foundations must bear the sameproportions to each other as the weight of material which is to beplaced upon them.Ever
y part of the depth of earth in a given space is composed oflayers, and each layer is composed of heavier or lighter mat
erials,the lowest being the heaviest. And this can be proved, because theselayers have been formed by the sediment from
water carried down tothe sea, by the current of rivers which flow into it. The heaviestpart of this sediment was that wh
ich was first thrown down, and soon by degrees; and this is the action of water when it becomesstagnant, having first br
ought down the mud whence it first flowed.And such layers of soil are seen in the banks of rivers, where theirconstant f
low has cut through them and divided one slope from theother to a great depth; where in gravelly strata the waters have
runoff, the materials have, in consequence, dried and been convertedinto hard stone, and this happened most in what was
the finest mud;whence we conclude that every portion of the surface of the earthwas once at the centre of the earth, and
 _vice_versa_ &c.790.The heaviest part of the foundations of buildings settles most, andleaves the lighter part above it
 separated from it.And the soil which is most pressed, if it be porous yields most.You should always make the foundation
s project equally beyond theweight of the walls and piers, as shown at _m a b_. If you do asmany do, that is to say if y
ou make a foundation of equal width fromthe bottom up to the surface of the ground, and charge it above withunequal weig
hts, as shown at _b e_ and at _e o_, at the part of thefoundation at _b e_, the pier of the angle will weigh most andthr
ust its foundation downwards, which the wall at _e o_ will notdo; since it does not cover the whole of its foundation, a
ndtherefore thrusts less heavily and settles less. Hence, the pier _be_ in settling cracks and parts from the wall _e o_
. This may beseen in most buildings which are cracked round the piers.791.The window _a_ is well placed under the window
 _c_, and the window_b_ is badly placed under the pier _d_, because this latter iswithout support and foundation; mind t
herefore never to make a breakunder the piers between the windows.792.OF THE SUPPORTS.A pillar of which the thickness is
 increased will gain more than itsdue strength, in direct proportion to what its loses in relativeheight.EXAMPLE.If a pi
llar should be nine times as high as it is broad--that is tosay, if it is one braccio thick, according to rule it should
 be ninebraccia high--then, if you place 100 such pillars together in a massthis will be ten braccia broad and 9 high; a
nd if the first pillarcould carry 10000 pounds the second being only about as high as itis wide, and thus lacking 8 part
s of its proper length, it, that isto say, each pillar thus united, will bear eight times more thanwhen disconnected; th
at is to say, that if at first it would carryten thousand pounds, it would now carry 90 thousand.V.ON THE RESISTANCE OF
BEAMS.793.That angle will offer the greatest resistance which is most acute,and the most obtuse will be the weakest.[Foo
tnote: The three smaller sketches accompany the text in theoriginal, but the larger one is not directly connected with i
t. Itis to be found on fol. 89a of the same Manuscript and there we readin a note, written underneath, _coverchio della
perdicha delcastello_ (roof of the flagstaff of the castle),--Compare also Pl.XCIII, No. 1.]794.If the beams and the wei
ght _o_ are 100 pounds, how much weight willbe wanted at _ae_ to resist such a weight, that it may not falldown?795.ON T
HE LENGTH OF BEAMS.That beam which is more than 20 times as long as its greatestthickness will be of brief duration and
will break in half; andremember, that the part built into the wall should be steeped in hotpitch and filleted with oak b
oards likewise so steeped. Each beammust pass through its walls and be secured beyond the walls withsufficient chaining,
 because in consequence of earthquakes the beamsare often seen to come out of the walls and bring down the walls andfloo
rs; whilst if they are chained they will hold the walls stronglytogether and the walls will hold the floors. Again I rem
ind younever to put plaster over timber. Since by expansion and shrinkingof the timber produced by damp and dryness such
 floors often crack,and once cracked their divisions gradually produce dust and an uglyeffect. Again remember not to lay
 a floor on beams supported onarches; for, in time the floor which is made on beams settlessomewhat in the middle while
that part of the floor which rests onthe arches remains in its place; hence, floors laid over two kindsof supports look,
 in time, as if they were made in hills [Footnote:19 M. RAVAISSON, in his edition of MS. A gives a very differentrenderi
ng of this passage translating it thus: _Les planchers quisont soutenus par deux differentes natures de supports paraiss
entavec le temps faits en voute a cholli_.]Remarks on the style of Leonardo's architecture.A few remarks may here be add
ed on the style of Leonardo'sarchitectural studies. However incomplete, however small in scale,they allow us to establis
h a certain number of facts andprobabilities, well worthy of consideration.When Leonardo began his studies the great nam
e of Brunellesco wasstill the inspiration of all Florence, and we cannot doubt thatLeonardo was open to it, since we fin
d among his sketches the planof the church of Santo Spirito[Footnote 1: See Pl. XCIV, No. 2. Thenonly in course of erect
ion after the designs of Brunellesco, thoughhe was already dead; finished in 1481.] and a lateral view of SanLorenzo (Pl
. XCIV No. 1), a plan almost identical with the chapelDegli Angeli, only begun by him (Pl. XCIV, No. 3) while amongLeona
rdo's designs for domes several clearly betray the influence ofBrunellesco's Cupola and the lantern of Santa Maria delFi
ore[Footnote 2: A small sketch of the tower of the Palazzo dellaSignoria (MS. C.A. 309) proves that he also studied medi
aevalmonuments.]The beginning of the second period of modern Italian architecturefalls during the first twenty years of
Leonardo's life. However thenew impetus given by Leon Battista Alberti either was not generallyunderstood by his contemp
oraries, or those who appreciated it, hadno opportunity of showing that they did so. It was only when takenup by Bramant
e and developed by him to the highest rank of modernarchitecture that this new influence was generally felt. Now thepecu
liar feature of Leonardo's sketches is that, like the works ofBramante, they appear to be the development and continuati
on ofAlberti's._But a question here occurs which is difficult to answer. DidLeonardo, till he quitted Florence, follow t
he direction given bythe dominant school of Brunellesco, which would then have given riseto his "First manner", or had h
e, even before he left Florence, feltAlberti's influence--either through his works (Palazzo Ruccellai,and the front of S
anta Maria Novella) or through personalintercourse? Or was it not till he went to Milan that Alberti's workbegan to impr
ess him through Bramante, who probably had knownAlberti at Mantua about 1470 and who not only carried out Alberti'sviews
 and ideas, but, by his designs for St. Peter's at Rome, provedhimself the greatest of modern architects. When Leonardo
went toMilan Bramante had already been living there for many years. One ofhis earliest works in Milan was the church of
Santa Maria presso SanSatiro, Via del Falcone[Footnote 1: Evidence of this I intend togive later on in a Life of Bramant
e, which I have in preparation.].Now we find among Leonardos studies of Cupolas on Plates LXXXIV andLXXXV and in Pl. LXX
X several sketches which seem to me to have beensuggested by Bramante's dome of this church.The MSS. B and Ash. II conta
in the plans of S. Sepolcro, thepavilion in the garden of the duke of Milan, and two churches,evidently inspired by the
church of San Lorenzo at Milan.MS. B. contains besides two notes relating to Pavia, one of them adesign for the sacristy
 of the Cathedral at Pavia, which cannot besupposed to be dated later than 1492, and it has probably somerelation to Leo
nardo's call to Pavia June 21, 1490[Footnote 2: Thesketch of the plan of Brunellesco's church of Santo Spirito atFlorenc
e, which occurs in the same Manuscript, may have been donefrom memory.]. These and other considerations justify us incon
cluding, that Leonardo made his studies of cupolas at Milan,probably between the years 1487 and 1492 in anticipation of
theerection of one of the grandest churches of Italy, the Cathedral ofPavia. This may explain the decidedly Lombardo-Bra
mantesque tendencyin the style of these studies, among which only a few remind us ofthe forms of the cupolas of S. Maria
 del Fiore and of the Baptisteryof Florence. Thus, although when compared with Bramante's work,several of these sketches
 plainly reveal that master's influence, wefind, among the sketches of domes, some, which show alreadyBramante's classic
 style, of which the Tempietto of San Pietro inMontorio, his first building executed at Rome, is the foremostexample[Foo
tnote 3: It may be mentioned here, that in 1494 Bramantemade a similar design for the lantern of the Cupola of the Churc
h ofSanta Maria delle Grazie.].On Plate LXXXIV is a sketch of the plan of a similar circularbuilding; and the Mausoleum
on Pl. XCVIII, no less than one of thepedestals for the statue of Francesco Sforza (Pl. LXV), is of thesame type.The dra
wings Pl. LXXXIV No. 2, Pl. LXXXVI No. 1 and 2 and the groundflour ("flour" sic but should be "floor" ?) of the building
 in thedrawing Pl. XCI No. 2, with the interesting decoration by giganticstatues in large niches, are also, I believe, m
ore in the styleBramante adopted at Rome, than in the Lombard style. Are we toconclude from this that Leonardo on his pa
rt influenced Bramante inthe sense of simplifying his style and rendering it more congenialto antique art? The answer to
 this important question seems at firstdifficult to give, for we are here in presence of Bramante, thegreatest of modern
 architects, and with Leonardo, the man comparablewith no other. We have no knowledge of any buildings erected byLeonard
o, and unless we admit personal intercourse--which seemsprobable, but of which there is no proof--, it would be difficul
t tounderstand how Leonardo could have affected Bramante's style. Theconverse is more easily to be admitted, since Brama
nte, as we haveproved elsewhere, drew and built simultaneously in differentmanners, and though in Lombardy there is no b
uilding by him in hisclassic style, the use of brick for building, in that part of Italy,may easily account for it.__Bra
mante's name is incidentally mentioned in Leonardo's manuscriptsin two passages (Nos. 1414 and 1448). On each occasion i
t is only aslight passing allusion, and the nature of the context gives us nodue information as to any close connection
between the two artists.__It might be supposed, on the ground of Leonardo's relations withthe East given in sections XVI
I and XXI of this volume, that someevidence of oriental influence might be detected in hisarchitectural drawings. I do n
ot however think that any such tracescan be pointed out with certainty unless perhaps the drawing for aMausoleum, Pl. XC
 VIII.__Among several studies for the construction of cupolas above a Greekcross there are some in which the forms are d
ecidedly monotonous.These, it is clear, were not designed as models of taste; they mustbe regarded as the results of cer
tain investigations into the lawsof proportion, harmony and contrast.__The designs for churches, on the plan of a Latin
cross areevidently intended to depart as little as possible from the form ofa Greek cross; and they also show a preferen
ce for a nave surroundedwith outer porticos.__The architectural forms preferred by Leonardo are pilasters coupled(Pl. LX
XXII No. 1; or grouped (Pl. LXXX No. 5 and XCIV No. 4), oftencombined with niches. We often meet with orders superposed,
 one ineach story, or two small orders on one story, in combination withone great order (Pl. XCVI No. 2)._The drum (tamb
uro) of these cupolas is generally octagonal, as inthe cathedral of Florence, and with similar round windows in itssides
. In Pl. LXXXVII No. 2 it is circular like the model actuallycarried out by Michael Angelo at St. Peter's.The cupola its
elf is either hidden under a pyramidal roof, as in theBaptistery of Florence, San Lorenzo of Milan and most of the Lomba
rdchurches (Pl. XCI No. 1 and Pl. XCII No. 1); but it more generallysuggests the curve of Sta Maria del Fiore (Pl. LXXXV
III No. 5; Pl.XC No. 2; Pl. LXXXIX, M; Pl XC No. 4, Pl. XCVI No. 2). In othercases (Pl. LXXX No. 4; Pl. LXXXIX; Pl. XC N
o. 2) it shows the sidesof the octagon crowned by semicircular pediments, as inBrunellesco's lantern of the Cathedral an
d in the model for theCathedral of Pavia.Finally, in some sketches the cupola is either semicircular, or asin Pl. LXXXVI
I No. 2, shows the beautiful line, adopted sixty yearslater by Michael Angelo for the existing dome of St. Peter's.It is
 worth noticing that for all these domes Leonardo is notsatisfied to decorate the exterior merely with ascending ribs or
mouldings, but employs also a system of horizontal parallels tocomplete the architectural system. Not the least interest
ing are thedesigns for the tiburio (cupola) of the Milan Cathedral. They showsome of the forms, just mentioned, adapted
to the peculiar gothicstyle of that monument.The few examples of interiors of churches recall the style employedin Lomba
rdy by Bramante, for instance in S. Maria di Canepanuova atPavia, or by Dolcebuono in the Monastero Maggiore at Milan (s
ee Pl.CI No. 1 [C. A. 181b; 546b]; Pl. LXXXIV No. 10).The few indications concerning palaces seem to prove that Leonardo
followed Alberti's example of decorating the walls with pilastersand a flat rustica, either in stone or by graffitti (Pl
. CII No. 1and Pl. LXXXV No. 14).By pointing out the analogies between Leonardo's architecture andthat of other masters
we in no way pretend to depreciate hisindividual and original inventive power. These are at all eventsbeyond dispute. Th
e project for the Mausoleum (Pl. XCVIII) wouldalone suffice to rank him among the greatest architects who everlived. The
 peculiar shape of the tower (Pl. LXXX), of the churchesfor preaching (Pl. XCVII No. 1 and pages 56 and 57, Fig. 1-4), h
iscurious plan for a city with high and low level streets (Pl. LXXVIIand LXXVIII No. 2 and No. 3), his Loggia with fount
ains (Pl. LXXXIINo. 4) reveal an originality, a power and facility of invention foralmost any given problem, which are q
uite wonderful._In addition to all these qualities he propably stood alone in hisday in one department of architectural
study,--his investigations,namely, as to the resistance of vaults, foundations, walls andarches.__As an application of t
hese studies the plan of a semicircular vault(Pl. CIII No. 2) may be mentioned here, disposed so as to produce nothrust
on the columns on which it rests:_ volta i botte e nonispignie ifori le colone. _Above the geometrical patterns on thesa
me sheet, close to a circle inscribed in a square is the note:_ laragio d'una volta cioe il terzo del diamitro della sua
 ... deltedesco in domo._There are few data by which to judge of Leonardo's style in thetreatment of detail. On Pl. LXXX
V No. 10 and Pl. CIII No. 3, we findsome details of pillars; on Pl. CI No. 3 slender pillars designedfor a fountain and
on Pl. CIII No. 1 MS. B, is a pen and ink drawingof a vase which also seems intended for a fountain. Three handlesseem t
o have been intended to connect the upper parts with the base.There can be no doubt that Leonardo, like Bramante, but un
likeMichael Angelo, brought infinite delicacy of motive and execution tobear on the details of his work.__XIV.__Anatomy,
 Zoology and Physiology.__Leonardo's eminent place in the history of medicine, as a pioneerin the sciences of Anatomy an
d Physiology, will never be appreciatedtill it is possible to publish the mass of manuscripts in which helargely treated
 of these two branches of learning. In the presentwork I must necessarily limit myself to giving the reader a generalvie
w of these labours, by publishing his introductory notes to thevarious books on anatomical subjects. I have added some e
xtracts,and such observations as are scattered incidentally through thesetreatises, as serving to throw a light on Leona
rdo's scientificattitude, besides having an interest for a wider circle than that ofspecialists only.__VASARI expressly
mentions Leonardo's anatomical studies, having hadoccasion to examine the manuscript books which refer to them.According
 to him Leonardo studied Anatomy in the companionship ofMarc Antonio della Torre_ "aiutato e scambievolmenteaiutando."_-
-This learned Anatomist taught the science in theuniversities first of Padua and then of Pavia, and at Pavia he andLeona
rdo may have worked and studied together. We have no clue toany exact dates, but in the year 1506 Marc Antonio della Tor
re seemsto have not yet left Padua. He was scarcely thirty years old when hedied in 1512, and his writings on anatomy ha
ve not only never beenpublished, but no manuscript copy of them is known to exist.__This is not the place to enlarge on
the connection between Leonardoand Marc Antonio della Torre. I may however observe that I have notbeen able to discover
in Leonardo's manuscripts on anatomy anymention of his younger contemporary. The few quotations which occurfrom writers
on medicine--either of antiquity or of the middle agesare printed in Section XXII. Here and there in the manuscriptsment
ion is made of an anonymous "adversary"_ (avversario) _whoseviews are opposed and refuted by Leonardo, but there is no g
roundfor supposing that Marc Antonio della Torre should have been this"adversary".__Only a very small selection from the
 mass of anatomical drawingsleft by Leonardo have been published here in facsimile, but to formany adequate idea of thei
r scientific merit they should be comparedwith the coarse and inadequate figures given in the published booksof the earl
y part of the XVI. century.William Hunter, the great surgeon--a competent judge--who had anopportunity in the time of Ge
orge III. of seeing the originals inthe King's Library, has thus recorded his opinion: "I expected tosee little more tha
n such designs in Anatomy as might be useful to apainter in his own profession. But I saw, and indeed withastonishment,
that Leonardo had been a general and deep student.When I consider what pains he has taken upon every part of the body,th
e superiority of his universal genius, his particular excellencein mechanics and hydraulics, and the attention with whic
h such a manwould examine and see objects which he has to draw, I am fullypersuaded that Leonardo was the best Anatomist
, at that time, in theworld ... Leonardo was certainly the first man, we know of, whointroduced the practice of making a
natomical drawings" (Twointroductory letters. London 1784, pages 37 and 39).The illustrious German Naturalist Johan Frie
drich Blumenbackesteemed them no less highly; he was one of the privileged few who,after Hunter, had the chance of seein
g these Manuscripts. He writes:_Der Scharfblick dieses grossen Forschers und Darstellers der Naturhat schon auf Dinge ge
achtet, die noch Jahrhunderte nachherunbemerkt geblieben sind_" (see _Blumenbach's medicinischeBibliothek_, Vol. 3, St.
4, 1795. page 728).These opinions were founded on the drawings alone. Up to the presentday hardly anything has been made
 known of the text, and, for thereasons I have given, it is my intention to reproduce here no morethan a selection of ex
tracts which I have made from the originals atWindsor Castle and elsewhere. In the Bibliography of theManuscripts, at th
e end of this volume a short review is given ofthe valuable contents of these Anatomical note books which are atpresent
almost all in the possession of her Majesty the Queen ofEngland. It is, I believe, possible to assign the date withappro
ximate accuracy to almost all the fragments, and I am thus ledto conclude that the greater part of Leonardo's anatomical
investigations were carried out after the death of della Torre.Merely in reading the introductory notes to his various b
ooks onAnatomy which are here printed it is impossible to resist theimpression that the Master's anatomical studies bear
 to a very greatextent the stamp of originality and independent thought.I.ANATOMY.796.A general introductionI wish to wo
rk miracles;--it may be that I shall possess less thanother men of more peaceful lives, or than those who want to growri
ch in a day. I may live for a long time in great poverty, asalways happens, and to all eternity will happen, to alchemis
ts, thewould-be creators of gold and silver, and to engineers who wouldhave dead water stir itself into life and perpetu
al motion, and tothose supreme fools, the necromancer and the enchanter.[Footnote 23: The following seems to be directed
 against students ofpainting and young artists rather than against medical men andanatomists.]And you, who say that it w
ould be better to watch an anatomist atwork than to see these drawings, you would be right, if it werepossible to observ
e all the things which are demonstrated in suchdrawings in a single figure, in which you, with all your cleverness,will
not see nor obtain knowledge of more than some few veins, toobtain a true and perfect knowledge of which I have dissecte
d morethan ten human bodies, destroying all the other members, andremoving the very minutest particles of the flesh by w
hich theseveins are surrounded, without causing them to bleed, excepting theinsensible bleeding of the capillary veins;
and as one single bodywould not last so long, since it was necessary to proceed withseveral bodies by degrees, until I c
ame to an end and had a completeknowledge; this I repeated twice, to learn the differences [59].[Footnote: Lines 1-59 an
d 60-89 are written in two parallel columns.When we here find Leonardo putting himself in the same category asthe Alchem
ists and Necromancers, whom he elsewhere mocks at sobitterly, it is evidently meant ironically. In the same wayLeonardo,
 in the introduction to the Books on Perspective setshimself with transparent satire on a level with other writers on th
esubject.]And if you should have a love for such things you might be preventedby loathing, and if that did not prevent y
ou, you might be deterredby the fear of living in the night hours in the company of thosecorpses, quartered and flayed a
nd horrible to see. And if this didnot prevent you, perhaps you might not be able to draw so well as isnecessary for suc
h a demonstration; or, if you had the skill indrawing, it might not be combined with knowledge of perspective; andif it
were so, you might not understand the methods of geometricaldemonstration and the method of the calculation of forces an
d of thestrength of the muscles; patience also may be wanting, so that youlack perseverance. As to whether all these thi
ngs were found in meor not [Footnote 84: Leonardo frequently, and perhaps habitually,wrote in note books of a very small
 size and only moderately thick;in most of those which have been preserved undivided, each containsless than fifty leave
s. Thus a considerable number of such volumesmust have gone to make up a volume of the bulk of the '_CodexAtlanticus_' w
hich now contains nearly 1200 detached leaves. In thepassage under consideration, which was evidently written at a latep
eriod of his life, Leonardo speaks of his Manuscript note-books asnumbering 12O; but we should hardly be justified in co
ncluding fromthis passage that the greater part of his Manuscripts were nowmissing (see _Prolegomena_, Vol. I, pp. 5-7).
], the hundred andtwenty books composed by me will give verdict Yes or No. In these Ihave been hindered neither by avari
ce nor negligence, but simply bywant of time. Farewell [89].Plans and suggestions for the arrangement of materials (797-
802).797.OF THE ORDER OF THE BOOK.This work must begin with the conception of man, and describe thenature of the womb an
d how the foetus lives in it, up to what stageit resides there, and in what way it quickens into life and feeds.Also its
 growth and what interval there is between one stage ofgrowth and another. What it is that forces it out from the body o
fthe mother, and for what reasons it sometimes comes out of themother's womb before the due time.Then I will describe wh
ich are the members, which, after the boy isborn, grow more than the others, and determine the proportions of aboy of on
e year.Then describe the fully grown man and woman, with their proportions,and the nature of their complexions, colour,
and physiognomy.Then how they are composed of veins, tendons, muscles and bones.This I shall do at the end of the book.
Then, in four drawings,represent four universal conditions of men. That is, Mirth, withvarious acts of laughter, and des
cribe the cause of laughter.Weeping in various aspects with its causes. Contention, with variousacts of killing; flight,
 fear, ferocity, boldness, murder and everything pertaining to such cases. Then represent Labour, with pulling,thrusting
, carrying, stopping, supporting and such like things.Further I would describe attitudes and movements. Then perspective
,concerning the functions and effects of the eye; and ofhearing--here I will speak of music--, and treat of the othersen
ses.And then describe the nature of the senses.This mechanism of man we will demonstrate in ... figures; of whichthe thr
ee first will show the ramification of the bones; that is:first one to show their height and position and shape: the sec
ondwill be seen in profile and will show the depth of the whole and ofthe parts, and their position. The third figure wi
ll be ademonstration of the bones of the backparts. Then I will make threeother figures from the same point of view, wit
h the bones sawnacross, in which will be shown their thickness and hollowness. Threeother figures of the bones complete,
 and of the nerves which risefrom the nape of the neck, and in what limbs they ramify. And threeothers of the bones and
veins, and where they ramify. Then threefigures with the muscles and three with the skin, and their properproportions; a
nd three of woman, to illustrate the womb and themenstrual veins which go to the breasts.[Footnote: The meaning of the w
ord _nervo_ varies in differentpassages, being sometimes used for _muscolo_ (muscle).]798.THE ORDER OF THE BOOK.This dep
icting of mine of the human body will be as clear to you asif you had the natural man before you; and the reason is that
 if youwish thoroughly to know the parts of man, anatomically, you--or youreye--require to see it from different aspects
, considering it frombelow and from above and from its sides, turning it about andseeking the origin of each member; and
 in this way the naturalanatomy is sufficient for your comprehension. But you mustunderstand that this amount of knowled
ge will not continue tosatisfy you; seeing the very great confusion that must result fromthe combination of tissues, wit
h veins, arteries, nerves, sinews,muscles, bones, and blood which, of itself, tinges every part thesame colour. And the
veins, which discharge this blood, are notdiscerned by reason of their smallness. Moreover integrity of thetissues, in t
he process of the investigating the parts within them,is inevitably destroyed, and their transparent substance beingting
ed with blood does not allow you to recognise the parts coveredby them, from the similarity of their blood-stained hue;
and youcannot know everything of the one without confusing and destroyingthe other. Hence, some further anatomy drawings
 become necessary. Ofwhich you want three to give full knowledge of the veins andarteries, everything else being destroy
ed with the greatest care.And three others to display the tissues; and three for the sinewsand muscles and ligaments; an
d three for the bones and cartilages;and three for the anatomy of the bones, which have to be sawn toshow which are holl
ow and which are not, which have marrow and whichare spongy, and which are thick from the outside inwards, and whichare
thin. And some are extremely thin in some parts and thick inothers, and in some parts hollow or filled up with bone, or
full ofmarrow, or spongy. And all these conditions are sometimes found inone and the same bone, and in some bones none o
f them. And three youmust have for the woman, in which there is much that is mysteriousby reason of the womb and the foe
tus. Therefore by my drawings everypart will be known to you, and all by means of demonstrations fromthree different poi
nts of view of each part; for when you have seena limb from the front, with any muscles, sinews, or veins which takethei
r rise from the opposite side, the same limb will be shown toyou in a side view or from behind, exactly as if you had th
at samelimb in your hand and were turning it from side to side until youhad acquired a full comprehension of all you wis
hed to know. In thesame way there will be put before you three or four demonstrationsof each limb, from various points o
f view, so that you will be leftwith a true and complete knowledge of all you wish to learn of thehuman figure[Footnote
35: Compare Pl. CVII. The original drawing atWindsor is 28 1/2 X 19 1/2 centimetres. The upper figures areslightly washe
d with Indian ink. On the back of this drawing is thetext No. 1140.].Thus, in twelve entire figures, you will have set b
efore you thecosmography of this lesser world on the same plan as, before me, wasadopted by Ptolemy in his cosmography;
and so I will afterwardsdivide them into limbs as he divided the whole world into provinces;then I will speak of the fun
ction of each part in every direction,putting before your eyes a description of the whole form andsubstance of man, as r
egards his movements from place to place, bymeans of his different parts. And thus, if it please our greatAuthor, I may
demonstrate the nature of men, and their customs inthe way I describe his figure.And remember that the anatomy of the ne
rves will not give theposition of their ramifications, nor show you which muscles theybranch into, by means of bodies di
ssected in running water or inlime water; though indeed their origin and starting point may beseen without such water as
 well as with it. But their ramifications,when under running water, cling and unite--just like flat or hempcarded for sp
inning--all into a skein, in a way which makes itimpossible to trace in which muscles or by what ramification thenerves
are distributed among those muscles.799.THE ARRANGEMENT OF ANATOMYFirst draw the bones, let us say, of the arm, and put
in the motormuscle from the shoulder to the elbow with all its lines. Thenproceed in the same way from the elbow to the
wrist. Then from thewrist to the hand and from the hand to the fingers.And in the arm you will put the motors of the fin
gers which open,and these you will show separately in their demonstration. In thesecond demonstration you will clothe th
ese muscles with thesecondary motors of the fingers and so proceed by degrees to avoidconfusion. But first lay on the bo
nes those muscles which lie closeto the said bones, without confusion of other muscles; and withthese you may put the ne
rves and veins which supply theirnourishment, after having first drawn the tree of veins and nervesover the simple bones
.800.Begin the anatomy at the head and finish at the sole of the foot.801.3 men complete, 3 with bones and nerves, 3 wit
h the bones only. Herewe have 12 demonstrations of entire figures.802.When you have finished building up the man, you wi
ll make the statuewith all its superficial measurements.[Footnote: _Cresciere l'omo_. The meaning of this expression app
earsto be different here and in the passage C.A. 157a, 468a (see No.526, Note 1. 2). Here it can hardly mean anything el
se thanmodelling, since the sculptor forms the figure by degrees, by addingwet clay and the figure consequently increase
s or grows. _Tu faraila statua_ would then mean, you must work out the figure in marble.If this interpretation is the co
rrect one, this passage would haveno right to find a place in the series on anatomical studies. I maysay that it was ori
ginally inserted in this connection under theimpression that _di cresciere_ should be read _descrivere_.]Plans for the r
epresentation of muscles by drawings (803-809).803.You must show all the motions of the bones with their joints tofollow
 the demonstration of the first three figures of the bones,and this should be done in the first book.804.Remember that t
o be certain of the point of origin of any muscle,you must pull the sinew from which the muscle springs in such a wayas
to see that muscle move, and where it is attached to theligaments of the bones.NOTE.You will never get any thing but con
fusion in demonstrating themuscles and their positions, origin, and termination, unless youfirst make a demonstration of
 thin muscles after the manner of linenthreads; and thus you can represent them, one over another as naturehas placed th
em; and thus, too, you can name them according to thelimb they serve; for instance the motor of the point of the greatto
e, of its middle bone, of its first bone, &c. And when you havethe knowledge you will draw, by the side of this, the tru
e form andsize and position of each muscle. But remember to give the threadswhich explain the situation of the muscles i
n the position whichcorresponds to the central line of each muscle; and so these threadswill demonstrate the form of the
 leg and their distance in a plainand clear manner.I have removed the skin from a man who was so shrunk by illness thatt
he muscles were worn down and remained in a state like thinmembrane, in such a way that the sinews instead of merging in
muscles ended in wide membrane; and where the bones were covered bythe skin they had very little over their natural size
.[Footnote: The photograph No. 41 of Grosvenor Gallery Publications:a drawing of the muscles of the foot, includes a com
plete facsimileof the text of this passage.]805.Which nerve causes the motion of the eye so that the motion of oneeye mo
ves the other?Of frowning the brows, of raising the brows, of lowering thebrows,--of closing the eyes, of opening the ey
es,--of raising thenostrils, of opening the lips, with the teeth shut, of pouting withthe lips, of smiling, of astonishm
ent.--Describe the beginning of man when it is caused in the womb and whyan eight months child does not live. What sneez
ing is. What yawningis. Falling sickness, spasms, paralysis, shivering with cold,sweating, fatigue, hunger, sleepiness,
thirst, lust.Of the nerve which is the cause of movement from the shoulder to theelbow, of the movement from the elbow t
o the hand, from the joint ofthe hand to the springing of the fingers. From the springing of thefingers to the middle jo
ints, and from the middle joints to thelast.Of the nerve which causes the movement of the thigh, and from theknee to the
 foot, and from the joint of the foot to the toes, andthen to the middle of the toes and of the rotary motion of the leg
.806.ANATOMY.Which nerves or sinews of the hand are those which close and partthe fingers and toes latteraly?807.Remove
by degrees all the parts of the front of a man in making yourdissection, till you come to the bones. Description of the
parts ofthe bust and of their motions.808.Give the anatomy of the leg up to the hip, in all views and in everyaction and
 in every state; veins, arteries, nerves, sinews andmuscles, skin and bones; then the bones in sections to show thethick
ness of the bones.[Footnote: A straightened leg in profile is sketched by the side ofthis text.]On corpulency and leanne
ss (809-811).809.Make the rule and give the measurement of each muscle, and give thereasons of all their functions, and
in which way they work and whatmakes them work &c.[4] First draw the spine of the back; then clothe it by degrees, oneaf
ter the other, with each of its muscles and put in the nerves andarteries and veins to each muscle by itself; and beside
s these notethe vertebrae to which they are attached; which of the intestinescome in contact with them; and which bones
and other organs &c.The most prominent parts of lean people are most prominent in themuscular, and equally so in fat per
sons. But concerning thedifference in the forms of the muscles in fat persons as comparedwith muscular persons, it shall
 be described below.[Footnote: The two drawings given on Pl. CVIII no. 1 come betweenlines 3 and 4. A good and very earl
y copy of this drawing withoutthe written text exists in the collection of drawings belonging toChrist's College Oxford,
 where it is attributed to Leonardo.]810.Describe which muscles disappear in growing fat, and which becomevisible in gro
wing lean.And observe that that part which on the surface of a fat person ismost concave, when he grows lean becomes mor
e prominent.Where the muscles separate one from another you must give profilesand where they coalesce ...811.OF THE HUMA
N FIGURE.Which is the part in man, which, as he grows fatter, never gainsflesh?Or what part which as a man grows lean ne
ver falls away with a tooperceptible diminution? And among the parts which grow fat which isthat which grows fattest?Amo
ng those which grow lean which is that which grows leanest?In very strong men which are the muscles which are thickest a
nd mostprominent?In your anatomy you must represent all the stages of the limbs fromman's creation to his death, and the
n till the death of the bone;and which part of him is first decayed and which is preserved thelongest.And in the same wa
y of extreme leanness and extreme fatness.The divisions of the head (812. 813).812.ANATOMY.There are eleven elementary t
issues:-- Cartilage, bones, nerves,veins, arteries, fascia, ligament and sinews, skin, muscle and fat.OF THE HEAD.The di
visions of the head are 10, viz. 5 external and 5 internal,the external are the hair, skin, muscle, fascia and the skull
; theinternal are the dura mater, the pia mater, [which enclose] thebrain. The pia mater and the dura mater come again u
nderneath andenclose the brain; then the rete mirabile, and the occipital bone,which supports the brain from which the n
erves spring.813._a_. hair_n_. skin_c_. muscle_m_. fascia_o_. skull _i.e._ bone_b_. dura mater_d_. pia mater_f_. brain_r
_. pia mater, below_t_. dura mater_l_. rete mirablile_s_. the occipitul bone.[Footnote: See Pl. CVIII, No. 3.]Physiologi
cal problems (814. 815).814.Of the cause of breathing, of the cause of the motion of the heart,of the cause of vomiting,
 of the cause of the descent of food fromthe stomach, of the cause of emptying the intestines.Of the cause of the moveme
nt of the superfluous matter through theintestines.Of the cause of swallowing, of the cause of coughing, of the causeof
yawning, of the cause of sneezing, of the cause of limbs gettingasleep.Of the cause of losing sensibility in any limb.Of
 the cause of tickling.Of the cause of lust and other appetites of the body, of the causeof urine and also of all the na
tural excretions of the body.[Footnote: By the side of this text stands the pen and ink drawingreproduced on Pl. CVIII,
No. 4; a skull with indications of theveins in the fleshy covering.]815.The tears come from the heart and not from the b
rain.Define all the parts, of which the body is composed, beginning withthe skin with its outer cuticle which is often c
happed by theinfluence of the sun.II.ZOOLOGY AND COMPARATIVE ANATOMY.The divisions of the animal kingdom (816. 817).816.
_Man_. The description of man, which includes that of such creaturesas are of almost the same species, as Apes, Monkeys
and the like,which are many,_The Lion_ and its kindred, as Panthers. [Footnote 3: _Leonza_--wildcat? "_Secondo alcuni, l
o stesso che Leonessa; e secondo altri conpiu certezza, lo stesso che Pantera_" FANFANI, _Vocabolario_ page858.] Wildcat
s (?) Tigers, Leopards, Wolfs, Lynxes, Spanish cats,common cats and the like._The Horse_ and its kindred, as Mule, Ass a
nd the like, with incisorteeth above and below._The Bull_ and its allies with horns and without upper incisors asthe Buf
falo, Stag Fallow Deer, Wild Goat, Swine, Goat, wild GoatsMuskdeers, Chamois, Giraffe.817.Describe the various forms of
the intestines of the human species,of apes and such like. Then, in what way the leonine species differ,and then the bov
ine, and finally birds; and arrange this descriptionafter the manner of a disquisition.Miscellaneous notes on the study
of Zoology (818-821).818.Procure the placenta of a calf when it is born and observe the formof the cotyledons, if their
cotyledons are male or female.819.Describe the tongue of the woodpecker and the jaw of the crocodile.820.Of the flight o
f the 4th kind of butterflies that consume wingedants. Of the three principal positions of the wings of birds indownward
 flight.[Footnote: A passing allusion is all I can here permit myself toLeonardo's elaborate researches into the flight
of birds. Comparethe observations on this subject in the Introduction to sectionXVIII and in the Bibliography of Manuscr
ipts at the end of thework.]821.Of the way in which the tail of a fish acts in propelling the fish;as in the eel, snake
and leech.[Footnote: A sketch of a fish, swimming upwards is in the original,inserted above this text.--Compare No. 1114
.]Comparative study of the structure of bones and of the action ofmuscles (822-826).822.OF THE PALM OF THE HAND.Then I w
ill discourse of the hands of each animal to show in whatthey vary; as in the bear, which has the ligatures of the sinew
s ofthe toes joined above the instep.823.A second demonstration inserted between anatomy and [the treatiseon] the living
 being.You will represent here for a comparison, the legs of a frog, whichhave a great resemblance to the legs of man, b
oth in the bones andin the muscles. Then, in continuation, the hind legs of the hare,which are very muscular, with stron
g active muscles, because theyare not encumbered with fat.[Footnote: This text is written by the side of a drawing in bl
ackchalk of a nude male figure, but there is no connection between thesketch and the text.]824.Here I make a note to dem
onstrate the difference there is betweenman and the horse and in the same way with other animals. And firstI will begin
with the bones, and then will go on to all the muscleswhich spring from the bones without tendons and end in them in the
same way, and then go on to those which start with a single tendonat one end.[Footnote: See Pl. CVIII, No. 2.]825.Note o
n the bendings of joints and in what way the flesh grows uponthem in their flexions or extensions; and of this most impo
rtantstudy write a separate treatise: in the description of the movementsof animals with four feet; among which is man,
who likewise in hisinfancy crawls on all fours.826.OF THE WAY OF WALKING IN MAN.The walking of man is always after the u
niversal manner of walkingin animals with 4 legs, inasmuch as just as they move their feetcrosswise after the manner of
a horse in trotting, so man moves his4 limbs crosswise; that is, if he puts forward his right foot inwalking he puts for
ward, with it, his left arm and vice versa,invariably.III.PHYSIOLOGY.Comparative study of the organs of sense in men and
 animals.827.I have found that in the composition of the human body as comparedwith the bodies of animals the organs of
sense are duller andcoarser. Thus it is composed of less ingenious instruments, and ofspaces less capacious for receivin
g the faculties of sense. I haveseen in the Lion tribe that the sense of smell is connected withpart of the substance of
 the brain which comes down the nostrils,which form a spacious receptacle for the sense of smell, whichenters by a great
 number of cartilaginous vesicles with severalpassages leading up to where the brain, as before said, comes down.The eye
s in the Lion tribe have a large part of the head for theirsockets and the optic nerves communicate at once with the bra
in; butthe contrary is to be seen in man, for the sockets of the eyes arebut a small part of the head, and the optic ner
ves are very fine andlong and weak, and by the weakness of their action we see by day butbadly at night, while these ani
mals can see as well at night as byday. The proof that they can see is that they prowl for prey atnight and sleep by day
, as nocturnal birds do also.Advantages in the structure of the eye in certain animals (828-831).828.Every object we see
 will appear larger at midnight than at midday,and larger in the morning than at midday.This happens because the pupil o
f the eye is much smaller at middaythan at any other time.In proportion as the eye or the pupil of the owl is larger inp
roportion to the animal than that of man, so much the more lightcan it see at night than man can; hence at midday it can
 see nothingif its pupil does not diminish; and, in the same way, at nightthings look larger to it than by day.829.OF TH
E EYES IN ANIMALS.The eyes of all animals have their pupils adapted to dilate anddiminish of their own accord in proport
ion to the greater or lesslight of the sun or other luminary. But in birds the variation ismuch greater; and particularl
y in nocturnal birds, such as hornedowls, and in the eyes of one species of owl; in these the pupildilates in such away
as to occupy nearly the whole eye, ordiminishes to the size of a grain of millet, and always preservesthe circular form.
 But in the Lion tribe, as panthers, pards,ounces, tigers, lynxes, Spanish cats and other similar animals thepupil dimin
ishes from the perfect circle to the figure of a pointedoval such as is shown in the margin. But man having a weaker sig
htthan any other animal is less hurt by a very strong light and hispupil increases but little in dark places; but in the
 eyes of thesenocturnal animals, the horned owl--a bird which is the largest ofall nocturnal birds--the power of vision
increases so much that inthe faintest nocturnal light (which we call darkness) it sees withmuch more distinctness than w
e do in the splendour of noon day, atwhich time these birds remain hidden in dark holes; or if indeedthey are compelled
to come out into the open air lighted up by thesun, they contract their pupils so much that their power of sightdiminish
es together with the quantity of light admitted.Study the anatomy of various eyes and see which are the muscleswhich ope
n and close the said pupils of the eyes of animals.[Footnote: Compare No. 24, lines 8 and fol.]830._a b n_ is the membra
ne which closes the eye from below, upwards,with an opaque film, _c n b_ encloses the eye in front and behindwith a tran
sparent membrane.It closes from below, upwards, because it [the eye] comes downwards.When the eye of a bird closes with
its two lids, the first to closeis the nictitating membrane which closes from the lacrymal duct overto the outer corner
of the eye; and the outer lid closes from belowupwards, and these two intersecting motions begin first from thelacrymato
ry duct, because we have already seen that in front andbelow birds are protected and use only the upper portion of the e
yefrom fear of birds of prey which come down from above and behind;and they uncover first the membrane from the outer co
rner, becauseif the enemy comes from behind, they have the power of escaping tothe front; and again the muscle called th
e nictitating membrane istransparent, because, if the eye had not such a screen, they couldnot keep it open against the
wind which strikes against the eye inthe rush of their rapid flight. And the pupil of the eye dilates andcontracts as it
 sees a less or greater light, that is to say intensebrilliancy.831.If at night your eye is placed between the light and
 the eye of acat, it will see the eye look like fire.Remarks on the organs of speech(832. 833).832._a  e  i  o  uba be b
i bo buca ce ci co cuda de di do dufa fe fi fo fuga ge gi go gula le li lo luma me mi mo muna ne ni no nupa pe pi po puq
a qe qi qo qura re ri ro rusa se si so suta te ti to tu_The tongue is found to have 24 muscles which correspond to the s
ixmuscles which compose the portion of the tongue which moves in themouth.And when _a o u_ are spoken with a clear and r
apid pronunciation, itis necessary, in order to pronounce continuously, without any pausebetween, that the opening of th
e lips should close by degrees; thatis, they are wide apart in saying _a_, closer in saying _o_, andmuch closer still to
 pronounce _u_.It may be shown how all the vowels are pronounced with the farthestportion of the false palate which is a
bove the epiglottis.833.If you draw in breath by the nose and send it out by the mouth youwill hear the sound made by th
e division that is the membrane in[Footnote 5: The text here breaks off.]...On the conditions of sight (834. 835).834.OF
 THE NATURE OF SIGHT.I say that sight is exercised by all animals, by the medium oflight; and if any one adduces, as aga
inst this, the sight ofnocturnal animals, I must say that this in the same way is subjectto the very same natural laws.
For it will easily be understood thatthe senses which receive the images of things do not project fromthemselves any vis
ual virtue [Footnote 4: Compare No. 68.]. On thecontrary the atmospheric medium which exists between the object andthe s
ense incorporates in itself the figure of things, and by itscontact with the sense transmits the object to it. If theobj
ect--whether by sound or by odour--presents its spiritual forceto the ear or the nose, then light is not required and do
es not act.The forms of objects do not send their images into the air if theyare not illuminated [8]; and the eye being
thus constituted cannotreceive that from the air, which the air does not possess, althoughit touches its surface. If you
 choose to say that there are manyanimals that prey at night, I answer that when the little lightwhich suffices the natu
re of their eyes is wanting, they directthemselves by their strong sense of hearing and of smell, which arenot impeded b
y the darkness, and in which they are very far superiorto man. If you make a cat leap, by daylight, among a quantity ofj
ars and crocks you will see them remain unbroken, but if you do thesame at night, many will be broken. Night birds do no
t fly aboutunless the moon shines full or in part; rather do they feed betweensun-down and the total darkness of the nig
ht.[Footnote 8: See No. 58-67.]No body can be apprehended without light and shade, and light andshade are caused by ligh
t.835.WHY MEN ADVANCED IN AGE SEE BETTER AT A DISTANCE.Sight is better from a distance than near in those men who areadv
ancing in age, because the same object transmits a smallerimpression of itself to the eye when it is distant than when i
t isnear.The seat of the common sense.836.The Common Sense, is that which judges of things offered to it bythe other sen
ses. The ancient speculators have concluded that thatpart of man which constitutes his judgment is caused by a centralor
gan to which the other five senses refer everything by means ofimpressibility; and to this centre they have given the na
me CommonSense. And they say that this Sense is situated in the centre of thehead between Sensation and Memory. And this
 name of Common Sense isgiven to it solely because it is the common judge of all the otherfive senses _i.e._ Seeing, Hea
ring, Touch, Taste and Smell. ThisCommon Sense is acted upon by means of Sensation which is placed asa medium between it
 and the senses. Sensation is acted upon by meansof the images of things presented to it by the external instruments,tha
t is to say the senses which are the medium between externalthings and Sensation. In the same way the senses are acted u
pon byobjects. Surrounding things transmit their images to the senses andthe senses transfer them to the Sensation. Sens
ation sends them tothe Common Sense, and by it they are stamped upon the memory and arethere more or less retained accor
ding to the importance or force ofthe impression. That sense is most rapid in its function which isnearest to the sensit
ive medium and the eye, being the highest isthe chief of the others. Of this then only we will speak, and theothers we w
ill leave in order not to make our matter too long.Experience tells us that the eye apprehends ten different natures oft
hings, that is: Light and Darkness, one being the cause of theperception of the nine others, and the other its absence:-
- Colourand substance, form and place, distance and nearness, motion andstillness [Footnote 15: Compare No. 23.].On the
origin of the soul.837.Though human ingenuity may make various inventions which, by thehelp of various machines answerin
g the same end, it will neverdevise any inventions more beautiful, nor more simple, nor more tothe purpose than Nature d
oes; because in her inventions nothing iswanting, and nothing is superfluous, and she needs no counterpoisewhen she make
s limbs proper for motion in the bodies of animals. Butshe puts into them the soul of the body, which forms them that is
the soul of the mother which first constructs in the womb the formof the man and in due time awakens the soul that is to
 inhabit it.And this at first lies dormant and under the tutelage of the soul ofthe mother, who nourishes and vivifies i
t by the umbilical vein,with all its spiritual parts, and this happens because thisumbilicus is joined to the placenta a
nd the cotyledons, by which thechild is attached to the mother. And these are the reason why awish, a strong craving or
a fright or any other mental suffering inthe mother, has more influence on the child than on the mother; forthere are ma
ny cases when the child loses its life from them, &c.This discourse is not in its place here, but will be wanted for the
one on the composition of animated bodies--and the rest of thedefinition of the soul I leave to the imaginations of fria
rs, thosefathers of the people who know all secrets by inspiration.[Footnote 57: _lettere incoronate_. By this term Leon
ardo probablyunderstands not the Bible only, but the works of the early Fathers,and all the books recognised as sacred b
y the Roman Church.] I leavealone the sacred books; for they are supreme truth.On the relations of the soul to the organ
s of sense.838.HOW THE FIVE SENSES ARE THE MINISTERS OF THE SOUL.The soul seems to reside in the judgment, and the judgm
ent wouldseem to be seated in that part where all the senses meet; and thisis called the Common Sense and is not all-per
vading throughout thebody, as many have thought. Rather is it entirely in one part.Because, if it were all-pervading and
 the same in every part, therewould have been no need to make the instruments of the senses meetin one centre and in one
 single spot; on the contrary it would havesufficed that the eye should fulfil the function of its sensation onits surfa
ce only, and not transmit the image of the things seen, tothe sense, by means of the optic nerves, so that the soul--for
 thereason given above-- may perceive it in the surface of the eye. Inthe same way as to the sense of hearing, it would
have sufficed ifthe voice had merely sounded in the porous cavity of the induratedportion of the temporal bone which lie
s within the ear, withoutmaking any farther transit from this bone to the common sense, wherethe voice confers with and
discourses to the common judgment. Thesense of smell, again, is compelled by necessity to refer itself tothat same judgm
ent. Feeling passes through the perforated cords andis conveyed to this common sense. These cords diverge with infiniter
amifications into the skin which encloses the members of the bodyand the viscera. The perforated cords convey volition a
nd sensationto the subordinate limbs. These cords and the nerves direct themotions of the muscles and sinews, between wh
ich they are placed;these obey, and this obedience takes effect by reducing theirthickness; for in swelling, their lengt
h is reduced, and the nervesshrink which are interwoven among the particles of the limbs; beingextended to the tips of t
he fingers, they transmit to the sense theobject which they touch.The nerves with their muscles obey the tendons as sold
iers obey theofficers, and the tendons obey the Common [central] Sense as theofficers obey the general. [27] Thus the jo
int of the bones obeysthe nerve, and the nerve the muscle, and the muscle the tendon andthe tendon the Common Sense. And
 the Common Sense is the seat of thesoul [28], and memory is its ammunition, and the impressibility isits referendary si
nce the sense waits on the soul and not the soulon the sense. And where the sense that ministers to the soul is notat th
e service of the soul, all the functions of that sense are alsowanting in that man's life, as is seen in those born mute
 and blind.[Footnote: The peculiar use of the words _nervo_, _muscolo_,_corda_, _senso comune_, which are here literally
 rendered by nerve,muscle cord or tendon and Common Sense may be understood from lines27 and 28.]On involuntary muscular
 action.839.HOW THE NERVES SOMETIMES ACT OF THEMSELVES WITHOUT ANY COMMANDS FROMTHE OTHER FUNCTIONS OF THE SOUL.This is
most plainly seen; for you will see palsied and shiveringpersons move, and their trembling limbs, as their head and hand
s,quake without leave from their soul and their soul with all itspower cannot prevent their members from trembling. The
same thinghappens in falling sickness, or in parts that have been cut off, asin the tails of lizards. The idea or imagin
ation is the helm andguiding-rein of the senses, because the thing conceived of moves thesense. Pre-imagining, is imagin
ing the things that are to be.Post-imagining, is imagining the things that are past.Miscellaneous physiological observat
ions (840-842).840.There are four Powers: memory and intellect, desire andcovetousness. The two first are mental and the
 others sensual. Thethree senses: sight, hearing and smell cannot well be prevented;touch and taste not at all. Smell is
 connected with taste in dogsand other gluttonous animals.841.I reveal to men the origin of the first, or perhaps second
 cause oftheir existence.842.Lust is the cause of generation.Appetite is the support of life. Fear or timidity is thepro
longation of life and preservation of its instruments.The laws of nutrition and the support of life (843-848).843.HOW TH
E BODY OF ANIMALS IS CONSTANTLY DYING AND BEING RENEWED.The body of any thing whatever that takes nourishment constantly
dies and is constantly renewed; because nourishment can only enterinto places where the former nourishment has expired,
and if it hasexpired it no longer has life. And if you do not supply nourishmentequal to the nourishment which is gone,
life will fail in vigour,and if you take away this nourishment, the life is entirelydestroyed. But if you restore as muc
h is destroyed day by day, thenas much of the life is renewed as is consumed, just as the flame ofthe candle is fed by t
he nourishment afforded by the liquid of thiscandle, which flame continually with a rapid supply restores to itfrom belo
w as much as is consumed in dying above: and from abrilliant light is converted in dying into murky smoke; and thisdeath
 is continuous, as the smoke is continuous; and the continuanceof the smoke is equal to the continuance of the nourishme
nt, and inthe same instant all the flame is dead and all regenerated,simultaneously with the movement of its own nourish
ment.844.King of the animals--as thou hast described him--I should rather sayking of the beasts, thou being the greatest
--because thou hastspared slaying them, in order that they may give thee their childrenfor the benefit of the gullet, of
 which thou hast attempted to makea sepulchre for all animals; and I would say still more, if it wereallowed me to speak
 the entire truth [5]. But we do not go outsidehuman matters in telling of one supreme wickedness, which does nothappen
among the animals of the earth, inasmuch as among them arefound none who eat their own kind, unless through want of sens
e (fewindeed among them, and those being mothers, as with men, albeit theybe not many in number); and this happens only
among the rapaciousanimals, as with the leonine species, and leopards, panthers lynxes,cats and the like, who sometimes
eat their children; but thou,besides thy children devourest father, mother, brothers and friends;nor is this enough for
thee, but thou goest to the chase on theislands of others, taking other men and these half-naked, the ...and the ... tho
u fattenest, and chasest them down thy ownthroat[18]; now does not nature produce enough simples, for thee tosatisfy thy
self? and if thou art not content with simples, canstthou not by the mixture of them make infinite compounds, as Platina
wrote[Footnote 21: _Come scrisse il Platina_ (Bartolomeo Sacchi, afamous humanist). The Italian edition of his treatise
_De artecoquinaria_, was published under the title _De la honestravoluptate, e valetudine, Venezia_ 1487.], and other au
thors onfeeding?[Footnote: We are led to believe that Leonardo himself was avegetarian from the following interesting pa
ssage in the first ofAndrea Corsali's letters to Giuliano de'Medici: _Alcuni gentilichiamati Guzzarati non si cibano di
cosa, alcuna che tenga sangue,ne fra essi loro consentono che si noccia ad alcuna cosa animata,come il nostro Leonardo d
a Vinci_.5-18. Amerigo Vespucci, with whom Leonardo was personallyacquainted, writes in his second letter to Pietro Sode
rini, aboutthe inhabitants of the Canary Islands after having stayed there in1503: "_Hanno una scelerata liberta di viue
re; ... si cibano dicarne humana, di maniera che il padre magia il figliuolo, etall'incontro il figliuolo il padre secon
do che a caso e per sorteauiene. Io viddi un certo huomo sceleratissimo che si vantaua, et siteneua a non piccola gloria
 di hauer mangiato piu di trecentohuomini. Viddi anche vna certa citta, nella quale io dimorai forseventisette giorni, d
oue le carni humane, hauendole salate, eranappicate alli traui, si come noi alli traui di cucina_ _appicchiamole carni d
i cinghali secche al sole o al fumo, et massimamentesalsiccie, et altre simil cose: anzi si marauigliauano gradem eteche
 noi non magiaissimo della carne de nemici, le quali diconomuouere appetito, et essere di marauiglioso sapore, et le lod
anocome cibi soaui et delicati (Lettere due di Amerigo VespucciFiorentino drizzate al magnifico Pietro Soderini, Gonfalo
niere dellaeccelsa Republica di Firenze_; various editions).]845.Our life is made by the death of others.In dead matter
insensible life remains, which, reunited to thestomachs of living beings, resumes life, both sensual andintellectual.846
.Here nature appears with many animals to have been rather a cruelstepmother than a mother, and with others not a stepmo
ther, but amost tender mother.847.Man and animals are really the passage and the conduit of food, thesepulchre of animal
s and resting place of the dead, one causing thedeath of the other, making themselves the covering for thecorruption of
other dead [bodies].On the circulation of the blood (848-850).848.Death in old men, when not from fever, is caused by th
e veins whichgo from the spleen to the valve of the liver, and which thicken somuch in the walls that they become closed
 up and leave no passagefor the blood that nourishes it.[6]The incessant current of the blood through the veins makes th
eseveins thicken and become callous, so that at last they close up andprevent the passage of the blood.849.The waters re
turn with constant motion from the lowest depths of thesea to the utmost height of the mountains, not obeying the nature
 ofheavier bodies; and in this they resemble the blood of animatedbeings which always moves from the sea of the heart an
d flowstowards the top of the head; and here it may burst a vein, as may beseen when a vein bursts in the nose; all the
blood rises from belowto the level of the burst vein. When the water rushes out from theburst vein in the earth, it obey
s the law of other bodies that areheavier than the air since it always seeks low places.[Footnote: From this passage it
is quite plain that Leonardo had notmerely a general suspicion of the circulation of the blood but avery clear conceptio
n of it. Leonardo's studies on the muscles ofthe heart are to be found in the MS. W. An. III. but no informationabout th
em has hitherto been made public. The limits of my plan inthis work exclude all purely anatomical writings, therefore on
ly avery brief excerpt from this note book can be given here. WILLIAMHARVEY (born 1578 and Professor of Anatomy at Cambr
idge from 1615)is always considered to have been the discoverer of the circulationof the blood. He studied medicine at P
adua in 1598, and in 1628brought out his memorable and important work: _De motu cordis etsanguinis_.]850.That the blood
which returns when the heart opens again is not thesame as that which closes the valves of the heart.Some notes on medic
ine (851-855).851.Make them give you the definition and remedies for the case ... andyou will see that men are selected
to be doctors for diseases theydo not know.852.A remedy for scratches taught me by the Herald to the King ofFrance. 4 ou
nces of virgin wax, 4 ounces of colophony, 2 ounces ofincense. Keep each thing separate; and melt the wax, and then put
inthe incense and then the colophony, make a mixture of it and put iton the sore place.853.Medicine is the restoration o
f discordant elements; sickness is thediscord of the elements infused into the living body.854.Those who are annoyed by
sickness at sea should drink extract ofwormwood.855.To keep in health, this rule is wise: Eat only when you want andreli
sh food. Chew thoroughly that it may do you good. Have it wellcooked, unspiced and undisguised. He who takes medicine is
 illadvised.[Footnote: This appears to be a sketch for a poem.]856.I teach you to preserve your health; and in this you
will succedbetter in proportion as you shun physicians, because their medicinesare the work of alchemists.[Footnote: Thi
s passage is written on the back of the drawing Pl.CVIII. Compare also No. 1184.]_XV_._Astronomy_._Ever since the public
ation by Venturi in_ 1797 _and Libri in_ 1840_of some few passages of Leonardo's astronomical notes, scientificastronome
rs have frequently expressed the opinion, that they musthave been based on very important discoveries, and that the grea
tpainter also deserved a conspicuous place in the history of thisscience. In the passages here printed, a connected view
 is given ofhis astronomical studies as they lie scattered through themanuscripts, which have come down to us. Unlike hi
s other purelyscientific labours, Leonardo devotes here a good deal of attentionto the opinions of the ancients, though
he does not follow thepractice universal in his day of relying on them as authorities; heonly quotes them, as we shall s
ee, in order to refute theirarguments. His researches throughout have the stamp of independentthought. There is nothing
in these writings to lead us to supposethat they were merely an epitome of the general learning common tothe astronomers
 of the period. As early as in the XIVth centurythere were chairs of astronomy in the universities of Padua andBologna,
but so late as during the entire XVIth century Astronomyand Astrology were still closely allied.__It is impossible now t
o decide whether Leonardo, when living inFlorence, became acquainted in his youth with the doctrines of PaoloToscanelli
the great astronomer and mathematician (died_ 1482_), ofwhose influence and teaching but little is now known, beyond the
fact that he advised and encouraged Columbus to carry out hisproject of sailing round the world. His name is nowhere men
tioned byLeonardo, and from the dates of the manuscripts from which the textson astronomy are taken, it seems highly pro
bable that Leonardodevoted his attention to astronomical studies less in his youth thanin his later years. It was eviden
tly his purpose to treat ofAstronomy in a connected form and in a separate work (see thebeginning of Nos._ 866 _and_ 892
_; compare also No._ 1167_). It isquite in accordance with his general scientific thoroughness that heshould propose to
write a special treatise on Optics as anintroduction to Astronomy (see Nos._ 867 _and_ 877_). Some of thechapters belong
ing to this Section bear the title "Prospettiva"_(see Nos._ 869 _and_ 870_), this being the term universally appliedat t
he time to Optics as well as Perspective (see Vol. I, p._ 10,_note to No._ 13, _l._ 10_)_._At the beginning of the XVIth
 century the Ptolemaic theory of theuniverse was still universally accepted as the true one, andLeonardo conceives of th
e earth as fixed, with the moon and sunrevolving round it, as they are represented in the diagram to No._897. _He does n
ot go into any theory of the motions of the planets;with regard to these and the fixed stars he only investigates thephe
nomena of their luminosity. The spherical form of the earth hetakes for granted as an axiom from the first, and he antic
ipatesNewton by pointing out the universality of Gravitation not merely inthe earth, but even in the moon. Although his
acute research intothe nature of the moon's light and the spots on the moon did notbring to light many results of lastin
g importance beyond making itevident that they were a refutation of the errors of hiscontemporaries, they contain variou
s explanations of facts whichmodern science need not modify in any essential point, anddiscoveries which history has hit
herto assigned to a very much laterdate_._The ingenious theory by which he tries to explain the nature ofwhat is known a
s earth shine, the reflection of the sun's rays bythe earth towards the moon, saying that it is a peculiar refraction,or
iginating in the innumerable curved surfaces of the waves of thesea may be regarded as absurd; but it must not be forgot
ten that hehad no means of detecting the fundamental error on which he basedit, namely: the assumption that the moon was
 at a relatively shortdistance from the earth. So long as the motion of the earth roundthe sun remained unknown, it was
of course impossible to form anyestimate of the moon's distance from the earth by a calculation ofits parallax_._Before
the discovery of the telescope accurate astronomicalobservations were only possible to a very limited extent. It wouldap
pear however from certain passages in the notes here printed forthe first time, that Leonardo was in a position to study
 the spotsin the moon more closely than he could have done with the unaidedeye. So far as can be gathered from the myste
rious language in whichthe description of his instrument is wrapped, he made use ofmagnifying glasses; these do not howe
ver seem to have beenconstructed like a telescope--telescopes were first made about_1600. _As LIBRI pointed out_ (Histoi
re des Sciences mathematiquesIII, 101) _Fracastoro of Verona_ (1473-1553) _succeeded inmagnifying the moon's face by an
arrangement of lenses (compare No._910, _note), and this gives probability to Leonardo's invention at anot much earlier
date._I.THE EARTH AS A PLANET.The earth's place in the universe (857. 858).857.The equator, the line of the horizon, the
 ecliptic, the meridian:These lines are those which in all their parts are equidistant fromthe centre of the globe.858.T
he earth is not in the centre of the Sun's orbit nor at the centreof the universe, but in the centre of its companion el
ements, andunited with them. And any one standing on the moon, when it and thesun are both beneath us, would see this ou
r earth and the element ofwater upon it just as we see the moon, and the earth would light itas it lights us.The fundame
ntal laws of the solar system (859-864).859.Force arises from dearth or abundance; it is the child of physicalmotion, an
d the grand-child of spiritual motion, and the mother andorigin of gravity. Gravity is limited to the elements of water
andearth; but this force is unlimited, and by it infinite worlds mightbe moved if instruments could be made by which the
 force could begenerated.Force, with physical motion, and gravity, with resistance are thefour external powers on which
all actions of mortals depend.Force has its origin in spiritual motion; and this motion, flowingthrough the limbs of sen
tient animals, enlarges their muscles. Beingenlarged by this current the muscles are shrunk in length andcontract the te
ndons which are connected with them, and this is thecause of the force of the limbs in man.The quality and quantity of t
he force of a man are able to givebirth to other forces, which will be proportionally greater as themotions produced by
them last longer.[Footnote: Only part of this passage belongs, strictly speaking, tothis section. The principle laid dow
n in the second paragraph ismore directly connected with the notes given in the precedingsection on Physiology.]860.Why
does not the weight _o_ remain in its place? It does not remainbecause it has no resistance. Where will it move to? It w
ill movetowards the centre [of gravity]. And why by no other line? Because aweight which has no support falls by the sho
rtest road to the lowestpoint which is the centre of the world. And why does the weight knowhow to find it by so short a
 line? Because it is not independant anddoes not move about in various directions.[Footnote: This text and the sketch be
longing to it, are reproducedon Pl. CXXI.]861.Let the earth turn on which side it may the surface of the waterswill neve
r move from its spherical form, but will always remainequidistant from the centre of the globe.Granting that the earth m
ight be removed from the centre of theglobe, what would happen to the water?It would remain in a sphere round that centr
e equally thick, but thesphere would have a smaller diameter than when it enclosed theearth.[Footnote: Compare No. 896,
lines 48-64; and No. 936.]862.Supposing the earth at our antipodes which supports the ocean wereto rise and stand uncove
red, far out of the sea, but remainingalmost level, by what means afterwards, in the course of time, wouldmountains and
vallies be formed?And the rocks with their various strata?863.Each man is always in the middle of the surface of the ear
th andunder the zenith of his own hemisphere, and over the centre of theearth.864.Mem.: That I must first show the dista
nce of the sun from the earth;and, by means of a ray passing through a small hole into a darkchamber, detect its real si
ze; and besides this, by means of theaqueous sphere calculate the size of the globe ...Here it will be shown, that when
the sun is in the meridian of ourhemisphere [Footnote 10: _Antipodi orientali cogli occidentali_. Theword _Antipodes_ do
es not here bear its literal sense, but--as wemay infer from the simultaneous reference to inhabitants of theNorth and S
outh-- is used as meaning men living at a distance of 90degrees from the zenith of the rational horizon of each observer
.],the antipodes to the East and to the West, alike, and at the sametime, see the sun mirrored in their waters; and the
same is equallytrue of the arctic and antarctic poles, if indeed they areinhabited.How to prove that the earth is a plan
et (865-867).865.That the earth is a star.866.In your discourse you must prove that the earth is a star much likethe moo
n, and the glory of our universe; and then you must treat ofthe size of various stars, according to the authors.867.THE
METHOD OF PROVING THAT THE EARTH IS A STAR.First describe the eye; then show how the twinkling of a star isreally in the
 eye and why one star should twinkle more than another,and how the rays from the stars originate in the eye; and add, th
atif the twinkling of the stars were really in the stars --as it seemsto be--that this twinkling appears to be an extens
ion as great asthe diameter of the body of the star; therefore, the star beinglarger than the earth, this motion effecte
d in an instant would be arapid doubling of the size of the star. Then prove that the surfaceof the air where it lies co
ntiguous to fire, and the surface of thefire where it ends are those into which the solar rays penetrate,and transmit th
e images of the heavenly bodies, large when theyrise, and small, when they are on the meridian. Let _a_ be the earthand
_n d m_ the surface of the air in contact with the sphere offire; _h f g_ is the orbit of the moon or, if you please, of
 thesun; then I say that when the sun appears on the horizon _g_, itsrays are seen passing through the surface of the ai
r at a slantingangle, that is _o m_; this is not the case at _d k_. And so itpasses through a greater mass of air; all o
f _e m_ is a denseratmosphere.868.Beyond the sun and us there is darkness and so the air appears blue.[Footnote: Compare
 Vol. I, No. 301.]869.PERSPECTIVE.It is possible to find means by which the eye shall not see remoteobjects as much dimi
nished as in natural perspective, whichdiminishes them by reason of the convexity of the eye whichnecessarily intersects
, at its surface, the pyramid of every imageconveyed to the eye at a right angle on its spherical surface. Butby the met
hod I here teach in the margin [9] these pyramids areintersected at right angles close to the surface of the pupil. Thec
onvex pupil of the eye can take in the whole of our hemisphere,while this will show only a single star; but where many s
mall starstransmit their images to the surface of the pupil those stars areextremely small; here only one star is seen b
ut it will be large.And so the moon will be seen larger and its spots of a more definedform [Footnote 20 and fol.: Teles
copes were not in use till a centurylater. Compare No. 910 and page 136.]. You must place close to theeye a glass filled
 with the water of which mention is made in number4 of Book 113 "On natural substances" [Footnote 23: _libro_ 113.This i
s perhaps the number of a book in some library catalogue. Butit may refer, on the other hand, to one of the 120 Books me
ntionedin No. 796. l. 84.]; for this water makes objects which are enclosedin balls of crystalline glass appear free fro
m the glass.OF THE EYE.Among the smaller objects presented to the pupil of the eye, thatwhich is closest to it, will be
least appreciable to the eye. And atthe same time, the experiments here made with the power of sight,show that it is not
 reduced to speck if the &c. [32][Footnote 32:Compare with this the passage in Vol. I, No. 52, written abouttwenty years
 earlier.].Read in the margin.[34]Those objects are seen largest which come to the eye at thelargest angles.But the imag
es of the objects conveyed to the pupil of the eye aredistributed to the pupil exactly as they are distributed in the ai
r:and the proof of this is in what follows; that when we look at thestarry sky, without gazing more fixedly at one star
than another,the sky appears all strewn with stars; and their proportions to theeye are the same as in the sky and likew
ise the spaces between them[61].[Footnote: 9. 32. _in margine:_ lines 34-61 are, in the original,written on the margin a
nd above them is the diagram to whichLeonardo seems to refer here.]870.PERSPECTIVE.Among objects moved from the eye at e
qual distance, that undergoesleast diminution which at first was most remote.When various objects are removed at equal d
istances farther fromtheir original position, that which was at first the farthest fromthe eye will diminish least. And
the proportion of the diminutionwill be in proportion to the relative distance of the objects fromthe eye before they we
re removed.That is to say in the object _t_ and the object _e_ the proportionof their distances from the eye _a_ is quin
tuple. I remove each fromits place and set it farther from the eye by one of the 5 parts intowhich the proposition is di
vided. Hence it happens that the nearestto the eye has doubled the distance and according to the lastproposition but one
 of this, is diminished by the half of its wholesize; and the body _e_, by the same motion, is diminished 1/5 of itswhol
e size. Therefore, by that same last proposition but one, thatwhich is said in this last proposition is true; and this I
 say ofthe motions of the celestial bodies which are more distant by 3500miles when setting than when overhead, and yet
do not increase ordiminish in any sensible degree.871._a b_ is the aperture through which the sun passes, and if you cou
ldmeasure the size of the solar rays at _n m_, you could accuratelytrace the real lines of the convergence of the solar
rays, themirror being at _a b_, and then show the reflected rays at equalangles to _n m_; but, as you want to have them
at _n m_, take themat the. inner side of the aperture at cd, where they maybe measuredat the spot where the solar rays f
all. Then place your mirror at thedistance _a b_, making the rays _d b_, _c a_ fall and then bereflected at equal angles
 towards _c d_; and this is the bestmethod, but you must use this mirror always in the same month, andthe same day, and
hour and instant, and this will be better than atno fixed time because when the sun is at a certain distance itproduces
a certain pyramid of rays.872._a_, the side of the body in light and shade _b_, faces the wholeportion of the hemisphere
 bed _e f_, and does not face any part ofthe darkness of the earth. And the same occurs at the point _o_;therefore the s
pace a _o_ is throughout of one and the samebrightness, and s faces only four degrees of the hemisphere _d e f gh_, and
also the whole of the earth _s h_, which will render itdarker; and how much must be demonstrated by calculation. [Footno
te:This passage, which has perhaps a doubtful right to its place inthis connection, stands in the Manuscript between tho
se given inVol. I as No. 117 and No. 427.]873.THE REASON OF THE INCREASED SIZE OF THE SUN IN THE WEST.Some mathematician
s explain that the sun looks larger as it sets,because the eye always sees it through a denser atmosphere, allegingthat
objects seen through mist or through water appear larger. Tothese I reply: No; because objects seen through a mist are s
imilarin colour to those at a distance; but not being similarly diminishedthey appear larger. Again, nothing increases i
n size in smoothwater; and the proof of this may be seen by throwing a light on aboard placed half under water. But the
reason why the sun lookslarger is that every luminous body appears larger in proportion asit is more remote. [Footnote:
Lines 5 and 6 are thus rendered by M.RAVAISSON in his edition of MS. A. "_De meme, aucune chose ne croitdans l'eau plane
, et tu en feras l'experience_ en calquant un aissous l'eau."--Compare the diagrams in Vol. I, p. 114.]On the luminosity
 of the Earth in the universal space (874-878).874.In my book I propose to show, how the ocean and the other seas must,b
y means of the sun, make our world shine with the appearance of amoon, and to the remoter worlds it looks like a star; a
nd this Ishall prove.Show, first that every light at a distance from the eye throws outrays which appear to increase the
 size of the luminous body; andfrom this it follows that 2 ...[Footnote 10: Here the text breaksoff; lines 11 and fol. a
re written in the margin.].[11]The moon is cold and moist. Water is cold and moist. Thus ourseas must appear to the moon
 as the moon does to us.875.The waves in water magnify the image of an object reflected in it.Let _a_ be the sun, and _n
 m_ the ruffled water, _b_ the image ofthe sun when the water is smooth. Let _f_ be the eye which sees theimage in all t
he waves included within the base of the triangle _c ef_. Now the sun reflected in the unruffled surface occupied thespa
ce _c d_, while in the ruffled surface it covers all the wateryspace _c e_ (as is proved in the 4th of my "Perspective")
 [Footnote9: _Nel quarto della mia prospettiva_. If this reference is to thediagrams accompanying the text--as is usual
with Leonardo--and notto some particular work, the largest of the diagrams here given mustbe meant. It is the lowest and
 actually the fifth, but he would havecalled it the fourth, for the text here given is preceded on thesame page of the m
anuscript by a passage on whirlpools, with thediagram belonging to it also reproduced here. The words _della miaprospett
iva_ may therefore indicate that the diagram to thepreceding chapter treating on a heterogeneal subject is to beexcluded
. It is a further difficulty that this diagram belongsproperly to lines 9-10 and not to the preceding sentence. Therefle
ction of the sun in water is also discussed in the Theoreticalpart of the Book on Painting; see Vol. I, No. 206, 207.] a
nd it willcover more of the water in proportion as the reflected image isremote from the eye [10].[Footnote: In the orig
inal sketch, inside the circle in the firstdiagram, is written _Sole_ (sun), and to the right of it _luna_(moon). Thus e
ither of these heavenly bodies may be supposed to fillthat space. Within the lower circle is written _simulacro_ (image)
.In the two next diagrams at the spot here marked _L_ the word _Luna_is written, and in the last _sole_ is written in th
e top circle at_a_.]The image of the sun will be more brightly shown in small waves thanin large ones--and this is becau
se the reflections or images of thesun are more numerous in the small waves than in large ones, and themore numerous ref
lections of its radiance give a larger light thanthe fewer.Waves which intersect like the scales of a fir cone reflect t
heimage of the sun with the greatest splendour; and this is the casebecause the images are as many as the ridges of the
waves on whichthe sun shines, and the shadows between these waves are small andnot very dark; and the radiance of so man
y reflections togetherbecomes united in the image which is transmitted to the eye, so thatthese shadows are imperceptibl
e.That reflection of the sun will cover most space on the surface ofthe water which is most remote from the eye which se
es it.Let _a_ be the sun, _p q_ the reflection of the sun; _a b_ is thesurface of the water, in which the sun is mirrore
d, and _r_ the eyewhich sees this reflection on the surface of the water occupying thespace _o m_. _c_ is the eye at a g
reater distance from the surfaceof the water and also from the reflection; hence this reflectioncovers a larger space of
 water, by the distance between _n_ and _o_.876.It is impossible that the side of a spherical mirror, illuminated bythe
sun, should reflect its radiance unless this mirror wereundulating or filled with bubbles.You see here the sun which lig
hts up the moon, a spherical mirror,and all of its surface, which faces the sun is rendered radiant.Whence it may be con
cluded that what shines in the moon is waterlike that of our seas, and in waves as that is; and that portionwhich does n
ot shine consists of islands and terra firma.This diagram, of several spherical bodies interposed between the eyeand the
 sun, is given to show that, just as the reflection of thesun is seen in each of these bodies, in the same way that imag
e maybe seen in each curve of the waves of the sea; and as in these manyspheres many reflections of the sun are seen, so
 in many waves thereare many images, each of which at a great distance is much magnifiedto the eye. And, as this happens
 with each wave, the spacesinterposed between the waves are concealed; and, for this reason, itlooks as though the many
suns mirrored in the many waves were butone continuous sun; and the shadows,, mixed up with the luminousimages, render t
his radiance less brilliant than that of the sunmirrored in these waves.[Footnote: In the original, at letter _A_ in the
 diagram "_Sole_"(the sun) is written, and at _o_ "_occhio_" (the eye).]877.This will have before it the treatise on lig
ht and shade.The edges in the moon will be most strongly lighted and reflect mostlight, because, there, nothing will be
visible but the tops of thewaves of the water [Footnote 5: I have thought it unnecessary toreproduce the detailed explan
ation of the theory of reflection onwaves contained in the passage which follows this.].878.The sun will appear larger i
n moving water or on waves than in stillwater; an example is the light reflected on the strings of amonochord.II.THE SUN
.The question of the true and of the apparent size of the sun(879-884).879.IN PRAISE OF THE SUN.If you look at the stars
, cutting off the rays (as may be done bylooking through a very small hole made with the extreme point of avery fine nee
dle, placed so as almost to touch the eye), you willsee those stars so minute that it would seem as though nothing could
be smaller; it is in fact their great distance which is the reasonof their diminution, for many of them are very many ti
mes largerthan the star which is the earth with water. Now reflect what thisour star must look like at such a distance,
and then consider howmany stars might be added--both in longitude and latitude--betweenthose stars which are scattered o
ver the darkened sky. But I cannotforbear to condemn many of the ancients, who said that the sun wasno larger than it ap
pears; among these was Epicurus, and I believethat he founded his reason on the effects of a light placed in ouratmosphe
re equidistant from the centre of the earth. Any one lookingat it never sees it diminished in size at whatever distance;
 and therea-[Footnote 879-882: What Leonardo says of Epicurus-- who according toLEWIS, _The Astronomy of the ancients_,
and MADLER, _Geschichte derHimmelskunde_, did not devote much attention to the study ofcelestial phenomena--, he probabl
y derived from Book X of DiogenesLaertius, whose _Vitae Philosophorum_ was not printed in Greek till1533, but the Latin
translation appeared in 1475.]880.sons of its size and power I shall reserve for Book 4. But I wondergreatly that Socrat
es[Footnote 2: _Socrates;_ I have little light to throw on thisreference. Plato's Socrates himself declares on more than
 oneoccasion that in his youth he had turned his mind to the study ofcelestial phenomena (METEWPA) but not in his later
years (see G. C.LEWIS, _The Astronomy of the ancients_, page 109; MADLER,_Geschichte der Himmelskunde_, page 41). Here a
nd there in Plato'swritings we find incidental notes on the sun and other heavenlybodies. Leonardo may very well have kn
own of these, since the Latinversion by Ficinus was printed as early as 1491; indeed an undatededition exists which may
very likely have appeared between 1480--90.There is but one passage in Plato, Epinomis (p. 983) where he speaksof the ph
ysical properties of the sun and says that it is largerthan the earth.Aristotle who goes very fully into the subject say
s the same. Acomplete edition of Aristotele's works was first printed in Venice1495-98, but a Latin version of the Books
 _De Coelo et Mundo_ and_De Physica_ had been printed in Venice as early as in 1483 (H.MULLER-STRUBING).]should have dep
reciated that solar body, saying that it was of thenature of incandescent stone, and the one who opposed him as to thate
rror was not far wrong. But I only wish I had words to serve me toblame those who are fain to extol the worship of men m
ore than thatof the sun; for in the whole universe there is nowhere to be seen abody of greater magnitude and power than
 the sun. Its light giveslight to all the celestial bodies which are distributed throughoutthe universe; and from it des
cends all vital force, for the heatthat is in living beings comes from the soul [vital spark]; andthere is no other cent
re of heat and light in the universe as willbe shown in Book 4; and certainly those who have chosen to worshipmen as god
s--as Jove, Saturn, Mars and the like--have fallen intothe gravest error, seeing that even if a man were as large as our
earth, he would look no bigger than a little star which appears butas a speck in the universe; and seeing again that the
se men aremortal, and putrid and corrupt in their sepulchres.Marcellus [Footnote 23: I have no means of identifying _Mar
cello_who is named in the margin. It may be Nonius Marcellus, an obscureRoman Grammarian of uncertain date (between the
IInd and Vthcenturies A. C.) the author of the treatise _De compendiosa doctrinaper litteras ad filium_ in which he trea
ts _de rebus omnibus etquibusdam aliis_. This was much read in the middle ages. The _edittoprinceps_ is dated 1470 (H. M
ULLER-STRUBING).] and many otherspraise the sun.881.Epicurus perhaps saw the shadows cast by columns on the walls infron
t of them equal in diameter to the columns from which theshadows were cast; and the breadth of the shadows being paralle
lfrom beginning to end, he thought he might infer that the sun alsowas directly opposite to this parallel and that conse
quently itsbreadth was not greater than that of the column; not perceiving thatthe diminution in the shadow was insensib
ly slight by reason of theremoteness of the sun. If the sun were smaller than the earth, thestars on a great portion of
our hemisphere would have no light,which is evidence against Epicurus who says the sun is only as largeas it appears.[Fo
otnote: In the original the writing is across the diagram.]882.Epicurus says the sun is the size it looks. Hence as it l
ooks abouta foot across we must consider that to be its size; it would followthat when the moon eclipses the sun, the su
n ought not to appear thelarger, as it does. Then, the moon being smaller than the sun, themoon must be less than a foot
, and consequently when our worldeclipses the moon, it must be less than a foot by a finger'sbreadth; inasmuch as if the
 sun is a foot across, and our earthcasts a conical shadow on the moon, it is inevitable that theluminous cause of the c
one of shadow must be larger than the opaquebody which casts the cone of shadow.883.To measure how many times the diamet
er of the sun will go into itscourse in 24 hours.Make a circle and place it to face the south, after the manner of asund
ial, and place a rod in the middle in such a way as that itslength points to the centre of this circle, and mark the sha
dow castin the sunshine by this rod on the circumference of the circle, andthis shadow will be--let us say-- as broad as
 from _a_ to _n_. Nowmeasure how many times this shadow will go into this circumferenceof a circle, and that will give y
ou the number of times that thesolar body will go into its orbit in 24 hours. Thus you may seewhether Epicurus was [righ
t in] saying that the sun was only aslarge as it looked; for, as the apparent diameter of the sun isabout a foot, and as
 that sun would go a thousand times into thelength of its course in 24 hours, it would have gone a thousandfeet, that is
 300 braccia, which is the sixth of a mile. Whence itwould follow that the course of the sun during the day would be the
sixth part of a mile and that this venerable snail, the sun willhave travelled 25 braccia an hour.884.Posidonius compose
d books on the size of the sun. [Footnote:Poseidonius of Apamea, commonly called the Rhodian, because hetaught in Rhodes
, was a Stoic philosopher, a contemporary and friendof Cicero's, and the author of numerous works on natural science,amo
ng them.Strabo quotes no doubt from one of his works, when he says thatPoseidonius explained how it was that the sun loo
ked larger when itwas rising or setting than during the rest of its course (III, p.135). Kleomedes, a later Greek Natura
list also mentions thisobservation of Poseidonius' without naming the title of his work;however, as Kleomedes' Cyclia Th
eorica was not printed till 1535,Leonardo must have derived his quotation from Strabo. He probablywrote this note in 150
8, and as the original Greek was first printedin Venice in 1516, we must suppose him to quote here from thetranslation b
y Guarinus Veronensis, which was printed as early as1471, also at Venice (H. MULLER-STRUBING).]Of the nature of Sunlight
.885.OF THE PROOF THAT THE SUN IS HOT BY NATURE AND NOT BY VIRTUE.Of the nature of Sunlight.That the heat of the sun res
ides in its nature and not in its virtue[or mode of action] is abundantly proved by the radiance of thesolar body on whi
ch the human eye cannot dwell and besides this noless manifestly by the rays reflected from a concave mirror,which--when
 they strike the eye with such splendour that the eyecannot bear them--have a brilliancy equal to the sun in its ownplac
e. And that this is true I prove by the fact that if the mirrorhas its concavity formed exactly as is requisite for the
collectingand reflecting of these rays, no created being could endure theheat that strikes from the reflected rays of su
ch a mirror. And ifyou argue that the mirror itself is cold and yet send forth hotrays, I should reply that those rays c
ome really from the sun andthat it is the ray of the concave mirror after having passed throughthe window.Considerations
 as to the size of the sun (886-891).886.The sun does not move. [Footnote: This sentence occurs incidentallyamong mathem
atical notes, and is written in unusually largeletters.]887.PROOF THAT THE NEARER YOU ARE TO THE SOURCE OF THE SOLAR RAY
S, THELARGER WILL THE REFLECTION OF THE SUN FROM THE SEA APPEAR TO YOU.[Footnote: Lines 4 and fol. Compare Vol. I, Nos.
130, 131.] If it isfrom the centre that the sun employs its radiance to intensify thepower of its whole mass, it is evid
ent that the farther its raysextend, the more widely they will be divided; and this being so,you, whose eye is near the
water that mirrors the sun, see but asmall portion of the rays of the sun strike the surface of thewater, and reflecting
 the form of the sun. But if you were near tothe sun--as would be the case when the sun is on the meridian andthe sea to
 the westward--you would see the sun, mirrored in the sea,of a very great size; because, as you are nearer to the sun, y
oureye taking in the rays nearer to the point of radiation takes moreof them in, and a great splendour is the result. An
d in this way itcan be proved that the moon must have seas which reflect the sun,and that the parts which do not shine a
re land.888.Take the measure of the sun at the solstice in mid-June.889.WHY THE SUN APPEARS LARGER WHEN SETTING THAN AT
NOON, WHEN IT ISNEAR TO US.Every object seen through a curved medium seems to be of larger sizethan it is.[Footnote: At
A is written _sole_ (the sun), at B _terra_ (theearth).]890.Because the eye is small it can only see the image of the su
n as ofa small size. If the eye were as large as the sun it would see theimage of the sun in water of the same size as t
he real body of thesun, so long as the water is smooth.891.A METHOD OF SEEING THE SUN ECLIPSED WITHOUT PAIN TO THE EYE.T
ake a piece of paper and pierce holes in it with a needle, and lookat the sun through these holes.III.THE MOON.On the lu
minousity of the moon (892-901).892.OF THE MOON.As I propose to treat of the nature of the moon, it is necessarythat fir
st I should describe the perspective of mirrors, whetherplane, concave or convex; and first what is meant by a luminous
ray,and how it is refracted by various kinds of media; then, when areflected ray is most powerful, whether when the angl
e of incidenceis acute, right, or obtuse, or from a convex, a plane, or a concavesurface; or from an opaque or a transpa
rent body. Besides this, howit is that the solar rays which fall on the waves of the sea, areseen by the eye of the same
 width at the angle nearest to the eye,as at the highest line of the waves on the horizon; butnotwithstanding this the s
olar rays reflected from the waves of thesea assume the pyramidal form and consequently, at each degree ofdistance incre
ase proportionally in size, although to our sight,they appear as parallel.1st. Nothing that has very little weight is op
aque.2dly. Nothing that is excessively weighty can remain beneath thatwhich is heavier.3dly. As to whether the moon is s
ituated in the centre of itselements or not.And, if it has no proper place of its own, like the earth, in themidst of it
s elements, why does it not fall to the centre of ourelements? [Footnote 26: The problem here propounded by Leonardo was
not satisfactorily answered till Newton in 1682 formulated the lawof universal attraction and gravitation. Compare No. 9
02, lines5-15.]And, if the moon is not in the centre of its own elements and yetdoes not fall, it must then be lighter t
han any other element.And, if the moon is lighter than the other elements why is it opaqueand not transparent?When objec
ts of various sizes, being placed at various distances,look of equal size, there must be the same relative proportion in
the distances as in the magnitudes of the objects.[Footnote: In the diagram Leonardo wrote _sole_ at the place marked_A_
.]893.OF THE MOON AND WHETHER IT IS POLISHED AND SPHERICAL.The image of the sun in the moon is powerfully luminous, and
is onlyon a small portion of its surface. And the proof may be seen bytaking a ball of burnished gold and placing it in
the dark with alight at some distance from it; and then, although it willilluminate about half of the ball, the eye will
 perceive itsreflection only in a small part of its surface, and all the rest ofthe surface reflects the darkness which
surrounds it; so that it isonly in that spot that the image of the light is seen, and all therest remains invisible, the
 eye being at a distance from the ball.The same thing would happen on the surface of the moon if it werepolished, lustro
us and opaque, like all bodies with a reflectingsurface.Show how, if you were standing on the moon or on a star, our ear
thwould seem to reflect the sun as the moon does.And show that the image of the sun in the sea cannot appear one andundi
vided, as it appears in a perfectly plane mirror.894.How shadows are lost at great distances, as is shown by the shadows
ide of the moon which is never seen. [Footnote: Compare also Vol.I, Nos. 175-179.]895.Either the moon has intrinsic lumi
nosity or not. If it has, why doesit not shine without the aid of the sun? But if it has not any lightin itself it must
of necessity be a spherical mirror; and if it is amirror, is it not proved in Perspective that the image of a luminousob
ject will never be equal to the extent of surface of thereflecting body that it illuminates? And if it be thus [Footnote
 13:At A, in the diagram, Leonardo wrote "_sole_" (the sun), and at B"_luna o noi terra_" (the moon or our earth). Compa
re also the textof No. 876.], as is here shown at _r s_ in the figure, whence comesso great an extent of radiance as tha
t of the full moon as we seeit, at the fifteenth day of the moon?896.OF THE MOON.The moon has no light in itself; but so
 much of it as faces the sunis illuminated, and of that illumined portion we see so much asfaces the earth. And the moon
's night receives just as much light asis lent it by our waters as they reflect the image of the sun, whichis mirrored i
n all those waters which are on the side towards thesun. The outside or surface of the waters forming the seas of themoo
n and of the seas of our globe is always ruffled little or much,or more or less--and this roughness causes an extension
of thenumberless images of the sun which are repeated in the ridges andhollows, the sides and fronts of the innumerable
waves; that is tosay in as many different spots on each wave as our eyes finddifferent positions to view them from. This
 could not happen, if theaqueous sphere which covers a great part of the moon were uniformlyspherical, for then the imag
es of the sun would be one to eachspectator, and its reflections would be separate and independent andits radiance would
 always appear circular; as is plainly to be seenin the gilt balls placed on the tops of high buildings. But if thosegil
t balls were rugged or composed of several little balls, likemulberries, which are a black fruit composed of minute roun
dglobules, then each portion of these little balls, when seen in thesun, would display to the eye the lustre resulting f
rom thereflection of the sun, and thus, in one and the same body many tinysuns would be seen; and these often combine at
 a long distance andappear as one. The lustre of the new moon is brighter and stronger,than when the moon is full; and t
he reason of this is that the angleof incidence is more obtuse in the new than in the full moon, inwhich the angles [of
incidence and reflection] are highly acute. Thewaves of the moon therefore mirror the sun in the hollows of thewaves as
well as on the ridges, and the sides remain in shadow. Butat the sides of the moon the hollows of the waves do not catch
 thesunlight, but only their crests; and thus the images are fewer andmore mixed up with the shadows in the hollows; and
 thisintermingling of the shaded and illuminated spots comes to the eyewith a mitigated splendour, so that the edges wil
l be darker,because the curves of the sides of the waves are insufficient toreflect to the eye the rays that fall upon t
hem. Now the new moonnaturally reflects the solar rays more directly towards the eye fromthe crests of the waves than fr
om any other part, as is shown by theform of the moon, whose rays a strike the waves _b_ and arereflected in the line _b
 d_, the eye being situated at _d_. Thiscannot happen at the full moon, when the solar rays, being in thewest, fall on t
he extreme waters of the moon to the East from _n_ to_m_, and are not reflected to the eye in the West, but are thrownba
ck eastwards, with but slight deflection from the straight courseof the solar ray; and thus the angle of incidence is ve
ry wideindeed.The moon is an opaque and solid body and if, on the contrary, itwere transparent, it would not receive the
 light of the sun.The yellow or yolk of an egg remains in the middle of the albumen,without moving on either side; now i
t is either lighter or heavierthan this albumen, or equal to it; if it is lighter, it ought torise above all the albumen
 and stop in contact with the shell of theegg; and if it is heavier, it ought to sink, and if it is equal, itmight just
as well be at one of the ends, as in the middle or below[54].[Footnote 48-64: Compare No. 861.]The innumerable images of
 the solar rays reflected from theinnumerable waves of the sea, as they fall upon those waves, arewhat cause us to see t
he very broad and continuous radiance on thesurface of the sea.897.That the sun could not be mirrored in the body of the
 moon, which isa convex mirror, in such a way as that so much of its surface as isilluminated by the sun, should reflect
 the sun unless the moon had asurface adapted to reflect it--in waves and ridges, like the surfaceof the sea when its su
rface is moved by the wind.[Footnote: In the original diagrams _sole_ is written at the placemarked _A; luna_ at _C,_ an
d _terra_ at the two spots marked _B_.]The waves in water multiply the image of the object reflected in it.These waves r
eflect light, each by its own line, as the surface ofthe fir cone does [Footnote 14: See the diagram p. 145.]These are 2
 figures one different from the other; one withundulating water and the other with smooth water.It is impossible that at
 any distance the image of the sun cast onthe surface of a spherical body should occupy the half of thesphere.Here you m
ust prove that the earth produces all the same effectswith regard to the moon, as the moon with regard to the earth.The
moon, with its reflected light, does not shine like the sun,because the light of the moon is not a continuous reflection
 of thatof the sun on its whole surface, but only on the crests and hollowsof the waves of its waters; and thus the sun
being confusedlyreflected, from the admixture of the shadows that lie between thelustrous waves, its light is not pure a
nd clear as the sun is.[Footnote 38: This refers to the small diagram placed between _B_and _B_.--]. The earth between t
he moon on the fifteenth day and thesun. [Footnote 39: See the diagram below the one referred to in thepreceding note.]
Here the sun is in the East and the moon on thefifteenth day in the West. [Footnote 40.41: Refers to the diagrambelow th
e others.] The moon on the fifteenth [day] between the earthand the sun. [41]Here it is the moon which has the sun to th
e Westand the earth to the East.898.WHAT SORT OF THING THE MOON IS.The moon is not of itself luminous, but is highly fit
ted toassimilate the character of light after the manner of a mirror, orof water, or of any other reflecting body; and i
t grows larger inthe East and in the West, like the sun and the other planets. Andthe reason is that every luminous body
 looks larger in proportion asit is remote. It is easy to understand that every planet and star isfarther from us when i
n the West than when it is overhead, by about3500 miles, as is proved on the margin [Footnote 7: refers to thefirst diag
ram.--A = _sole_ (the sun), B = _terra_ (the earth), C =_luna_ (the moon).], and if you see the sun or moon mirrored in
thewater near to you, it looks to you of the same size in the water asin the sky. But if you recede to the distance of a
 mile, it willlook 100 times larger; and if you see the sun reflected in the seaat sunset, its image would look to you m
ore than 10 miles long;because that reflected image extends over more than 10 miles of sea.And if you could stand where
the moon is, the sun would look to you,as if it were reflected from all the sea that it illuminates by day;and the land
amid the water would appear just like the dark spotsthat are on the moon, which, when looked at from our earth, appearst
o men the same as our earth would appear to any men who might dwellin the moon.[Footnote: This text has already been pub
lished by LIBRI: _Histoiredes Sciences,_ III, pp. 224, 225.]OF THE NATURE OF THE MOON.When the moon is entirely lighted
up to our sight, we see its fulldaylight; and at that time, owing to the reflection of the solarrays which fall on it an
d are thrown off towards us, its ocean castsoff less moisture towards us; and the less light it gives the moreinjurious
it is.899.OF THE MOON.I say that as the moon has no light in itself and yet is luminous,it is inevitable but that its li
ght is caused by some other body.900.OF THE MOON.All my opponent's arguments to say that there is no water in themoon. [
Footnote: The objections are very minutely noted down in themanuscript, but they hardly seem to have a place here.]901.A
nswer to Maestro Andrea da Imola, who said that the solar raysreflected from a convex mirror are mingled and lost at a s
hortdistance; whereby it is altogether denied that the luminous side ofthe moon is of the nature of a mirror, and that c
onsequently thelight is not produced by the innumerable multitude of the waves ofthat sea, which I declared to be the po
rtion of the moon which isilluminated by the solar rays.Let _o p_ be the body of the sun, _c n s_ the moon, and _b_ the
eyewhich, above the base _c n_ of the cathetus _c n m_, sees the bodyof the sun reflected at equal angles _c n_; and the
 same again onmoving the eye from _b_ to _a_. [Footnote: The large diagram on themargin of page 161 belongs to this chap
ter.]Explanation of the lumen cinereum in the moon.902.OF THE MOON.No solid body is less heavy than the atmosphere.[Foot
note: 1. On the margin are the words _tola romantina,tola--ferro stagnato_ (tinned iron); _romantina_ is some specialkin
d of sheet-iron no longer known by that name.]Having proved that the part of the moon that shines consists ofwater, whic
h mirrors the body of the sun and reflects the radianceit receives from it; and that, if these waters were devoid of wav
es,it would appear small, but of a radiance almost like the sun; --[5]It must now be shown whether the moon is a heavy o
r a light body:for, if it were a heavy body--admitting that at every grade ofdistance from the earth greater levity must
 prevail, so that wateris lighter than the earth, and air than water, and fire than air andso on successively--it would
seem that if the moon had density as itreally has, it would have weight, and having weight, that it couldnot be sustaine
d in the space where it is, and consequently that itwould fall towards the centre of the universe and become united toth
e earth; or if not the moon itself, at least its waters would fallaway and be lost from it, and descend towards the cent
re, leavingthe moon without any and so devoid of lustre. But as this does nothappen, as might in reason be expected, it
is a manifest sign thatthe moon is surrounded by its own elements: that is to say water,air and fire; and thus is, of it
self and by itself, suspended inthat part of space, as our earth with its element is in this part ofspace; and that heav
y bodies act in the midst of its elements justas other heavy bodies do in ours [Footnote 15: This passage wouldcertainly
 seem to establish Leonardo's claim to be regarded as theoriginal discoverer of the cause of the ashy colour of the new
moon(_lumen cinereum_). His observations however, having hithertoremained unknown to astronomers, Moestlin and Kepler ha
ve beencredited with the discoveries which they made independently acentury later.Some disconnected notes treat of the s
ame subject in MS. C. A. 239b;718b and 719b; "_Perche la luna cinta della parte alluminata dalsole in ponente, tra maggi
or splendore in mezzo a tal cerchio, chequando essa eclissava il sole. Questo accade perche nell' eclissareil sole ella
ombrava il nostro oceano, il qual caso non accadeessendo in ponente, quando il sole alluma esso oceano_." The editorsof
the "_Saggio_" who first published this passage (page 12) addanother short one about the seasons in the moon which I con
fess notto have seen in the original manuscript: "_La luna ha ogni mese unverno e una state, e ha maggiori freddi e magg
iori caldi, e i suoiequinozii son piu freddi de' nostri._"]When the eye is in the East and sees the moon in the West nea
r tothe setting sun, it sees it with its shaded portion surrounded byluminous portions; and the lateral and upper portio
n of this lightis derived from the sun, and the lower portion from the ocean in theWest, which receives the solar rays a
nd reflects them on the lowerwaters of the moon, and indeed affords the part of the moon that isin shadow as much radian
ce as the moon gives the earth at midnight.Therefore it is not totally dark, and hence some have believed thatthe moon m
ust in parts have a light of its own besides that which isgiven it by the sun; and this light is due, as has been said,
to theabove- mentioned cause,--that our seas are illuminated by the sun.Again, it might be said that the circle of radia
nce shown by themoon when it and the sun are both in the West is wholly borrowedfrom the sun, when it, and the sun, and
the eye are situated as isshown above.[Footnote 23. 24: The larger of the two diagrams reproduced abovestands between th
ese two lines, and the smaller one is sketched inthe margin. At the spot marked _A_ Leonardo wrote _corpo solare_(solar
body) in the larger diagram and _Sole_ (sun) in the smallerone. At _C luna_ (moon) is written and at _B terra_ (the eart
h).]Some might say that the air surrounding the moon as an element,catches the light of the sun as our atmosphere does,
and that it isthis which completes the luminous circle on the body of the moon.Some have thought that the moon has a lig
ht of its own, but thisopinion is false, because they have founded it on that dim lightseen between the hornes of the ne
w moon, which looks dark where itis close to the bright part, while against the darkness of thebackground it looks so li
ght that many have taken it to be a ring ofnew radiance completing the circle where the tips of the hornsilluminated by
the sun cease to shine [Footnote 34: See Pl. CVIII,No. 5.]. And this difference of background arises from the fact thatt
he portion of that background which is conterminous with the brightpart of the moon, by comparison with that brightness
looks darkerthan it is; while at the upper part, where a portion of the luminouscircle is to be seen of uniform width, t
he result is that the moon,being brighter there than the medium or background on which it isseen by comparison with that
 darkness it looks more luminous at thatedge than it is. And that brightness at such a time itself isderived from our oc
ean and other inland-seas. These are, at thattime, illuminated by the sun which is already setting in such a wayas that
the sea then fulfils the same function to the dark side ofthe moon as the moon at its fifteenth day does to us when the
sun isset. And the small amount of light which the dark side of the moonreceives bears the same proportion to the light
of that side whichis illuminated, as that... [Footnote 42: Here the text breaks off;lines 43-52 are written on the margi
n.].If you want to see how much brighter the shaded portion of the moonis than the background on which it is seen, conce
al the luminousportion of the moon with your hand or with some other more distantobject.On the spots in the moon (903-90
7).903.THE SPOTS ON THE MOON.Some have said that vapours rise from the moon, after the manner ofclouds and are interpose
d between the moon and our eyes. But, ifthis were the case, these spots would never be permanent, either asto position o
r form; and, seeing the moon from various aspects, evenif these spots did not move they would change in form, as objects
 dowhich are seen from different sides.904.OF THE SPOTS ON THE MOON.Others say that the moon is composed of more or less
 transparentparts; as though one part were something like alabaster and otherslike crystal or glass. It would follow fro
m this that the suncasting its rays on the less transparent portions, the light wouldremain on the surface, and so the d
enser part would be illuminated,and the transparent portions would display the shadow of theirdarker depths; and this is
 their account of the structure and natureof the moon. And this opinion has found favour with manyphilosophers, and part
icularly with Aristotle, and yet it is a falseview--for, in the various phases and frequent changes of the moonand sun t
o our eyes, we should see these spots vary, at one timelooking dark and at another light: they would be dark when the su
nis in the West and the moon in the middle of the sky; for then thetransparent hollows would be in shadow as far as the
tops of theedges of those transparent hollows, because the sun could not thenfling his rays into the mouth of the hollow
s, which however, at fullmoon, would be seen in bright light, at which time the moon is inthe East and faces the sun in
the West; then the sun wouldilluminate even the lowest depths of these transparent places andthus, as there would be no
shadows cast, the moon at these timeswould not show us the spots in question; and so it would be, nowmore and now less,
according to the changes in the position of thesun to the moon, and of the moon to our eyes, as I have said above.905.OF
 THE SPOTS ON THE MOON.It has been asserted, that the spots on the moon result from themoon being of varying thinness or
 density; but if this were so, whenthere is an eclipse of the moon the solar rays would pierce throughthe portions which
 were thin as is alleged [Footnote 3-5: _Eclissi_.This word, as it seems to me, here means eclipses of the sun; andthe s
ense of the passage, as I understand it, is that by theforegoing hypothesis the moon, when it comes between the sun and
theearth must appear as if pierced,--we may say like a sieve.]. But aswe do not see this effect the opinion must be fals
e.Others say that the surface of the moon is smooth and polished andthat, like a mirror, it reflects in itself the image
 of our earth.This view is also false, inasmuch as the land, where it is notcovered with water, presents various aspects
 and forms. Hence whenthe moon is in the East it would reflect different spots from thoseit would show when it is above
us or in the West; now the spots onthe moon, as they are seen at full moon, never vary in the course ofits motion over o
ur hemisphere. A second reason is that an objectreflected in a convex body takes up but a small portion of thatbody, as
is proved in perspective [Footnote 18: _come e provato_.This alludes to the accompanying diagram.]. The third reason is
thatwhen the moon is full, it only faces half the hemisphere of theilluminated earth, on which only the ocean and other
waters reflectbright light, while the land makes spots on that brightness; thushalf of our earth would be seen girt roun
d with the brightness ofthe sea lighted up by the sun, and in the moon this reflection wouldbe the smallest part of that
 moon. Fourthly, a radiant body cannotbe reflected from another equally radiant; therefore the sea, sinceit borrows its
brightness from the sun,--as the moon does--, couldnot cause the earth to be reflected in it, nor indeed could the bodyo
f the sun be seen reflected in it, nor indeed any star opposite toit.906.If you keep the details of the spots of the moo
n under observationyou will often find great variation in them, and this I myself haveproved by drawing them. And this i
s caused by the clouds that risefrom the waters in the moon, which come between the sun and thosewaters, and by their sh
adow deprive these waters of the sun's rays.Thus those waters remain dark, not being able to reflect the solarbody.907.H
ow the spots on the moon must have varied from what they formerlywere, by reason of the course of its waters.On the moon
's halo.908.OF HALOS ROUND THE MOON.I have found, that the circles which at night seem to surround themoon, of various s
izes, and degrees of density are caused by variousgradations in the densities of the vapours which exist at differentalt
itudes between the moon and our eyes. And of these halos thelargest and least red is caused by the lowest of these vapou
rs; thesecond, smaller one, is higher up, and looks redder because it isseen through two vapours. And so on, as they are
 higher they willappear smaller and redder, because, between the eye and them, thereis thicker vapour. Whence it is prov
ed that where they are seen tobe reddest, the vapours are most dense.On instruments for observing the moon (909. 910).90
9.If you want to prove why the moon appears larger than it is, when itreaches the horizon; take a lens which is highly c
onvex on onesurface and concave on the opposite, and place the concave side nextthe eye, and look at the object beyond t
he convex surface; by thismeans you will have produced an exact imitation of the atmosphereincluded beneath the sphere o
f fire and outside that of water; forthis atmosphere is concave on the side next the earth, and convextowards the fire.9
10.Construct glasses to see the moon magnified.[Footnote: See the Introduction, p. 136, Fracastoro says in his workHomoc
entres: "_Per dua specilla ocularla si quis perspiciat, alterialtero superposito, majora multo et propinquiora videbitom
nia.--Quin imo quaedam specilla ocularia fiunt tantae densitatis,ut si per ea quis aut lunam, aut aliud siderum spectet,
 adeopropinqua illa iudicet, ut ne turres ipsas excedant_" (sect. II c. 8and sect. III, c. 23).]I.THE STARS.On the light
 of the stars (911-913).911.The stars are visible by night and not by day, because we areeneath the dense atmosphere, wh
ich is full of innumerablearticles of moisture, each of which independently, when theays of the sun fall upon it, reflec
ts a radiance, and so theseumberless bright particles conceal the stars; and if it were notor this atmosphere the sky wo
uld always display the stars againstts darkness.[Footnote: See No. 296, which also refers to starlight.]912.Whether the
stars have their light from the sun or in themselves.Some say that they shine of themselves, alledging that if Venusnd M
ercury had not a light of their own, when they come betweenur eye and the sun they would darken so much of the sun as th
eyould cover from our eye. But this is false, for it is proved that dark object against a luminous body is enveloped and
 entirelyoncealed by the lateral rays of the rest of that luminous bodynd so remains invisible. As may be seen when the
sun is seenhrough the boughs of trees bare of their leaves, at some distancehe branches do not conceal any portion of th
e sun from our eye.he same thing happens with the above mentioned planets which,hough they have no light of their own, d
o not--as has been said--onceal any part of the sun from our eye[18].SECOND ARGUMENT.Some say that the stars appear most
 brilliant at night in proportionas they are higher up; and that if they had no light of their own,the shadow of the ear
th which comes between them and the sun, woulddarken them, since they would not face nor be faced by the solarbody. But
those persons have not considered that the conical shadowof the earth cannot reach many of the stars; and even as to tho
se itdoes reach, the cone is so much diminished that it covers verylittle of the star's mass, and all the rest is illumi
nated by thesun.Footnote: From this and other remarks (see No. 902) it is clearhat Leonardo was familiar with the phenom
ena of Irradiation.]13.Why the planets appear larger in the East than they do overhead,whereas the contrary should be th
e case, as they are 3500 milesnearer to us when in mid sky than when on the horizon.All the degrees of the elements, thr
ough which the images of thecelestial bodies pass to reach the eye, are equal curves and theangles by which the central
line of those images passes throughthem, are unequal angles [Footnote 13: _inequali_, here andelsewhere does not mean un
equal in the sense of not being equal toeach other, but angles which are not right angles.]; and thedistance is greater,
 as is shown by the excess of _a b_ beyond _ad_; and the enlargement of these celestial bodies on the horizon isshown by
 the 9th of the 7th.Observations on the stars.914.To see the real nature of the planets open the covering and note atthe
 base [Footnote 4: _basa_. This probably alludes to someinstrument, perhaps the Camera obscura.] one single planet, and
thereflected movement of this base will show the nature of the saidplanet; but arrange that the base may face only one a
t the time.On history of astronomy.915.Cicero says in [his book] De Divinatione that Astrology has beenpractised five hu
ndred seventy thousand years before the Trojan war.57000.[Footnote: The statement that CICERO, _De Divin._ ascribes thed
iscovery of astrology to a period 57000 years before the Trojan warI believe to be quite erroneous. According to ERNESTI
, _ClavisCiceroniana,_ CH. G. SCHULZ (_Lexic. Cicer._) and the edition of _DeDivin._ by GIESE the word Astrologia occurs
 only twice in CICERO:_De Divin. II_, 42. _Ad Chaldaeorum monstra veniamus, de quibusEudoxus, Platonis auditor, in astro
logia judicio doctissimorumhominum facile princeps, sic opinatur (id quod scriptum reliquit):Chaldaeis in praedictione e
t in notatione cujusque vitae ex natalidie minime esse credendum._" He then quotes the condemnatory verdictof other phil
osophers as to the teaching of the Chaldaeans but saysnothing as to the antiquity and origin of astronomy. CICERO furthe
rnotes _De oratore_ I, 16 that Aratus was "_ignarus astrologiae_" butthat is all. So far as I know the word occurs nowhe
re else inCICERO; and the word _Astronomia_ he does not seem to have used atall. (H. MULLER-STRUBING.)]Of time and its d
ivisions (916-918).916.Although time is included in the class of Continuous Quantities,being indivisible and immaterial,
 it does not come entirely underthe head of Geometry, which represents its divisions by means offigures and bodies of in
finite variety, such as are seen to becontinuous in their visible and material properties. But only withits first princi
ples does it agree, that is with the Point and theLine; the point may be compared to an instant of time, and the linemay
 be likened to the length of a certain quantity of time, and justas a line begins and terminates in a point, so such a s
pace of time.begins and terminates in an instant. And whereas a line isinfinitely divisible, the divisibility of a space
 of time is of thesame nature; and as the divisions of the line may bear a certainproportion to each other, so may the d
ivisions of time.[Footnote: This passage is repeated word for word on page 190b ofthe same manuscript and this is accoun
ted for by the text in Vol. I,No. 4. Compare also No. 1216.]917.Describe the nature of Time as distinguished from the Ge
ometricaldefinitions.918.Divide an hour into 3000 parts, and this you can do with a clock bymaking the pendulum lighter
or heavier._XVI.Physical Geography.Leonardo's researches as to the structure of the earth and sea weremade at a time, wh
en the extended voyages of the Spaniards andPortuguese had also excited a special interest in geographicalquestions in I
taly, and particularly in Tuscany. Still, it needscarcely surprise us to find that in deeper questions, as to thestructu
re of the globe, the primitive state of the earth's surface,and the like, he was far in advance of his time.The number o
f passages which treat of such matters is relativelyconsiderable; like almost all Leonardo's scientific notes they dealp
artly with theoretical and partly with practical questions. Some ofhis theoretical views of the motion of water were col
lected in acopied manuscript volume by an early transcriber, but without anyacknowledgment of the source whence they wer
e derived. This copy isnow in the Library of the Barberini palace at Rome and was publishedunder the title: "De moto e m
isura dell'acqua," by FRANCESCOCARDINALI, Bologna_ 1828. _In this work the texts are arranged underthe following titles:
_ Libr. I. Della spera dell'acqua; Libr. II.Del moto dell'acqua; Libr. III. Dell'onda dell'acqua; Libr. IV. Deiretrosi d
'acqua; Libr. V. Dell'acqua cadente; Libr. VI. Dellerotture fatte dall'acqua; Libr. VII Delle cose portate dall'acqua;Li
br. VIII. Dell'oncia dell'acqua e delle canne; Libr. IX. De molinie d'altri ordigni d'acqua._The large number of isolate
d observations scattered through themanuscripts, accounts for our so frequently finding notes of newschemes for the arra
ngement of those relating to water and itsmotions, particularly in the Codex Atlanticus: I have printedseveral of these
plans as an introduction to the Physical Geography,and I have actually arranged the texts in accordance with the clueaff
orded by one of them which is undoubtedly one of the latest notesreferring to the subject (No._ 920_). The text given as
 No._ 930_which is also taken from a late note-book of Leonardo's, served asa basis for the arrangement of the first of
the seven books--orsections--, bearing the title: Of the Nature of Water_ (Dell'acquein se)._As I have not made it any p
art of this undertaking to print thepassages which refer to purely physical principles, it has also beennecessary to exc
lude those practical researches which, in accordancewith indications given in_ 920, _ought to come in as Books_ 13, 14_a
nd_ 15. _I can only incidentally mention here that Leonardo--as itseems to me, especially in his youth--devoted a great
deal ofattention to the construction of mills. This is proved by a numberof drawings of very careful and minute executio
n, which are to befound in the Codex Atlanticus. Nor was it possible to include hisconsiderations on the regulation of r
ivers, the making of canals andso forth (No._ 920, _Books_ 10, 11 _and_ 12_); but those passages inwhich the structure o
f a canal is directly connected with notices ofparticular places will be found duly inserted under section XVII(Topograp
hical notes). In Vol. I, No._ 5 _the text refers tocanal-making in general.__On one point only can the collection of pas
sages included under thegeneral heading of Physical Geography claim to be complete. Whencomparing and sorting the materi
als for this work I took particularcare not to exclude or omit any text in which a geographical namewas mentioned even i
ncidentally, since in all such researches thechief interest, as it appeared to me, attached to the questionwhether these
 acute observations on the various localcharacteristics of mountains, rivers or seas, had been made byLeonardo himself,
and on the spot. It is self-evident that the fewgeneral and somewhat superficial observations on the Rhine and theDanube
, on England and Flanders, must have been obtained from mapsor from some informants, and in the case of Flanders Leonard
ohimself acknowledges this (see No._ 1008_). But that most of theother and more exact observations were made, on the spo
t, byLeonardo himself, may be safely assumed from their method and thestyle in which he writes of them; and we should be
ar it in mind thatin all investigations, of whatever kind, experience is always spokenof as the only basis on which he r
elies. Incidentally, as in No._984, _he thinks it necessary to allude to the total absence of allrecorded observations._
I.INTRODUCTION.Schemes for the arrangement of the materials (919-928).919.These books contain in the beginning: Of the n
ature of water itselfin its motions; the others treat of the effects of its currents,which change the world in its centr
e and its shape.920.DIVISIONS OF THE BOOK.Book 1 of water in itself.Book 2 of the sea.Book 3 of subterranean rivers.Book
 4 of rivers.Book 5 of the nature of the abyss.Book 6 of the obstacles.Book 7 of gravels.Book 8 of the surface of water.
Book 9 of the things placed therein.Book 10 of the repairing of rivers.Book 11 of conduits.Book 12 of canals.Book 13 of
machines turned by water.Book 14 of raising water.Book 15 of matters worn away by water.921.First you shall make a book
treating of places occupied by freshwaters, and the second by salt waters, and the third, how by thedisappearance of the
se, our parts of the world were made lighter andin consequence more remote from the centre of the world.922.First write
of all water, in each of its motions; then describe allits bottoms and their various materials, always referring to thep
ropositions concerning the said waters; and let the order be good,for otherwise the work will be confused.Describe all t
he forms taken by water from its greatest to itssmallest wave, and their causes.923.Book 9, of accidental risings of wat
er.924.THE ORDER OF THE BOOK.Place at the beginning what a river can effect.925.A book of driving back armies by the for
ce of a flood made byreleasing waters.A book showing how the waters safely bring down timber cut in themountains.A book
of boats driven against the impetus of rivers.A book of raising large bridges higher. Simply by the swelling ofthe water
s.A book of guarding against the impetus of rivers so that towns maynot be damaged by them.926.A book of the ordering of
 rivers so as to preserve their banks.A book of the mountains, which would stand forth and become land, ifour hemisphere
 were to be uncovered by the water.A book of the earth carried down by the waters to fill up the greatabyss of the seas.
A book of the ways in which a tempest may of itself clear out filledup sea-ports.A book of the shores of rivers and of t
heir permanency.A book of how to deal with rivers, so that they may keep theirbottom scoured by their own flow near the
cities they pass.A book of how to make or to repair the foundations for bridges overthe rivers.A book of the repairs whi
ch ought to be made in walls and banks ofrivers where the water strikes them.A book of the formation of hills of sand or
 gravel at great depthsin water.927.Water gives the first impetus to its motion.A book of the levelling of waters by var
ious means,A book of diverting rivers from places where they do mischief.A book of guiding rivers which occupy too much
ground.A book of parting rivers into several branches and making themfordable.A book of the waters which with various cu
rrents pass through seas.A book of deepening the beds of rivers by means of currents ofwater.A book of controlling river
s so that the little beginnings ofmischief, caused by them, may not increase.A book of the various movements of waters p
assing through channelsof different forms.A book of preventing small rivers from diverting the larger one intowhich thei
r waters run.A book of the lowest level which can be found in the current of thesurface of rivers.A book of the origin o
f rivers which flow from the high tops ofmountains.A book of the various motions of waters in their rivers.928.[1] Of in
equality in the concavity of a ship. [Footnote 1: The firstline of this passage was added subsequently, evidently as aco
rrection of the following line.][1] A book of the inequality in the curve of the sides of ships.[1] A book of the inequa
lity in the position of the tiller.[1] A book of the inequality in the keel of ships.[2] A book of various forms of aper
tures by which water flows out.[3] A book of water contained in vessels with air, and of itsmovements.[4] A book of the
motion of water through a syphon. [Footnote 7:_cicognole_, see No. 966, 11, 17.][5] A book of the meetings and union of
waters coming from differentdirections.[6] A book of the various forms of the banks through which riverspass.[7] A book
of the various forms of shoals formed under the sluicesof rivers.[8] A book of the windings and meanderings of the curre
nts ofrivers.[9] A book of the various places whence the waters of rivers arederived.[10] A book of the configuration of
 the shores of rivers and oftheir permanency.[11] A book of the perpendicular fall of water on various objects.[12] Aboo
k of the course of water when it is impeded in variousplaces.[12] A book of the various forms of the obstacles which imp
ede thecourse of waters.[13] A book of the concavity and globosity formed round variousobjects at the bottom.[14] Abook
of conducting navigable canals above or beneath therivers which intersect them.[15] A book of the soils which absorb wat
er in canals and ofrepairing them.[16] Abook of creating currents for rivers, which quit their beds,[and] for rivers cho
ked with soil.General introduction.929.THE BEGINNING OF THE TREATISE ON WATER.By the ancients man has been called the wo
rld in miniature; andcertainly this name is well bestowed, because, inasmuch as man iscomposed of earth, water, air and
fire, his body resembles that ofthe earth; and as man has in him bones the supports and framework ofhis flesh, the world
 has its rocks the supports of the earth; as manhas in him a pool of blood in which the lungs rise and fall inbreathing,
 so the body of the earth has its ocean tide whichlikewise rises and falls every six hours, as if the world breathed;as
in that pool of blood veins have their origin, which ramify allover the human body, so likewise the ocean sea fills the
body of theearth with infinite springs of water. The body of the earth lackssinews and this is, because the sinews are m
ade expressely formovements and, the world being perpetually stable, no movement takesplace, and no movement taking plac
e, muscles are not necessary.--But in all other points they are much alike.I.OF THE NATURE OF WATER.The arrangement of B
ook I.930.THE ORDER OF THE FIRST BOOK ON WATER.Define first what is meant by height and depth; also how theelements are
situated one inside another. Then, what is meant bysolid weight and by liquid weight; but first what weight andlightness
 are in themselves. Then describe why water moves, and whyits motion ceases; then why it becomes slower or more rapid; b
esidesthis, how it always falls, being in contact with the air but lowerthan the air. And how water rises in the air by
means of the heat ofthe sun, and then falls again in rain; again, why water springsforth from the tops of mountains; and
 if the water of any springhigher than the ocean can pour forth water higher than the surfaceof that ocean. And how all
the water that returns to the ocean ishigher than the sphere of waters. And how the waters of theequatorial seas are hig
her than the waters of the North, and higherbeneath the body of the sun than in any part of the equatorialcircle; for ex
periment shows that under the heat of a burning brandthe water near the brand boils, and the water surrounding thisebull
ition always sinks with a circular eddy. And how the waters ofthe North are lower than the other seas, and more so as th
ey becomecolder, until they are converted into ice.Definitions (931. 932).931.OF WHAT IS WATER.Among the four elements w
ater is the second both in weight and ininstability.932.THE BEGINNING OF THE BOOK ON WATER.Sea is the name given to that
 water which is wide and deep, in whichthe waters have not much motion.[Footnote: Only the beginning of this passage is
here given, theremainder consists of definitions which have no direct bearing onthe subject.]Of the surface of the water
 in relation to the globe (933-936).933.The centres of the sphere of water are two, one universal and commonto all water
, the other particular. The universal one is that whichis common to all waters not in motion, which exist in greatquanti
ties. As canals, ditches, ponds, fountains, wells, deadrivers, lakes, stagnant pools and seas, which, although they are
atvarious levels, have each in itself the limits of their superficiesequally distant from the centre of the earth, such
as lakes placedat the tops of high mountains; as the lake near Pietra Pana and thelake of the Sybil near Norcia; and all
 the lakes that give rise togreat rivers, as the Ticino from Lago Maggiore, the Adda from thelake of Como, the Mincio fr
om the lake of Garda, the Rhine from thelakes of Constance and of Chur, and from the lake of Lucerne, likethe Tigris whi
ch passes through Asia Minor carrying with it thewaters of three lakes, one above the other at different heights ofwhich
 the highest is Munace, the middle one Pallas, and the lowestTriton; the Nile again flows from three very high lakes in
Ethiopia.[Footnote 5: _Pietra Pana_, a mountain near Florence. If for Norcia,we may read Norchia, the remains of the Etr
uscan city near Viterbo,there can be no doubt that by '_Lago della Sibilla_'--a name notknown elsewhere, so far as I can
 learn--Leonardo meant _Lago diVico_ (Lacus Ciminus, Aen. 7).]934.OF THE CENTRE OF THE OCEAN.The centre of the sphere of
 waters is the true centre of the globeof our world, which is composed of water and earth, having the shapeof a sphere.
But, if you want to find the centre of the element ofthe earth, this is placed at a point equidistant from the surface o
fthe ocean, and not equidistant from the surface of the earth; for itis evident that this globe of earth has nowhere any
 perfectrotundity, excepting in places where the sea is, or marshes or otherstill waters. And every part of the earth th
at rises above the wateris farther from the centre.935.OF THE SEA WHICH CHANGES THE WEIGHT OF THE EARTH.The shells, oyst
ers, and other similar animals, which originate insea-mud, bear witness to the changes of the earth round the centreof o
ur elements. This is proved thus: Great rivers always runturbid, being coloured by the earth, which is stirred by thefri
ction of their waters at the bottom and on their shores; and thiswearing disturbs the face of the strata made by the lay
ers ofshells, which lie on the surface of the marine mud, and which wereproduced there when the salt waters covered them
; and these stratawere covered over again from time to time, with mud of variousthickness, or carried down to the sea by
 the rivers and floods ofmore or less extent; and thus these layers of mud became raised tosuch a height, that they came
 up from the bottom to the air. At thepresent time these bottoms are so high that they form hills or highmountains, and
the rivers, which wear away the sides of thesemountains, uncover the strata of these shells, and thus the softenedside o
f the earth continually rises and the antipodes sink closer tothe centre of the earth, and the ancient bottoms of the se
as havebecome mountain ridges.936.Let the earth make whatever changes it may in its weight, thesurface of the sphere of
waters can never vary in its equal distancefrom the centre of the world.Of the proportion of the mass of water to that o
f the earth (937.938).937.WHETHER THE EARTH IS LESS THAN THE WATER.Some assert that it is true that the earth, which is
not covered bywater is much less than that covered by water. But considering thesize of 7000 miles in diameter which is
that of this earth, we mayconclude the water to be of small depth.938.OF THE EARTH.The great elevations of the peaks of
the mountains above the sphereof the water may have resulted from this that: a very large portionof the earth which was
filled with water that is to say the vastcavern inside the earth may have fallen in a vast part of its vaulttowards the
centre of the earth, being pierced by means of thecourse of the springs which continually wear away the place wherethey
pass.Sinking in of countries like the Dead Sea in Syria, that is Sodomand Gomorrah.It is of necessity that there should
be more water than land, andthe visible portion of the sea does not show this; so that theremust be a great deal of wate
r inside the earth, besides that whichrises into the lower air and which flows through rivers and springs.[Footnote: The
 small sketch below on the left, is placed in theoriginal close to the text referring to the Dead Sea.]The theory of Pla
to.939.THE FIGURES OF THE ELEMENTS.Of the figures of the elements; and first as against those who denythe opinions of Pl
ato, and who say that if the elements include oneanother in the forms attributed to them by Plato they would cause avacu
um one within the other. I say it is not true, and I here proveit, but first I desire to propound some conclusions. It i
s notnecessary that the elements which include each other should be ofcorresponding magnitude in all the parts, of that
which includes andof that which is included. We see that the sphere of the watersvaries conspicuously in mass from the s
urface to the bottom, andthat, far from investing the earth when that was in the form of acube that is of 8 angles as Pl
ato will have it, that it invests theearth which has innumerable angles of rock covered by the water andvarious prominen
ces and concavities, and yet no vacuum is generatedbetween the earth and water; again, the air invests the sphere ofwate
rs together with the mountains and valleys, which rise abovethat sphere, and no vacuum remains between the earth and the
 air, sothat any one who says a vacuum is generated, speaks foolishly.But to Plato I would reply that the surface of the
 figures whichaccording to him the elements would have, could not exist.That the flow of rivers proves the slope of the
land.940.PROVES HOW THE EARTH IS NOT GLOBULAR AND NOT BEING GLOBULAR CANNOTHAVE A COMMON CENTRE.We see the Nile come fro
m Southern regions and traverse variousprovinces, running towards the North for a distance of 3000 milesand flow into th
e Mediterranean by the shores of Egypt; and if wewill give to this a fall of ten braccia a mile, as is usuallyallowed to
 the course of rivers in general, we shall find that theNile must have its mouth ten miles lower than its source. Again,
 wesee the Rhine, the Rhone and the Danube starting from the Germanparts, almost the centre of Europe, and having a cour
se one to theEast, the other to the North, and the last to Southern seas. And ifyou consider all this you will see that
the plains of Europe intheir aggregate are much higher than the high peaks of the maritimemountains; think then how much
 their tops must be above the seashores.Theory of the elevation of water within the mountains.941.OF THE HEAT THAT IS IN
 THE WORLD.Where there is life there is heat, and where vital heat is, there ismovement of vapour. This is proved, inasm
uch as we see that theelement of fire by its heat always draws to itself damp vapours andthick mists as opaque clouds, w
hich it raises from seas as well aslakes and rivers and damp valleys; and these being drawn by degreesas far as the cold
 region, the first portion stops, because heat andmoisture cannot exist with cold and dryness; and where the firstportio
n stops the rest settle, and thus one portion after anotherbeing added, thick and dark clouds are formed. They are often
 waftedabout and borne by the winds from one region to another, where bytheir density they become so heavy that they fal
l in thick rain; andif the heat of the sun is added to the power of the element of fire,the clouds are drawn up higher s
till and find a greater degree ofcold, in which they form ice and fall in storms of hail. Now thesame heat which holds u
p so great a weight of water as is seen torain from the clouds, draws them from below upwards, from the footof the mount
ains, and leads and holds them within the summits of themountains, and these, finding some fissure, issue continuously a
ndcause rivers.The relative height of the surface of the sea to that of the land(942-945).942.OF THE SEA, WHICH TO MANY
FOOLS APPEARS TO BE HIGHER THAN THE EARTHWHICH FORMS ITS SHORE._b d_ is a plain through which a river flows to the sea;
this plainends at the sea, and since in fact the dry land that is uncovered isnot perfectly level--for, if it were, the
river would have nomotion--as the river does move, this place is a slope rather than aplain; hence this plain _d b_ so e
nds where the sphere of waterbegins that if it were extended in a continuous line to _b a_ itwould go down beneath the s
ea, whence it follows that the sea _a cb_ looks higher than the dry land.Obviously no portions of dry land left uncovere
d by water can everbe lower than the surface of the watery sphere.943.OF CERTAIN PERSONS WHO SAY THE WATERS WERE HIGHER
THAN THE DRY LAND.Certainly I wonder not a little at the common opinion which iscontrary to truth, but held by the unive
rsal consent of the judgmentof men. And this is that all are agreed that the surface of the seais higher than the highes
t peaks of the mountains; and they allegemany vain and childish reasons, against which I will allege only onesimple and
short reason; We see plainly that if we could remove theshores of the sea, it would invest the whole earth and make it a
perfect sphere. Now, consider how much earth would be carried awayto enable the waves of the sea to cover the world; the
refore thatwhich would be carried away must be higher than the sea-shore.944.THE OPINION OF SOME PERSONS WHO SAY THAT TH
E WATER OF SOME SEAS ISHIGHER THAN THE HIGHEST SUMMITS OF MOUNTAINS; AND NEVERTHELESS THEWATER WAS FORCED UP TO THESE SU
MMITS.Water would not move from place to place if it were not that itseeks the lowest level and by a natural consequence
 it never canreturn to a height like that of the place where it first on issuingfrom the mountain came to light. And tha
t portion of the sea which,in your vain imagining, you say was so high that it flowed over thesummits of the high mounta
ins, for so many centuries would beswallowed up and poured out again through the issue from thesemountains. You can well
 imagine that all the time that Tigris andEuphrates945.have flowed from the summits of the mountains of Armenia, it must
 bebelieved that all the water of the ocean has passed very many timesthrough these mouths. And do you not believe that
the Nile must havesent more water into the sea than at present exists of all theelement of water? Undoubtedly, yes. And
if all this water had fallenaway from this body of the earth, this terrestrial machine wouldlong since have been without
 water. Whence we may conclude that thewater goes from the rivers to the sea, and from the sea to therivers, thus consta
ntly circulating and returning, and that all thesea and the rivers have passed through the mouth of the Nile aninfinite
number of times [Footnote: _Moti Armeni, Ermini_ in theoriginal, in M. RAVAISSON'S transcript _"monti ernini [le lororui
ne?]"_. He renders this _"Le Tigre et l'Euphrate se sont deversespar les sommets des montagnes [avec leurs eaux destruct
ives?] onpent cro're" &c. Leonardo always writes _Ermini, Erminia_, for_Armeni, Armenia_ (Arabic: _Irminiah_). M. RAVAIS
SON also deviatesfrom the original in his translation of the following passage: "_Ortu ne crois pas que le Nil ait mis p
lus d'eau dans la mer qu'il n'yen a a present dans tout l'element de l'eau. Il est certain que sicette eau etait tombee_
" &c.]II.ON THE OCEAN.Refutation of Pliny's theory as to the saltness of the sea (946.947).946.WHY WATER IS SALT.Pliny s
ays in his second book, chapter 103, that the water of thesea is salt because the heat of the sun dries up the moisture
anddrinks it up; and this gives to the wide stretching sea the savourof salt. But this cannot be admitted, because if th
e saltness of thesea were caused by the heat of the sun, there can be no doubt thatlakes, pools and marshes would be so
much the more salt, as theirwaters have less motion and are of less depth; but experience showsus, on the contrary, that
 these lakes have their waters quite freefrom salt. Again it is stated by Pliny in the same chapter that thissaltness mi
ght originate, because all the sweet and subtle portionswhich the heat attracts easily being taken away, the more bitter
 andcoarser part will remain, and thus the water on the surface isfresher than at the bottom [Footnote 22: Compare No. 9
48.]; but thisis contradicted by the same reason given above, which is, that thesame thing would happen in marshes and o
ther waters, which are driedup by the heat. Again, it has been said that the saltness of the seais the sweat of the eart
h; to this it may be answered that all thesprings of water which penetrate through the earth, would then besalt. But the
 conclusion is, that the saltness of the sea mustproceed from the many springs of water which, as they penetrate intothe
 earth, find mines of salt and these they dissolve in part, andcarry with them to the ocean and the other seas, whence t
he clouds,the begetters of rivers, never carry it up. And the sea would besalter in our times than ever it was at any ti
me; and if theadversary were to say that in infinite time the sea would dry up orcongeal into salt, to this I answer tha
t this salt is restored tothe earth by the setting free of that part of the earth which risesout of the sea with the sal
t it has acquired, and the rivers returnit to the earth under the sea.[Footnote: See PLINY, Hist. Nat. II, CIII [C]. _It
aque Solis ardoresiccatur liquor: et hoc esse masculum sidus accepimus, torrenscuncta sorbensque._ (cp. CIV.) _Sic mari
late patenti saporemincoqui salis, aut quia exhausto inde dulci tenuique, quod facillimetrahat vis ignea, omne asperius
crassiusque linquatur: ideo summaaequorum aqua dulciorem profundam; hanc esse veriorem causam, quamquod mare terrae sudo
r sit aeternus: aut quia plurimum ex aridomisceatur illi vapore: aut quia terrae natura sicut medicatas aquasinficiat_ .
.. (cp. CV): _altissimum mare XV. stadiorum Fabianustradit. Alii n Ponto coadverso Coraxorum gentis (vocant B Ponti)trec
entis fere a continenti stadiis immensam altitudinem maristradunt, vadis nunquam repertis._ (cp. CVI [CIII]) _Mirabilius
 idfaciunt aquae dulces, juxta mare, ut fistulis emicantes. Nam necaquarum natura a miraculis cessat. Dulces mari invehu
ntur, levioreshaud dubie. Ideo et marinae, quarum natura gravior, magis invectasustinent. Quaedam vero et dulces inter s
e supermeant alias._]947.For the third and last reason we will say that salt is in allcreated things; and this we learn
from water passed over the ashesand cinders of burnt things; and the urine of every animal, and thesuperfluities issuing
 from their bodies, and the earth into whichall things are converted by corruption.But,--to put it better,--given that t
he world is everlasting, itmust be admitted that its population will also be eternal; hence thehuman species has eternal
ly been and would be consumers of salt; andif all the mass of the earth were to be turned into salt, it wouldnot suffice
 for all human food [Footnote 27: That is, on thesupposition that salt, once consumed, disappears for ever.]; whencewe a
re forced to admit, either that the species of salt must beeverlasting like the world, or that it dies and is born again
 likethe men who devour it. But as experience teaches us that it does notdie, as is evident by fire, which does not cons
ume it, and by waterwhich becomes salt in proportion to the quantity dissolved init,--and when it is evaporated the salt
 always remains in theoriginal quantity--it must pass through the bodies of men either inthe urine or the sweat or other
 excretions where it is found again;and as much salt is thus got rid of as is carried every year intotowns; therefore sa
lt is dug in places where there is urine.-- Seahogs and sea winds are salt.We will say that the rains which penetrate th
e earth are what isunder the foundations of cities with their inhabitants, and are whatrestore through the internal pass
ages of the earth the saltnesstaken from the sea; and that the change in the place of the sea,which has been over all th
e mountains, caused it to be left there inthe mines found in those mountains, &c.The characteristics of sea water (948.
949).948.The waters of the salt sea are fresh at the greatest depths.949.THAT THE OCEAN DOES NOT PENETRATE UNDER THE EAR
TH.The ocean does not penetrate under the earth, and this we learn fromthe many and various springs of fresh water which
, in many parts ofthe ocean make their way up from the bottom to the surface. The samething is farther proved by wells d
ug beyond the distance of a milefrom the said ocean, which fill with fresh water; and this happensbecause the fresh wate
r is lighter than salt water and consequentlymore penetrating.Which weighs most, water when frozen or when not frozen?FR
ESH WATER PENETRATES MORE AGAINST SALT WATER THAN SALT WATERAGAINST FRESH WATER.That fresh water penetrates more against
 salt water, than salt wateragainst fresh is proved by a thin cloth dry and old, hanging withthe two opposite ends equal
ly low in the two different waters, thesurfaces of which are at an equal level; and it will then be seenhow much higher
the fresh water will rise in this piece of linenthan the salt; by so much is the fresh lighter than the salt.On the form
ation of Gulfs (950. 951).950.All inland seas and the gulfs of those seas, are made by riverswhich flow into the sea.951
.HERE THE REASON IS GIVEN OF THE EFFECTS PRODUCED BY THE WATERS INTHE ABOVE MENTIONED PLACE.All the lakes and all the gu
lfs of the sea and all inland seas aredue to rivers which distribute their waters into them, and fromimpediments in thei
r downfall into the Mediterranean --which dividesAfrica from Europe and Europe from Asia by means of the Nile and theDon
 which pour their waters into it. It is asked what impediment isgreat enough to stop the course of the waters which do n
ot reach theocean.On the encroachments of the sea on the land and vice versa(952-954).952.OF WAVES.A wave of the sea alw
ays breaks in front of its base, and thatportion of the crest will then be lowest which before was highest.[Footnote: Th
e page of FRANCESCO DI GIORGIO'S _Trattato_, on whichLeonardo has written this remark, contains some notes on theconstru
ction of dams, harbours &c.]953.That the shores of the sea constantly acquire more soil towards themiddle of the sea; th
at the rocks and promontories of the sea areconstantly being ruined and worn away; that the Mediterranean seaswill in ti
me discover their bottom to the air, and all that will beleft will be the channel of the greatest river that enters it;
andthis will run to the ocean and pour its waters into that with thoseof all the rivers that are its tributaries.954.How
 the river Po, in a short time might dry up the Adriatic sea inthe same way as it has dried up a large part of Lombardy.
The ebb and flow of the tide (955-960).955.Where there is a larger quantity of water, there is a greater flowand ebb, bu
t the contrary in narrow waters.Look whether the sea is at its greatest flow when the moon is halfway over our hemispher
e [on the meridian].956.Whether the flow and ebb are caused by the moon or the sun, or arethe breathing of this terrestr
ial machine. That the flow and ebb aredifferent in different countries and seas.[Footnote: 1. Allusion may here be made
to the mythologicalexplanation of the ebb and flow given in the Edda. Utgardloki saysto Thor (Gylfaginning 48): "When th
ou wert drinking out of the horn,and it seemed to thee that it was slow in emptying a wonder befell,which I should not h
ave believed possible: the other end of the hornlay in the sea, which thou sawest not; but when thou shalt go to thesea,
 thou shalt see how much thou hast drunk out of it. And that mennow call the ebb tide."Several passages in various manus
cripts treat of the ebb and flow.In collecting them I have been guided by the rule only to transcribethose which named s
ome particular spot.]957.Book 9 of the meeting of rivers and their flow and ebb. The cause isthe same in the sea, where
it is caused by the straits of Gibraltar.And again it is caused by whirlpools.958.OF THE FLOW AND EBB.All seas have thei
r flow and ebb in the same period, but they seemto vary because the days do not begin at the same time throughoutthe uni
verse; in such wise as that when it is midday in ourhemisphere, it is midnight in the opposite hemisphere; and at theEas
tern boundary of the two hemispheres the night begins whichfollows on the day, and at the Western boundary of these hemi
spheresbegins the day, which follows the night from the opposite side.Hence it is to be inferred that the above mentione
d swelling anddiminution in the height of the seas, although they take place inone and the same space of time, are seen
to vary from the abovementioned causes. The waters are then withdrawn into the fissureswhich start from the depths of th
e sea and which ramify inside thebody of the earth, corresponding to the sources of rivers, which areconstantly taking f
rom the bottom of the sea the water which hasflowed into it. A sea of water is incessantly being drawn off fromthe surfa
ce of the sea. And if you should think that the moon,rising at the Eastern end of the Mediterranean sea must there begin
to attract to herself the waters of the sea, it would follow that wemust at once see the effect of it at the Eastern end
 of that sea.Again, as the Mediterranean sea is about the eighth part of thecircumference of the aqueous sphere, being 3
000 miles long, whilethe flow and ebb only occur 4 times in 24 hours, these results wouldnot agree with the time of 24 h
ours, unless this Mediterranean seawere six thousand miles in length; because if such a superabundanceof water had to pa
ss through the straits of Gibraltar in runningbehind the moon, the rush of the water through that strait would beso grea
t, and would rise to such a height, that beyond the straitsit would for many miles rush so violently into the ocean as t
o causefloods and tremendous seething, so that it would be impossible topass through. This agitated ocean would afterwar
ds return the watersit had received with equal fury to the place they had come from, sothat no one ever could pass throu
gh those straits. Now experienceshows that at every hour they are passed in safety, but when thewind sets in the same di
rection as the current, the strong ebbincreases [Footnote 23: In attempting to get out of theMediterranean, vessels are
sometimes detained for a considerabletime; not merely by the causes mentioned by Leonardo but by theconstant current flo
wing eastwards through the middle of the straitsof Gibraltar.]. The sea does not raise the water that has issuedfrom the
 straits, but it checks them and this retards the tide; thenit makes up with furious haste for the time it has lost unti
l theend of the ebb movement.959.That the flow and ebb are not general; for on the shore at Genoathere is none, at Venic
e two braccia, between England and Flanders18 braccia. That in the straits of Sicily the current is very strongbecause a
ll the waters from the rivers that flow into the Adriaticpass there.[Footnote: A few more recent data may be given here
to facilitatecomparison. In the Adriatic the tide rises 2 and 1/2 feet, atTerracina 1 1/4. In the English channel betwee
n Calais and Kent itrises from 18 to 20 feet. In the straits of Messina it rises no morethan 2 1/2 feet, and that only i
n stormy weather, but the current isall the stronger. When Leonardo accounts for this by the southwardflow of all the It
alian rivers along the coasts, the explanation isat least based on a correct observation; namely that a steadycurrent fl
ows southwards along the coast of Calabria and anothernorthwards, along the shores of Sicily; he seems to infer, from th
edirection of the fust, that the tide in the Adriatic is caused byit.]960.In the West, near to Flanders, the sea rises a
nd decreases every 6hours about 20 braccia, and 22 when the moon is in its favour; but20 braccia is the general rule, an
d this rule, as it is evident,cannot have the moon for its cause. This variation in the increaseand decrease of the sea
every 6 hours may arise from the damming upof the waters, which are poured into the Mediterranean by thequantity of rive
rs from Africa, Asia and Europe, which flow intothat sea, and the waters which are given to it by those rivers; itpours
them to the ocean through the straits of Gibraltar, betweenAbila and Calpe [Footnote 5: _Abila_, Lat. _Abyla_, Gr. , now
Sierra _Ximiera_ near Ceuta; _Calpe_, Lat. _Calpe_. Gr., nowGibraltar. Leonardo here uses the ancient names of the rocks
, whichwere known as the Pillars of Hercules.]. That ocean extends to theisland of England and others farther North, and
 it becomes dammed upand kept high in various gulfs. These, being seas of which thesurface is remote from the centre of
the earth, have acquired aweight, which as it is greater than the force of the incoming waterswhich cause it, gives this
 water an impetus in the contrarydirection to that in which it came and it is borne back to meet thewaters coming out of
 the straits; and this it does most against thestraits of Gibraltar; these, so long as this goes on, remain dammedup and
 all the water which is poured out meanwhile by theaforementioned rivers, is pent up [in the Mediterranean]; and thismig
ht be assigned as the cause of its flow and ebb, as is shown inthe 21st of the 4th of my theory.III.SUBTERRANEAN WATER C
OURSES.Theory of the circulation of the waters (961. 962).961.Very large rivers flow under ground.962.This is meant to r
epresent the earth cut through in the middle,showing the depths of the sea and of the earth; the waters startfrom the bo
ttom of the seas, and ramifying through the earth theyrise to the summits of the mountains, flowing back by the rivers a
ndreturning to the sea.Observations in support of the hypothesis (963-969).963.The waters circulate with constant motion
 from the utmost depths ofthe sea to the highest summits of the mountains, not obeying thenature of heavy matter; and in
 this case it acts as does the bloodof animals which is always moving from the sea of the heart andflows to the top of t
heir heads; and here it is that veins burst--asone may see when a vein bursts in the nose, that all the blood frombelow
rises to the level of the burst vein. When the water rushesout of a burst vein in the earth it obeys the nature of other
 thingsheavier than the air, whence it always seeks the lowest places. [7]These waters traverse the body of the earth wi
th infiniteramifications.[Footnote: The greater part of this passage has been given as No.849 in the section on Anatomy.
]964.The same cause which stirs the humours in every species of animalbody and by which every injury is repaired, also m
oves the watersfrom the utmost depth of the sea to the greatest heights.965.It is the property of water that it constitu
tes the vital human ofthis arid earth; and the cause which moves it through its ramifiedveins, against the natural cours
e of heavy matters, is the sameproperty which moves the humours in every species of animal body.But that which crowns ou
r wonder in contemplating it is, that itrises from the utmost depths of the sea to the highest tops of themountains, and
 flowing from the opened veins returns to the lowseas; then once more, and with extreme swiftness, it mounts againand re
turns by the same descent, thus rising from the inside to theoutside, and going round from the lowest to the highest, fr
om whenceit rushes down in a natural course. Thus by these two movementscombined in a constant circulation, it travels t
hrough the veins ofthe earth.966.WHETHER WATER RISES FROM THE SEA TO THE TOPS OF MOUNTAINS.The water of the ocean cannot
 make its way from the bases to thetops of the mountains which bound it, but only so much rises as thedryness of the mou
ntain attracts. And if, on the contrary, the rain,which penetrates from the summit of the mountain to the base, whichis
the boundary of the sea, descends and softens the slope oppositeto the said mountain and constantly draws the water, lik
e a syphon[Footnote 11: Cicognola, Syphon. See Vol. I, Pl. XXIV, No. 1.] whichpours through its longest side, it must be
 this which draws up thewater of the sea; thus if _s n_ were the surface of the sea, and therain descends from the top o
f the mountain _a_ to _n_ on one side,and on the other sides it descends from _a_ to _m_, without a doubtthis would occu
r after the manner of distilling through felt, or ashappens through the tubes called syphons [Footnote 17: Cicognola,Syp
hon. See Vol. I, Pl. XXIV, No. 1.]. And at all times the waterwhich has softened the mountain, by the great rain which r
uns downthe two opposite sides, would constantly attract the rain _a n_, onits longest side together with the water from
 the sea, if that sideof the mountain _a m_ were longer than the other _a n_; but thiscannot be, because no part of the
earth which is not submerged bythe ocean can be lower than that ocean.967.OF SPRINGS OF WATER ON THE TOPS OF MOUNTAINS.I
t is quite evident that the whole surface of the ocean--when thereis no storm--is at an equal distance from the centre o
f the earth,and that the tops of the mountains are farther from this centre inproportion as they rise above the surface
of that sea; therefore ifthe body of the earth were not like that of man, it would beimpossible that the waters of the s
ea--being so much lower than themountains--could by their nature rise up to the summits of thesemountains. Hence it is t
o be believed that the same cause whichkeeps the blood at the top of the head in man keeps the water at thesummits of th
e mountains.[Footnote: This conception of the rising of the blood, which hasgiven rise to the comparison, was recognised
 as erroneous byLeonardo himself at a later period. It must be remembered that theMS. A, from which these passages are t
aken, was written about twentyyears earlier than the MS. Leic. (Nos. 963 and 849) and twenty-fiveyears before the MS. W.
 An. IV.There is, in the original a sketch with No. 968 which is notreproduced. It represents a hill of the same shape a
s that shown atNo. 982. There are veins, or branched streams, on the side of thehill, like those on the skull Pl. CVIII,
 No. 4]968.IN CONFIRMATION OF WHY THE WATER GOES TO THE TOPS OF MOUNTAINS.I say that just as the natural heat of the blo
od in the veins keepsit in the head of man,--for when the man is dead the cold bloodsinks to the lower parts--and when t
he sun is hot on the head of aman the blood increases and rises so much, with other humours, thatby pressure in the vein
s pains in the head are often caused; in thesame way veins ramify through the body of the earth, and by thenatural heat
which is distributed throughout the containing body,the water is raised through the veins to the tops of mountains. Andt
his water, which passes through a closed conduit inside the body ofthe mountain like a dead thing, cannot come forth fro
m its low placeunless it is warmed by the vital heat of the spring time. Again, theheat of the element of fire and, by d
ay, the heat of the sun, havepower to draw forth the moisture of the low parts of the mountainsand to draw them up, in t
he same way as it draws the clouds andcollects their moisture from the bed of the sea.969.That many springs of salt wate
r are found at great distances fromthe sea; this might happen because such springs pass through somemine of salt, like t
hat in Hungary where salt is hewn out of vastcaverns, just as stone is hewn.[Footnote: The great mine of Wieliczka in Ga
licia, out of which amillion cwt. of rock-salt are annually dug out, extends for 3000metres from West to East, and 1150
metres from North to South.]IV.OF RIVERS.On the way in which the sources of rivers are fed.970.OF THE ORIGIN OF RIVERS.T
he body of the earth, like the bodies of animals, is intersectedwith ramifications of waters which are all in connection
 and areconstituted to give nutriment and life to the earth and to itscreatures. These come from the depth of the sea an
d, after manyrevolutions, have to return to it by the rivers created by thebursting of these springs; and if you chose t
o say that the rains ofthe winter or the melting of the snows in summer were the cause ofthe birth of rivers, I could me
ntion the rivers which originate inthe torrid countries of Africa, where it never rains--and still lesssnows--because th
e intense heat always melts into air all the cloudswhich are borne thither by the winds. And if you chose to say thatsuc
h rivers, as increase in July and August, come from the snowswhich melt in May and June from the sun's approach to the s
nows onthe mountains of Scythia [Footnote 9: Scythia means here, as inAncient Geography, the whole of the Northern part
of Asia as far asIndia.], and that such meltings come down into certain valleys andform lakes, into which they enter by
springs and subterranean cavesto issue forth again at the sources of the Nile, this is false;because Scythia is lower th
an the sources of the Nile, and, besides,Scythia is only 400 miles from the Black sea and the sources of theNile are 300
0 miles distant from the sea of Egypt into which itswaters flow.The tide in estuaries.971.Book 9, of the meeting of rive
rs and of their ebb and flow. Thecause is the same in the sea, where it is caused by the straits ofGibraltar; and again
it is caused by whirlpools.[3] If two rivers meet together to form a straight line, and thenbelow two right angles take
their course together, the flow and ebbwill happen now in one river and now in the other above theirconfluence, and prin
cipally if the outlet for their united volume isno swifter than when they were separate. Here occur 4 instances.[Footnot
e: The first two lines of this passage have already beengiven as No. 957. In the margin, near line 3 of this passage, th
etext given as No. 919 is written.]On the alterations, caused in the courses of rivers by theirconfluence (972-974).972.
When a smaller river pours its waters into a larger one, and thatlarger one flows from the opposite direction, the cours
e of thesmaller river will bend up against the approach of the larger river;and this happens because, when the larger ri
ver fills up all its bedwith water, it makes an eddy in front of the mouth of the otherriver, and so carries the water p
oured in by the smaller river withits own. When the smaller river pours its waters into the largerone, which runs across
 the current at the mouth of the smallerriver, its waters will bend with the downward movement of the largerriver. [Foot
note: In the original sketches the word _Arno_ iswritten at the spot here marked _A_, at _R. Rifredi_, and at _M.Mugnone
_.]973.When the fulness of rivers is diminished, then the acute anglesformed at the junction of their branches become sh
orter at the sidesand wider at the point; like the current _a n_ and the current _dn_, which unite in _n_ when the river
 is at its greatest fulness. Isay, that when it is in this condition if, before the fullest time,_d n_ was lower than _a
 n_, at the time of fulness _d n_ will befull of sand and mud. When the water _d n_ falls, it will carry awaythe mud and
 remain with a lower bottom, and the channel _a n_finding itself the higher, will fling its waters into the lower, _dn_,
 and will wash away all the point of the sand-spit _b n c_, andthus the angle _a c d_ will remain larger than the angle
_a n d_ andthe sides shorter, as I said before.[Footnote: Above the first sketch we find, in the original, thisnote: "_S
opra il pote rubaconte alla torricella_"; and by thesecond, which represents a pier of a bridge, "_Sotto l'ospedal delce
ppo._"]974.WATER.OF THE MOVEMENT OF A SUDDEN RUSH MADE BY A RIVER IN ITS BEDPREVIOUSLY DRY.In proportion as the current
of the water given forth by thedraining of the lake is slow or rapid in the dry river bed, so willthis river be wider or
 narrower, or shallower or deeper in one placethan another, according to this proposition: the flow and ebb of thesea wh
ich enters the Mediterranean from the ocean, and of the riverswhich meet and struggle with it, will raise their waters m
ore orless in proportion as the sea is wider or narrower.[Footnote: In the margin is a sketch of a river which winds so
as toform islands.]Whirlpools.975.Whirlpools, that is to say caverns; that is to say places left byprecipitated waters.O
n the alterations in the channels of rivers.976.OF THE VIBRATION OF THE EARTH.The subterranean channels of waters, like
those which exist betweenthe air and the earth, are those which unceasingly wear away anddeepen the beds of their curren
ts.The origin of the sand in rivers (977. 978).977.A river that flows from mountains deposits a great quantity of larges
tones in its bed, which still have some of their angles and sides,and in the course of its flow it carries down smaller
stones withthe angles more worn; that is to say the large stones becomesmaller. And farther on it deposits coarse gravel
 and then smaller,and as it proceeds this becomes coarse sand and then finer, andgoing on thus the water, turbid with sa
nd and gravel, joins the sea;and the sand settles on the sea-shores, being cast up by the saltwaves; and there results t
he sand of so fine a nature as to seemalmost like water, and it will not stop on the shores of the sea butreturns by rea
son of its lightness, because it was originally formedof rotten leaves and other very light things. Still, beingalmost--
as was said--of the nature of water itself, it afterwards,when the weather is calm, settles and becomes solid at the bot
tom ofthe sea, where by its fineness it becomes compact and by itssmoothness resists the waves which glide over it; and
in this shellsare found; and this is white earth, fit for pottery.978.All the torrents of water flowing from the mountai
ns to the seacarry with them the stones from the hills to the sea, and by theinflux of the sea-water towards the mountai
ns; these stones werethrown back towards the mountains, and as the waters rose andretired, the stones were tossed about
by it and in rolling, theirangles hit together; then as the parts, which least resisted theblows, were worn off, the sto
nes ceased to be angular and becameround in form, as may be seen on the banks of the Elsa. And thoseremained larger whic
h were less removed from their native spot; andthey became smaller, the farther they were carried from that place,so tha
t in the process they were converted into small pebbles andthen into sand and at last into mud. After the sea had recede
d fromthe mountains the brine left by the sea with other humours of theearth made a concretion of these pebbles and this
 sand, so that thepebbles were converted into rock and the sand into tufa. And of thiswe see an example in the Adda wher
e it issues from the mountains ofComo and in the Ticino, the Adige and the Oglio coming from theGerman Alps, and in the
Arno at Monte Albano [Footnote 13: At thefoot of _Monte Albano_ lies Vinci, the birth place of Leonardo.Opposite, on the
 other bank of the Arno, is _Monte Lupo_.], nearMonte Lupo and Capraia where the rocks, which are very large, areall of
conglomerated pebbles of various kinds and colours.V.ON MOUNTAINS.The formation of mountains (979-983).979.Mountains are
 made by the currents of rivers.Mountains are destroyed by the currents of rivers.[Footnote: Compare 789.]980.That the N
orthern bases of some Alps are not yet petrified. And thisis plainly to be seen where the rivers, which cut through them
, flowtowards the North; where they cut through the strata in the livingstone in the higher parts of the mountains; and,
 where they join theplains, these strata are all of potter's clay; as is to be seen inthe valley of Lamona where the riv
er Lamona, as it issues from theAppenines, does these things on its banks.That the rivers have all cut and divided the m
ountains of the greatAlps one from the other. This is visible in the order of thestratified rocks, because from the summ
its of the banks, down to theriver the correspondence of the strata in the rocks is visible oneither side of the river.
That the stratified stones of themountains are all layers of clay, deposited one above the other bythe various floods of
 the rivers. That the different size of thestrata is caused by the difference in the floods--that is to saygreater or le
sser floods.981.The summits of mountains for a long time rise constantly.The opposite sides of the mountains always appr
oach each otherbelow; the depths of the valleys which are above the sphere of thewaters are in the course of time consta
ntly getting nearer to thecentre of the world.In an equal period, the valleys sink much more than the mountainsrise.The
bases of the mountains always come closer together.In proportion as the valleys become deeper, the more quickly aretheir
 sides worn away.982.In every concavity at the summit of the mountains we shall alwaysfind the divisions of the strata i
n the rocks.983.OF THE SEA WHICH ENCIRCLES THE EARTH.I find that of old, the state of the earth was that its plains were
all covered up and hidden by salt water. [Footnote: This passage hasalready been published by Dr. M. JORDAN: _Das Malerb
uch des L. daVinci, Leipzig_ 1873, p. 86. However, his reading of the textdiffers from mine.]The authorities for the stu
dy of the structure of the earth.984.Since things are much more ancient than letters, it is no marvel if,in our day, no
records exist of these seas having covered so manycountries; and if, moreover, some records had existed, war andconflagr
ations, the deluge of waters, the changes of languages andof laws have consumed every thing ancient. But sufficient for
us isthe testimony of things created in the salt waters, and found againin high mountains far from the seas.VI.GEOLOGICA
L PROBLEMS.985.In this work you have first to prove that the shells at a thousandbraccia of elevation were not carried t
here by the deluge, becausethey are seen to be all at one level, and many mountains are seen tobe above that level; and
to inquire whether the deluge was caused byrain or by the swelling of the sea; and then you must show how,neither by rai
n nor by swelling of the rivers, nor by the overflowof this sea, could the shells--being heavy objects--be floated upthe
 mountains by the sea, nor have carried there by the riversagainst the course of their waters.Doubts about the deluge.98
6.A DOUBTFUL POINT.Here a doubt arises, and that is: whether the deluge, which happenedat the time of Noah, was universa
l or not. And it would seem not,for the reasons now to be given: We have it in the Bible that thisdeluge lasted 40 days
and 40 nights of incessant and universal rain,and that this rain rose to ten cubits above the highest mountains inthe wo
rld. And if it had been that the rain was universal, it wouldhave covered our globe which is spherical in form. And this
spherical surface is equally distant in every part, from the centreof its sphere; hence the sphere of the waters being u
nder the sameconditions, it is impossible that the water upon it should move,because water, in itself, does not move unl
ess it falls; thereforehow could the waters of such a deluge depart, if it is proved thatit has no motion? and if it dep
arted how could it move unless itwent upwards? Here, then, natural reasons are wanting; hence toremove this doubt it is
necessary to call in a miracle to aid us, orelse to say that all this water was evaporated by the heat of thesun.[Footno
te: The passages, here given from the MS. Leic., havehitherto remained unknown. Some preliminary notes on the subject ar
eto be found in MS. F 8oa and 8ob; but as compared with the fullertreatment here given, they are, it seems to me, of sec
ondaryinterest. They contain nothing that is not repeated here moreclearly and fully. LIBRI, _Histoire des Sciences math
ematiques III_,pages 218--221, has printed the text of F 80a and 80b, therefore itseemed desirable to give my reasons fo
r not inserting it in thiswork.]That marine shells could not go up the mountains.987.OF THE DELUGE AND OF MARINE SHELLS.
If you were to say that the shells which are to be seen within theconfines of Italy now, in our days, far from the sea a
nd at suchheights, had been brought there by the deluge which left them there,I should answer that if you believe that t
his deluge rose 7 cubitsabove the highest mountains-- as he who measured it haswritten--these shells, which always live
near the sea-shore, shouldhave been left on the mountains; and not such a little way from thefoot of the mountains; nor
all at one level, nor in layers uponlayers. And if you were to say that these shells are desirous ofremaining near to th
e margin of the sea, and that, as it rose inheight, the shells quitted their first home, and followed theincrease of the
 waters up to their highest level; to this I answer,that the cockle is an animal of not more rapid movement than thesnai
l is out of water, or even somewhat slower; because it does notswim, on the contrary it makes a furrow in the sand by me
ans of itssides, and in this furrow it will travel each day from 3 to 4braccia; therefore this creature, with so slow a
motion, could nothave travelled from the Adriatic sea as far as Monferrato inLombardy [Footnote: _Monferrato di Lombardi
a_. The range of hills ofMonferrato is in Piedmont, and Casale di Monferrato belonged, inLeonardo's time, to the Marches
e di Mantova.], which is 250 milesdistance, in 40 days; which he has said who took account of thetime. And if you say th
at the waves carried them there, by theirgravity they could not move, excepting at the bottom. And if youwill not grant
me this, confess at least that they would have tostay at the summits of the highest mountains, in the lakes which areenc
losed among the mountains, like the lakes of Lario, or of Comoand il Maggiore [Footnote: _Lago di Lario._ Lacus Larius w
as thename given by the Romans to the lake of Como. It is evident that itis here a slip of the pen since the the words i
n the MS. are: _"ComeLago di Lario o'l Magare e di Como,"_ In the MS. after line 16 wecome upon a digression treating of
 the weight of water; this hashere been omitted. It is 11 lines long.] and of Fiesole, and ofPerugia, and others.And if
you should say that the shells were carried by the waves,being empty and dead, I say that where the dead went they were
notfar removed from the living; for in these mountains living ones arefound, which are recognisable by the shells being
in pairs; and theyare in a layer where there are no dead ones; and a little higher upthey are found, where they were thr
own by the waves, all the deadones with their shells separated, near to where the rivers fell intothe sea, to a great de
pth; like the Arno which fell from theGonfolina near to Monte Lupo [Footnote: _Monte Lupo_, compare 970,13; it is betwee
n Empoli and Florence.], where it left a deposit ofgravel which may still be seen, and which has agglomerated; and ofsto
nes of various districts, natures, and colours and hardness,making one single conglomerate. And a little beyond the sand
stoneconglomerate a tufa has been formed, where it turned towards CastelFlorentino; farther on, the mud was deposited in
 which the shellslived, and which rose in layers according to the levels at which theturbid Arno flowed into that sea. A
nd from time to time the bottomof the sea was raised, depositing these shells in layers, as may beseen in the cutting at
 Colle Gonzoli, laid open by the Arno which iswearing away the base of it; in which cutting the said layers ofshells are
 very plainly to be seen in clay of a bluish colour, andvarious marine objects are found there. And if the earth of ourh
emisphere is indeed raised by so much higher than it used to be, itmust have become by so much lighter by the waters whi
ch it lostthrough the rift between Gibraltar and Ceuta; and all the more thehigher it rose, because the weight of the wa
ters which were thuslost would be added to the earth in the other hemisphere. And if theshells had been carried by the m
uddy deluge they would have beenmixed up, and separated from each other amidst the mud, and not inregular steps and laye
rs-- as we see them now in our time.The marine shells were not produced away from the sea.988.As to those who say that s
hells existed for a long time and wereborn at a distance from the sea, from the nature of the place and ofthe cycles, wh
ich can influence a place to produce suchcreatures--to them it may be answered: such an influence could notplace the ani
mals all on one line, except those of the same sort andage; and not the old with the young, nor some with an operculum a
ndothers without their operculum, nor some broken and others whole,nor some filled with sea-sand and large and small fra
gments of othershells inside the whole shells which remained open; nor the claws ofcrabs without the rest of their bodie
s; nor the shells of otherspecies stuck on to them like animals which have moved about onthem; since the traces of their
 track still remain, on the outside,after the manner of worms in the wood which they ate into. Nor wouldthere be found a
mong them the bones and teeth of fish which somecall arrows and others serpents' tongues, nor would so many[Footnote: I.
 Scilla argued against this hypothesis, which was stillaccepted in his days; see: _La vana Speculazione, Napoli_ 1670.]p
ortions of various animals be found all together if they had notbeen thrown on the sea shore. And the deluge cannot have
 carriedthem there, because things that are heavier than water do not floaton the water. But these things could not be a
t so great a height ifthey had not been carried there by the water, such a thing beingimpossible from their weight. In p
laces where the valleys have notbeen filled with salt sea water shells are never to be seen; as isplainly visible in the
 great valley of the Arno above Gonfolina; arock formerly united to Monte Albano, in the form of a very highbank which k
ept the river pent up, in such a way that before itcould flow into the sea, which was afterwards at its foot, it formedt
wo great lakes; of which the first was where we now see the city ofFlorence together with Prato and Pistoia, and Monte A
lbano. Itfollowed the rest of its bank as far as where Serravalle now stands.>From the Val d'Arno upwards, as far as Are
zzo, another lake wasformed, which discharged its waters into the former lake. It wasclosed at about the spot where now
we see Girone, and occupied thewhole of that valley above for a distance of 40 miles in length.This valley received on i
ts bottom all the soil brought down by theturbid waters. And this is still to be seen at the foot of PratoMagno; it ther
e lies very high where the rivers have not worn itaway. Across this land are to be seen the deep cuts of the riversthat
have passed there, falling from the great mountain of PratoMagno; in these cuts there are no vestiges of any shells or o
fmarine soil. This lake was joined with that of Perugia [Footnote:See PI. CXIII.]A great quantity of shells are to be se
en where the rivers flow intothe sea, because on such shores the waters are not so salt owing tothe admixture of the fre
sh water, which is poured into it. Evidenceof this is to be seen where, of old, the Appenines poured theirrivers into th
e Adriatic sea; for there in most places greatquantities of shells are to be found, among the mountains, togetherwith bl
uish marine clay; and all the rocks which are torn off insuch places are full of shells. The same may be observed to hav
ebeen done by the Arno when it fell from the rock of Gonfolina intothe sea, which was not so very far below; for at that
 time it washigher than the top of San Miniato al Tedesco, since at the highestsummit of this the shores may be seen ful
l of shells and oysterswithin its flanks. The shells did not extend towards Val di Nievole,because the fresh waters of t
he Arno did not extend so far.That the shells were not carried away from the sea by the deluge,because the waters which
came from the earth although they drew thesea towards the earth, were those which struck its depths; becausethe water wh
ich goes down from the earth, has a stronger currentthan that of the sea, and in consequence is more powerful, and itent
ers beneath the sea water and stirs the depths and carries withit all sorts of movable objects which are to be found in
the earth,such as the above-mentioned shells and other similar things. And inproportion as the water which comes from th
e land is muddier thansea water it is stronger and heavier than this; therefore I see noway of getting the said shells s
o far in land, unless they had beenborn there. If you were to tell me that the river Loire [Footnote:Leonardo has writte
n Era instead of Loera or Loira--perhaps underthe mistaken idea that _Lo_ was an article.],which traverses Francecovers
when the sea rises more than eighty miles of country, becauseit is a district of vast plains, and the sea rises about 20
 braccia,and shells are found in this plain at the distance of 80 miles fromthe sea; here I answer that the flow and ebb
 in our MediterraneanSea does not vary so much; for at Genoa it does not rise at all, andat Venice but little, and very
little in Africa; and where it varieslittle it covers but little of the country.The course of the water of a river alway
s rises higher in a placewhere the current is impeded; it behaves as it does where it isreduced in width to pass under t
he arches of a bridge.Further researches (989-991).989.A CONFUTATION OF THOSE WHO SAY THAT SHELLS MAY HAVE BEEN CARRIED
TOA DISTANCE OF MANY DAYS' JOURNEY FROM THE SEA BY THE DELUGE, WHICHWAS SO HIGH AS TO BE ABOVE THOSE HEIGHTS.I say that
the deluge could not carry objects, native to the sea, upto the mountains, unless the sea had already increased so as to
create inundations as high up as those places; and this increasecould not have occurred because it would cause a vacuum;
 and if youwere to say that the air would rush in there, we have alreadyconcluded that what is heavy cannot remain above
 what is light,whence of necessity we must conclude that this deluge was caused byrain water, so that all these waters r
an to the sea, and the sea didnot run up the mountains; and as they ran to the sea, they thrustthe shells from the shore
 of the sea and did not draw them to wardsthemselves. And if you were then to say that the sea, raised by therain water,
 had carried these shells to such a height, we havealready said that things heavier than water cannot rise upon it, butr
emain at the bottom of it, and do not move unless by the impact ofthe waves. And if you were to say that the waves had c
arried them tosuch high spots, we have proved that the waves in a great depth movein a contrary direction at the bottom
to the motion at the top, andthis is shown by the turbidity of the sea from the earth washed downnear its shores. Anythi
ng which is lighter than the water moves withthe waves, and is left on the highest level of the highest margin ofthe wav
es. Anything which is heavier than the water moves, suspendedin it, between the surface and the bottom; and from these t
woconclusions, which will be amply proved in their place, we inferthat the waves of the surface cannot convey shells, si
nce they areheavier than water.If the deluge had to carry shells three hundred and four hundredmiles from the sea, it wo
uld have carried them mixed with variousother natural objects heaped together; and we see at such distancesoysters all t
ogether, and sea-snails, and cuttlefish, and all theother shells which congregate together, all to be found together and
dead; and the solitary shells are found wide apart from each other,as we may see them on sea-shores every day. And if we
 find oystersof very large shells joined together and among them very many whichstill have the covering attached, indica
ting that they were lefthere by the sea, and still living when the strait of Gibraltar wascut through; there are to be s
een, in the mountains of Parma andPiacenza, a multitude of shells and corals, full of holes, and stillsticking to the ro
cks there. When I was making the great horse forMilan, a large sack full was brought to me in my workshop by certainpeas
ants; these were found in that place and among them were manypreserved in their first freshness.Under ground, and under
the foundations of buildings, timbers arefound of wrought beams and already black. Such were found in my timein those di
ggings at Castel Fiorentino. And these had been in thatdeep place before the sand carried by the Arno into the sea, then
covering the plain, had heen raised to such a height; and before theplains of Casentino had been so much lowered, by the
 earth beingconstantly carried down from them.[Footnote: These lines are written in the margin.]And if you were to say t
hat these shells were created, and werecontinually being created in such places by the nature of the spot,and of the hea
vens which might have some influence there, such anopinion cannot exist in a brain of much reason; because here are they
ears of their growth, numbered on their shells, and there are largeand small ones to be seen which could not have grown
without food,and could not have fed without motion--and here they could not move[Footnote: These lines are written in th
e margin.]990.That in the drifts, among one and another, there are still to befound the traces of the worms which crawle
d upon them when they werenot yet dry. And all marine clays still contain shells, and theshells are petrified together w
ith the clay. From their firmness andunity some persons will have it that these animals were carried upto places remote
from the sea by the deluge. Another sect ofignorant persons declare that Nature or Heaven created them in theseplaces by
 celestial influences, as if in these places we did notalso find the bones of fishes which have taken a long time to gro
w;and as if, we could not count, in the shells of cockles and snails,the years and months of their life, as we do in the
 horns of bullsand oxen, and in the branches of plants that have never been cut inany part. Besides, having proved by th
ese signs the length of theirlives, it is evident, and it must be admitted, that these animalscould not live without mov
ing to fetch their food; and we find inthem no instrument for penetrating the earth or the rock where wefind them enclos
ed. But how could we find in a large snail shell thefragments and portions of many other sorts of shells, of varioussort
s, if they had not been thrown there, when dead, by the waves ofthe sea like the other light objects which it throws on
the earth?Why do we find so many fragments and whole shells between layer andlayer of stone, if this had not formerly be
en covered on the shoreby a layer of earth thrown up by the sea, and which was afterwardspetrified? And if the deluge be
fore mentioned had carried them tothese parts of the sea, you might find these shells at the boundaryof one drift but no
t at the boundary between many drifts. We mustalso account for the winters of the years during which the seamultiplied t
he drifts of sand and mud brought down by theneighbouring rivers, by washing down the shores; and if you chose tosay tha
t there were several deluges to produce these rifts and theshells among them, you would also have to affirm that such a
delugetook place every year. Again, among the fragments of these shells,it must be presumed that in those places there w
ere sea coasts,where all the shells were thrown up, broken, and divided, and neverin pairs, since they are found alive i
n the sea, with two valves,each serving as a lid to the other; and in the drifts of rivers andon the shores of the sea t
hey are found in fragments. And within thelimits of the separate strata of rocks they are found, few in numberand in pai
rs like those which were left by the sea, buried alive inthe mud, which subsequently dried up and, in time, was petrifie
d.991.And if you choose to say that it was the deluge which carried theseshells away from the sea for hundreds of miles,
 this cannot havehappened, since that deluge was caused by rain; because rainnaturally forces the rivers to rush towards
 the sea with all thethings they carry with them, and not to bear the dead things of thesea shores to the mountains. And
 if you choose to say that thedeluge afterwards rose with its waters above the mountains, themovement of the sea must ha
ve been so sluggish in its rise againstthe currents of the rivers, that it could not have carried, floatingupon it, thin
gs heavier than itself; and even if it had supportedthem, in its receding it would have left them strewn about, invariou
s spots. But how are we to account for the corals which arefound every day towards Monte Ferrato in Lombardy, with the h
oles ofthe worms in them, sticking to rocks left uncovered by the currentsof rivers? These rocks are all covered with st
ocks and families ofoysters, which as we know, never move, but always remain with one oftheir halves stuck to a rock, an
d the other they open to feedthemselves on the animalcules that swim in the water, which, hopingto find good feeding gro
und, become the food of these shells. We donot find that the sand mixed with seaweed has been petrified,because the weed
 which was mingled with it has shrunk away, and thisthe Po shows us every day in the debris of its banks.Other problems
(992-994).992.Why do we find the bones of great fishes and oysters and corals andvarious other shells and sea-snails on
the high summits of mountainsby the sea, just as we find them in low seas?993.You now have to prove that the shells cann
ot have originated if notin salt water, almost all being of that sort; and that the shells inLombardy are at four levels
, and thus it is everywhere, having beenmade at various times. And they all occur in valleys that opentowards the seas.9
94.>From the two lines of shells we are forced to say that the earthindignantly submerged under the sea and so the first
 layer was made;and then the deluge made the second.[Footnote: This note is in the early writing of about 1470--1480. On
the same sheet are the passages No. 1217 and 1219. Compare also No.1339. All the foregoing chapters are from Manuscripts
 of about 1510.This explains the want of connection and the contradiction betweenthis and the foregoing texts.]VII.ON TH
E ATMOSPHERE.Constituents of the atmosphere.995.That the brightness of the air is occasioned by the water which hasdisso
lved itself in it into imperceptible molecules. These, beinglighted by the sun from the opposite side, reflect the brigh
tnesswhich is visible in the air; and the azure which is seen in it iscaused by the darkness that is hidden beyond the a
ir. [Footnote:Compare Vol. I, No. 300.]On the motion of air (996--999).996.That the return eddies of wind at the mouth o
f certain valleysstrike upon the waters and scoop them out in a great hollow, whirlthe water into the air in the form of
 a column, and of the colour ofa cloud. And I saw this thing happen on a sand bank in the Arno,where the sand was hollow
ed out to a greater depth than the statureof a man; and with it the gravel was whirled round and flung aboutfor a great
space; it appeared in the air in the form of a greatbell-tower; and the top spread like the branches of a pine tree, and
then it bent at the contact of the direct wind, which passed overfrom the mountains.997.The element of fire acts upon a
wave of air in the same way as theair does on water, or as water does on a mass of sand --that isearth; and their motion
s are in the same proportions as those of themotors acting upon them.998.OF MOTION.I ask whether the true motion of the
clouds can be known by themotion of their shadows; and in like manner of the motion of thesun.999.To know better the dir
ection of the winds. [Footnote: In connectionwith this text I may here mention a hygrometer, drawn and probablyinvented
by Leonardo. A facsimile of this is given in Vol. I, p. 297with the note: _'Modi di pesare l'arie eddi sapere quando s'a
arrompere il tepo'_ (Mode of weighing the air and of knowing whenthe weather will change); by the sponge _"Spugnea"_ is
written.]The globe an organism.1000.Nothing originates in a spot where there is no sentient, vegetableand rational life;
 feathers grow upon birds and are changed everyyear; hairs grow upon animals and are changed every year, exceptingsome p
arts, like the hairs of the beard in lions, cats and theirlike. The grass grows in the fields, and the leaves on the tre
es,and every year they are, in great part, renewed. So that we mightsay that the earth has a spirit of growth; that its
flesh is thesoil, its bones the arrangement and connection of the rocks of whichthe mountains are composed, its cartilag
e the tufa, and its bloodthe springs of water. The pool of blood which lies round the heartis the ocean, and its breathi
ng, and the increase and decrease ofthe blood in the pulses, is represented in the earth by the flow andebb of the sea;
and the heat of the spirit of the world is the firewhich pervades the earth, and the seat of the vegetative soul is inth
e fires, which in many parts of the earth find vent in baths andmines of sulphur, and in volcanoes, as at Mount Aetna in
 Sicily, andin many other places.[Footnote: Compare No. 929.]_XVII.__Topographical Notes.__A large part of the texts pub
lished in this section might perhapshave found their proper place in connection with the foregoingchapters on Physical G
eography. But these observations on PhysicalGeography, of whatever kind they may be, as soon as they arelocalised acquir
e a special interest and importance and particularlyas bearing on the question whether Leonardo himself made theobservat
ions recorded at the places mentioned or merely noted thestatements from hearsay. In a few instances he himself tells us
 thathe writes at second hand. In some cases again, although the styleand expressions used make it seem highly probable
that he hasderived his information from others-- though, as it seems to me,these cases are not very numerous--we find, o
n the other hand, amongthese topographical notes a great number of observations, aboutwhich it is extremely difficult to
 form a decided opinion. Of whatthe Master's life and travels may have been throughout hissixty-seven years of life we k
now comparatively little; for a longcourse of time, and particularly from about 1482 to 1486, we do noteven know with ce
rtainty that he was living in Italy. Thus, from abiographical point of view a very great interest attaches to some ofthe
 topographical notes, and for this reason it seemed that it wouldadd to their value to arrange them in a group by themse
lves.Leonardo's intimate knowledge with places, some of which werecertainly remote from his native home, are of importan
ce ascontributing to decide the still open question as to the extent ofLeonardo's travels. We shall find in these notes
a confirmation ofthe view, that the MSS. in which the Topographical Notes occur arein only a very few instances such dia
ries as may have been in useduring a journey. These notes are mostly found in the MSS. books ofhis later and quieter yea
rs, and it is certainly remarkable thatLeonardo is very reticent as to the authorities from whom he quoteshis facts and
observations: For instance, as to the Straits ofGibraltar, the Nile, the Taurus Mountains and the Tigris andEuphrates. I
s it likely that he, who declared that in all scientificresearch, his own experience should be the foundation of hisstat
ements (see XIX Philosophy No. 987--991,) should here have madean exception to this rule without mentioning it?__As for
instance in the discussion as to the equilibrium of the massof water in the Mediterranean Sea--a subject which, it may b
eobserved, had at that time attracted the interest and study ofhardly any other observer. The acute remarks, in Nos. 985
--993, onthe presence of shells at the tops of mountains, suffice toprove--as it seems to me--that it was not in his nat
ure to allowhimself to be betrayed into wide generalisations, extending beyondthe limits of his own investigations, even
 by such brilliant resultsof personal study.__Most of these Topographical Notes, though suggesting very carefuland thoro
ugh research, do not however, as has been said, affordnecessarily indisputable evidence that that research was Leonardo'
sown. But it must be granted that in more than one instanceprobability is in favour of this idea.__Among the passages wh
ich treat somewhat fully of the topography ofEastern places by far the most interesting is a description of theTaurus Mo
untains; but as this text is written in the style of aformal report and, in the original, is associated with certainlett
ers which give us the history of its origin, I have thought itbest not to sever it from that connection. It will be foun
d underNo. XXI (Letters).__That Florence, and its neighbourhood, where Leonardo spent hisearly years, should be nowhere
mentioned except in connection withthe projects for canals, which occupied his attention for some shorttime during the f
irst ten years of the XVIth century, need notsurprise us. The various passages relating to the construction ofcanals in
Tuscany, which are put together at the beginning, areimmediately followed by those which deal with schemes for canals in
Lombardy; and after these come notes on the city and vicinity ofMilan as well as on the lakes of North Italy.__The notes
 on some towns of Central Italy which Leonardo visited in1502, when in the service of Cesare Borgia, are reproduced here
 inthe same order as in the note book used during these travels (MS.L., Institut de France). These notes have but little
 interest inthemselves excepting as suggesting his itinerary. The maps of thedistricts drawn by Leonardo at the time are
 more valuable (see No.1054 note). The names on these maps are not written from right toleft, but in the usual manner, a
nd we are permitted to infer thatthey were made in obedience to some command, possibly for the use ofCesare Borgia himse
lf; the fact that they remained nevertheless inLeonardo's hands is not surprising when we remember the suddenpolitical c
hanges and warlike events of the period. There can be nodoubt that these maps, which are here published for the first ti
me,are original in the strictest sense of the word, that is to saydrawn from observations of the places themselves; this
 is proved bythe fact--among others--that we find among his manuscripts not onlythe finished maps themselves but the rou
gh sketches and studies forthem. And it would perhaps be difficult to point out among theabundant contributions to geogr
aphical knowledge published duringthe XVIth century, any maps at all approaching these in accuracy andfinish.__The inter
esting map of the world, so far as it was then known,which is among the Leonardo MSS. at Windsor (published in the_'Arch
aeologia' _Vol. XI) cannot be attributed to the Master, as theMarchese Girolamo d'Adda has sufficiently proved; it has n
ottherefore been reproduced here.__Such of Leonardo's observations on places in Italy as were madebefore or after his of
ficial travels as military engineer to CesareBorgia, have been arranged in alphabetical order, under Nos.1034-1054. The
most interesting are those which relate to the Alpsand the Appenines, Nos. 1057-1068.__Most of the passages in which Fra
nce is mentioned have hithertoremained unknown, as well as those which treat of the countriesbordering on the Mediterran
ean, which come at the end of thissection. Though these may be regarded as of a more questionableimportance in their bea
ring on the biography of the Master thanthose which mention places in France, it must be allowed that theyare interestin
g as showing the prominent place which the countriesof the East held in his geographical studies. He never once alludest
o the discovery of America._I.ITALY.Canals in connection with the Arno (1001-1008).1001.CANAL OF FLORENCE.Sluices should
 be made in the valley of la Chiana at Arezzo, so thatwhen, in the summer, the Arno lacks water, the canal may not remai
ndry: and let this canal be 20 braccia wide at the bottom, and at thetop 30, and 2 braccia deep, or 4, so that two of th
ese braccia mayflow to the mills and the meadows, which will benefit the country;and Prato, Pistoia and Pisa, as well as
 Florence, will gain twohundred thousand ducats a year, and will lend a hand and money tothis useful work; and the Lucch
ese the same, for the lake of Sestowill be navigable; I shall direct it to Prato and Pistoia, and cutthrough Serravalle
and make an issue into the lake; for there willbe no need of locks or supports, which are not lasting and so willalways
be giving trouble in working at them and keeping them up.And know that in digging this canal where it is 4 braccia deep,
 itwill cost 4 dinari the square braccio; for twice the depth 6 dinari,if you are making 4 braccia [Footnote: This passa
ge is illustratedby a slightly sketched map, on which these places are indicated fromWest to East: Pisa, Luccha, Lago, S
eravalle, Pistoja, Prato,Firenze.] and there are but 2 banks; that is to say one from thebottom of the trench to the sur
face of the edges of it, and theother from these edges to the top of the ridge of earth which willbe raised on the margi
n of the bank. And if this bank were of doublethe depth only the first bank will be increased, that is 4 bracciaincrease
d by half the first cost; that is to say that if at first 4dinari were paid for 2 banks, for 3 it would come to 6, at 2
dinarithe bank, if the trench measured 16 braccia at the bottom; again, ifthe trench were 16 braccia wide and 4 deep, co
ming to 4 lire for thework, 4 Milan dinari the square braccio; a trench which was 32braccia at the bottom would come to
8 dinari the square braccio.1002.>From the wall of the Arno at [the gate of] la Giustizia to the bankof the Arno at Sard
igna where the walls are, to the mills, is 7400braccia, that is 2 miles and 1400 braccia and beyond the Arno is5500 brac
cia.[Footnote: 2. _Giustizia_. By this the Porta della Giustizia seemsto be meant; from the XVth to the XVIth centuries
it was alsocommonly known as Porta Guelfa, Porta San Francesco del Renaio,Porta Nuova, and Porta Reale. It was close to
the Arno opposite tothe Porta San Niccolo, which still exists.]1003.By guiding the Arno above and below a treasure will
be found in eachacre of ground by whomsoever will.1004.The wall of the old houses runs towards the gate of San Nicolo.[F
ootnote: By the side of this text there is an indistinct sketch,resembling that given under No.973. On the bank is writt
en the word_Casace_. There then follows in the original a passage of 12 linesin which the consequences of the windings o
f the river arediscussed. A larger but equally hasty diagram on the same pagerepresents the shores of the Arno inside Fl
orence as in two parallellines. Four horizontal lines indicate the bridges. By the side thesemeasures are stated in figu
res: I. (at the Ponte alla Carraja):_230--largho br. 12 e 2 di spoda e 14 di pile e a 4 pilastri;_ 2.(at the Ponte S. Tr
inita); _l88--largho br. 15 e 2 di spode he 28di pilastri for delle spode e pilastri so 2;_ 3. (at the Pontevecchio); _p
ote lung br. 152 e largo;_ 4. (at the Ponte alleGrazie): _290 ellargo 12 e 2 di spode e 6 di pili._There is, in MS. W. L
. 2l2b, a sketched plan of Florence, with thefollowing names of gates:_Nicholo--Saminiato--Giorgo--Ghanolini--Porta San
Fredian--Prato--Faenza--Ghallo--Pinti--Giustitia_.]1005.The ruined wall is 640 braccia; 130 is the wall remaining with t
hemill; 300 braccia were broken in 4 years by Bisarno.1006.They do not know why the Arno will never remain in a channel.
 It isbecause the rivers which flow into it deposit earth where theyenter, and wear it away on the opposite side, bendin
g the river inthat direction. The Arno flows for 6 miles between la Caprona andLeghorn; and for 12 through the marshes,
which extend 32 miles, and16 from La Caprona up the river, which makes 48; by the Arno fromFlorence beyond 16 miles; to
Vico 16 miles, and the canal is 5; fromFlorence to Fucechio it is 40 miles by the river Arno.56 miles by the Arno from F
lorence to Vico; by the Pistoia canal itis 44 miles. Thus it is 12 miles shorter by the canal than by theArno.[Footnote:
 This passage is written by the side of a map washed inIndian ink, of the course of the Arno; it is evidently a sketch f
ora completer map.These investigations may possibly be connected with the followingdocuments. _Francesco Guiducci alla B
alia di Firenze. Dal Campocontro Pisa_ 24 _Luglio_ 1503 (_Archivio di Stato, Firenze, Letterealla Balia_; published by J
. GAYE, _Carteggio inedito d'Artisti,Firenze_ 1840, _Tom. II_, p. 62): _Ex Castris, FranciscusGhuiduccius,_ 24. _Jul._ 1
503. _Appresso fu qui hieri con una di V.Signoria Alexandro degli Albizi insieme con Leonardo da Vinci etcerti altri, et
 veduto el disegno insieme con el ghovernatore, doppomolte discussioni et dubii conclusesi che l'opera fussi molto alpro
posito, o si veramente Arno volgersi qui, o restarvi con uncanale, che almeno vieterebbe che le colline da nemici nonpot
rebbono essere offese; come tucto referiranno loro a bocha V. S._And, _Archivio di Stato, Firenze, Libro d'Entrata e Usc
ita di cassade' Magnifici Signori di luglio e agosto_1503 _a_ 51 _T.: Andata di Leonardo al Campo sotto Pisa. Speseextra
ordinarie dieno dare a di XXVI di luglio L. LVI sol. XII perloro a Giovanni Piffero; e sono per tanti, asegnia avere spe
xi invetture di sei chavalli a spese di vitto per andare chon Lionardo daVinci a livellare Arno in quello di Pisa per le
vallo del lilo suo._(Published by MILANESI, _Archivio Storico Italiano, Serie III, Tom.XVI._} VASARI asserts: _(Leonardo
) fu il primo ancora, chegiovanetto discorresse sopra il fiume d'Arno per metterlo in canaleda Pisa a Fiorenza_ (ed. SAN
SONI, IV, 20).The passage above is in some degree illustrated by the map on Pl.CXII, where the course of the Arno westwa
rd from Empoli is shown.]1007.The eddy made by the Mensola, when the Arno is low and the Mensolafull.[Footnote: _Mensola
_ is a mountain stream which falls into the Arnoabout a mile and a half above Florence.A=Arno, I=Isola, M=Mvgone, P=Pesa
, N=Mesola.]1008.That the river which is to be turned from one place to another mustbe coaxed and not treated roughly or
 with violence; and to do this asort of floodgate should be made in the river, and then lower downone in front of it and
 in like manner a third, fourth and fifth, sothat the river may discharge itself into the channel given to it, orthat by
 this means it may be diverted from the place it has damaged,as was done in Flanders--as I was told by Niccolo di Forsor
e.How to protect and repair the banks washed by the water, as belowthe island of Cocomeri.Ponte Rubaconte (Fig. 1); belo
w [the palaces] Bisticci and Canigiani(Fig. 2). Above the flood gate of la Giustizia (Fig. 3); _a b_ is asand bank oppos
ite the end of the island of the Cocomeri in themiddle of the Arno (Fig. 4). [Footnote: The course of the river Arnois a
lso discussed in Nos. 987 and 988.]Canals in the Milanese (1009-1013).1009.The canal of San Cristofano at Milan made May
 3rd 1509. [Footnote:This observation is written above a washed pen and ink drawing whichhas been published as Tav. VI i
n the _,,Saggio."_ The editors ofthat work explain the drawing as _"uno Studio di bocche perestrazione d'acqua."_]1010.O
F THE CANAL OF MARTESANA.By making the canal of Martesana the water of the Adda is greatlydiminished by its distribution
 over many districts for theirrigation of the fields. A remedy for this would be to make severallittle channels, since t
he water drunk up by the earth is of no moreuse to any one, nor mischief neither, because it is taken from noone; and by
 making these channels the water which before was lostreturns again and is once more serviceable and useful to men.[Foot
note: _"el navilio di Martagano"_ is also mentioned in a notewritten in red chalk, MS. H2 17a Leonardo has, as it seems,
 littleto do with Lodovico il Moro's scheme to render this canal navigable.The canal had been made in 1460 by Bertonino
da Novara. Il Moroissued his degree in 1493, but Leonardo's notes about this canalwere, with the exception of one (No. 1
343), written about sixteenyears later.]1011.No canal which is fed by a river can be permanent if the riverwhence it ori
ginates is not wholly closed up, like the canal ofMartesana which is fed by the Ticino.1012.>From the beginning of the c
anal to the mill.>From the beginning of the canal of Brivio to the mill of Travagliais 2794 trabochi, that is 11176 brac
cia, which is more than 3 milesand two thirds; and here the canal is 57 braccia higher than thesurface of the water of t
he Adda, giving a fall of two inches inevery hundred trabochi; and at that spot we propose to take theopening of our can
al.[Footnote: The following are written on the sketches: At the placemarked _N: navilio da dacquiue_ (canal of running w
ater); at _M:molin del Travaglia_ (Mill of Travaglia); at _R: rochetta ssantamaria_ (small rock of Santa Maria); at _A:
Adda;_ at _L: Lagho diLecho ringorgato alli 3 corni in Adda,--Concha perpetua_ (lake ofLecco overflowing at Tre Corni, i
n Adda,-- a permanent sluice). Nearthe second sketch, referring to the sluice near _Q: qui la chatenattalie d'u peso_ (h
ere the chain is in one piece). At _M_ in thelower sketch: _mol del travaglia, nel cavare la concha il terenoara chotrap
ero co cassa d'acqua._ (Mill of Travaglia, in diggingout the sluice the soil will have as a counterpoise a vessel ofwate
r).]1013.If it be not reported there that this is to be a public canal, itwill be necessary to pay for the land; [Footno
te 3: _il re_. LouisXII or Francis I of France. It is hardly possible to doubt that thecanals here spoken of were intend
ed to be in the Milanese. Comparewith this passage the rough copy of a letter by Leonardo, to the_"Presidente dell' Uffi
cio regolatore dell' acqua"_ on No. 1350. Seealso the note to No. 745, 1. 12.] and the king will pay it byremitting the
taxes for a year.Estimates and preparatory studies for canals (1014. 1015).1014.CANAL.The canal which may be 16 braccia
wide at the bottom and 20 at thetop, we may say is on the average 18 braccia wide, and if it is 4braccia deep, at 4 dina
ri the square braccia; it will only cost 900ducats, to excavate by the mile, if the square braccio is calculatedin ordin
ary braccia; but if the braccia are those used in measuringland, of which every 4 are equal to 4 1/2 and if by the mile
weunderstand three thousand ordinary braccia; turned into landbraccia, these 3000 braccia will lack 1/4; there remain 22
50braccia, which at 4 dinari the braccio will amount to 675 ducats amile. At 3 dinari the square braccio, the mile will
amount to 5061/4 ducats so that the excavation of 30 miles of the canal willamount to 15187 1/2 ducats.1015.To make the
great canal, first make the smaller one and conduct intoit the waters which by a wheel will help to fill the great one.N
otes on buildings in Milan (1016-1019)1016.Indicate the centre of Milan.Moforte--porta resa--porta nova--strada nova--na
vilio--portacumana--barco--porta giovia--porta vercellina--porta scoAnbrogio--porta Tesinese--torre dell' Imperatore-- p
ortaLodovica--acqua.[Footnote: See Pl. CIX. The original sketch is here reduced to abouthalf its size. The gates of the
town are here named, beginning atthe right hand and following the curved line. In the bird's eye viewof Milan below, the
 cathedral is plainly recognisable in the middle;to the right is the tower of San Gottardo. The square, above thenumber
9147, is the Lazzaretto, which was begun in 1488. On the leftthe group of buildings of the _'Castello'_ will be noticed.
 On thesketched Plan of Florence (see No. 1004 note) Leonardo has writtenon the margin the following names of gates of M
ilan: Vercellina--Ticinese--Ludovica--Romana--Orientale--Nova--Beatrice--Cumana--Compare too No. 1448, 11. 5, 12.]1017.T
he moat of Milan.Canal 2 braccia wide.The castle with the moats full.The filling of the moats of the Castle of Milan.101
8.THE BATH.To heat the water for the stove of the Duchess take four parts ofcold water to three parts of hot water.[Foot
note: _Duchessa di Milano_, Beatrice d'Este, wife of Ludovicoil Moro to whom she was married, in 1491. She died in June
1497.]1019.In the Cathedral at the pulley of the nail of the cross.Item.To place the mass _v r_ in the...[Footnote: On t
his passage AMORETTI remarks _(Memorie Storiche_chap. IX): _Nell'anno stesso lo veggiamo formare un congegno dicarucole
e di corde, con cui trasportare in piu venerabile e piusicuro luogo, cioe nell'ultima arcata della nave di mezzo dellame
tropolitana, la sacra reliquia del Santo Chiodo, che ivi ancor sivenera. Al fol. 15 del codice segnato Q. R. in 16, egli
 ci halasciata di tal congegno una doppia figura, cioe una di quattrocarucole, e una di tre colle rispettive corde, sogg
iugnandovi: inDomo alla carucola del Chiodo della Croce._AMORETTI'S views as to the mark on the MS, and the date when it
 waswritten are, it may be observed, wholly unfounded. The MS. L, inwhich it occurs, is of the year 1502, and it is very
 unlikely thatLeonardo was in Milan at that time; this however would not preventthe remark, which is somewhat obscure, f
rom applying to theCathedral at Milan.]1020.OF THE FORCE OF THE VACUUM FORMED IN A MOMENT.I saw, at Milan, a thunderbolt
 fall on the tower della Credenza onits Northern side, and it descended with a slow motion down thatside, and then at on
ce parted from that tower and carried with itand tore away from that wall a space of 3 braccia wide and two deep;and thi
s wall was 4 braccia thick and was built of thin and smallold bricks; and this was dragged out by the vacuum which the f
lameof the thunderbolt had caused, &c.[Footnote: With reference to buildings at Milan see also Nos. 751and 756, and Pl.
XCV, No. 2 (explained on p. 52), Pl. C (explainedon pages 60-62). See also pages 25, 39 and 40.]Remarks on natural pheno
mena in and near Milan (1021. 1022).1021.I have already been to see a great variety (of atmospheric effects).And lately
over Milan towards Lago Maggiore I saw a cloud in theform of an immense mountain full of rifts of glowing light, because
the rays of the sun, which was already close to the horizon and red,tinged the cloud with its own hue. And this cloud at
tracted to itall the little clouds that were near while the large one did notmove from its place; thus it retained on it
s summit the reflectionof the sunlight till an hour and a half after sunset, so immenselylarge was it; and about two hou
rs after sunset such a violent windarose, that it was really tremendous and unheard of.[Footnote: _di arie_ is wanting i
n the original but may safely beinserted in the context, as the formation of clouds is underdiscussion before this text.
]1022.On the 10th day of December at 9 o'clock a. m. fire was set to theplace.On the l8th day of December 1511 at 9 o'cl
ock a. m. this second firewas kindled by the Swiss at Milan at the place called DCXC.[Footnote: With these two texts, (l
. 1--2 and l. 3--5 are in theoriginal side by side) there are sketches of smoke wreaths in redchalk.]Note on Pavia.1023.
The chimneys of the castle of Pavia have 6 rows of openings and fromeach to the other is one braccio.[Footnote: Other no
tes relating to Pavia occur on p. 43 and p. 53(Pl. XCVIII, No. 3). Compare No. 1448, 26.]Notes on the Sforzesca near Vig
evano (1024-1028).1024.On the 2nd day of February 1494. At Sforzesca I drew twenty fivesteps, 2/3 braccia to each, and 8
 braccia wide.[Footnote: See Pl. CX, No. 2. The rest of the notes on this pagerefer to the motion of water. On the lower
 sketch we read: 4 _br._(four braccia) and _giara_ (for _ghiaja_, sand, gravel).]1025.The vineyards of Vigevano on the 2
0th day of March 1494.[Footnote: On one side there is an effaced sketch in red chalk.]1026.To lock up a butteris at Vige
vano.1027.Again if the lowest part of the bank which lies across the currentof the waters is made in deep and wide steps
, after the manner ofstairs, the waters which, in their course usually fallperpendicularly from the top of such a place
to the bottom, and wearaway the foundations of this bank can no longer descend with a blowof too great a force; and I fi
nd the example of this in the stairsdown which the water falls in the fields at Sforzesca at Vigevanoover which the runn
ing water falls for a height of 50 braccia.1028.Stair of Vigevano below La Sforzesca, 130 steps, 1/4 braccio highand 1/2
 braccio wide, down which the water falls, so as not to wearaway anything at the end of its fall; by these steps so much
 soilhas come down that it has dried up a pool; that is to say it hasfilled it up and a pool of great depth has been tur
ned into meadows.Notes on the North Italian lake. (1029-1033)1029.In many places there are streams of water which swell
for six hoursand ebb for six hours; and I, for my part, have seen one above thelake of Como called Fonte Pliniana, which
 increases and ebbs, as Ihave said, in such a way as to turn the stones of two mills; andwhen it fails it falls so low t
hat it is like looking at water in adeep pit.[Footnote: The fountain is known by this name to this day: it isnear Torno,
 on the Eastern shore of Como. The waters still rise andfall with the flow and ebb of the tide as Pliny described it (Ep
ist.IV, 30; Hist. Nat. II, 206).]1030.LAKE OF COMO. VALLEY OF CHIAVENNA.Above the lake of Como towards Germany is the va
lley of Chiavennawhere the river Mera flows into this lake. Here are barren and veryhigh mountains, with huge rocks. Amo
ng these mountains are to befound the water-birds called gulls. Here grow fir trees, larches andpines. Deer, wildgoats,
chamois, and terrible bears. It isimpossible to climb them without using hands and feet. The peasantsgo there at the tim
e of the snows with great snares to make thebears fall down these rocks. These mountains which very closelyapproach each
 other are parted by the river. They are to the rightand left for the distance of 20 miles throughout of the same nature
.>From mile to mile there are good inns. Above on the said river thereare waterfalls of 400 braccia in height, which are
 fine to see; andthere is good living at 4 soldi the reckoning. This river bringsdown a great deal of timber.VAL SASINA.
Val Sasina runs down towards Italy; this is almost the same form andcharacter. There grow here many _mappello_ and there
 are great ruinsand falls of water [Footnote 14: The meaning of _mappello_ isunknown.].VALLEY OF INTROZZO.This valley pr
oduces a great quantity of firs, pines and larches;and from here Ambrogio Fereri has his timber brought down; at thehead
 of the Valtellina are the mountains of Bormio, terrible andalways covered with snow; marmots (?) are found there.BELLAG
GIO.Opposite the castle Bellaggio there is the river Latte, which fallsfrom a height of more than 100 braccia from the s
ource whence itsprings, perpendicularly, into the lake with an inconceivable roarand noise. This spring flows only in Au
gust and September.VALTELLINA.Valtellina, as it is called, is a valley enclosed in high andterrible mountains; it produc
es much strong wine, and there is somuch cattle that the natives conclude that more milk than wine growsthere. This is t
he valley through which the Adda passes, which firstruns more than 40 miles through Germany; this river breeds the fish_
temolo_ which live on silver, of which much is to be found in itssands. In this country every one can sell bread and win
e, and thewine is worth at most one soldo the bottle and a pound of veal onesoldo, and salt ten dinari and butter the sa
me and their pound is 30ounces, and eggs are one soldo the lot.1031.At BORMIO.At Bormio are the baths;--About eight mile
s above Como is thePliniana, which increases and ebbs every six hours, and its swellsupplies water for two mills; and it
s ebbing makes the spring dryup; two miles higher up there is Nesso, a place where a river fallswith great violence into
 a vast rift in the mountain. Theseexcursions are to be made in the month of May. And the largest barerocks that are to
be found in this part of the country are themountains of Mandello near to those of Lecco, and of Gravidonatowards Bellin
zona, 30 miles from Lecco, and those of the valley ofChiavenna; but the greatest of all is that of Mandello, which has a
tits base an opening towards the lake, which goes down 200 steps, andthere at all times is ice and wind.IN VAL SASINA.In
 Val Sasina, between Vimognio and Introbbio, to the right hand,going in by the road to Lecco, is the river Troggia which
 falls froma very high rock, and as it falls it goes underground and the riverends there. 3 miles farther we find the bu
ildings of the mines ofcopper and silver near a place called Pra' Santo Pietro, and minesof iron and curious things. La
Grigna is the highest mountain thereis in this part, and it is quite bare.[Footnote: 1030 and 1031. From the character o
f the handwriting wemay conclude that these observations were made in Leonardo's youth;and I should infer from their con
tents, that they were notes made inanticipation of a visit to the places here described, and derivedfrom some person (un
known to us) who had given him an account ofthem.]1032.The lake of Pusiano flows into the lake of Segrino [Footnote 3: T
hestatement about the lake Segrino is incorrect; it is situated in theValle Assina, above the lake of Pusiano.] and of A
nnone and of Sala.The lake of Annone is 22 braccia higher at the surface of its waterthan the surface of the water of th
e lake of Lecco, and the lake ofPusiano is 20 braccia higher than the lake of Annone, which added tothe afore said 22 br
accia make 42 braccia and this is the greatestheight of the surface of the lake of Pusiano above the surface ofthe lake
of Lecco.[Footnote: This text has in the original a slight sketch toillustrate it.]1033.At Santa Maria in the Valley of
Ravagnate [Footnote 2: _Ravagnate_(Leonardo writes _Ravagna_) in the Brianza is between Oggiono andBrivio, South of the
lake of Como. M. Ravaisson avails himself ofthis note to prove his hypothesis that Leonardo paid two visits toFrance. Se
e Gazette des Beaux Arts, 1881 pag. 528:_Au recto du meme feuillet, on lit encore une note relative a unevallee "nemonti
 brigatia"; il me semble qu'il s'agit bien des montsde Briancon, le Brigantio des anciens. Briancon est sur la route deL
yon en Italie. Ce fut par le mont Viso que passerent, en aout 1515,les troupes francaises qui allaient remporter la vict
oire deMarignan.Leonard de Vinci, ingenieur de Francois Ier, comme il l'avait ete deLouis XII, aurait-il ete pour quelqu
e chose dans le plan du celebrepassage des Alpes, qui eut lieu en aout 1515, et a la suite duquelon le vit accompagner p
artout le chevaleresque vainqueur? Auraitilete appele par le jeune roi, de Rome ou l'artiste etait alors, desson aveneme
nt au trone?_] in the mountains of Brianza are the rodsof chestnuts of 9 braccia and one out of an average of 100 will b
e14 braccia.At Varallo di Ponbia near to Sesto on the Ticino the quinces arewhite, large and hard.[Footnote 5: Varallo d
i Ponbia, about ten miles South of Arona isdistinct from Varallo the chief town in the Val di Sesia.]Notes on places in
Central Italy, visited in 1502 (1034-1054).1034.Pigeon-house at Urbino, the 30th day of July 1502. [Footnote: Anindistin
ct sketch is introduced with this text, in the original, inwhich the word _Scolatoro_ (conduit) is written.]1035.Made by
 the sea at Piombino. [Footnote: Below the sketch there areeleven lines of text referring to the motion of waves.]1036.A
cquapendente is near Orvieto. [Footnote: _Acquapendente_ is about10 miles West of Orvieto, and is to the right in the ma
p on Pl.CXIII, near the lake of Bolsena.]1037.The rock of Cesena. [Footnote: See Pl. XCIV No. 1, the lower sketch.The ex
planation of the upper sketch is given on p. 29.]1038.Siena, _a b_ 4 braccia, _a c_ 10 braccia. Steps at [the castle of]
Urbino. [Footnote: See Pl. CX No. 3; compare also No. 765.]1039.The bell of Siena, that is the manner of its movement, a
nd the placeof the attachment of the clapper. [Footnote: The text is accompaniedby an indistinct sketch.]1040.On St. Mar
y's day in the middle of August, at Cesena, 1502.[Footnote: See Pl. CX, No. 4.]1041.Stairs of the [palace of the] Count
of Urbino,--rough. [Footnote:The text is accompanied by a slight sketch.]1042.At the fair of San Lorenzo at Cesena. 1502
.1043.Windows at Cesena. [Footnote: There are four more lines of textwhich refer to a slightly sketched diagram.]1044.At
 Porto Cesenatico, on the 6th of September 1502 at 9 o'clock a. m.The way in which bastions ought to project beyond the
walls of thetowers to defend the outer talus; so that they may not be taken byartillery.[Footnote: An indistinct sketch,
 accompanies this passage.]1045.The rock of the harbour of Cesena is four points towards the SouthWest from Cesena.1046.
In Romagna, the realm of all stupidity, vehicles with four wheelsare used, of which O the two in front are small and two
 high onesare behind; an arrangement which is very unfavourable to the motion,because on the fore wheels more weight is
laid than on those behind,as I showed in the first of the 5th on "Elements".1047.Thus grapes are carried at Cesena. The
number of the diggers of theditches is [arranged] pyramidically. [Footnote: A sketch,representing a hook to which two bu
nches of grapes are hanging,refers to these first two lines. Cesena is mentioned again Fol. 82a:_Carro da Cesena_ (a car
t from Cesena).]1048.There might be a harmony of the different falls of water as you sawthem at the fountain of Rimini o
n the 8th day of August, 1502.1049.The fortress at Urbino. [Footnote: 1049. In the original the text iswritten inside th
e sketch in the place here marked _n_.]1050.Imola, as regards Bologna, is five points from the West, towards theNorth We
st, at a distance of 20 miles.Castel San Piero is seen from Imola at four points from the Westtowards the North West, at
 a distance of 7 miles.Faenza stands with regard to Imola between East and South East at adistance of ten miles. Forli s
tands with regard to Faenza betweenSouth East and East at a distance of 20 miles from Imola and tenfrom Faenza.Forlimpop
oli lies in the same direction at 25 miles from Imola.Bertinoro, as regards Imola, is five points from the East to wards
the South East, at 27 miles.1051.Imola as regards Bologna is five points from the West towards theNorth West at a distan
ce of 20 miles.Castel San Pietro lies exactly North West of Imola, at a distance of7 miles.Faenza, as regards Imola lies
 exactly half way between the East andSouth East at a distance of 10 miles; and Forli lies in the samedirection from Imo
la at a distance of 20 miles; and Forlimpopololies in the same direction from Forli at a distance of 25 miles.Bertinoro
is seen from Imola two points from the East towards theSouth East at a distance of 27 miles.[Footnote: Leonardo inserted
 this passage on the margin of thecircular plan, in water colour, of Imola--see Pl. CXI No. 1.--In theoriginal the field
s surrounding the town are light green; the moat,which surrounds the fortifications and the windings of the riverSantern
o, are light blue. The parts, which have come out blackishclose to the river are yellow ochre in the original. The dark
groupsof houses inside the town are red. At the four points of the compassdrawn in the middle of the town Leonardo has w
ritten (from right toleft): _Mezzodi_ (South) at the top; to the left _Scirocho_ (Southeast), _levante_ (East), _Greco_
(North East), _Septantrione_(North), _Maesstro_ (North West), _ponente_ (West) _Libecco_ (SouthWest). The arch in which
the plan is drawn is, in the original, 42centimetres across.At the beginning of October 1502 Cesare Borgia was shut up i
n Imolaby a sudden revolt of the Condottieri, and it was some weeks beforehe could release himself from this state of si
ege (see Gregorovius,_Geschichte der Stadt Rom im Mittelalter_, Vol. VII, Book XIII, 5,5).Besides this incident Imola pl
ays no important part in the historyof the time. I therefore think myself fully justified in connectingthis map, which i
s at Windsor, with the siege of 1502 and withLeonardo's engagements in the service of Cesare Borgia, because acomparison
 of these texts, Nos. 1050 and 1051, raise, I believe, thehypothesis to a certainty.]1052.>From Bonconventi to Casa Nova
 are 10 miles, from Casa Nova to Chiusi9 miles, from Chiusi to Perugia, from, Perugia to Santa Maria degliAngeli, and th
en to Fuligno. [Footnote: Most of the places heredescribed lie within the district shown in the maps on Pl. CXIII.]1053.
On the first of August 1502, the library at Pesaro.1054.OF PAINTING.On the tops and sides of hills foreshorten the shape
 of the groundand its divisions, but give its proper shape to what is turnedtowards you. [Footnote: This passage evident
ly refers to the makingof maps, such as Pl. CXII, CXIII, and CXIV. There is no mention ofsuch works, it is true, excepti
ng in this one passage of MS. L. Butthis can scarcely be taken as evidence against my view that Leonardobusied himself v
ery extensively at that time in the construction ofmaps; and all the less since the foregoing chapters clearly provethat
 at a time so full of events Leonardo would only now and thencommit his observations to paper, in the MS. L.By the side
of this text we find, in the original, a very indistinctsketch, perhaps a plan of a position. Instead of this drawing I
havehere inserted a much clearer sketch of a position from the same MS.,L. 82b and 83a. They are the only drawings of la
ndscape, it may benoted, which occur at all in that MS.]Alessandria in Piedmont (1055. 1056).1055.At Candia in Lombardy,
 near Alessandria della Paglia, in making awell for Messer Gualtieri [Footnote 2: Messer Gualtieri, the sameprobably as
is mentioned in Nos. 672 and 1344.] of Candia, theskeleton of a very large boat was found about 10 bracciaunderground; a
nd as the timber was black and fine, it seemed good tothe said Messer Gualtieri to have the mouth of the well lengthened
in such a way as that the ends of the boat should be uncovered.1056.At Alessandria della Paglia in Lombardy there are no
 stones formaking lime of, but such as are mixed up with an infinite variety ofthings native to the sea, which is now mo
re than 200 miles away.The Alps (1057-1062).1057.At Monbracco, above Saluzzo,--a mile above the Certosa, at the footof M
onte Viso, there is a quarry of flakey stone, which is as whiteas Carrara marble, without a spot, and as hard as porphyr
y or evenharder; of which my worthy gossip, Master Benedetto the sculptor,has promised to give me a small slab, for the
colours, the secondday of January 1511.[Footnote: Saluzzo at the foot of the Alps South of Turin.][Footnote 9. 10.: _Mae
stro Benedetto scultore_; probably some nativeof Northern Italy acquainted with the place here described. Hardlythe Flor
entine sculptor Benedetto da Majano. Amoretti had publishedthis passage, and M. Ravaisson who gave a French translation
of itin the _Gazette des Beaux Arts_ (1881, pag. 528), remarks asfollows: _Le maitre sculpteur que Leonard appelle son "
compare" neserait-il pas Benedetto da Majano, un de ceux qui jugerent avec luide la place a donner au David de Michel-An
ge, et de qui le Louvre aacquis recemment un buste d'apres Philippe Strozzi?_ To this it maybe objected that Benedetto d
a Majano had already lain in his gravefourteen years, in the year 1511, when he is supposed to have giventhe promise to
Leonardo. The colours may have been given to thesculptor Benedetto and the stone may have been in payment for them.>From
 the description of the stone here given we may conclude that itis repeated from hearsay of the sculptor's account of it
. I do notunderstand how, from this observation, it is possible to concludethat Leonardo was on the spot.]1058.That ther
e are springs which suddenly break forth in earthquakes orother convulsions and suddenly fail; and this happened in a mo
untainin Savoy where certain forests sank in and left a very deep gap, andabout four miles from here the earth opened it
self like a gulf inthe mountain, and threw out a sudden and immense flood of waterwhich scoured the whole of a little va
lley of the tilled soil,vineyards and houses, and did the greatest mischief, wherever itoverflowed.1059.The river Arve,
a quarter of a mile from Geneva in Savoy, where thefair is held on midsummerday in the village of Saint Gervais.[Footnot
e: An indistinct sketch is to be seen by the text.]1060.And this may be seen, as I saw it, by any one going up Monbroso[
Footnote: I have vainly enquired of every available authority for asolution of the mystery as to what mountain is intend
ed by the nameMonboso (Comp. Vol. I Nos. 300 and 301). It seems most obvious torefer it to Monte Rosa. ROSA derived from
 the Keltic ROS whichsurvives in Breton and in Gaelic, meaning, in its first sense, amountain spur, but which also--like
 HORN--means a very high peak;thus Monte Rosa would mean literally the High Peak.], a peak of theAlps which divide Franc
e from Italy. The base of this mountain givesbirth to the 4 rivers which flow in four different directionsthrough the wh
ole of Europe. And no mountain has its base at sogreat a height as this, which lifts itself above almost all theclouds;
and snow seldom falls there, but only hail in the summer,when the clouds are highest. And this hail lies [unmelted] ther
e, sothat if it were not for the absorption of the rising and fallingclouds, which does not happen more than twice in an
 age, an enormousmass of ice would be piled up there by the layers of hail, and inthe middle of July I found it very con
siderable; and I saw the skyabove me quite dark, and the sun as it fell on the mountain was farbrighter here than in the
 plains below, because a smaller extent ofatmosphere lay between the summit of the mountain and the sun.[Footnote 6: _in
 una eta._ This is perhaps a slip of the pen onLeonardo's part and should be read _estate_ (summer).]Leic. 9b]1061.In th
e mountains of Verona the red marble is found all mixed withcockle shells turned into stone; some of them have been fill
ed atthe mouth with the cement which is the substance of the stone; andin some parts they have remained separate from th
e mass of the rockwhich enclosed them, because the outer covering of the shell hadinterposed and had not allowed them to
 unite with it; while in otherplaces this cement had petrified those which were old and almoststripped the outer skin.10
62.Bridge of Goertz-Wilbach (?).[Footnote: There is a slight sketch with this text, Leonardo seemsto have intended to su
ggest, with a few pen-strokes, the course ofthe Isonzo and of the Wipbach in the vicinity of Gorizia (Goerz). Hehimself
says in another place that he had been in Friuli (see No.1077 1. 19).]The Appenins (1063-1068).1063.That part of the ear
th which was lightest remained farthest from thecentre of the world; and that part of the earth became the lightestover
which the greatest quantity of water flowed. And therefore thatpart became lightest where the greatest number of rivers
flow; likethe Alps which divide Germany and France from Italy; whence issuethe Rhone flowing Southwards, and the Rhine t
o the North. The Danubeor Tanoia towards the North East, and the Po to the East, withinnumerable rivers which join them,
 and which always run turbid withthe soil carried by them to the sea.The shores of the sea are constantly moving towards
 the middle ofthe sea and displace it from its original position. The lowestportion of the Mediterranean will be reserve
d for the bed andcurrent of the Nile, the largest river that flows into that sea. Andwith it are grouped all its tributa
ries, which at first fell intothe sea; as may be seen with the Po and its tributaries, which firstfell into that sea, wh
ich between the Appenines and the German Alpswas united to the Adriatic sea.That the Gallic Alps are the highest part of
 Europe.1064.And of these I found some in the rocks of the high Appenines andmostly at the rock of La Vernia. [Footnote
6: _Sasso della Vernia._The frowning rock between the sources of the Arno and the Tiber, asDante describes this mountain
, which is 1269 metres in height.This note is written by the side of that given as No. 1020; buttheir connection does no
t make it clear what Leonardo's purpose wasin writing it.]1065.At Parma, at 'La Campana' on the twenty-fifth of October
1514.[Footnote 2: _Capano_, an Inn.]A note on the petrifactions, or fossils near Parma will be foundunder No. 989.]1066.
A method for drying the marsh of Piombino. [Footnote: There is aslight sketch with this text in the original.--Piombino
is alsomentioned in Nos. 609, l. 55-58 (compare Pl. XXXV, 3, below). Alsoin No. 1035.]1067.The shepherds in the Romagna
at the foot of the Apennines makepeculiar large cavities in the mountains in the form of a horn, andon one side they fas
ten a horn. This little horn becomes one and thesame with the said cavity and thus they produce by blowing into it avery
 loud noise. [Footnote: As to the Romagna see also No. 1046.]1068.A spring may be seen to rise in Sicily which at certai
n times of theyear throws out chesnut leaves in quantities; but in Sicily chesnutsdo not grow, hence it is evident that
that spring must issue fromsome abyss in Italy and then flow beneath the sea to break forth inSicily. [Footnote: The che
snut tree is very common in Sicily. Inwriting _cicilia_ Leonardo meant perhaps Cilicia.]II.FRANCE.1069.   GERMANY.
               FRANCE.a. Austria,                 a. Picardy.b. Saxony.                  b. Normandy.c. Nuremberg.
         c. Dauphine.d. Flanders.               SPAIN.            a. Biscay.            b. Castille.            c. Galic
ia.            d. Portugal.            e. Taragona.            f. Granada.[Footnote: Two slightly sketched maps, one of
Europe the other ofSpain, are at the side of these notes.]1070.Perpignan. Roanne. Lyons. Paris. Ghent. Bruges. Holland.[
Footnote: _Roana_ does not seem to mean here Rouen in Normandy, butis probably Roanne (Rodumna) on the upper Loire, Lyon
nais (Dep. duLoire). This town is now unimportant, but in Leonardo's time wasstill a place of some consequence.]1071.At
Bordeaux in Gascony the sea rises about 40 braccia before itsebb, and the river there is filled with salt water for more
 than ahundred and fifty miles; and the vessels which are repaired thererest high and dry on a high hill above the sea a
t low tide.[Footnote 2: This is obviously an exaggeration founded on inaccurateinformation. Half of 150 miles would be n
earer the mark.]1072.The Rhone issues from the lake of Geneva and flows first to the Westand then to the South, with a c
ourse of 400 miles and pours itswaters into the Mediterranean.1073._c d_ is the garden at Blois; _a b_ is the conduit of
 Blois, made inFrance by Fra Giocondo, _b c_ is what is wanting in the height ofthat conduit, _c d_ is the height of the
 garden at Blois, _e f_ isthe siphon of the conduit, _b c_, _e f_, _f g_ is where the siphondischarges into the river. [
Footnote: The tenor of this note (seelines 2 and 3) seems to me to indicate that this passage was notwritten in France,
but was written from oral information. We have noevidence as to when this note may have been written beyond thecircumsta
nce that Fra Giocondo the Veronese Architect left Francenot before the year 1505. The greater part of the magnificentCha
teau of Blois has now disappeared. Whether this note was made fora special purpose is uncertain. The original form and e
xtent of theChateau is shown in Androvet, _Les plus excellents Bastiments deFrance, Paris MDCVII,_ and it may be observe
d that there is in themiddle of the garden a Pavilion somewhat similar to that shown onPl. LXXXVIII No. 7.See S. DE LA S
AUSSAYE, _Histoire du Chateau de Blois 4eme editionBlois et Paris_ p. 175: _En mariant sa fille ainee a Francois, comted
'Angouleme, Louis XII lui avait constitue en dot les comtes deBlois, d'Asti, de Coucy, de Montfort, d'Etampes et de Vert
us. Uneordonnance de Francois I. lui laissa en_ 1516 _l'administration ducomte de Blois.Le roi fit commencer, dans la me
me annee, les travaux de celle bellepartie du chateau, connue sous le nom d'aile de Francois I, et dontnous avons donne
la description au commencement de ce livre. Noustrouvons en effet, dans les archives du Baron de Foursanvault, unepiece
qui en fixe parfaitement la date. On y lit: "Je, BaymonPhilippeaux, commis par le Roy a tenir le compte et fair le payem
entdes bastiments, ediffices et reparacions que le dit seigneur faitfaire en son chastu de Blois, confesse avoir eu et r
eceu ... lasomme de trois mille livres tournois ... le cinquieme jour dejuillet, l'an mil cinq cent et seize._ P. 24: _L
es jardins avaientete decores avec beaucoup de luxe par les differents possesseurs duchateau. Il ne reste de tous les ba
timents qu'ils y eleverent queceux des officiers charges de l'ad_ministration et de la culture desjardins, et un pavilio
n carre en pierre et en brique flanque deterrasses a chacun de ses angles. Quoique defigure par des mesureselevees sur l
es terrasses, cet edifice est tris-digne d'interet parl'originalite du plan, la decoration architecturale et le souvenir
d'Anne de Bretagne qui le fit construire._ Felibien describes thegarden as follows: _Le jardin haut etait fort bien dres
se par grandscompartimens de toutes sortes de figures, avec des allees demeuriers blancs et des palissades de coudriers.
 Deux grands berceauxde charpenterie separoient toute la longueur et la largeur dujardin, et dans les quatres angles des
 allees, ou ces berceaux secroissent, il y auoit 4 cabinets, de mesme charpenterie ... Il y apas longtemps qu'il y auoit
 dans ce mesme jardin, a l'endroit ou secroissent les allees du milieu, un edifice de figure octogone, deplus de 7 thois
es de diametre et de plus de neuf thoises de haut;avec 4 enfoncements en forme de niches dans les 4 angles des allies.Ce
 bastiment.... esloit de charpente mais d'un extraordinairementbien travaille. On y voyait particulierement la cordilier
e quiregnati tout autour en forme de cordon. Car la Reyne affectait de lamettre nonseulement a ses armes et a ses chiffr
es mais de la fairerepresenter en divers manieres dans tous les ouvrages qu'on luifaisait pour elle ... le bastiment est
ati couvert en forme de domequi dans son milieu avait encore un plus petit dome, ou lanternevitree au-dessus de laquelle
 estait une figure doree representantSaint Michel. Les deux domes estoient proprement couvert d'ardoiseet de plomb dore
par dehors; par dedans ils esloient lambrissezd'une menuiserie tres delicate. Au milieu de ce Salon il y avait ungrand b
assin octogone de marbre blanc, dont toutes les facesestoient enrichies de differentes sculptures, avec les armes et les
chiffres du Roy Louis XII et de la Reine Anne, Dans ce bassin il yen avait un autre pose sur un piedestal lequel auoit s
ept piedz dediametre. Il estait de figure ronde a godrons, avec des masques etd'autres ornements tres scauamment taillez
. Du milieu de cedeuxiesme bassin s'y levoit un autre petit piedestal qui portait untroisiesme bassin de trois pieds de
diametre, aussy parfaitementbien taille; c'estoit de ce dernier bassin que jallissoit l'eau quise rependoit en suitte da
ns les deux autres bassins. Les beauxouvrages faits d'un marbre esgalement blanc et poli, furent brisezpar la pesanteur
de tout l'edifice, que les injures de l'airrenverserent de fond en comble.]1074.The river Loire at Amboise.The river is
higher within the bank _b d_ than outside that bank.The island where there is a part of Amboise.This is the river that p
asses through Amboise; it passes at _a b cd_, and when it has passed the bridge it turns back, against theoriginal curre
nt, by the channel _d e_, _b f_ in contact with thebank which lies between the two contrary currents of the said river,_
a b_, _c d_, and _d e_, _b f_. It then turns down again by thechannel _f l_, _g h_, _n m_, and reunites with the river f
rom whichit was at first separated, which passes by _k n_, which makes _k m_,_r t_. But when the river is very full it f
lows all in one channelpassing over the bank _b d_. [Footnote: See Pl. CXV. Lines 1-7 areabove, lines 8-10 in the middle
 of the large island and the word_Isola_ is written above _d_ in the smaller island; _a_ is writtenon the margin on the
bank of the river above 1. I; in thereproduction it is not visible. As may be seen from the lastsentence, the observatio
n was made after long study of the river'scourse, when Leonardo had resided for some time at, or near,Amboise.]1075.The
water may be dammed up above the level of Romorantin to such aheight, that in its fall it may be used for numerous mills
.1075.The river at Villefranche may be conducted to Romorantin which maybe done by the inhabitants; and the timber of wh
ich their houses arebuilt may be carried in boats to Romorantin [Footnote: Compare No.744.]. The river may be dammed up
at such a height that the watersmay be brought back to Romorantin with a convenient fall.1076.As to whether it is better
 that the water should all be raised in asingle turn or in two?The answer is that in one single turn the wheel could not
 supportall the water that it can raise in two turns, because at the halfturn of the wheel it would be raising 100 pound
s and no more; and ifit had to raise the whole, 200 pounds in one turn, it could notraise them unless the wheel were of
double the diameter and if thediameter were doubled, the time of its revolution would be doubled;therefore it is better
and a greater advantage in expense to makesuch a wheel of half the size (?) the land which it would water andwould rende
r the country fertile to supply food to the inhabitants,and would make navigable canals for mercantile purposes.The way
in which the river in its flow should scour its own channel.By the ninth of the third; the more rapid it is, the more it
 wearsaway its channel; and, by the converse proposition, the slower thewater the more it deposits that which renders it
 turbid.And let the sluice be movable like the one I arranged in Friuli[Footnote 19: This passage reveals to us the fact
 that Leonardo hadvisited the country of Friuli and that he had stayed there for sometime. Nothing whatever was known of
 this previously.], where whenone sluice was opened the water which passed through it dug out thebottom. Therefore when
the rivers are flooded, the sluices of themills ought to be opened in order that the whole course of the rivermay pass t
hrough falls to each mill; there should be many in orderto give a greater impetus, and so all the river will be scoured.
 Andbelow the site of each of the two mills there may be one of the saidsluice falls; one of them may be placed below ea
ch mill.1078.A trabocco is four braccia, and one mile is three thousand of thesaid braccia. Each braccio is divided into
 12 inches; and the waterin the canals has a fall in every hundred trabocchi of two of theseinches; therefore 14 inches
of fall are necessary in two thousandeight hundred braccia of flow in these canals; it follows that 15inches of fall giv
e the required momentum to the currents of thewaters in the said canals, that is one braccio and a half in themile. And
from this it may be concluded that the water taken fromthe river of Ville-franche and lent to the river of Romorantinwil
l..... Where one river by reason of its low level cannot flowinto the other, it will be necessary to dam it up, so that
it mayacquire a fall into the other, which was previously the higher.The eve of Saint Antony I returned from Romorantin
to Amboise, andthe King went away two days before from Romorantin.>From Romorantin as far as the bridge at Saudre it is
called theSaudre, and from that bridge as far as Tours it is called the Cher.I would test the level of that channel whic
h is to lead from theLoire to Romorantin, with a channel one braccio wide and one bracciodeep.[Footnote: Lines 6-18 are
partly reproduced in the facsimile on p.254, and the whole of lines 19-25.The following names are written along the rive
rs on the largersketch, _era f_ (the Loire) _scier f_ (the Cher) three times. _PoteSodro_ (bridge of the Soudre). _Villa
 francha_ (Villefranche)_banco_ (sandbank) _Sodro_ (Soudre). The circle below shows theposition of Romorantin. The words
 '_orologio del sole_' writtenbelow do not belong to the map of the rivers. The following namesare written by the side o
f the smaller sketch-map:--_tors_ (Tours),_Abosa_ (Amboise) _bres_--for Bles (Blois) _mo rica_ (Montrichard)._Lione_ (Ly
ons). This map was also published in the 'Saggio'(Milano, 1872) Pl. XXII, and the editors remark: _Forse la liniaretta c
he va da Amboise a Romorantin segna l'andamento proposto d'unCanale, che poi rembra prolungarsi in giu fin dove sta scri
ttoLione._M. Ravaisson has enlarged on this idea in the Gazette des Beaux Arts(1881 p. 530): _Les traces de Leonard perm
ettent d'entrevoir que lecanal commencant soit aupres de Tours, soit aupres de Blois etpassant par Romorantin, avec port
 d'embarquement a Villefranche,devait, au dela de Bourges, traverser l'Allier au-dessous desaffluents de la Dore et de l
a Sioule, aller par Moulins jusqu' aDigoin; enfin, sur l'autre rive de la Loire, depasser les monts duCharolais et rejoi
ndre la Saone aupres de Macon._ It seems to merash, however, to found so elaborate an hypothesis on these sketchesof riv
ers. The slight stroke going to _Lione_ is perhaps only anindication of the direction.--With regard to the Loire compare
 alsoNo. 988. l. 38.]1079.THE ROAD TO ORLEANSAt 1/4 from the South to the South East. At 1/3 from the South tothe South
East. At 1/4 from the South to the South East. At 1/5 fromthe South to the South East. Between the South West and South,
 tothe East bearing to the South; from the South towards the East 1/8;thence to the West, between the South and South We
st; at the South.[Footnote: The meaning is obscure; a more important passagereferring to France is to be found under No.
 744]On the Germans (1080. 1081).1080.The way in which the Germans closing up together cross andinterweave their broad l
eather shields against the enemy, stoopingdown and putting one of the ends on the ground while they hold therest in thei
r hand. [Footnote: Above the text is a sketch of a fewlines crossing each other and the words _de ponderibus_. The meani
ngof the passage is obscure.]1081.The Germans are wont to annoy a garrison with the smoke of feathers,sulphur and realga
r, and they make this smoke last 7 or 8 hours.Likewise the husks of wheat make a great and lasting smoke; and alsodry du
ng; but this must be mixed with olive husks, that is olivespressed for oil and from which the oil has been extracted.[Fo
otnote: There is with this passage a sketch of a round towershrouded in smoke.]The Danube.1082.That the valleys were for
merly in great part covered by lakes thesoil of which always forms the banks of rivers,--and by seas, whichafterwards, b
y the persistent wearing of the rivers, cut through themountains and the wandering courses of the rivers carried away th
eother plains enclosed by the mountains; and the cutting away of themountains is evident from the strata in the rocks, w
hich correspondin their sections as made by the courses of the rivers [Footnote 4:_Emus_, the Balkan; _Dardania_, now Se
rvia.], The Haemus mountainswhich go along Thrace and Dardania and join the Sardonius mountainswhich, going on to the we
stward change their name from Sardus toRebi, as they come near Dalmatia; then turning to the West crossIllyria, now call
ed Sclavonia, changing the name of Rebi to Albanus,and going on still to the West, they change to Mount Ocra in theNorth
; and to the South above Istria they are named Caruancas; andto the West above Italy they join the Adula, where the Danu
be rises[8], which stretches to the East and has a course of 1500 miles; itsshortest line is about l000 miles, and the s
ame or about the same isthat branch of the Adula mountains changed as to their name, asbefore mentioned. To the North ar
e the Carpathians, closing in thebreadth of the valley of the Danube, which, as I have said extendseastward, a length of
 about 1000 miles, and is sometimes 200 and insome places 300 miles wide; and in the midst flows the Danube, theprincipa
l river of Europe as to size. The said Danube runs throughthe middle of Austria and Albania and northwards through Bavar
ia,Poland, Hungary, Wallachia and Bosnia and then the Danube or Donauflows into the Black Sea, which formerly extended a
lmost to Austriaand occupied the plains through which the Danube now courses; andthe evidence of this is in the oysters
and cockle shells andscollops and bones of great fishes which are still to be found inmany places on the sides of those
mountains; and this sea was formedby the filling up of the spurs of the Adula mountains which thenextended to the East j
oining the spurs of the Taurus which extend tothe West. And near Bithynia the waters of this Black Sea poured intothe Pr
opontis [Marmora] falling into the Aegean Sea, that is theMediterranean, where, after a long course, the spurs of the Ad
ulamountains became separated from those of the Taurus. The Black Seasank lower and laid bare the valley of the Danube w
ith the abovenamed countries, and the whole of Asia Minor beyond the Taurus rangeto the North, and the plains from mount
 Caucasus to the Black Sea tothe West, and the plains of the Don this side--that is to say, atthe foot of the Ural mount
ains. And thus the Black Sea must havesunk about 1000 braccia to uncover such vast plains.[Footnote 8: _Danubio_, in the
 original _Reno_; evidently a mistakeas we may infer from _come dissi_ l. 10 &c.]III.THE COUNTRIES OF THE WESTERN END OF
 THE MEDITERRANEAN.The straits of Gibraltar (1083-1085).1083.WHY THE SEA MAKES A STRONGER CURRENT IN THE STRAITS OF SPAI
N THANELSEWHERE.A river of equal depth runs with greater speed in a narrow spacethan in a wide one, in proportion to the
 difference between thewider and the narrower one.This proposition is clearly proved by reason confirmed byexperiment. S
upposing that through a channel one mile wide thereflows one mile in length of water; where the river is five mileswide
each of the 5 square miles will require 1/5 of itself to beequal to the square mile of water required in the sea, and wh
ere theriver is 3 miles wide each of these square miles will require thethird of its volume to make up the amount of the
 square mile of thenarrow part; as is demonstrated in _f g h_ at the mile marked _n_.[Footnote: In the place marked A in
 the diagram _Mare Mediterano_(Mediterranean Sea) is written in the original. And at B, _strettodi Spugna_ (straits of S
pain, _i.e._ Gibraltar). Compare No. 960.]1084.WHY THE CURRENT OF GIBRALTAR IS ALWAYS GREATER TO THE WEST THAN TOTHE EAS
T.The reason is that if you put together the mouths of the riverswhich discharge into the Mediterranean sea, you would f
ind the sumof water to be larger than that which this sea pours through thestraits into the ocean. You see Africa discha
rging its rivers thatrun northwards into this sea, and among them the Nile which runsthrough 3000 miles of Africa; there
 is also the Bagrada river andthe Schelif and others. [Footnote 5: _Bagrada_ (Leonardo writesBragada) in Tunis, now Meds
cherda; _Mavretano_, now Schelif.]Likewise Europe pours into it the Don and the Danube, the Po, theRhone, the Arno, and
the Tiber, so that evidently these rivers, withan infinite number of others of less fame, make its great breadthand dept
h and current; and the sea is not wider than 18 miles at themost westerly point of land where it divides Europe from Afr
ica.1085.The gulf of the Mediterranean, as an inland sea, received theprincipal waters of Africa, Asia and Europe that f
lowed towards it;and its waters came up to the foot of the mountains that surroundedit and made its shores. And the summ
its of the Apennines stood upout of this sea like islands, surrounded by salt water. Africaagain, behind its Atlas mount
ains did not expose uncovered to thesky the surface of its vast plains about 3000 miles in length, andMemphis [Footnote
6: _Mefi._ Leonardo can only mean here the citadelof Cairo on the Mokattam hills.] was on the shores of this sea, andabo
ve the plains of Italy, where now birds fly in flocks, fish werewont to wander in large shoals.1086.Tunis.The greatest e
bb made anywhere by the Mediterranean is above Tunis,being about two and a half braccia and at Venice it falls twobracci
a. In all the rest of the Mediterranean sea the fall is littleor none.1087.Libya.Describe the mountains of shifting dese
rts; that is to say theformation of waves of sand borne by the wind, and of its mountainsand hills, such as occur in Lib
ya. Examples may be seen on the widesands of the Po and the Ticino, and other large rivers.1088.Majorca.Circumfulgore is
 a naval machine. It was an invention of the men ofMajorca. [Footnote: The machine is fully described in the MS. andshow
n in a sketch.]1089.The Tyrrhene Sea.Some at the Tyrrhene sea employ this method; that is to say theyfastened an anchor
to one end of the yard, and to the other a cord,of which the lower end was fastened to an anchor; and in battle theyflun
g this anchor on to the oars of the opponent's boat and by theuse of a capstan drew it to the side; and threw soft soap
and tow,daubed with pitch and set ablaze, on to that side where the anchorhung; so that in order to escape that fire, th
e defenders of thatship had to fly to the opposite side; and in doing this they aidedto the attack, because the galley w
as more easily drawn to the sideby reason of the counterpoise. [Footnote: This text is illustratedin the original by a p
en and ink sketch.]IV.THE LEVANT.The Levantine Sea.1090.On the shores of the Mediterranean 300 rivers flow, and 40, 200p
orts. And this sea is 3000 miles long. Many times has the increaseof its waters, heaped up by their backward flow and th
e blowing ofthe West winds, caused the overflow of the Nile and of the riverswhich flow out through the Black Sea, and h
ave so much raised theseas that they have spread with vast floods over many countries. Andthese floods take place at the
 time when the sun melts the snows onthe high mountains of Ethiopia that rise up into the cold regions ofthe air; and in
 the same way the approach of the sun acts on themountains of Sarmatia in Asia and on those in Europe; so that thegather
ing together of these three things are, and always have been,the cause of tremendous floods: that is, the return flow of
 the seawith the West wind and the melting of the snows. So every river willoverflow in Syria, in Samaria, in Judea betw
een Sinai and theLebanon, and in the rest of Syria between the Lebanon and the Taurusmountains, and in Cilicia, in the A
rmenian mountains, and inPamphilia and in Lycia within the hills, and in Egypt as far as theAtlas mountains. The gulf of
 Persia which was formerly a vast lakeof the Tigris and discharged into the Indian Sea, has now worn awaythe mountains w
hich formed its banks and laid them even with thelevel of the Indian ocean. And if the Mediterranean had continuedits fl
ow through the gulf of Arabia, it would have done the same,that is to say, would have reduced the level of the Mediterra
nean tothat of the Indian Sea.The Red Sea. (1091. 1092).1091.For a long time the water of the Mediterranean flowed out t
hroughthe Red Sea, which is 100 miles wide and 1500 long, and full ofreefs; and it has worn away the sides of Mount Sina
i, a fact whichtestifies, not to an inundation from the Indian sea beating on thesecoasts, but to a deluge of water whic
h carried with it all therivers which abound round the Mediterranean, and besides this thereis the reflux of the sea; an
d then, a cutting being made to the West3000 miles away from this place, Gibraltar was separated from Ceuta,which had be
en joined to it. And this passage was cut very low down,in the plains between Gibraltar and the ocean at the foot of the
mountain, in the low part, aided by the hollowing out of somevalleys made by certain rivers, which might have flowed her
e.Hercules [Footnote 9: Leonardo seems here to mention Hercules halfjestingly and only in order to suggest to the reader
 an allusion tothe legend of the pillars of Hercules.] came to open the sea to thewestward and then the sea waters began
 to pour into the WesternOcean; and in consequence of this great fall, the Red Sea remainedthe higher; whence the water,
 abandoning its course here, ever afterpoured away through the Straits of Spain.1092.The surface of the Red Sea is on a
level with the ocean.A mountain may have fallen and closed the mouth of the Red Sea andprevented the outlet of the Medit
erranean, and the Mediterranean Seathus overfilled had for outlet the passage below the mountains ofGades; for, in our o
wn times a similar thing has been seen [Footnote6: Compare also No. 1336, ll. 30, 35 and 36.-- Paolo Giovio, thecelebrat
ed historian (born at Como in 1483) reports that in 1513 atthe foot of the Alps, above Bellinzona, on the road to Switze
rland,a mountain fell with a very great noise, in consequence of anearthquake, and that the mass of rocks, which fell on
 the left(Western) side blocked the river Breno (T. I p. 218 and 345 of D.Sauvage's French edition, quoted in ALEXIS PER
CY, _Memoire destremblements de terre de la peninsule italique; Academie Royale deBelgique._ T. XXII).--]; a mountain fe
ll seven miles across a valleyand closed it up and made a lake. And thus most lakes have been madeby mountains, as the l
ake of Garda, the lakes of Como and Lugano,and the Lago Maggiore. The Mediterranean fell but little on theconfines of Sy
ria, in consequence of the Gaditanean passage, but agreat deal in this passage, because before this cutting was made the
Mediterranean sea flowed to the South East, and then the fall had tobe made by its run through the Straits of Gades.At _
a_ the water of the Mediterranean fell into the ocean.All the plains which lie between the sea and mountains were former
lycovered with salt water.Every valley has been made by its own river; and the proportionbetween valleys is the same as
that between river and river.The greatest river in our world is the Mediterranean river, whichmoves from the sources of
the Nile to the Western ocean.And its greatest height is in Outer Mauritania and it has a courseof ten thousand miles be
fore it reunites with its ocean, the fatherof the waters.That is 3000 miles for the Mediterranean, 3000 for the Nile, as
 faras discovered and 3000 for the Nile which flows to the East, &c.[Footnote: See Pl. CXI 2, a sketch of the shores of
theMediterranean Sea, where lines 11 to 16 may be seen. The largefigures 158 are not in Leonardo's writing. The characte
r of thewriting leads us to conclude that this text was written later thanthe foregoing. A slight sketch of the Mediterr
anean is also to befound in MS. I', 47a.]The Nile (1093-1098).1093.Therefore we must conclude those mountains to be of t
he greatestheight, above which the clouds falling in snow give rise to theNile.1094.The Egyptians, the Ethiopians, and t
he Arabs, in crossing the Nilewith camels, are accustomed to attach two bags on the sides of thecamel's bodies that is s
kins in the form shown underneath.In these four meshes of the net the camels for baggage place theirfeet.[Footnote: Unfo
rtunately both the sketches which accompany thispassage are too much effaced to be reproduced. The upper representsthe t
wo sacks joined by ropes, as here described, the other showsfour camels with riders swimming through a river.]1095.The T
igris passes through Asia Minor and brings with it the water ofthree lakes, one after the other of various elevations; t
he firstbeing Munace and the middle Pallas and the lowest Triton. And theNile again springs from three very high lakes i
n Ethiopia, and runsnorthwards towards the sea of Egypt with a course of 4000 miles, andby the shortest and straightest
line it is 3000 miles. It is saidthat it issues from the Mountains of the Moon, and has variousunknown sources. The said
 lakes are about 4000 braccia above thesurface of the sphere of water, that is 1 mile and 1/3, giving tothe Nile a fall
of 1 braccia in every mile.[Footnote 5: _Incogniti principio._ The affluents of the lakes areprobably here intended. Com
pare, as to the Nile, Nos. 970, 1063 and1084.]1096.Very many times the Nile and other very large rivers have poured outt
heir whole element of water and restored it to the sea.1097.Why does the inundation of the Nile occur in the summer, com
ing fromtorrid countries?1098.It is not denied that the Nile is constantly muddy in entering theEgyptian sea and that it
s turbidity is caused by soil that thisriver is continually bringing from the places it passes; which soilnever returns
in the sea which receives it, unless it throws it onits shores. You see the sandy desert beyond Mount Atlas whereformerl
y it was covered with salt water.Customs of Asiatic Nations (1099. 1100).1099.The Assyrians and the people of Euboea acc
ustom their horses tocarry sacks which they can at pleasure fill with air, and which incase of need they carry instead o
f the girth of the saddle above andat the side, and they are well covered with plates of cuir bouilli,in order that they
 may not be perforated by flights of arrows. Thusthey have not on their minds their security in flight, when thevictory
is uncertain; a horse thus equipped enables four or five mento cross over at need.1100.SMALL BOATS.The small boats used
by the Assyrians were made of thin laths ofwillow plaited over rods also of willow, and bent into the form of aboat. The
y were daubed with fine mud soaked with oil or withturpentine, and reduced to a kind of mud which resisted the waterand
because pine would split; and always remained fresh; and theycovered this sort of boats with the skins of oxen in safely
 crossingthe river Sicuris of Spain, as is reported by Lucant; [Footnote 7:See Lucan's Pharsalia IV, 130: _Utque habuit
ripas Sicoris camposquereliquit, Primum cana salix madefacto vimine parvam Texitur inpuppim, calsoque inducto juvenco Ve
ctoris patiens tumidum supernatatamnem. Sic Venetus stagnante Pado, fusoque Britannus Navigat oceano,sic cum tenet omnia
 Nilus, Conseritur bibula Memphitis cymbo papyro.His ratibus transjecta manus festinat utrimque Succisam cavare nemus]Th
e Spaniards, the Scythians and the Arabs, when they want to make abridge in haste, fix hurdlework made of willows on bag
s of ox-hide,and so cross in safety.Rhodes (1101. 1102).1101.In [fourteen hundred and] eighty nine there was an earthqua
ke in thesea of Atalia near Rhodes, which opened the sea--that is itsbottom--and into this opening such a torrent of wat
er poured thatfor more than three hours the bottom of the sea was uncovered byreason of the water which was lost in it,
and then it closed to theformer level.[Footnote: _Nello ottanto_ 9. It is scarcely likely that Leonardoshould here mean
89 AD. Dr. H. MULLER- STRUBING writes to me asfollows on this subject: "With reference to Rhodes Ross says (_Reiseauf de
n Griechischen Inseln, III_ 70 _ff_. 1840), that ancienthistory affords instances of severe earthquakes at Rhodes, among
others one in the second year of the 138th Olympiad=270 B. C.; aremarkably violent one under Antoninus Pius (A. D. 138-1
61) andagain under Constantine and later. But Leonardo expressly speaks ofan earthquake "_nel mar di Atalia presso a Rod
i_", which issingular. The town of Attalia, founded by Attalus, which is what heno doubt means, was in Pamphylia and mor
e than 150 English milesEast of Rhodes in a straight line. Leake and most other geographersidentify it with the present
town of Adalia. Attalia is rarelymentioned by the ancients, indeed only by Strabo and Pliny and noearthquake is spoken o
f. I think therefore you are justified inassuming that Leonardo means 1489". In the elaborate catalogue ofearthquakes in
 the East by Sciale Dshelal eddin Sayouthy (anunpublished Arabic MS. in the possession of Prof. SCHEFER, (Membrede l'Ins
titut, Paris) mention is made of a terrible earthquake inthe year 867 of the Mohamedan Era corresponding to the year 148
9,and it is there stated that a hundred persons were killed by it inthe fortress of Kerak. There are three places of thi
s name. Kerak onthe sea of Tiberias, Kerak near Tahle on the Libanon, which Ivisited in the summer of l876--but neither
of these is the placealluded to. Possibly it may be the strongly fortified town ofKerak=Kir Moab, to the West of the Dea
d Sea. There is no noticeabout this in ALEXIS PERCY, _Memoire sur les tremblements de terresressentis dans la peninsule
turco- hellenique et en Syrie (Memoirescouronnes et memoires des savants etrangers, Academie Royale deBelgique, Tome XXI
II)._]1102.Rhodes has in it 5000 houses.Cyprus (1103. 1104).1103.SITE FOR [A TEMPLE OF] VENUS.You must make steps on fou
r sides, by which to mount to a meadowformed by nature at the top of a rock which may be hollowed out andsupported in fr
ont by pilasters and open underneath in a largeportico,[Footnote: See Pl. LXXXIII. Compare also p. 33 of this Vol. Thest
anding male figure at the side is evidently suggested by MichaelAngelo's David. On the same place a slight sketch of hor
ses seems tohave been drawn first; there is no reason for assuming that the textand this sketch, which have no connectio
n with each other, are ofthe same date._Sito di Venere._ By this heading Leonardo appears to mean Cyprus,which was alway
s considered by the ancients to be the home and birthplace of Aphrodite (Kirpic in Homer).]in which the water may fall i
nto various vases of granite,porphyryand serpentine, within semi-circular recesses; and the watermay overflow from these
. And round this portico towards the Norththere should be a lake with a little island in the midst of whichshould be a t
hick and shady wood; the waters at the top of thepilasters should pour into vases at their base, from whence theyshould
flow in little channels.Starting from the shore of Cilicia towards the South you discoverthe beauties of the island of C
yprus.The Caspian Sea (1105. 1106).1104.>From the shore of the Southern coast of Cilicia may be seen to theSouth the bea
utiful island of Cyprus, which was the realm of thegoddess Venus, and many navigators being attracted by her beauty,had
their ships and rigging broken amidst the reefs, surrounded bythe whirling waters. Here the beauty of delightful hills t
emptswandering mariners to refresh themselves amidst their floweryverdure, where the winds are tempered and fill the isl
and and thesurrounding seas with fragrant odours. Ah! how many a ship has herebeen sunk. Ah! how many a vessel broken on
 these rocks. Here mightbe seen barks without number, some wrecked and half covered by thesand; others showing the poop
and another the prow, here a keel andthere the ribs; and it seems like a day of judgment when thereshould be a resurrect
ion of dead ships, so great is the number ofthem covering all the Northern shore; and while the North gale makesvarious
and fearful noises there.1105.Write to Bartolomeo the Turk as to the flow and ebb of the Blacksea, and whether he is awa
re if there be such a flow and ebb in theHyrcanean or Caspian sea. [Footnote: The handwriting of this notepoints to a la
te date.]1106.WHY WATER IS FOUND AT THE TOP OF MOUNTAINS.>From the straits of Gibraltar to the Don is 3500 miles, that i
s onemile and 1/6, giving a fall of one braccio in a mile to any waterthat moves gently. The Caspian sea is a great deal
 higher; and noneof the mountains of Europe rise a mile above the surface of ourseas; therefore it might be said that th
e water which is on thesummits of our mountains might come from the height of those seas,and of the rivers which flow in
to them, and which are still higher.The sea of Azov.1107.Hence it follows that the sea of Azov is the highest part of th
eMediterranean sea, being at a distance of 3500 miles from theStraits of Gibraltar, as is shown by the map for navigatio
n; and ithas 3500 braccia of descent, that is, one mile and 1/6; therefore itis higher than any mountains which exist in
 the West.[Footnote: The passage before this, in the original, treats of theexit of the waters from Lakes in general.]Th
e Dardanelles.1108.In the Bosphorus the Black Sea flows always into the Egean sea, andthe Egean sea never flows into it.
 And this is because the Caspian,which is 400 miles to the East, with the rivers which pour into it,always flows through
 subterranean caves into this sea of Pontus; andthe Don does the same as well as the Danube, so that the waters ofPontus
 are always higher than those of the Egean; for the higheralways fall towards the lower, and never the lower towards the
higher.Constantinople.1109.The bridge of Pera at Constantinople, 40 braccia wide, 70 bracciahigh above the water, 600 br
accia long; that is 400 over the sea and200 on the land, thus making its own abutments.[Footnote: See Pl. CX No. 1. In 1
453 by order of Sultan Mohamed II.the Golden Horn was crossed by a pontoon bridge laid on barrels (seeJoh. Dukas' Histor
y of the Byzantine Empire XXXVIII p. 279). --Thebiographers of Michelangelo, Vasari as well as Condivi, relate thatat th
e time when Michelangelo suddenly left Rome, in 1506, heentertained some intention of going to Constantinople, there tos
erve the Sultan, who sought to engage him, by means of certainFranciscan Monks, for the purpose of constructing a bridge
 toconnect Constantinople with Pera. See VASARI, _Vite_ (ed. SansoniVII, 168): _Michelangelo, veduto questa furia del pa
pa, dubitando dilui, ebbe, secondo che si dice, voglia di andarsene inGostantinopoli a servire il Turco, per mezzo di ce
rti frati di SanFrancesco, che desiderava averlo per fare un ponte che passassi daGostantinopoli a Pera._ And CONDIVI, _
Vita di M. Buonaroti chap._30_; Michelangelo allora vedendosi condotto a questo, temendodell'ira del papa, penso d'andar
sene in Levante; massimamenteessendo stato dal Turco ricercato con grandissime promesse per mezzodi certi frati di San F
rancesco, per volersene servire in fare unponte da Costantinopoli a Pera ed in altri affari._ Leonardo's planfor this br
idge was made in 1502. We may therefore conclude that atabout that time the Sultan Bajazet II. had either announced acom
petition in this matter, or that through his agents Leonardo hadfirst been called upon to carry out the scheme.]The Euph
rates.1110.If the river will turn to the rift farther on it will never returnto its bed, as the Euphrates does, and this
 may do at Bologna theone who is disappointed for his rivers.Centrae Asia.1111.Mounts Caucasus, Comedorum, and Paropemis
idae are joined togetherbetween Bactria and India, and give birth to the river Oxus whichtakes its rise in these mountai
ns and flows 500 miles towards theNorth and as many towards the West, and discharges its waters intothe Caspian sea; and
 is accompanied by the Oxus, Dargados, Arthamis,Xariaspes, Dargamaim, Ocus and Margus, all very large rivers. Fromthe op
posite side towards the South rises the great river Induswhich sends its waters for 600 miles Southwards and receives as
tributaries in this course the rivers Xaradrus, Hyphasis, Vadris,Vandabal Bislaspus to the East, Suastes and Coe to the
West, unitingwith these rivers, and with their waters it flows 800 miles to theWest; then, turning back by the Arbiti mo
untains makes an elbow andturns Southwards, where after a course of about 100 miles it findsthe Indian Sea, in which it
pours itself by seven branches. On theside of the same mountains rises the great Ganges, which river flowsSouthwards for
 500 miles and to the Southwest a thousand ... andSarabas, Diarnuna, Soas and Scilo, Condranunda are its tributaries.It
flows into the Indian sea by many mouths.On the natives of hot countries.1112.Men born in hot countries love the night b
ecause it refreshes themand have a horror of light because it burns them; and therefore theyare of the colour of night,
that is black. And in cold countries itis just the contrary.[Footnote: The sketch here inserted is in MS. H3 55b.]_XVIII
.__Naval Warfare.--Mechanical Appliances.--Music.__Such theoretical questions, as have been laid before the reader inSec
tions XVI and XVII, though they were the chief subjects ofLeonardo's studies of the sea, did not exclusively claim hisat
tention. A few passages have been collected at the beginning ofthis section, which prove that he had turned his mind to
thepractical problems of navigation, and more especially of navalwarfare. What we know for certain of his life gives us
no data, itis true, as to when or where these matters came under hisconsideration; but the fact remains certain both fro
m these notes inhis manuscripts, and from the well known letter to Ludovico il Moro(No._ 1340_), in which he expressly s
tates that he is as capable asany man, in this very department.__The numerous notes as to the laws and rationale of the
flight ofbirds, are scattered through several note-books. An account of theseis given in the Bibliography of the manuscr
ipts at the end of thiswork. It seems probable that the idea which led him to theseinvestigations was his desire to cons
truct a flying or aerialmachine for man. At the same time it must be admitted that the noteson the two subjects are quit
e unconnected in the manuscripts, andthat those on the flight of birds are by far the most numerous andextensive. The tw
o most important passages that treat of theconstruction of a flying machine are those already published as Tav.XVI, No._
 1 _and Tav. XVIII in the_ "Saggio delle opere di Leonardoda Vinci" _(Milan_ 1872_). The passages--Nos._ 1120-1125--_her
eprinted for the first time and hitherto unknown--refer to the samesubject and, with the exception of one already publis
hed in theSaggio-- No._ 1126--_they are, so far as I know, the only notes,among the numerous observations on the flight
of birds, in which thephenomena are incidentally and expressly connected with the idea ofa flying machine.__The notes on
 machines of war, the construction of fortifications,and similar matters which fall within the department of theEngineer
, have not been included in this work, for the reasons givenon page_ 26 _of this Vol. An exception has been made in favo
ur ofthe passages Nos._ 1127 _and_ 1128, _because they have a moregeneral interest, as bearing on the important question
: whence theMaster derived his knowledge of these matters. Though it would berash to assert that Leonardo was the first
to introduce the scienceof mining into Italy, it may be confidently said that he is one ofthe earliest writers who can b
e proved to have known and understoodit; while, on the other hand, it is almost beyond doubt that in theEast at that tim
e, the whole science of besieging towns and miningin particular, was far more advanced than in Europe. This gives apecul
iar value to the expressions used in No._ 1127._I have been unable to find in the manuscripts any passage whateverwhich
throws any light on Leonardo's great reputation as a musician.Nothing therein illustrates VASARPS well-known statement:_
 Avvenneche morto Giovan Galeazze duca di Milano, e creato Lodovico Sforzanel grado medesimo anno 1494, fu condotto a Mi
lano con granriputazione Lionardo al duca, il quale molto si dilettava del suonodella lira, perche sonasse; e Lionardo p
orto quello strumentoch'egli aveva di sua mano fabbricato d'argento gran parte, in formad'un teschio di cavallo, cosa bi
zzarra e nuova, acciocche l'armoniafosse con maggior tuba e piu sonora di voce; laonde supero tutti imusici che quivi er
ano concorsi a sonare._The only notes on musical matters are those given as Nos._ 1129_and_ 1130, _which explain certain
 arrangements in instruments._The ship's logs of Vitruvius, of Alberti and of Leonardo1113.ON MOVEMENTS;--TO KNOW HOW MU
CH A SHIP ADVANCES IN AN HOUR.The ancients used various devices to ascertain the distance gone bya ship each hour, among
 which Vitruvius [Footnote 6: See VITRUVIUS,_De Architectura lib. X._ C. 14 (p. 264 in the edition of Rose andMuller- St
rubing). The German edition published at Bale in 1543 has,on fol. 596, an illustration of the contrivance, as described
byVitruvius.] gives one in his work on Architecture which is just asfallacious as all the others; and this is a mill whe
el which touchesthe waves of the sea at one end and in each complete revolutiondescribes a straight line which represent
s the circumference of thewheel extended to a straightness. But this invention is of no worthexcepting on the smooth and
 motionless surface of lakes. But if thewater moves together with the ship at an equal rate, then the wheelremains motio
nless; and if the motion of the water is more or lessrapid than that of the ship, then neither has the wheel the samemot
ion as the ship so that this invention is of but little use.There is another method tried by experiment with a known dis
tancebetween one island and another; and this is done by a board or underthe pressure of wind which strikes on it with m
ore or lessswiftness. This is in Battista Alberti [Footnote 25: LEON BATTISTAALBERTI, _De Architectura lib. V._, c. 12 t
reats '_de le navi eparti loro_', but there is no reference to the machine, mentioned byLeonardo. Alberti says here: _No
i abbiamo trattato lungamente inaltro luogo de' modi de le navi, ma in questo luogo ne abbiamo dettoquel tanto che si bi
sogna_. To this the following note is added inthe most recent Italian edition: _Questo libro e tuttora inedito eporta il
 titolo, secondo Gesnero di_ '_Liber navis_'.].Battista Alberti's method which is made by experiment on a knowndistance
between one island and another. But such an invention doesnot succeed excepting on a ship like the one on which the expe
rimentwas made, and it must be of the same burden and have the same sails,and the sails in the same places, and the size
 of the waves must bethe same. But my method will serve for any ship, whether with oarsor sails; and whether it be small
 or large, broad or long, or highor low, it always serves [Footnote 52: Leonardo does not reveal themethod invented by h
im.].Methods of staying and moving in water1114.How an army ought to cross rivers by swimming with air-bags ... Howfishe
s swim [Footnote 2: Compare No. 821.]; of the way in which theyjump out of the water, as may be seen with dolphins; and
it seems awonderful thing to make a leap from a thing which does not resistbut slips away. Of the swimming of animals of
 a long form, such aseels and the like. Of the mode of swimming against currents and inthe rapid falls of rivers. Of the
 mode of swimming of fishes of around form. How it is that animals which have not long hind quartrescannot swim. How it
is that all other animals which have feet withtoes, know by nature how to swim, excepting man. In what way manought to l
earn to swim. Of the way in which man may rest on thewater. How man may protect himself against whirlpools or eddies int
he water, which drag him down. How a man dragged to the bottom mustseek the reflux which will throw him up from the dept
hs. How heought to move his arms. How to swim on his back. How he can and howhe cannot stay under water unless he can ho
ld his breath [13]. Howby means of a certain machine many people may stay some time underwater. How and why I do not des
cribe my method of remaining underwater, or how long I can stay without eating; and I do not publishnor divulge these by
 reason of the evil nature of men who would usethem as means of destruction at the bottom of the sea, by sendingships to
 the bottom, and sinking them together with the men in them.And although I will impart others, there is no danger in the
m;because the mouth of the tube, by which you breathe, is above thewater supported on bags or corks [19].[Footnote: L. 1
3-19 will also be found in Vol. I No. 1.]On naval warfare (1115. 1116).1115.Supposing in a battle between ships and gall
eys that the ships arevictorious by reason of the high of heir tops, you must haul theyard up almost to the top of the m
ast, and at the extremity of theyard, that is the end which is turned towards the enemy, have asmall cage fastened, wrap
ped up below and all round in a greatmattress full of cotton so that it may not be injured by the bombs;then, with the c
apstan, haul down the opposite end of this yard andthe top on the opposite side will go up so high, that it will be fara
bove the round-top of the ship, and you will easily drive out themen that are in it. But it is necessary that the men wh
o are in thegalley should go to the opposite side of it so as to afford acounterpoise to the weight of the men placed in
side the cage on theyard.1116.If you want to build an armada for the sea employ these ships to ramin the enemy's ships.
That is, make ships 100 feet long and 8 feetwide, but arranged so that the left hand rowers may have their oarsto the ri
ght side of the ship, and the right hand ones to the leftside, as is shown at M, so that the leverage of the oars may be
longer. And the said ship may be one foot and a half thick, that ismade with cross beams within and without, with planks
 in contrarydirections. And this ship must have attached to it, a foot below thewater, an iron-shod spike of about the w
eight and size of an anvil;and this, by force of oars may, after it has given the first blow,be drawn back, and driven f
orward again with fury give a secondblow, and then a third, and so many as to destroy the other ship.The use of swimming
 belts.1117.A METHOD OF ESCAPING IN A TEMPEST AND SHIPWRECK AT SEA.Have a coat made of leather, which must be double acr
oss the breast,that is having a hem on each side of about a finger breadth. Thus itwill be double from the waist to the
knee; and the leather must bequite air-tight. When you want to leap into the sea, blow out theskirt of your coat through
 the double hems of the breast; and jumpinto the sea, and allow yourself to be carried by the waves; whenyou see no shor
e near, give your attention to the sea you are in,and always keep in your mouth the air-tube which leads down into theco
at; and if now and again you require to take a breath of freshair, and the foam prevents you, you may draw a breath of t
he airwithin the coat.[Footnote: AMORETTI, _Memorie Storiche_, Tav. II. B. Fig. 5, givesthe same figure, somewhat altere
d. 6. _La canna dell' aria_. CompareVol. I. No. I. Note]On the gravity of water.1118.If the weight of the sea bears on i
ts bottom, a man, lying on thatbottom and having l000 braccia of water on his back, would haveenough to crush him.Diving
 apparatus and Skating (1119-1121).1119.Of walking under water. Method of walking on water.[Footnote: The two sketches b
elonging to this passage are given byAMORETTI, _Memorie Storiche_. Tav. II, Fig. 3 and 4.]1120.Just as on a frozen river
 a man may run without moving his feet, soa car might be made that would slide by itself.[Footnote: The drawings of cart
s by the side of this text have nodirect connection with the problem as stated in words.--Compare No.1448, l. 17.]1121.A
 definition as to why a man who slides on ice does not fall.[Footnote: An indistinct sketch accompanies the passage, in
theoriginal.]On Flying machines (1122-1126).1122.Man when flying must stand free from the waist upwards so as to beable
to balance himself as he does in a boat so that the centre ofgravity in himself and in the machine may counterbalance ea
ch other,and be shifted as necessity demands for the changes of its centre ofresistance.1123.Remember that your flying m
achine must imitate no other than thebat, because the web is what by its union gives the armour, orstrength to the wings
.If you imitate the wings of feathered birds, you will find a muchstronger structure, because they are pervious; that is
, theirfeathers are separate and the air passes through them. But the batis aided by the web that connects the whole and
 is not pervious.1124.TO ESCAPE THE PERIL OF DESTRUCTION.Destruction to such a machine may occur in two ways; of which t
hefirst is the breaking of the machine. The second would be when themachine should turn on its edge or nearly on its edg
e, because itought always to descend in a highly oblique direction, and almostexactly balanced on its centre. As regards
 the first--the breakingof the machine--, that may be prevented by making it as strong aspossible; and in whichever dire
ction it may tend to turn over, onecentre must be very far from the other; that is, in a machine 30braccia long the cent
res must be 4 braccia one from the other.[Footnote: Compare No. 1428.]1125.Bags by which a man falling from a height of
6 braccia may avoidhurting himself, by a fall whether into water or on the ground; andthese bags, strung together like a
 rosary, are to be fixed on one'sback.1126.An object offers as much resistance to the air as the air does tothe object.
You may see that the beating of its wings against theair supports a heavy eagle in the highest and rarest atmosphere,clo
se to the sphere of elemental fire. Again you may see the air inmotion over the sea, fill the swelling sails and drive h
eavily ladenships. From these instances, and the reasons given, a man with wingslarge enough and duly connected might le
arn to overcome theresistance of the air, and by conquering it, succeed in subjugatingit and rising above it. [Footnote:
 A parachute is here sketched,with an explanatory remark. It is reproduced on Tav. XVI in theSaggio, and in: _Leonardo d
a Vinci als Ingenieur etc., Ein Beitragzur Geschichte der Technik und der induktiven Wissenschaften, vonDr. Hermann Grot
he, Berlin_ 1874, p. 50.]Of mining.1127.If you want to know where a mine runs, place a drum over all theplaces where you
 suspect that it is being made, and upon this drumput a couple of dice, and when you are over the spot where they aremin
ing, the dice will jump a little on the drum at every blow whichis given underground in the mining.There are persons who
, having the convenience of a river or a lakein their lands, have made, close to the place where they suspectthat a mine
 is being made, a great reservoir of water, and havecountermined the enemy, and having found them, have turned the water
upon them and destroyed a great number in the mine.Of Greek fire.1128.GREEK FIRE.Take charcoal of willow, and saltpetre,
 and sulphuric acid, andsulphur, and pitch, with frankincense and camphor, and Ethiopianwool, and boil them all together
. This fire is so ready to burn thatit clings to the timbers even under water. And add to thiscomposition liquid varnish
, and bituminous oil, and turpentine andstrong vinegar, and mix all together and dry it in the sun, or in anoven when th
e bread is taken out; and then stick it round hempen orother tow, moulding it into a round form, and studding it all ove
rwith very sharp nails. You must leave in this ball an opening toserve as a fusee, and cover it with rosin and sulphur.A
gain, this fire, stuck at the top of a long plank which has onebraccio length of the end pointed with iron that it may n
ot be burntby the said fire, is good for avoiding and keeping off the ships, soas not to be overwhelmed by their onset.A
gain throw vessels of glass full of pitch on to the enemy's shipswhen the men in them are intent on the battle; and then
 by throwingsimilar burning balls upon them you have it in your power to burnall their ships.[Footnote: Venturi has give
n another short text about the Greek firein a French translation (Essai Section XIV). He adds that theoriginal text is t
o be found in MS. B. 30 (?). Libri speaks of it ina note as follows (_Histoire des sciences mathematiques en ItalieVol.
II_ p. 129): _La composition du feu gregeois est une des chasesqui ont ete les plus cherchees et qui sont encore les plu
sdouteuses. On dit qu'il fut invente au septieme siecle de l'erechretienne par l'architecte Callinique (Constantini Porp
hyrogenetaeopera, Lugd. Batav._ 1617,-- _in-_8vo; p. 172, _de admin, imper.exp._ 48_), et il se trouve souvent mentionne
 par les HistoriensByzantins. Tantot on le langait avec des machines, comme onlancerait une banche, tantot on le souffla
it avec de longs tubes,comme on soufflerait un gaz ou un liquide enflamme (Annae ComnenaeAlexias_, p. 335, _lib. XI.--Ae
liani et Leonis, imperatoris tactica,Lugd.-Bat._ 1613, _in_-4. part. 2 a, p. 322, _Leonis tact. cap._l9.--_Joinville, hi
stoire du Saint Louis collect. Petitot tom. II,_p. 235). _Les ecrivains contemporains disent que l'eau ne pouvaitpas ete
indre ce feu, mais qu'avec du vinaigre et du sable on yparvenait. Suivant quelques historiens le feu gregeois etait comp
osede soufre et de resine. Marcus Graecus (Liber ignium, Paris,_ 1804,_in_-40_) donne plusieurs manieres de le faire qui
 ne sont pas tresintelligibles, mais parmi lesquelles on trouve la composition de lapoudre a canon. Leonard de Vinci (MS
S. de Leonard de Vinci, vol. B.f. 30,) dit qu'on le faisait avec du charbon de saule, du salpetre,de l'eau de vie, de la
 resine, du soufre, de la poix et du camphre.Mais il est probable que nous ne savons pas qu'elle etait sacomposition, su
rtout a cause du secret qu'en faisaient les Grecs. Eneffet, l'empereur Constantin Porphyrogenete recommende a son fils d
ene jamais en donner aux Barbares, et de leur repondre, s'ils endemandaient, qu'il avait ete apporti du ciel par un ange
 et que lesecret en avait ete confie aux Chretiens (ConstantiniPorphyrogennetae opera,_ p. 26-27, _de admin. imper., cap
. _12_)._]Of Music (1129. 1130).1129.A drum with cogs working by wheels with springs [2].[Footnote: This chapter consist
s of explanations of the sketchesshown on Pl. CXXI. Lines 1 and 2 of the text are to be seen at thetop at the left hand
side of the first sketch of a drum. Lines 3-5refer to the sketch immediately below this. Line 6 is written as theside of
 the seventh sketch, and lines 7 and 8 at the side of theeighth. Lines 9-16 are at the bottom in the middle. The remaind
er ofthe text is at the side of the drawing at the bottom.]A square drum of which the parchment may be drawn tight or sl
ackenedby the lever _a b_ [5].A drum for harmony [6].[7] A clapper for harmony; that is, three clappers together.[9] Jus
t as one and the same drum makes a deep or acute soundaccording as the parchments are more or less tightened, so thesepa
rchments variously tightened on one and the same drum will makevarious sounds [16].Keys narrow and close together; (bicc
hi) far apart; these will beright for the trumpet shown above._a_ must enter in the place of the ordinary keys which hav
e the ...in the openings of a flute.1130.Tymbals to be played like the monochord, or the soft flute.[6] Here there is to
 be a cylinder of cane after the manner ofclappers with a musical round called a Canon, which is sung in fourparts; each
 singer singing the whole round. Therefore I here make awheel with 4 teeth so that each tooth takes by itself the part o
f asinger.[Footnote: In the original there are some more sketches, to whichthe text, from line 6, refers. They are studi
es for a contrivanceexactly like the cylinder in our musical boxes.]1131.Of decorations.White and sky-blue cloths, woven
 in checks to make a decoration.Cloths with the threads drawn at _a b c d e f g h i k_, to go roundthe decoration._XIX._
_Philosophical Maxims. Morals. Polemics and Speculations_._Vasari indulges in severe strictures on Leonardo's religious
views.He speaks, among other things, of his_ "capricci nel filosofar dellecose naturali" _and says on this point:_ "Per
il che fece nell'animoun concetto si eretico che e' non si accostava a qualsi vogliareligione, stimando per avventura as
sai piu lo esser filosofo checristiano" _(see the first edition of_ 'Le Vite'_). But thisaccusation on the part of a wri
ter in the days of the Inquisition isnot a very serious one--and the less so, since, throughout themanuscripts, we find
nothing to support it.__Under the heading of "Philosophical Maxims" I have collected allthe passages which can give us a
 clear comprehension of Leonardo'sideas of the world at large. It is scarcely necessary to observethat there is absolute
ly nothing in them to lead to the inferencethat he was an atheist. His views of nature and its laws are nodoubt very unl
ike those of his contemporaries, and have a muchcloser affinity to those which find general acceptance at thepresent day
. On the other hand, it is obvious from Leonardo's will(see No._ 1566_) that, in the year before his death, he hadprofes
sed to adhere to the fundamental doctrines of the RomanCatholic faith, and this evidently from his own personal desire a
ndimpulse.__The incredible and demonstrably fictitious legend of Leonardo'sdeath in the arms of Francis the First, is gi
ven, with others, byVasari and further embellished by this odious comment:_ "Mostravatuttavia quanto avea offeso Dio e g
li uomini del mondo, non avendooperato nell'arte come si conveniva." _This last accusation, it maybe remarked, is above
all evidence of the superficial character ofthe information which Vasari was in a position to give aboutLeonardo. It see
ms to imply that Leonardo was disdainful of diligentlabour. With regard to the second, referring to Leonardo's moralitya
nd dealings with his fellow men, Vasari himself nullifies it byasserting the very contrary in several passages. A furthe
rrefutation may be found in the following sentence from the letter inwhich Melsi, the young Milanese nobleman, announces
 the Master'sdeath to Leonardo's brothers:_ Credo siate certificati della mortedi Maestro Lionardo fratello vostro, e mi
o quanto optimo padre, perla cui morte sarebbe impossibile che io potesse esprimere il doloreche io ho preso; e in mentr
e che queste mia membra si sosterrannoinsieme, io possedero una perpetua infelicita, e meritamente perchesviscerato et a
rdentissimo amore mi portava giornalmente. E dolto adognuno la perdita di tal uomo, quale non e piu in podesta dellanatu
ra, ecc._It is true that, in April_ 1476, _we find the names of Leonardo andVerrocchio entered in the_ "Libro degli Uffi
ziali di notte e de'Monasteri" _as breaking the laws; but we immediately after find thenote_ "Absoluti cum condizione ut
 retamburentur" (Tamburini _was thename given to the warrant cases of the night police). The acquittaltherefore did not
exclude the possibility of a repetition of thecharge. It was in fact repeated, two months later, and on thisoccasion the
 Master and his pupil were again fully acquitted.Verrocchio was at this time forty and Leonardo four-and-twenty. Thedocu
ments referring to this affair are in the State Archives ofFlorence; they have been withheld from publication, but it se
emed tome desirable to give the reader this brief account of the leadingfacts of the story, as the vague hints of it, wh
ich have recentlybeen made public, may have given to the incident an aspect which ithad not in reality, and which it doe
s not deserve.__The passages here classed under the head "Morals" reveal Leonardoto us as a man whose life and conduct w
ere unfailingly governed bylofty principles and aims. He could scarcely have recorded his sternreprobation and unmeasure
d contempt for men who do nothing usefuland strive only for riches, if his own life and ambitions had beensuch as they h
ave so often been misrepresented.__At a period like that, when superstition still exercised unlimiteddominion over the m
inds not merely of the illiterate crowd, but ofthe cultivated and learned classes, it was very natural thatLeonardo's vi
ews as to Alchemy, Ghosts, Magicians, and the likeshould be met with stern reprobation whenever and wherever he mayhave
expressed them; this accounts for the argumentative tone of allhis utterances on such subjects which I have collected in
Subdivision III of this section. To these I have added some passageswhich throw light on Leonardo's personal views on th
e Universe. Theyare, without exception, characterised by a broad spirit ofnaturalism of which the principles are more st
rictly applied in hisessays on Astronomy, and still more on Physical Geography.__To avoid repetition, only such notes on
 Philosophy, Morals andPolemics, have been included in this section as occur as independenttexts in the original MSS. Se
veral moral reflections have alreadybeen given in Vol. I, in section "Allegorical representations,Mottoes and Emblems".
Others will be found in the following section.Nos._ 9 _to_ 12, _Vol. I, are also passages of an argumentativecharacter.
It did not seem requisite to repeat here these andsimilar passages, since their direct connection with the context isfar
 closer in places where they have appeared already, than it wouldbe here._I.PHILOSOPHICAL MAXIMS.Prayers to God (1132. 1
133).1132.I obey Thee Lord, first for the love I ought, in all reason to bearThee; secondly for that Thou canst shorten
or prolong the lives ofmen.1133.A PRAYER.Thou, O God, dost sell us all good things at the price of labour.The powers of
Nature (1134-1139).1134.O admirable impartiality of Thine, Thou first Mover; Thou hast notpermitted that any force shoul
d fail of the order or quality of itsnecessary results.1135.Necessity is the mistress and guide of nature.Necessity is t
he theme and the inventress, the eternal curb and lawof nature.1136.In many cases one and the same thing is attracted by
 two strongforces, namely Necessity and Potency. Water falls in rain; the earthabsorbs it from the necessity for moistur
e; and the sun evaporatesit, not from necessity, but by its power.1137.Weight, force and casual impulse, together with r
esistance, are thefour external powers in which all the visible actions of mortalshave their being and their end.1138.Ou
r body is dependant on heaven and heaven on the Spirit.1139.The motive power is the cause of all life.Psychology (1140-1
147).1140.And you, O Man, who will discern in this work of mine the wonderfulworks of Nature, if you think it would be a
 criminal thing todestroy it, reflect how much more criminal it is to take the life ofa man; and if this, his external f
orm, appears to thee marvellouslyconstructed, remember that it is nothing as compared with the soulthat dwells in that s
tructure; for that indeed, be it what it may,is a thing divine. Leave it then to dwell in His work at His goodwill and p
leasure, and let not your rage or malice destroy alife--for indeed, he who does not value it, does not himself deserveit
 [Footnote 19: In MS. II 15a is the note: _chi no stima la vita,non la merita._].[Footnote: This text is on the back of
the drawings reproduced onPl. CVII. Compare No. 798, 35 note on p. 111: Compare also No. 837and 838.]1141.The soul can n
ever be corrupted with the corruption of the body,,but is in the body as it were the air which causes the sound of theor
gan, where when a pipe bursts, the wind would cease to have anygood effect. [Footnote: Compare No. 845.]1142.The part al
ways has a tendency to reunite with its whole in order toescape from its imperfection.The spirit desires to remain with
its body, because, without theorganic instruments of that body, it can neither act, nor feelanything.1143.If any one wis
hes to see how the soul dwells in its body, let himobserve how this body uses its daily habitation; that is to say, ifth
is is devoid of order and confused, the body will be kept indisorder and confusion by its soul.1144.Why does the eye see
 a thing more clearly in dreams than with theimagination being awake?1145.The senses are of the earth; Reason, stands ap
art in contemplation.[Footnote: Compare No. 842.]1146.Every action needs to be prompted by a motive.To know and to will
are two operations of the human mind.Discerning, judging, deliberating are acts of the human mind.1147.All our knowledge
 has its origin in our preceptions.Science, its principles and rules (1148--1161)1148.Science is the observation of thin
gs possible, whether present orpast; prescience is the knowledge of things which may come to pass,though but slowly.1149
.Experience, the interpreter between formative nature and the humanrace, teaches how that nature acts among mortals; and
 beingconstrained by necessity cannot act otherwise than as reason, whichis its helm, requires her to act.1150.Wisdom is
 the daughter of experience.1151.Nature is full of infinite causes that have never occured inexperience.1152.Truth was t
he only daughter of Time.1153.Experience never errs; it is only your judgments that err bypromising themselves effects s
uch as are not caused by yourexperiments.Experience does not err; only your judgments err by expecting fromher what is n
ot in her power. Men wrongly complain of Experience;with great abuse they accuse her of leading them astray but they set
Experience aside, turning from it with complaints as to ourignorance causing us to be carried away by vain and foolish d
esiresto promise ourselves, in her name, things that are not in her power;saying that she is fallacious. Men are unjust
in complaining ofinnocent Experience, constantly accusing her of error and of falseevidence.1154.Instrumental or mechani
cal science is of all the noblest and themost useful, seeing that by means of this all animated bodies thathave movement
 perform all their actions; and these movements arebased on the centre of gravity which is placed in the middledividing
unequal weights, and it has dearth and wealth of musclesand also lever and counterlever.1155.OF MECHANICS.Mechanics are
the Paradise of mathematical science, because here wecome to the fruits of mathematics. [Footnote: Compare No. 660, 11.1
9--22 (Vol. I., p. 332). 1156.Every instrument requires to be made by experience.1157.The man who blames the supreme cer
tainty of mathematics feeds onconfusion, and can never silence the contradictions of sophisticalsciences which lead to a
n eternal quackery.1158.There is no certainty in sciences where one of the mathematicalsciences cannot be applied, or wh
ich are not in relation with thesemathematics.1159.Any one who in discussion relies upon authority uses, not hisundersta
nding, but rather his memory. Good culture is born of a gooddisposition; and since the cause is more to be praised than
theeffect, I will rather praise a good disposition without culture,than good culture without the disposition.1160.Scienc
e is the captain, and practice the soldiers.1161.OF THE ERRORS OF THOSE WHO DEPEND ON PRACTICE WITHOUT SCIENCE.Those who
 fall in love with practice without science are like asailor who enters a ship without a helm or a compass, and who neve
rcan be certain whither he is going.II.MORALS.What is life? (1162. 1163).1162.Now you see that the hope and the desire o
f returning home and toone's former state is like the moth to the light, and that the manwho with constant longing await
s with joy each new spring time, eachnew summer, each new month and new year--deeming that the things helongs for are ev
er too late in coming--does not perceive that he islonging for his own destruction. But this desire is the veryquintesse
nce, the spirit of the elements, which finding itselfimprisoned with the soul is ever longing to return from the humanbo
dy to its giver. And you must know that this same longing is thatquintessence, inseparable from nature, and that man is
the image ofthe world.1163.O Time! consumer of all things; O envious age! thou dost destroy allthings and devour all thi
ngs with the relentless teeth of years,little by little in a slow death. Helen, when she looked in hermirror, seeing the
 withered wrinkles made in her face by old age,wept and wondered why she had twice been carried away.O Time! consumer of
 all things, and O envious age! by which allthings are all devoured.Death.1164.Every evil leaves behind a grief in our m
emory, except the supremeevil, that is death, which destroys this memory together with life.How to spend life (1165-1170
).1165.0 sleepers! what a thing is slumber! Sleep resembles death. Ah, whythen dost thou not work in such wise as that a
fter death thou maystretain a resemblance to perfect life, when, during life, thou art insleep so like to the hapless de
ad? [Footnote: Compare No. 676, Vol.I. p. 353.]1166.One pushes down the other.By these square-blocks are meant the life
and the studies of men.1167.The knowledge of past times and of the places on the earth is bothan ornament and nutriment
to the human mind.1168.To lie is so vile, that even if it were in speaking well of godlythings it would take off somethi
ng from God's grace; and Truth is soexcellent, that if it praises but small things they become noble.Beyond a doubt trut
h bears the same relation to falsehood as lightto darkness; and this truth is in itself so excellent that, evenwhen it d
wells on humble and lowly matters, it is still infinitelyabove uncertainty and lies, disguised in high and lofty discour
ses;because in our minds, even if lying should be their fifth element,this does not prevent that the truth of things is
the chiefnutriment of superior intellects, though not of wandering wits.But you who live in dreams are better pleased by
 the sophisticalreasons and frauds of wits in great and uncertain things, than bythose reasons which are certain and nat
ural and not so far above us.1169.Avoid studies of which the result dies with the worker.1170.Men are in error when they
 lament the flight of time, accusing it ofbeing too swift, and not perceiving that it is sufficient as itpasses; but goo
d memory, with which nature has endowed us, causesthings long past to seem present.1171.Learning acquired in youth arres
ts the evil of old age; and if youunderstand that old age has wisdom for its food, you will so conductyourself in youth
that your old age will not lack for nourishment.1172.The acquisition of any knowledge is always of use to the intellect,
because it may thus drive out useless things and retain the good.For nothing can be loved or hated unless it is first kn
own.1173.As a day well spent procures a happy sleep, so a life well employedprocures a happy death.1174.The water you to
uch in a river is the last of that which has passed,and the first of that which is coming. Thus it is with time present.
Life if well spent, is long.1175.Just as food eaten without caring for it is turned into loathsomenourishment, so study
without a taste for it spoils memory, byretaining nothing which it has taken in.1176.Just as eating against one's will i
s injurious to health, so studywithout a liking for it spoils the memory, and it retains nothing ittakes in.1177.On Moun
t Etna the words freeze in your mouth and you may make ice ofthem.[Footnote 2: There is no clue to explain this stranges
entence.]Just as iron rusts unless it is used, and water putrifies or, incold, turns to ice, so our intellect spoils unl
ess it is kept inuse.You do ill if you praise, and still worse if you reprove in a matteryou do not understand.When Fort
une comes, seize her in front with a sure hand, becausebehind she is bald.1178.It seems to me that men of coarse and clu
msy habits and of smallknowledge do not deserve such fine instruments nor so great avariety of natural mechanism as men
of speculation and of greatknowledge; but merely a sack in which their food may be stowed andwhence it may issue, since
they cannot be judged to be any thingelse than vehicles for food; for it seems to me they have nothingabout them of the
human species but the voice and the figure, andfor all the rest are much below beasts.1179.Some there are who are nothin
g else than a passage for food andaugmentors of excrement and fillers of privies, because through themno other things in
 the world, nor any good effects are produced,since nothing but full privies results from them.On foolishness and ignora
nce (1180--1182).1180.The greatest deception men suffer is from their own opinions.1181.Folly is the shield of shame, as
 unreadiness is that of povertyglorified.1182.Blind ignorance misleads us thus and delights with the results oflasciviou
s joys.Because it does not know the true light. Because it does not knowwhat is the true light.Vain splendour takes from
 us the power of being .... behold! for itsvain splendour we go into the fire, thus blind ignorance doesmislead us. That
 is, blind ignorance so misleads us that ...O! wretched mortals, open your eyes.On riches (1183--1187).1183.That is not
riches, which may be lost; virtue is our true good andthe true reward of its possessor. That cannot be lost; that neverd
eserts us, but when life leaves us. As to property and externalriches, hold them with trembling; they often leave their
possessorin contempt, and mocked at for having lost them.1184.Every man wishes to make money to give it to the doctors,
destroyersof life; they then ought to be rich. [Footnote 2: Compare No. 856.]Man has much power of discourse which for t
he most part is vain andfalse; animals have but little, but it is useful and true, and asmall truth is better than a gre
at lie.1185.He who possesses most must be most afraid of loss.1186.He who wishes to be rich in a day will be hanged in a
 year.1187.That man is of supreme folly who always wants for fear of wanting;and his life flies away while he is still h
oping to enjoy the goodthings which he has with extreme labour acquired.Rules of Life (1188-1202).1188.If you governed y
our body by the rules of virtue you would not walkon all fours in this world.You grow in reputation like bread in the ha
nds of a child.[Footnote: The first sentence is obscure. Compare Nos. 825, 826.]1189.Savage he is who saves himself.1190
.We ought not to desire the impossible. [Footnote: The writing ofthis note, which is exceedingly minute, is reproduced i
n facsimileon Pl. XLI No. 5 above the first diagram.1191.Ask counsel of him who rules himself well.Justice requires powe
r, insight, and will; and it resembles thequeen-bee.He who does not punish evil commands it to be done.He who takes the
snake by the tail will presently be bitten by it.The grave will fall in upon him who digs it.1192.The man who does not r
estrain wantonness, allies himself withbeasts.You can have no dominion greater or less than that over yourself.He who th
inks little, errs much.It is easier to contend with evil at the first than at the last.No counsel is more loyal than tha
t given on ships which are inperil: He may expect loss who acts on the advice of an inexperiencedyouth.1193.Where there
is most feeling, there is the greatest martyrdom;--agreat martyr.1194.The memory of benefits is a frail defence against
ingratitude.Reprove your friend in secret and praise him openly.Be not false about the past.1195.A SIMILE FOR PATIENCE.P
atience serves us against insults precisely as clothes do againstthe cold. For if you multiply your garments as the cold
 increases,that cold cannot hurt you; in the same way increase your patienceunder great offences, and they cannot hurt y
our feelings.1196.To speak well of a base man is much the same as speaking ill of agood man.1197.Envy wounds with false
accusations, that is with detraction, a thingwhich scares virtue.1198.We are deceived by promises and time disappoints u
s ... [Footnote 2:The rest of this passage may be rendered in various ways, but noneof them give a satisfactory meaning.
]1199.Fear arises sooner than any thing else.1200.Just as courage imperils life, fear protects it.Threats alone are the
weapons of the threatened man.Wherever good fortune enters, envy lays siege to the place andattacks it; and when it depa
rts, sorrow and repentance remainbehind.He who walks straight rarely falls.It is bad if you praise, and worse if you rep
rove a thing, I mean,if you do not understand the matter well.It is ill to praise, and worse to reprimand in matters tha
t you donot understand.1201.Words which do not satisfy the ear of the hearer weary him or vexhim, and the symptoms of th
is you will often see in such hearers intheir frequent yawns; you therefore, who speak before men whose goodwill you des
ire, when you see such an excess of fatigue, abridgeyour speech, or change your discourse; and if you do otherwise, then
instead of the favour you desire, you will get dislike andhostility.And if you would see in what a man takes pleasure, w
ithout hearinghim speak, change the subject of your discourse in talking to him,and when you presently see him intent, w
ithout yawning or wrinklinghis brow or other actions of various kinds, you may be certain thatthe matter of which you ar
e speaking is such as is agreeable to him&c.1202.The lover is moved by the beloved object as the senses are bysensible o
bjects; and they unite and become one and the same thing.The work is the first thing born of this union; if the thing lo
vedis base the lover becomes base.When the thing taken into union is perfectly adapted to that whichreceives it, the res
ult is delight and pleasure and satisfaction.When that which loves is united to the thing beloved it can restthere; when
 the burden is laid down it finds rest there.Politics (1203. 1204).1203.There will be eternal fame also for the inhabita
nts of that town,constructed and enlarged by him.All communities obey and are led by their magnates, and thesemagnates a
lly themselves with the lords and subjugate them in twoways: either by consanguinity, or by fortune; by consanguinity, w
hentheir children are, as it were, hostages, and a security and pledgeof their suspected fidelity; by property, when you
 make each ofthese build a house or two inside your city which may yield somerevenue and he shall have...; 10 towns, fiv
e thousand houses withthirty thousand inhabitants, and you will disperse this greatcongregation of people which stand li
ke goats one behind the other,filling every place with fetid smells and sowing seeds of pestilenceand death;And the city
 will gain beauty worthy of its name and to you it willbe useful by its revenues, and the eternal fame of itsaggrandizem
ent.[Footnote: These notes were possibly written in preparation for aletter. The meaning is obscure.]1204.To preserve Na
ture's chiefest boon, that is freedom, I can findmeans of offence and defence, when it is assailed by ambitioustyrants,
and first I will speak of the situation of the walls, andalso I shall show how communities can maintain their good and j
ustLords.[Footnote: Compare No. 1266.]III.POLEMICS.--SPECULATION.Against Speculators (1205. 1206).1205.Oh! speculators o
n things, boast not of knowing the things thatnature ordinarily brings about; but rejoice if you know the end ofthose th
ings which you yourself devise.1206.Oh! speculators on perpetual motion how many vain projects of thelike character you
have created! Go and be the companions of thesearchers for gold. [Footnote: Another short passage in MS. I,referring als
o to speculators, is given by LIBRI (_Hist, desSciences math._ III, 228): _Sicche voi speculatori non vi fidatedelli aut
ori che anno sol col immaginatione voluto farsi interpretitra la natura e l'omo, ma sol di quelli che non coi cienni del
lanatura, ma cogli effetti delle sue esperienze anno esercitati i loroingegni._]Against alchemists (1207. 1208).1207.The
 false interpreters of nature declare that quicksilver is thecommon seed of every metal, not remembering that nature var
ies theseed according to the variety of the things she desires to producein the world.1208.And many have made a trade of
 delusions and false miracles,deceiving the stupid multitude.Against friars.1209.Pharisees--that is to say, friars.[Foot
note: Compare No. 837, 11. 54-57, No. 1296 (p. 363 and 364),and No. 1305 (p. 370).]Against writers of epitomes.1210.Abbr
eviators do harm to knowledge and to love, seeing that the loveof any thing is the offspring of this knowledge, the love
 being themore fervent in proportion as the knowledge is more certain. Andthis certainty is born of a complete knowledge
 of all the parts,which, when combined, compose the totality of the thing which oughtto be loved. Of what use then is he
 who abridges the details ofthose matters of which he professes to give thorough information,while he leaves behind the
chief part of the things of which thewhole is composed? It is true that impatience, the mother ofstupidity, praises brev
ity, as if such persons had not life longenough to serve them to acquire a complete knowledge of one singlesubject, such
 as the human body; and then they want to comprehendthe mind of God in which the universe is included, weighing itminute
ly and mincing it into infinite parts, as if they had todissect it!Oh! human stupidity, do you not perceive that, though
 you have beenwith yourself all your life, you are not yet aware of the thing youpossess most of, that is of your folly?
 and then, with the crowd ofsophists, you deceive yourselves and others, despising themathematical sciences, in which tr
uth dwells and the knowledge ofthe things included in them. And then you occupy yourself withmiracles, and write that yo
u possess information of those things ofwhich the human mind is incapable and which cannot be proved by anyinstance from
 nature. And you fancy you have wrought miracles whenyou spoil a work of some speculative mind, and do not perceive that
you are falling into the same error as that of a man who strips atree of the ornament of its branches covered with leave
s mingledwith the scented blossoms or fruit....... [Footnote 48: _Givstino_,Marcus Junianus Justinus, a Roman historian
of the second century,who compiled an epitome from the general history written by TrogusPompeius, who lived in the time
of Augustus. The work of the latterwriter no longer exist.] as Justinus did, in abridging the historieswritten by Trogus
 Pompeius, who had written in an ornate style allthe worthy deeds of his forefathers, full of the most admirable andorna
mental passages; and so composed a bald work worthy only ofthose impatient spirits, who fancy they are losing as much ti
me asthat which they employ usefully in studying the works of nature andthe deeds of men. But these may remain in compan
y of beasts; amongtheir associates should be dogs and other animals full of rapine andthey may hunt with them after....,
 and then follow helpless beasts,which in time of great snows come near to your houses asking alms asfrom their master..
..On spirits (1211--1213).1211.O mathematicians shed light on this error.The spirit has no voice, because where there is
 a voice there is abody, and where there is a body space is occupied, and this preventsthe eye from seeing what is place
d behind that space; hence thesurrounding air is filled by the body, that is by its image.1212.There can be no voice whe
re there is no motion or percussion of theair; there can be no percussion of the air where there is noinstrument, there
can be no instrument without a body; and thisbeing so, a spirit can have neither voice, nor form, nor strength.And if it
 were to assume a body it could not penetrate nor enterwhere the passages are closed. And if any one should say that bya
ir, compressed and compacted together, a spirit may take bodies ofvarious forms and by this means speak and move with st
rength--to himI reply that when there are neither nerves nor bones there can be noforce exercised in any kind of movemen
t made by such imaginaryspirits.Beware of the teaching of these speculators, because their reasoningis not confirmed by
experience.1213.Of all human opinions that is to be reputed the most foolish whichdeals with the belief in Necromancy, t
he sister of Alchemy, whichgives birth to simple and natural things. But it is all the moreworthy of reprehension than a
lchemy, because it brings forth nothingbut what is like itself, that is, lies; this does not happen inAlchemy which deal
s with simple products of nature and whosefunction cannot be exercised by nature itself, because it has noorganic instru
ments with which it can work, as men do by means oftheir hands, who have produced, for instance, glass &c. but thisNecro
mancy the flag and flying banner, blown by the winds, is theguide of the stupid crowd which is constantly witness to the
dazzling and endless effects of this art; and there are books full,declaring that enchantments and spirits can work and
speak withouttongues and without organic instruments-- without which it isimpossible to speak-- and can carry heaviest w
eights and raisestorms and rain; and that men can be turned into cats and wolves andother beasts, although indeed it is
those who affirm these thingswho first became beasts.And surely if this Necromancy did exist, as is believed by smallwit
s, there is nothing on the earth that would be of so muchimportance alike for the detriment and service of men, if it we
retrue that there were in such an art a power to disturb the calmserenity of the air, converting it into darkness and ma
kingcoruscations or winds, with terrific thunder and lightnings rushingthrough the darkness, and with violent storms ove
rthrowing highbuildings and rooting up forests; and thus to oppose armies,crushing and annihilating them; and, besides t
hese frightful stormsmay deprive the peasants of the reward of their labours.--Now whatkind of warfare is there to hurt
the enemy so much as to deprive himof the harvest? What naval warfare could be compared with this? Isay, the man who has
 power to command the winds and to make ruinousgales by which any fleet may be submerged, --surely a man who couldcomman
d such violent forces would be lord of the nations, and nohuman ingenuity could resist his crushing force. The hiddentre
asures and gems reposing in the body of the earth would all bemade manifest to him. No lock nor fortress, though impregn
able,would be able to save any one against the will of the necromancer.He would have himself carried through the air fro
m East to West andthrough all the opposite sides of the universe. But why should Ienlarge further upon this? What is the
re that could not be done bysuch a craftsman? Almost nothing, except to escape death. Hereby Ihave explained in part the
 mischief and the usefulness, contained inthis art, if it is real; and if it is real why has it not remainedamong men wh
o desire it so much, having nothing to do with anydeity? For I know that there are numberless people who would, tosatisf
y a whim, destroy God and all the universe; and if thisnecromancy, being, as it were, so necessary to men, has not beenl
eft among them, it can never have existed, nor will it ever existaccording to the definition of the spirit, which is inv
isible insubstance; for within the elements there are no incorporate things,because where there is no body, there is a v
acuum; and no vacuum canexist in the elements because it would be immediately filled up.Turn over.1214.OF SPIRITS.We hav
e said, on the other side of this page, that the definition ofa spirit is a power conjoined to a body; because it cannot
 move ofits own accord, nor can it have any kind of motion in space; and ifyou were to say that it moves itself, this ca
nnot be within theelements. For, if the spirit is an incorporeal quantity, thisquantity is called a vacuum, and a vacuum
 does not exist in nature;and granting that one were formed, it would be immediately filled upby the rushing in of the e
lement in which the vacuum had beengenerated. Therefore, from the definition of weight, which isthis--Gravity is an acci
dental power, created by one element beingdrawn to or suspended in another--it follows that an element, notweighing anyt
hing compared with itself, has weight in the elementabove it and lighter than it; as we see that the parts of water have
no gravity or levity compared with other water, but if you draw itup into the air, then it would acquire weight, and if
you were todraw the air beneath the water then the water which remains abovethis air would acquire weight, which weight
could not sustain itselfby itself, whence collapse is inevitable. And this happens in water;wherever the vacuum may be i
n this water it will fall in; and thiswould happen with a spirit amid the elements, where it wouldcontinuously generate
a vacuum in whatever element it might finditself, whence it would be inevitable that it should be constantlyflying towar
ds the sky until it had quitted these elements.AS TO WHETHER A SPIRIT HAS A BODY AMID THE ELEMENTS.We have proved that a
 spirit cannot exist of itself amid theelements without a body, nor can it move of itself by voluntarymotion unless it b
e to rise upwards. But now we will say how such aspirit taking an aerial body would be inevitably melt into air;because
if it remained united, it would be separated and fall toform a vacuum, as is said above; therefore it is inevitable, if
itis to be able to remain suspended in the air, that it should absorba certain quantity of air; and if it were mingled w
ith the air, twodifficulties arise; that is to say: It must rarefy that portion ofthe air with which it mingles; and for
 this cause the rarefied airmust fly up of itself and will not remain among the air that isheavier than itself; and besi
des this the subtle spiritual essencedisunites itself, and its nature is modified, by which that natureloses some of its
 first virtue. Added to these there is a thirddifficulty, and this is that such a body formed of air assumed bythe spiri
ts is exposed to the penetrating winds, which areincessantly sundering and dispersing the united portions of the air,rev
olving and whirling amidst the rest of the atmosphere; thereforethe spirit which is infused in this1215.air would be dis
membered or rent and broken up with the rending ofthe air into which it was incorporated.AS TO WHETHER THE SPIRIT, HAVIN
G TAKEN THIS BODY OF AIR, CAN MOVE OFITSELF OR NOT.It is impossible that the spirit infused into a certain quantity ofai
r, should move this air; and this is proved by the above passagewhere it is said: the spirit rarefies that portion of th
e air inwhich it incorporates itself; therefore this air will rise highabove the other air and there will be a motion of
 the air caused byits lightness and not by a voluntary movement of the spirit, and ifthis air is encountered by the wind
, according to the 3rd of this,the air will be moved by the wind and not by the spirit incorporatedin it.AS TO WHETHER T
HE SPIRIT CAN SPEAK OR NOT.In order to prove whether the spirit can speak or not, it isnecessary in the first place to d
efine what a voice is and how it isgenerated; and we will say that the voice is, as it were, themovement of air in frict
ion against a dense body, or a dense body infriction against the air,--which is the same thing. And thisfriction of the
dense and the rare condenses the rare and causesresistance; again, the rare, when in swift motion, and the rare inslow m
otion condense each other when they come in contact and make anoise and very great uproar; and the sound or murmur made
by therare moving through the rare with only moderate swiftness, like agreat flame generating noises in the air; and the
 tremendous uproarmade by the rare mingling with the rare, and when that air which isboth swift and rare rushes into tha
t which is itself rare and inmotion, it is like the flame of fire which issues from a big gun andstriking against the ai
r; and again when a flame issues from thecloud, there is a concussion in the air as the bolt is generated.Therefore we m
ay say that the spirit cannot produce a voice withoutmovement of the air, and air in it there is none, nor can it emitwh
at it has not; and if desires to move that air in which it isincorporated, it is necessary that the spirit should multip
lyitself, and that cannot multiply which has no quantity. And in the4th place it is said that no rare body can move, if
it has not astable spot, whence it may take its motion; much more is it so whenan element has to move within its own ele
ment, which does not moveof itself, excepting by uniform evaporation at the centre of thething evaporated; as occurs in
a sponge squeezed in the hand heldunder water; the water escapes in every direction with equalmovement through the openi
ngs between the fingers of the hand inwhich it is squeezed.As to whether the spirit has an articulate voice, and whether
 thespirit can be heard, and what hearing is, and seeing; the wave ofthe voice passes through the air as the images of o
bjects pass tothe eye.Nonentity.1216.Every quantity is intellectually conceivable as infinitelydivisible.[Amid the vastn
ess of the things among which we live, the existenceof nothingness holds the first place; its function extends over allt
hings that have no existence, and its essence, as regards time,lies precisely between the past and the future, and has n
othing inthe present. This nothingness has the part equal to the whole, andthe whole to the part, the divisible to the i
ndivisible; and theproduct of the sum is the same whether we divide or multiply, and inaddition as in subtraction; as is
 proved by arithmeticians by theirtenth figure which represents zero; and its power has not extensionamong the things of
 Nature.][What is called Nothingness is to be found only in time and inspeech. In time it stands between the past and fu
ture and has noexistence in the present; and thus in speech it is one of the thingsof which we say: They are not, or the
y are impossible.]With regard to time, nothingness lies between the past and thefuture, and has nothing to do with the p
resent, and as to its natureit is to be classed among things impossible: hence, from what hasbeen said, it has no existe
nce; because where there is nothing therewould necessarily be a vacuum.[Footnote: Compare No. 916.]Reflections on Nature
 (1217-1219).1217.EXAMPLE OF THE LIGHTNING IN CLOUDS.[O mighty and once living instrument of formative nature. Incapable
of availing thyself of thy vast strength thou hast to abandon a lifeof stillness and to obey the law which God and time
gave toprocreative nature.]Ah! how many a time the shoals of terrified dolphins and the hugetunny-fish were seen to flee
 before thy cruel fury, to escape;whilst thy fulminations raised in the sea a sudden tempest withbuffeting and submersio
n of ships in the great waves; and fillingthe uncovered shores with the terrified and desperate fishes whichfled from th
ee, and left by the sea, remained in spots where theybecame the abundant prey of the people in the neighbourhood.O time,
 swift robber of all created things, how many kings, how manynations hast thou undone, and how many changes of states an
d ofvarious events have happened since the wondrous forms of this fishperished here in this cavernous and winding recess
. Now destroyed bytime thou liest patiently in this confined space with bones strippedand bare; serving as a support and
 prop for the superimposedmountain.[Footnote: The character of the handwriting points to an earlyperiod of Leonardo's li
fe. It has become very indistinct, and is atpresent exceedingly difficult to decipher. Some passages remaindoubtful.][Fo
otnote: Compare No. 1339, written on the same sheet.]1218.The watery element was left enclosed between the raised banks
of therivers, and the sea was seen between the uplifted earth and thesurrounding air which has to envelope and enclose t
he complicatedmachine of the earth, and whose mass, standing between the water andthe element of fire, remained much res
tricted and deprived of itsindispensable moisture; the rivers will be deprived of their waters,the fruitful earth will p
ut forth no more her light verdure; thefields will no more be decked with waving corn; all the animals,finding no fresh
grass for pasture, will die and food will then belacking to the lions and wolves and other beasts of prey, and to menwho
 after many efforts will be compelled to abandon their life, andthe human race will die out. In this way the fertile and
 fruitfulearth will remain deserted, arid and sterile from the water beingshut up in its interior, and from the activity
 of nature it willcontinue a little time to increase until the cold and subtle airbeing gone, it will be forced to end w
ith the element of fire; andthen its surface will be left burnt up to cinder and this will bethe end of all terrestrial
nature. [Footnote: Compare No. 1339,written on the same sheet.]1219.Why did nature not ordain that one animal should not
 live by thedeath of another? Nature, being inconstant and taking pleasure increating and making constantly new lives an
d forms, because sheknows that her terrestrial materials become thereby augmented, ismore ready and more swift in her cr
eating, than time in hisdestruction; and so she has ordained that many animals shall be foodfor others. Nay, this not sa
tisfying her desire, to the same end shefrequently sends forth certain poisonous and pestilential vapoursupon the vast i
ncrease and congregation of animals; and most of allupon men, who increase vastly because other animals do not feed upon
them; and, the causes being removed, the effects would not follow.This earth therefore seeks to lose its life, desiring
only continualreproduction; and as, by the argument you bring forward anddemonstrate, like effects always follow like ca
uses, animals are theimage of the world._XX.__Humorous Writings.__Just as Michaelangelo's occasional poems reflect his p
rivate lifeas well as the general disposition of his mind, we may find in thewritings collected in this section, the tra
nscript of Leonardo'sfanciful nature, and we should probably not be far wrong inassuming, that he himself had recited th
ese fables in the company ofhis friends or at the court festivals of princes and patrons._ Eratanto piacevole nella conv
ersazione-- _so relates Vasari_--chetirava a se gli animi delle genti. _And Paulus Jovius says in hisshort biography of
the artist:_ Fuit ingenio valde comi, nitido,liberali, vultu autem longe venustissimo, et cum elegantiae omnisdeliciarum
que maxime theatralium mirificus inventor ac arbiteresset, ad lyramque scito caneret, cunctis per omnem aetatemprincipib
us mire placuit. _There can be no doubt that the fables arethe original offspring of Leonardo's brain, and not borrowed
fromany foreign source; indeed the schemes and plans for the compositionof fables collected in division V seem to afford
 an external proofof this, if the fables themselves did not render it self-evident.Several of them-- for instance No._ l
279--_are so strikinglycharacteristic of Leonardo's views of natural science that we cannotdo them justice till we are a
cquainted with his theories on suchsubjects; and this is equally true of the 'Prophecies'_._I have prefixed to these qua
int writings the 'Studies on the lifeand habits of animals' which are singular from their peculiaraphoristic style, and
I have transcribed them in exactly the orderin which they are written in MS. H. This is one of the very rareinstances in
 which one subject is treated in a consecutive series ofnotes, all in one MS., and Leonardo has also departed from hisor
dinary habits, by occasionally not completing the text on the pageit is begun. These brief notes of a somewhat mysteriou
s bearing havebeen placed here, simply because they may possibly have beenintended to serve as hints for fables or alleg
ories. They canscarcely be regarded as preparatory for a natural history, ratherthey would seem to be extracts. On the o
ne hand the names of some ofthe animals seem to prove that Leonardo could not here be recordingobservations of his own;
on the other hand the notes on their habitsand life appear to me to dwell precisely on what must haveinterested him most
--so far as it is possible to form any completeestimate of his nature and tastes.__In No._ 1293 _lines_ 1-10, _we have a
 sketch of a scheme forgrouping the Prophecies. I have not however availed myself of it asa clue to their arrangement he
re because, in the first place, thetexts are not so numerous as to render the suggested classificationuseful to the read
er, and, also, because in reading the long series,as they occur in the original, we may follow the author's mind; andher
e and there it is not difficult to see how one theme suggestedanother. I have however regarded Leonardo's scheme for the
classification of the Prophecies as available for that of the Fablesand Jests, and have adhered to it as far as possible
.__Among the humourous writings I might perhaps have included the_'Rebusses', _of which there are several in the collect
ion ofLeonardo's drawings at Windsor; it seems to me not likely that manyor all of them could be solved at the present d
ay and the MSS. throwno light on them. Nor should I be justified if I intended to includein the literary works the well-
known caricatures of human facesattributed to Leonardo-- of which, however, it may be incidentallyobserved, the greater
number are in my opinion undoubtedly spurious.Two only have necessarily been given owing to their presence intext, which
 it was desired to reproduce: Vol. I page_ 326, _and Pl.CXXII. It can scarcely be doubted that some satirical intention
isconveyed by the drawing on Pl. LXIV (text No. _688_).My reason for not presenting Leonardo to the reader as a poet is
thefact that the maxims and morals in verse which have been ascribed tohim, are not to be found in the manuscripts, and
Prof. Uzielli hasalready proved that they cannot be by him. Hence it would seem thatonly a few short verses can be attri
buted to him with anycertainty._I.STUDIES ON THE LIFE AND HABITS OF ANIMALS.1220.THE LOVE OF VIRTUE.The gold-finch is a
bird of which it is related that, when it iscarried into the presence of a sick person, if the sick man is goingto die,
the bird turns away its head and never looks at him; but ifthe sick man is to be saved the bird never loses sight of him
 but isthe cause of curing him of all his sickness.Like unto this is the love of virtue. It never looks at any vile orba
se thing, but rather clings always to pure and virtuous things andtakes up its abode in a noble heart; as the birds do i
n green woodson flowery branches. And this Love shows itself more in adversitythan in prosperity; as light does, which s
hines most where the placeis darkest.1221.ENVY.We read of the kite that, when it sees its young ones growing toobig in t
he nest, out of envy it pecks their sides, and keeps themwithout food.CHEERFULNESS.Cheerfulness is proper to the cock, w
hich rejoices over every littlething, and crows with varied and lively movements.SADNESS.Sadness resembles the raven, wh
ich, when it sees its young ones bornwhite, departs in great grief, and abandons them with dolefullamentations, and does
 not feed them until it sees in them some fewblack feathers.1222.PEACE.We read of the beaver that when it is pursued, kn
owing that it isfor the virtue [contained] in its medicinal testicles and not beingable to escape, it stops; and to be a
t peace with its pursuers, itbites off its testicles with its sharp teeth, and leaves them to itsenemies.RAGE.It is said
 of the bear that when it goes to the haunts of bees totake their honey, the bees having begun to sting him he leaves th
ehoney and rushes to revenge himself. And as he seeks to be revengedon all those that sting him, he is revenged on none;
 in such wisethat his rage is turned to madness, and he flings himself on theground, vainly exasperating, by his hands a
nd feet, the foes againstwhich he is defending himself.1223.GRATITUDE.The virtue of gratitude is said to be more [develo
ped] in the birdscalled hoopoes which, knowing the benefits of life and food, theyhave received from their father and th
eir mother, when they see themgrow old, make a nest for them and brood over them and feed them,and with their beaks pull
 out their old and shabby feathers; andthen, with a certain herb restore their sight so that they return toa prosperous
state.AVARICE.The toad feeds on earth and always remains lean; because it nevereats enough:-- it is so afraid lest it sh
ould want for earth.1224.INGRATITUDE.Pigeons are a symbol of ingratitude; for when they are old enough nolonger to need
to be fed, they begin to fight with their father, andthis struggle does not end until the young one drives the father ou
tand takes the hen and makes her his own.CRUELTY.The basilisk is so utterly cruel that when it cannot kill animals byits
 baleful gaze, it turns upon herbs and plants, and fixing itsgaze on them withers them up.1225.GENEROSITY.It is said of
the eagle that it is never so hungry but that it willleave a part of its prey for the birds that are round it, which,bei
ng unable to provide their own food, are necessarily dependent onthe eagle, since it is thus that they obtain food.DISCI
PLINE.When the wolf goes cunningly round some stable of cattle, and byaccident puts his foot in a trap, so that he makes
 a noise, he biteshis foot off to punish himself for his folly.1226.FLATTERERS OR SYRENS.The syren sings so sweetly that
 she lulls the mariners to sleep;then she climbs upon the ships and kills the sleeping mariners.PRUDENCE.The ant, by her
 natural foresight provides in the summer for thewinter, killing the seeds she harvests that they may not germinate,and
on them, in due time she feeds.FOLLY.The wild bull having a horror of a red colour, the hunters dress upthe trunk of a t
ree with red and the bull runs at this with greatfrenzy, thus fixing his horns, and forthwith the hunters kill himthere.
1227.JUSTICE.We may liken the virtue of Justice to the king of the bees whichorders and arranges every thing with judgme
nt. For some bees areordered to go to the flowers, others are ordered to labour, othersto fight with the wasps, others t
o clear away all dirt, others toaccompagny and escort the king; and when he is old and has no wingsthey carry him. And i
f one of them fails in his duty, he is punishedwithout reprieve.TRUTH.Although partridges steal each other's eggs, never
theless the youngborn of these eggs always return to their true mother.1228.FIDELITY, OR LOYALTY.The cranes are so faith
ful and loyal to their king, that at night,when he is sleeping, some of them go round the field to keep watchat a distan
ce; others remain near, each holding a stone in his foot,so that if sleep should overcome them, this stone would fall an
dmake so much noise that they would wake up again. And there areothers which sleep together round the king; and this the
y do everynight, changing in turn so that their king may never find themwanting.FALSEHOOD.The fox when it sees a flock o
f herons or magpies or birds of thatkind, suddenly flings himself on the ground with his mouth open tolook as he were de
ad; and these birds want to peck at his tongue,and he bites off their heads.1229.LIES.The mole has very small eyes and i
t always lives under ground; andit lives as long as it is in the dark but when it comes into thelight it dies immediatel
y, because it becomes known;--and so it iswith lies.VALOUR.The lion is never afraid, but rather fights with a bold spiri
t andsavage onslaught against a multitude of hunters, always seeking toinjure the first that injures him.FEAR OR COWARDI
CE.The hare is always frightened; and the leaves that fall from thetrees in autumn always keep him in terror and general
ly put him toflight.1230.MAGNANIMITY.The falcon never preys but on large birds; and it will let itselfdie rather than fe
ed on little ones, or eat stinking meat.VAIN GLORY.As regards this vice, we read that the peacock is more guilty of itth
an any other animal. For it is always contemplating the beauty ofits tail, which it spreads in the form of a wheel, and
by its criesattracts to itself the gaze of the creatures that surround it.And this is the last vice to be conquered.1231
.CONSTANCY.Constancy may be symbolised by the phoenix which, knowing that bynature it must be resuscitated, has the cons
tancy to endure theburning flames which consume it, and then it rises anew.INCONSTANCY.The swallow may serve for Inconst
ancy, for it is always in movement,since it cannot endure the smallest discomfort.CONTINENCE.The camel is the most lustf
ul animal there is, and will follow thefemale for a thousand miles. But if you keep it constantly with itsmother or sist
er it will leave them alone, so temperate is itsnature.1232.INCONTINENCE.The unicorn, through its intemperance and not k
nowing how to controlitself, for the love it bears to fair maidens forgets its ferocityand wildness; and laying aside al
l fear it will go up to a seateddamsel and go to sleep in her lap, and thus the hunters take it.HUMILITY.We see the most
 striking example of humility in the lamb which willsubmit to any animal; and when they are given for food to imprisoned
lions they are as gentle to them as to their own mother, so thatvery often it has been seen that the lions forbear to ki
ll them.1233.PRIDE.The falcon, by reason of its haughtiness and pride, is fain to lordit and rule over all the other bir
ds of prey, and longs to be soleand supreme; and very often the falcon has been seen to assault theeagle, the Queen of b
irds.ABSTINENCE.The wild ass, when it goes to the well to drink, and finds the watertroubled, is never so thirsty but th
at it will abstain fromdrinking, and wait till the water is clear again.GLUTTONY.The vulture is so addicted to gluttony
that it will go a thousandmiles to eat a carrion [carcase]; therefore is it that it followsarmies.1234.CHASTITY.The turt
le-dove is never false to its mate; and if one dies theother preserves perpetual chastity, and never again sits on a gre
enbough, nor ever again drinks of clear water.UNCHASTITY.The bat, owing to unbridled lust, observes no universal rule in
pairing, but males with males and females with females pairpromiscuously, as it may happen.MODERATION.The ermine out of
moderation never eats but once in the day; it willrather let itself be taken by the hunters than take refuge in adirty l
air, in order not to stain its purity.1235.THE EAGLE.The eagle when it is old flies so high that it scorches itsfeathers
, and Nature allowing that it should renew its youth, itfalls into shallow water [Footnote 5: The meaning is obscure.].
Andif its young ones cannot bear to gaze on the sun [Footnote 6: Themeaning is obscure.]--; it does not feed them with a
ny bird, thatdoes not wish to die. Animals which much fear it do not approach itsnest, although it does not hurt them. I
t always leaves part of itsprey uneaten.LUMERPA,--FAME.This is found in Asia Major, and shines so brightly that it absor
bsits own shadow, and when it dies it does not lose this light, andits feathers never fall out, but a feather pulled out
 shines nolonger.1236.THE PELICAN.This bird has a great love for its young; and when it finds them inits nest dead from
a serpent's bite, it pierces itself to the heart,and with its blood it bathes them till they return to life.THE SALAMAND
ER.This has no digestive organs, and gets no food but from the fire, inwhich it constantly renews its scaly skin.The sal
amander, which renews its scaly skin in the fire,--forvirtue.THE CAMELEON.This lives on air, and there it is the prey of
 all the birds; so inorder to be safer it flies above the clouds and finds an air sorarefied that it cannot support the
bird that follows it.At that height nothing can go unless it has a gift from Heaven, andthat is where the chameleon flie
s.1237.THE ALEPO, A FISH.The fish _alepo_ does not live out of water.THE OSTRICH.This bird converts iron into nourishmen
t, and hatches its eggs byits gaze;--Armies under commanders.THE SWAN.The swan is white without any spot, and it sings s
weetly as it dies,its life ending with that song.THE STORK.This bird, by drinking saltwater purges itself of distempers.
 If themale finds his mate unfaithful, he abandons her; and when it growsold its young ones brood over it, and feed it t
ill it dies.1238.THE GRASSHOPPER.This silences the cuckoo with its song. It dies in oil and revivesin vinegar. It sings
in the greatest heatsTHE BAT.The more light there is the blinder this creature becomes; as thosewho gaze most at the sun
 become most dazzled.--For Vice, that cannotremain where Virtue appears.THE PARTRIDGE.This bird changes from the female
into the male and forgets itsformer sex; and out of envy it steals the eggs from others andhatches them, but the young o
nes follow the true mother.THE SWALLOW.This bird gives sight to its blind young ones by means of celandine.1239.THE OYST
ER.--FOR TREACHERY.This creature, when the moon is full opens itself wide, and when thecrab looks in he throws in a piec
e of rock or seaweed and the oystercannot close again, whereby it serves for food to that crab. This iswhat happens to h
im who opens his mouth to tell his secret. Hebecomes the prey of the treacherous hearer.THE BASILISK.--CRUELTY.All snake
s flie from this creature; but the weasel attacks it bymeans of rue and kills it.THE ASP.This carries instantaneous deat
h in its fangs; and, that it may nothear the charmer it stops its ears with its tail.1240.THE DRAGON.This creature entan
gles itself in the legs of the elephant whichfalls upon it, and so both die, and in its death it is avenged.THE VIPER.Sh
e, in pairing opens her mouth and at last clenches her teeth andkills her husband. Then the young ones, growing within h
er body rendher open and kill their mother.THE SCORPION.Saliva, spit out when fasting will kill a scorpion. This may bel
ikened to abstinence from greediness, which removes and heals theills which result from that gluttony, and opens the pat
h of virtue.1241.THE CROCODILE. HYPOCRISY.This animal catches a man and straightway kills him; after he isdead, it weeps
 for him with a lamentable voice and many tears. Then,having done lamenting, it cruelly devours him. It is thus with the
hypocrite, who, for the smallest matter, has his face bathed withtears, but shows the heart of a tiger and rejoices in h
is heart atthe woes of others, while wearing a pitiful face.THE TOAD.The toad flies from the light of the sun, and if it
 is held there byforce it puffs itself out so much as to hide its head below andshield itself from the rays. Thus does t
he foe of clear and radiantvirtue, who can only be constrainedly brought to face it with puffedup courage.1242.THE CATER
PILLAR.--FOR VIRTUE IN GENERAL.The caterpillar, which by means of assiduous care is able to weaveround itself a new dwel
ling place with marvellous artifice and fineworkmanship, comes out of it afterwards with painted and lovelywings, with w
hich it rises towards Heaven.THE SPIDER.The spider brings forth out of herself the delicate and ingeniousweb, which make
s her a return by the prey it takes.[Footnote: Two notes are underneath this text. The first: _'nessunachosa e da ttemer
e piu che lla sozza fama'_ is a repetition of thefirst line of the text given in Vol. I No. 695.The second: _faticha fug
ga cholla fama in braccio quasi ochultata c_is written in red chalk and is evidently an incomplete sentence.]1243.THE LI
ON.This animal, with his thundering roar, rouses his young the thirdday after they are born, teaching them the use of al
l their dormantsenses and all the wild things which are in the wood flee away.This may be compared to the children of Vi
rtue who are roused by thesound of praise and grow up in honourable studies, by which they aremore and more elevated; wh
ile all that is base flies at the sound,shunning those who are virtuous.Again, the lion covers over its foot tracks, so
that the way it hasgone may not be known to its enemies. Thus it beseems a captain toconceal the secrets of his mind so
that the enemy may not know hispurpose.1244.THE TARANTULA.The bite of the tarantula fixes a man's mind on one idea; that
 is onthe thing he was thinking of when he was bitten.THE SCREECH-OWL AND THE OWL.These punish those who are scoffing at
 them by pecking out theireyes; for nature has so ordered it, that they may thus be fed.1245.THE ELEPHANT.The huge eleph
ant has by nature what is rarely found in man; that isHonesty, Prudence, Justice, and the Observance of Religion; inasmu
chas when the moon is new, these beasts go down to the rivers, andthere, solemnly cleansing themselves, they bathe, and
so, havingsaluted the planet, return to the woods. And when they are ill,being laid down, they fling up plants towards H
eaven as though theywould offer sacrifice. --They bury their tusks when they fall outfrom old age.--Of these two tusks t
hey use one to dig up roots forfood; but they save the point of the other for fighting with; whenthey are taken by hunte
rs and when worn out by fatigue, they dig upthese buried tusks and ransom themselves.1246.They are merciful, and know th
e dangers, and if one finds a manalone and lost, he kindly puts him back in the road he has missed,if he finds the footp
rints of the man before the man himself. Itdreads betrayal, so it stops and blows, pointing it out to the otherelephants
 who form in a troop and go warily.These beasts always go in troops, and the oldest goes in front andthe second in age r
emains the last, and thus they enclose the troop.Out of shame they pair only at night and secretly, nor do they thenrejo
in the herd but first bathe in the river. The females do notfight as with other animals; and it is so merciful that it i
s mostunwilling by nature ever to hurt those weaker than itself. And if itmeets in the middle of its way a flock of shee
p1247.it puts them aside with its trunk, so as not to trample them underfoot; and it never hurts any thing unless when p
rovoked. When onehas fallen into a pit the others fill up the pit with branches,earth and stones, thus raising the botto
m that he may easily getout. They greatly dread the noise of swine and fly in confusion,doing no less harm then, with th
eir feet, to their own kind than tothe enemy. They delight in rivers and are always wandering aboutnear them, though on
account of their great weight they cannot swim.They devour stones, and the trunks of trees are their favouritefood. They
 have a horror of rats. Flies delight in their smell andsettle on their back, and the beast scrapes its skin making itsf
olds even and kills them.1248.When they cross rivers they send their young ones up against thestream of the water; thus,
 being set towards the fall, they breakthe united current of the water so that the current does not carrythem away. The
dragon flings itself under the elephant's body, andwith its tail it ties its legs; with its wings and with its arms ital
so clings round its ribs and cuts its throat with its teeth, andthe elephant falls upon it and the dragon is burst. Thus
, in itsdeath it is revenged on its foe.THE DRAGON.These go in companies together, and they twine themselves after thema
nner of roots, and with their heads raised they cross lakes, andswim to where they find better pasture; and if they did
not thuscombine1249.they would be drowned, therefore they combine.THE SERPENT.The serpent is a very large animal. When i
t sees a bird in the airit draws in its breath so strongly that it draws the birds into itsmouth too. Marcus Regulus, th
e consul of the Roman army wasattacked, with his army, by such an animal and almost defeated. Andthis animal, being kill
ed by a catapult, measured 123 feet, that is64 1/2 braccia and its head was high above all the trees in a wood.THE BOA(?
)This is a very large snake which entangles itself round the legs ofthe cow so that it cannot move and then sucks it, in
 such wise thatit almost dries it up. In the time of Claudius the Emperor, therewas killed, on the Vatican Hill,1250.one
 which had inside it a boy, entire, that it had swallowed.THE MACLI.--CAUGHT WHEN ASLEEP.This beast is born in Scandinav
ia. It has the shape of a greathorse, excepting that the great length of its neck and of its earsmake a difference. It f
eeds on grass, going backwards, for it has solong an upper lip that if it went forwards it would cover up thegrass. Its
legs are all in one piece; for this reason when it wantsto sleep it leans against a tree, and the hunters, spying out th
eplace where it is wont to sleep, saw the tree almost through, andthen, when it leans against it to sleep, in its sleep
it falls, andthus the hunters take it. And every other mode of taking it is invain, because it is incredibly swift in ru
nning.1251.THE BISON WHICH DOES INJURY IN ITS FLIGHT.This beast is a native of Paeonia and has a neck with a mane like a
horse. In all its other parts it is like a bull, excepting that itshorns are in a way bent inwards so that it cannot but
t; hence it hasno safety but in flight, in which it flings out its excrement to adistance of 400 braccia in its course,
and this burns like firewherever it touches.LIONS, PARDS, PANTHERS, TIGERS.These keep their claws in the sheath, and nev
er put them out unlessthey are on the back of their prey or their enemy.THE LIONESS.When the lioness defends her young f
rom the hand of the hunter, inorder not to be frightened by the spears she keeps her eyes on theground, to the end that
she may not by her flight leave her youngones prisoners.1252.THE LION.This animal, which is so terrible, fears nothing m
ore than the noiseof empty carts, and likewise the crowing of cocks. And it is muchterrified at the sight of one, and lo
oks at its comb with afrightened aspect, and is strangely alarmed when its face iscovered.THE PANTHER IN AFRICA.This has
 the form of the lioness but it is taller on its legs andslimmer and long bodied; and it is all white and marked with bl
ackspots after the manner of rosettes; and all animals delight to lookupon these rosettes, and they would always be stan
ding round it ifit were not for the terror of its face;1253.therefore knowing this, it hides its face, and the surroundi
nganimals grow bold and come close, the better to enjoy the sight ofso much beauty; when suddenly it seizes the nearest
and at oncedevours it.CAMELS.The Bactrian have two humps; the Arabian one only. They are swift inbattle and most useful
to carry burdens. This animal is extremelyobservant of rule and measure, for it will not move if it has agreater weight
than it is used to, and if it is taken too far itdoes the same, and suddenly stops and so the merchants are obligedto lo
dge there.1254.THE TIGER.This beast is a native of Hyrcania, and it is something like thepanther from the various spots
on its skin. It is an animal ofterrible swiftness; the hunter when he finds its young ones carriesthem off hastily, plac
ing mirrors in the place whence he takes them,and at once escapes on a swift horse. The panther returning findsthe mirro
rs fixed on the ground and looking into them believes itsees its young; then scratching with its paws it discovers thech
eat. Forthwith, by means of the scent of its young, it follows thehunter, and when this hunter sees the tigress he drops
 one of theyoung ones and she takes it, and having carried it to the den sheimmediately returns to the hunter and does12
55.the same till he gets into his boat.CATOBLEPAS.It is found in Ethiopia near to the source Nigricapo. It is not avery
large animal, is sluggish in all its parts, and its head is solarge that it carries it with difficulty, in such wise tha
t italways droops towards the ground; otherwise it would be a great pestto man, for any one on whom it fixes its eyes di
es immediately.[Footnote: Leonardo undoubtedly derived these remarks as to theCatoblepas from Pliny, Hist. Nat. VIII. 21
 (al. 32): _Apud HesperiosAethiopas fons est Nigris_ (different readings), _ut pleriqueexistimavere, Nili caput.-----Jux
ta hunc fera appellatur catoblepas,modica alioquin, ceterisque membris iners, caput tantum praegraveaegre ferens; alias
internecio humani generis, omnibus qui oculosejus videre, confestim morientibus._ Aelian, _Hist. An._ gives a farmore mi
nute description of the creature, but he says that it poisonsbeasts not by its gaze, but by its venomous breath. Athenae
us 221 B,mentions both. If Leonardo had known of these two passages, he wouldscarcely have omitted the poisonous breath.
 (H. MULLER-STRUBING.)]THE BASILISK.This is found in the province of Cyrenaica and is not more than 12fingers long. It h
as on its head a white spot after the fashion of adiadem. It scares all serpents with its whistling. It resembles asnake
, but does not move by wriggling but from the centre forwardsto the right. It is said that one1256.of these, being kille
d with a spear by one who was on horse-back,and its venom flowing on the spear, not only the man but the horsealso died.
 It spoils the wheat and not only that which it touches,but where it breathes the grass dries and the stones are split.T
HE WEASEL.This beast finding the lair of the basilisk kills it with the smellof its urine, and this smell, indeed, often
 kills the weasel itself.THE CERASTES.This has four movable little horns; so, when it wants to feed, ithides under leave
s all of its body except these little horns which,as they move, seem to the birds to be some small worms at play. Thenth
ey immediately swoop down to pick them and the Cerastes suddenlytwines round them and encircles and devours them.1257.TH
E AMPHISBOENA.This has two heads, one in its proper place the other at the tail;as if one place were not enough from whi
ch to fling its venom.THE IACULUS.This lies on trees, and flings itself down like a dart, and piercesthrough the wild be
ast and kills them.THE ASP.The bite of this animal cannot be cured unless by immediatelycutting out the bitten part. Thi
s pestilential animal has such alove for its mate that they always go in company. And if, by mishap,one of them is kille
d the other, with incredible swiftness, followshim who has killed it; and it is so determined and eager forvengeance tha
t it overcomes every difficulty, and passing by everytroop it seeks to hurt none but its enemy. And it will travel anydi
stance, and it is impossible to avoid it unless by crossing waterand by very swift flight. It has its eyes turned inward
s, and largeears and it hears better than it sees.1258.THE ICHNEUMON.This animal is the mortal enemy of the asp. It is a
 native of Egyptand when it sees an asp near its place, it runs at once to the bedor mud of the Nile and with this makes
 itself muddy all over, thenit dries itself in the sun, smears itself again with mud, and thus,drying one after the othe
r, it makes itself three or four coatingslike a coat of mail. Then it attacks the asp, and fights well withhim, so that,
 taking its time it catches him in the throat anddestroys him.THE CROCODILE.This is found in the Nile, it has four feet
and lives on land and inwater. No other terrestrial creature but this is found to have notongue, and it only bites by mo
ving its upper jaw. It grows to alength of forty feet and has claws and is armed with a hide thatwill take any blow. By
day it is on land and at night in the water.It feeds on fishes, and going to sleep on the bank of the Nile withits mouth
 open, a bird called1259.trochilus, a very small bird, runs at once to its mouth and hopsamong its teeth and goes peckin
g out the remains of the food, and soinciting it with voluptuous delight tempts it to open the whole ofits mouth, and so
 it sleeps. This being observed by the ichneumon itflings itself into its mouth and perforates its stomach and bowels,an
d finally kills it.THE DOLPHIN.Nature has given such knowledge to animals, that besides theconsciousness of their own ad
vantages they know the disadvantages oftheir foes. Thus the dolphin understands what strength lies in a cutfrom the fins
 placed on his chine, and how tender is the belly ofthe crocodile; hence in fighting with him it thrusts at him frombene
ath and rips up his belly and so kills him.The crocodile is a terror to those that flee, and a base coward tothose that
pursue him.1260.THE HIPPOPOTAMUS.This beast when it feels itself over-full goes about seeking thorns,or where there may
be the remains of canes that have been split, andit rubs against them till a vein is opened; then when the blood hasflow
ed as much as he needs, he plasters himself with mud and healsthe wound. In form he is something like a horse with long
haunches,a twisted tail and the teeth of a wild boar, his neck has a mane;the skin cannot be pierced, unless when he is
bathing; he feeds onplants in the fields and goes into them backwards so that it mayseem, as though he had come out.THE
IBIS.This bird resembles a crane, and when it feels itself ill it fillsits craw with water, and with its beak makes an i
njection of it.THE STAG.These creatures when they feel themselves bitten by the spidercalled father-long-legs, eat crabs
 and free themselves of the venom.1261.THE LIZARD.This, when fighting with serpents eats the sow-thistle and is free.THE
 SWALLOW.This [bird] gives sight to its blind young ones, with the juice ofthe celandine.THE WEASEL.This, when chasing r
ats first eats of rue.THE WILD BOAR.This beast cures its sickness by eating of ivy.THE SNAKE.This creature when it wants
 to renew itself casts its old skin,beginning with the head, and changing in one day and one night.THE PANTHER.This beas
t after its bowels have fallen out will still fight withthe dogs and hunters.1262.THE CHAMELEON.This creature always tak
es the colour of the thing on which it isresting, whence it is often devoured together with the leaves onwhich the eleph
ant feeds.THE RAVEN.When it has killed the Chameleon it takes laurel as a purge.1263.Moderation checks all the vices. Th
e ermine will die rather thanbesmirch itself.OF FORESIGHT.The cock does not crow till it has thrice flapped its wings; t
heparrot in moving among boughs never puts its feet excepting where ithas first put its beak. Vows are not made till Hop
e is dead.Motion tends towards the centre of gravity.1264.MAGNANIMITY.The falcon never seizes any but large birds and wi
ll sooner die thaneat [tainted] meat of bad savour.II.FABLES.Fables on animals (1265-1270).1265.A FABLE.An oyster being
turned out together with other fish in the house ofa fisherman near the sea, he entreated a rat to take him to the sea.T
he rat purposing to eat him bid him open; but as he bit him theoyster squeezed his head and closed; and the cat came and
 killedhim.1266.A FABLE.The thrushes rejoiced greatly at seeing a man take the owl anddeprive her of liberty, tying her
feet with strong bonds. But thisowl was afterwards by means of bird-lime the cause of the thrusheslosing not only their
liberty, but their life. This is said forthose countries which rejoice in seeing their governors lose theirliberty, when
 by that means they themselves lose all succour, andremain in bondage in the power of their enemies, losing theirliberty
 and often their life.1267.A FABLE.A dog, lying asleep on the fur of a sheep, one of his fleas,perceiving the odour of t
he greasy wool, judged that this must be aland of better living, and also more secure from the teeth and nailsof the dog
 than where he fed on the dog; and without fartherreflection he left the dog and went into the thick wool. There hebegan
 with great labour to try to pass among the roots of the hairs;but after much sweating had to give up the task as vain,
becausethese hairs were so close that they almost touched each other, andthere was no space where fleas could taste the
skin. Hence, aftermuch labour and fatigue, he began to wish to return to his dog, whohowever had already departed; so he
 was constrained after longrepentance and bitter tears, to die of hunger.1268.A FABLE.The vain and wandering butterfly,
not content with being able to flyat its ease through the air, overcome by the tempting flame of thecandle, decided to f
ly into it; but its sportive impulse was thecause of a sudden fall, for its delicate wings were burnt in theflame. And t
he hapless butterfly having dropped, all scorched, atthe foot of the candlestick, after much lamentation and repentance,
dried the tears from its swimming eyes, and raising its faceexclaimed: O false light! how many must thou have miserably
deceivedin the past, like me; or if I must indeed see light so near, ought Inot to have known the sun from the false gla
re of dirty tallow?A FABLE.The monkey, finding a nest of small birds, went up to it greatlydelighted. But they, being al
ready fledged, he could only succeed intaking the smallest; greatly delighted he took it in his hand andwent to his abod
e; and having begun to look at the little bird hetook to kissing it, and from excess of love he kissed it so much andtur
ned it about and squeezed it till he killed it. This is said forthose who by not punishing their children let them come
to mischief.1269.A FABLE.A rat was besieged in his little dwelling by a weasel, which withunwearied vigilance awaited hi
s surrender, while watching hisimminent peril through a little hole. Meanwhile the cat came by andsuddenly seized the we
asel and forthwith devoured it. Then the ratoffered up a sacrifice to Jove of some of his store of nuts, humblythanking
His providence, and came out of his hole to enjoy hislately lost liberty. But he was instantly deprived of it, togetherw
ith his life, by the cruel claws and teeth of the lurking cat.1270.A FABLE.The ant found a grain of millet. The seed fee
ling itself takenprisoner cried out to her: "If you will do me the kindness to allowme accomplish my function of reprodu
ction, I will give you a hundredsuch as I am." And so it was.A Spider found a bunch of grapes which for its sweetness wa
s muchresorted to by bees and divers kinds of flies. It seemed to her thatshe had found a most convenient spot to spread
 her snare, and havingsettled herself on it with her delicate web, and entered into hernew habitation, there, every day
placing herself in the openingsmade by the spaces between the grapes, she fell like a thief on thewretched creatures whi
ch were not aware of her. But, after a fewdays had passed, the vintager came, and cut away the bunch of grapesand put it
 with others, with which it was trodden; and thus thegrapes were a snare and pitfall both for the treacherous spider and
the betrayed flies.An ass having gone to sleep on the ice over a deep lake, his heatdissolved the ice and the ass awoke
under water to his great grief,and was forthwith drowned.A falcon, unable to endure with patience the disappearance of a
duck, which, flying before him had plunged under water, wished tofollow it under water, and having soaked his feathers h
ad to remainin the water while the duck rising to the air mocked at the falconas he drowned.The spider wishing to take f
lies in her treacherous net, was cruellykilled in it by the hornet.An eagle wanting to mock at the owl was caught by the
 wings inbird-lime and was taken and killed by a man.Fables on lifeless objects (1271--1274).1271.The water finding that
 its element was the lordly ocean, was seizedwith a desire to rise above the air, and being encouraged by theelement of
fire and rising as a very subtle vapour, it seemed asthough it were really as thin as air. But having risen very high, i
treached the air that was still more rare and cold, where the fireforsook it, and the minute particles, being brought to
gether, unitedand became heavy; whence its haughtiness deserting it, it betookitself to flight and it fell from the sky,
 and was drunk up by thedry earth, where, being imprisoned for a long time, it did penancefor its sin.1272.A FABLE.The r
azor having one day come forth from the handle which serves asits sheath and having placed himself in the sun, saw the s
unreflected in his body, which filled him with great pride. Andturning it over in his thoughts he began to say to himsel
f: "Andshall I return again to that shop from which I have just come?Certainly not; such splendid beauty shall not, plea
se God, be turnedto such base uses. What folly it would be that could lead me toshave the lathered beards of rustic peas
ants and perform such menialservice! Is this body destined for such work? Certainly not. I willhide myself in some retir
ed spot and there pass my life in tranquilrepose." And having thus remained hidden for some months, one day hecame out i
nto the air, and issuing from his sheath, saw himselfturned to the similitude of a rusty saw while his surface no longer
reflected the resplendent sun. With useless repentance he vainlydeplored the irreparable mischief saying to himself: "Oh
! how farbetter was it to employ at the barbers my lost edge of suchexquisite keenness! Where is that lustrous surface?
It has beenconsumed by this vexatious and unsightly rust."The same thing happens to those minds which instead of exercis
e givethemselves up to sloth. They are like the razor here spoken of, andlose the keenness of their edge, while the rust
 of ignorance spoilstheir form.A FABLE.A stone of some size recently uncovered by the water lay on acertain spot somewha
t raised, and just where a delightful groveended by a stony road; here it was surrounded by plants decorated byvarious f
lowers of divers colours. And as it saw the great quantityof stones collected together in the roadway below, it began to
 wishit could let itself fall down there, saying to itself: "What have Ito do here with these plants? I want to live in
the company ofthose, my sisters." And letting itself fall, its rapid course endedamong these longed for companions. When
 it had been there sometimeit began to find itself constantly toiling under the wheels of thecarts the iron-shoed feet o
f horses and of travellers. This onerolled it over, that one trod upon it; sometimes it lifted itself alittle and then i
t was covered with mud or the dung of some animal,and it was in vain that it looked at the spot whence it had come asa p
lace of solitude and tranquil place.Thus it happens to those who choose to leave a life of solitarycomtemplation, and co
me to live in cities among people full ofinfinite evil.1273.Some flames had already lasted in the furnace of a glass-blo
wer,when they saw a candle approaching in a beautiful and glitteringcandlestick. With ardent longing they strove to reac
h it; and one ofthem, quitting its natural course, writhed up to an unburnt brand onwhich it fed and passed at the oppos
ite end out by a narrow chink tothe candle which was near. It flung itself upon it, and with fiercejealousy and greedine
ss it devoured it, having reduced it almost todeath, and, wishing to procure the prolongation of its life, ittried to re
turn to the furnace whence it had come. But in vain, forit was compelled to die, the wood perishing together with thecan
dle, being at last converted, with lamentation and repentance,into foul smoke, while leaving all its sisters in brillian
t andenduring life and beauty.1274.A small patch of snow finding itself clinging to the top of a rockwhich was lying on
the topmost height of a very high mountain andbeing left to its own imaginings, it began to reflect in this way,saying t
o itself: "Now, shall not I be thought vain and proud forhaving placed myself--such a small patch of snow--in so lofty a
spot, and for allowing that so large a quantity of snow as I haveseen here around me, should take a place lower than min
e? Certainlymy small dimensions by no means merit this elevation. How easily mayI, in proof of my insignificance, experi
ence the same fate as thatwhich the sun brought about yesterday to my companions, who wereall, in a few hours, destroyed
 by the sun. And this happened fromtheir having placed themselves higher than became them. I will fleefrom the wrath of
the sun, and humble myself and find a placebefitting my small importance." Thus, flinging itself down, it beganto descen
d, hurrying from its high home on to the other snow; butthe more it sought a low place the more its bulk increased, so t
hatwhen at last its course was ended on a hill, it found itself no lessin size than the hill which supported it; and it
was the last of thesnow which was destroyed that summer by the sun. This is said forthose who, humbling themselves, beco
me exalted.Fables on plants (1275-1279).1275.The cedar, being desirous of producing a fine and noble fruit at itssummit,
 set to work to form it with all the strength of its sap. Butthis fruit, when grown, was the cause of the tall and uprig
httree-top being bent over.The peach, being envious of the vast quantity of fruit which she sawborne on the nut-tree, he
r neighbour, determined to do the same, andloaded herself with her own in such a way that the weight of thefruit pulled
her up by the roots and broke her down to the ground.The nut-tree stood always by a road side displaying the wealth ofit
s fruit to the passers by, and every one cast stones at it.The fig-tree, having no fruit, no one looked at it; then, wis
hing toproduce fruits that it might be praised by men, it was bent andbroken down by them.The fig-tree, standing by the
side of the elm and seeing that itsboughs were bare of fruit, yet that it had the audacity to keep theSun from its own u
nripe figs with its branches, said to it: "Oh elm!art thou not ashamed to stand in front of me. But wait till myoffsprin
g are fully grown and you will see where you are!" But whenher offspring were mature, a troop of soldiers coming by fell
 uponthe fig-tree and her figs were all torn off her, and her boughs cutaway and broken. Then, when she was thus maimed
in all her limbs,the elm asked her, saying: "O fig-tree! which was best, to bewithout offspring, or to be brought by the
m into so miserable aplight!"1276.The plant complains of the old and dry stick which stands by itsside and of the dry st
akes that surround it.One keeps it upright, the other keeps it from low company.1277.A FABLE.A nut, having been carried
by a crow to the top of a tall campanileand released by falling into a chink from the mortal grip of itsbeak, it prayed
the wall by the grace bestowed on it by God inallowing it to be so high and thick, and to own such fine bells andof so n
oble a tone, that it would succour it, and that, as it hadnot been able to fall under the verdurous boughs of its venera
blefather and lie in the fat earth covered up by his fallen leaves itwould not abandon it; because, finding itself in th
e beak of thecruel crow, it had there made a vow that if it escaped from her itwould end its life in a little hole. At t
hese words the wall, movedto compassion, was content to shelter it in the spot where it hadfallen; and after a short tim
e the nut began to split open and putforth roots between the rifts of the stones and push them apart, andto throw out sh
oots from its hollow shell; and, to be brief, theserose above the building and the twisted roots, growing thicker,began
to thrust the walls apart, and tear out the ancient stonesfrom their old places. Then the wall too late and in vain bewa
iledthe cause of its destruction and in a short time, it wrought theruin of a great part of it.1278.A FABLE.The privet f
eeling its tender boughs loaded with young fruit,pricked by the sharp claws and beak of the insolent blackbird,complaine
d to the blackbird with pitious remonstrance entreating herthat since she stole its delicious fruits she should not depr
ive itof the leaves with which it preserved them from the burning rays ofthe sun, and that she should not divest it of i
ts tender bark byscratching it with her sharp claws. To which the blackbird repliedwith angry upbraiding: "O, be silent,
 uncultured shrub! Do you notknow that Nature made you produce these fruits for my nourishment;do you not see that you a
re in the world [only] to serve me as food;do you not know, base creature, that next winter you will be foodand prey for
 the Fire?" To which words the tree listened patiently,and not without tears. After a short time the blackbird was taken
 ina net and boughs were cut to make a cage, in which to imprison her.Branches were cut, among others from the pliant pr
ivet, to serve forthe small rods of the cage; and seeing herself to be the cause ofthe Blackbird's loss of liberty it re
joiced and spoke as follows: "OBlackbird, I am here, and not yet burnt by fire as you said. I shallsee you in prison bef
ore you see me burnt."A FABLE.The laurel and the myrtle seeing the pear tree cut down cried outwith a loud voice: "O pea
r-tree! whither are you going? Where is thepride you had when you were covered with ripe fruits? Now you willno longer s
hade us with your mass of leaves." Then the pear-treereplied: "I am going with the husbandman who has cut me down and wh
owill take me to the workshop of a good sculptor who by his art willmake me take the form of Jove the god; and I shall b
e dedicated in atemple and adored by men in the place of Jove, while you are boundalways to remain maimed and stripped o
f your boughs, which will beplaced round me to do me honour.A FABLE.The chesnut, seeing a man upon the fig-tree, bending
 its boughs downand pulling off the ripe fruits, which he put into his open mouthdestroying and crushing them with his h
ard teeth, it tossed its longboughs and with a noisy rustle exclaimed: "O fig! how much less areyou protected by nature
than I. See how in me my sweet offspring areset in close array; first clothed in soft wrappers over which is thehard but
 softly lined husk; and not content with taking this care ofme, and having given them so strong a shelter, on this she h
asplaced sharp and close-set spines so that the hand of man cannothurt me." Then the fig-tree and her offspring began to
 laugh andhaving laughed she said: "I know man to be of such ingenuity thatwith rods and stones and stakes flung up amon
g your branches he willbereave you of your fruits; and when they are fallen, he willtrample them with his feet or with s
tones, so that your offspringwill come out of their armour, crushed and maimed; while I amtouched carefully by their han
ds, and not like you with sticks andstones."1279.The hapless willow, finding that she could not enjoy the pleasure ofsee
ing her slender branches grow or attain to the height she wished,or point to the sky, by reason of the vine and whatever
 other treesthat grew near, but was always maimed and lopped and spoiled,brought all her spirits together and gave and d
evoted itselfentirely to imagination, standing plunged in long meditation andseeking, in all the world of plants, with w
hich of them she mightally herself and which could not need the help of her withes. Havingstood for some time in this pr
olific imagination, with a suddenflash the gourd presented itself to her thoughts and tossing all herbranches with extre
me delight, it seemed to her that she had foundthe companion suited to her purpose, because the gourd is more aptto bind
 others than to need binding; having come to this conclusionshe awaited eagerly some friendly bird who should be the med
iator ofher wishes. Presently seeing near her the magpie she said to him: "Ogentle bird! by the memory of the refuge whi
ch you found thismorning among my branches, when the hungry cruel, and rapaciousfalcon wanted to devour you, and by that
 repose which you havealways found in me when your wings craved rest, and by the pleasureyou have enjoyed among my bough
s, when playing with your companionsor making love--I entreat you find the gourd and obtain from hersome of her seeds, a
nd tell her that those that are born of them Iwill treat exactly as though they were my own flesh and blood; andin this
way use all the words you can think of, which are of thesame persuasive purport; though, indeed, since you are a master
oflanguage, I need not teach you. And if you will do me this service Ishall be happy to have your nest in the fork of my
 boughs, and allyour family without payment of any rent." Then the magpie, havingmade and confirmed certain new stipulat
ions with the willow,--andprincipally that she should never admit upon her any snake orpolecat, cocked his tail, and put
 down his head, and flung himselffrom the bough, throwing his weight upon his wings; and these,beating the fleeting air,
 now here, now there, bearing aboutinquisitively, while his tail served as a rudder to steer him, hecame to a gourd; the
n with a handsome bow and a few polite words, heobtained the required seeds, and carried them to the willow, whoreceived
 him with a cheerful face. And when he had scraped away withhis foot a small quantity of the earth near the willow, desc
ribing acircle, with his beak he planted the grains, which in a short timebegan to grow, and by their growth and the bra
nches to take up allthe boughs of the willow, while their broad leaves deprived it ofthe beauty of the sun and sky. And
not content with so much evil,the gourds next began, by their rude hold, to drag the ends of thetender shoots down towar
ds the earth, with strange twisting anddistortion.Then, being much annoyed, it shook itself in vain to throw off thegour
d. After raving for some days in such plans vainly, because thefirm union forbade it, seeing the wind come by it commend
ed itselfto him. The wind flew hard and opened the old and hollow stem of thewillow in two down to the roots, so that it
 fell into two parts. Invain did it bewail itself recognising that it was born to no goodend.III.JESTS AND TALES.1280.A
JEST.A priest, making the rounds of his parish on Easter Eve, andsprinkling holy water in the houses as is customary, ca
me to apainter's room, where he sprinkled the water on some of hispictures. The painter turned round, somewhat angered,
and asked himwhy this sprinkling had been bestowed on his pictures; then said thepriest, that it was the custom and his
duty to do so, and that hewas doing good; and that he who did good might look for good inreturn, and, indeed, for better
, since God had promised that everygood deed that was done on earth should be rewarded a hundred-foldfrom above. Then th
e painter, waiting till he went out, went to anupper window and flung a large pail of water on the priest's back,saying:
 "Here is the reward a hundred-fold from above, which yousaid would come from the good you had done me with your holy wa
ter,by which you have damaged my pictures."1281.When wine is drunk by a drunkard, that wine is revenged on thedrinker.12
82.Wine, the divine juice of the grape, finding itself in a golden andrichly wrought cup, on the table of Mahomet, was p
uffed up withpride at so much honour; when suddenly it was struck by a contraryreflection, saying to itself: "What am I
about, that I shouldrejoice, and not perceive that I am now near to my death and shallleave my golden abode in this cup
to enter into the foul and fetidcaverns of the human body, and to be transmuted from a fragrant anddelicious liquor into
 a foul and base one. Nay, and as though somuch evil as this were not enough, I must for a long time lie inhideous recep
tacles, together with other fetid and corrupt matter,cast out from human intestines." And it cried to Heaven, imploringv
engeance for so much insult, and that an end might henceforth beput to such contempt; and that, since that country produ
ced thefinest and best grapes in the whole world, at least they should notbe turned into wine. Then Jove made that wine
drunk by Mahomet torise in spirit to his brain; and that in so deleterious a mannerthat it made him mad, and gave birth
to so many follies that when hehad recovered himself, he made a law that no Asiatic should drinkwine, and henceforth the
 vine and its fruit were left free.As soon as wine has entered the stomach it begins to ferment andswell; then the spiri
t of that man begins to abandon his body,rising as it were skywards, and the brain finds itself parting fromthe body. Th
en it begins to degrade him, and make him rave like amadman, and then he does irreparable evil, killing his friends.1283
.An artizan often going to visit a great gentleman without anydefinite purpose, the gentleman asked him what he did this
 for. Theother said that he came there to have a pleasure which his lordshipcould not have; since to him it was a satisf
action to see mengreater than himself, as is the way with the populace; while thegentleman could only see men of less co
nsequence than himself; andso lords and great men were deprived of that pleasure.1284.Franciscan begging Friars are wont
, at certain times, to keep fasts,when they do not eat meat in their convents. But on journeys, asthey live on charity,
they have license to eat whatever is setbefore them. Now a couple of these friars on their travels, stoppedat an inn, in
 company with a certain merchant, and sat down with himat the same table, where, from the poverty of the inn, nothing wa
sserved to them but a small roast chicken. The merchant, seeing thisto be but little even for himself, turned to the fri
ars and said:"If my memory serves me, you do not eat any kind of flesh in yourconvents at this season." At these words t
he friars were compelledby their rule to admit, without cavil, that this was the truth; sothe merchant had his wish, and
 eat the chicken and the friars didthe best they could. After dinner the messmates departed, all threetogether, and afte
r travelling some distance they came to a river ofsome width and depth. All three being on foot--the friars by reasonof
their poverty, and the other from avarice--it was necessary bythe custom of company that one of the friars, being barefo
ot, shouldcarry the merchant on his shoulders: so having given his woodenshoes into his keeping, he took up his man. But
 it so happened thatwhen the friar had got to the middle of the river, he againremembered a rule of his order, and stopp
ing short, he looked up,like Saint Christopher, to the burden on his back and said: "Tellme, have you any money about yo
u?"--"You know I have", answered theother, "How do you suppose that a Merchant like me should go aboutotherwise?" "Alack
!" cried the friar, "our rules forbid as to carryany money on our persons," and forthwith he dropped him into thewater,
which the merchant perceived was a facetious way of beingrevenged on the indignity he had done them; so, with a smiling
face,and blushing somewhat with shame, he peaceably endured the revenge.1285.A JEST.A man wishing to prove, by the autho
rity of Pythagoras, that he hadformerly been in the world, while another would not let him finishhis argument, the first
 speaker said to the second: "It is by thistoken that I was formerly here, I remember that you were a miller."The other
one, feeling himself stung by these words, agreed that itwas true, and that by the same token he remembered that the spe
akerhad been the ass that carried the flour.A JEST.It was asked of a painter why, since he made such beautiful figures,w
hich were but dead things, his children were so ugly; to which thepainter replied that he made his pictures by day, and
his childrenby night.1286.A man saw a large sword which another one wore at his side. Said he"Poor fellow, for a long ti
me I have seen you tied to that weapon;why do you not release yourself as your hands are untied, and setyourself free?"
To which the other replied: "This is none of yours,on the contrary it is an old story." The former speaker, feelingstung
, replied: "I know that you are acquainted with so few thingsin this world, that I thought anything I could tell you wou
ld be newto you."1287.A man gave up his intimacy with one of his friends because he oftenspoke ill of his other friends.
 The neglected friend one daylamenting to this former friend, after much complaining, entreatedhim to say what might be
the cause that had made him forget so muchfriendship. To which he answered: "I will no longer be intimate withyou becaus
e I love you, and I do not choose that you, by speakingill of me, your friend, to others, should produce in others, as i
nme, a bad impression of yourself, by speaking evil to them of me,your friend. Therefore, being no longer intimate toget
her, it willseem as though we had become enemies; and in speaking evil of me, asis your wont, you will not be blamed so
much as if we continuedintimate.1288.A man was arguing and boasting that he knew many and various tricks.Another among t
he bystanders said: "I know how to play a trick whichwill make whomsoever I like pull off his breeches." The first man--
the boaster--said: "You won't make me pull off mine, and I bet you apair of hose on it." He who proposed the game, havin
g accepted theoffer, produced breeches and drew them across the face of him whobet the pair of hose and won the bet [4].
A man said to an acquaintance: "Your eyes are changed to a strangecolour." The other replied: "It often happens, but you
 have notnoticed it." "When does it happen?" said the former. "Every timethat my eyes see your ugly face, from the shock
 of so unpleasing asight they suddenly turn pale and change to a strange colour."A man said to another: "Your eyes are c
hanged to a strange colour."The other replied: "It is because my eyes behold your strange uglyface."A man said that in h
is country were the strangest things in theworld. Another answered: "You, who were born there, confirm this astrue, by t
he strangeness of your ugly face."[Footnote: The joke turns, it appears, on two meanings of trarre andis not easily tran
slated.]1289.An old man was publicly casting contempt on a young one, and boldlyshowing that he did not fear him; on whi
ch the young man repliedthat his advanced age served him better as a shield than either histongue or his strength.1290.A
 JEST.A sick man finding himself in _articulo mortis_ heard a knock at thedoor, and asking one of his servants who was k
nocking, the servantwent out, and answered that it was a woman calling herself MadonnaBona. Then the sick man lifting hi
s arms to Heaven thanked God witha loud voice, and told the servants that they were to let her comein at once, so that h
e might see one good woman before he died,since in all his life he had never yet seen one.1291.A JEST.A man was desired
to rise from bed, because the sun was alreadyrisen. To which he replied: "If I had as far to go, and as much todo as he
has, I should be risen by now; but having but a little wayto go, I shall not rise yet."1292.A man, seeing a woman ready
to hold up the target for a joustingmatch, exclaimed, looking at the shield, and considering his spear:"Alack! this is t
oo small a workman for so great a business."IV.PROPHECIES.1293.THE DIVISION OF THE PROPHECIES.First, of things relating
to animals; secondly, of irrationalcreatures; thirdly of plants; fourthly, of ceremonies; fifthly, ofmanners; sixthly, o
f cases or edicts or quarrels; seventhly, ofcases that are impossible in nature [paradoxes], as, for instance,of those t
hings which, the more is taken from them, the more theygrow. And reserve the great matters till the end, and the smallma
tters give at the beginning. And first show the evils and then thepunishment of philosophical things.(Of Ants.)These cre
atures will form many communities, which will hidethemselves and their young ones and victuals in dark caverns, andthey
will feed themselves and their families in dark places for manymonths without any light, artificial or natural.[Footnote
: Lines 1--5l are in the original written in one column,beginning with the text of line 11. At the end of the column is
theprogramme for the arrangement of the prophecies, placed here at thehead: Lines 56--79 form a second column, lines 80-
-97 a third one(see the reproduction of the text on the facsimile PI. CXVIII).Another suggestion for the arrangement of
the prophecies is to befound among the notes 55--57 on page 357.](Of Bees.)And many others will be deprived of their sto
re and their food, andwill be cruelly submerged and drowned by folks devoid of reason. OhJustice of God! Why dost thou n
ot wake and behold thy creatures thusill used?(Of Sheep, Cows, Goats and the like.)Endless multitudes of these will have
 their little children takenfrom them ripped open and flayed and most barbarously quartered.(Of Nuts, and Olives, and Ac
orns, and Chesnuts, and such like.)Many offspring shall be snatched by cruel thrashing from the veryarms of their mother
s, and flung on the ground, and crushed.(Of Children bound in Bundles.)O cities of the Sea! In you I see your citizens--
both females andmales--tightly bound, arms and legs, with strong withes by folks whowill not understand your language. A
nd you will only be able toassuage your sorrows and lost liberty by means of tearful complaintsand sighing and lamentati
on among yourselves; for those who willbind you will not understand you, nor will you understand them.(Of Cats that eat
Rats.)In you, O cities of Africa your children will be seen quartered intheir own houses by most cruel and rapacious bea
sts of your owncountry.(Of Asses that are beaten.)[Footnote 48: Compare No. 845.] O Nature! Wherefore art thou sopartial
; being to some of thy children a tender and benign mother,and to others a most cruel and pitiless stepmother? I see chi
ldrenof thine given up to slavery to others, without any sort ofadvantage, and instead of remuneration for the good they
 do, theyare paid with the severest suffering, and spend their whole life inbenefitting those who ill treat them.(Of Men
 who sleep on boards of Trees.)Men shall sleep, and eat, and dwell among trees, in the forests andopen country.(Of Dream
ing.)Men will seem to see new destructions in the sky. The flames thatfall from it will seem to rise in it and to fly fr
om it with terror.They will hear every kind of animals speak in human language. Theywill instantaneously run in person i
n various parts of the world,without motion. They will see the greatest splendour in the midst ofdarkness. O! marvel of
the human race! What madness has led youthus! You will speak with animals of every species and they with youin human spe
ech. You will see yourself fall from great heightswithout any harm and torrents will accompany you, and will minglewith
their rapid course.(Of Christians.)Many who hold the faith of the Son only build temples in the name ofthe Mother.(Of Fo
od which has been alive.)[84] A great portion of bodies that have been alive will pass intothe bodies of other animals;
which is as much as to say, that thedeserted tenements will pass piecemeal into the inhabited ones,furnishing them with
good things, and carrying with them theirevils. That is to say the life of man is formed from things eaten,and these car
ry with them that part of man which dies . . .1294.(Of Funeral Rites, and Processions, and Lights, and Bells, andFollowe
rs.)The greatest honours will be paid to men, and much pomp, withouttheir knowledge.[Footnote: A facsimile of this text
is on PI. CXVI below on theright, but the writing is larger than the other notes on the samesheet and of a somewhat diff
erent style. The ink is also of adifferent hue, as may be seen on the original sheet at Milan.]1295.(Of the Avaricious.)
There will be many who will eagerly and with great care andsolicitude follow up a thing, which, if they only knew itsmal
ignity, would always terrify them.(Of those men, who, the older they grow, the more avaricious theybecome, whereas, havi
ng but little time to stay, they should becomemore liberal.)We see those who are regarded as being most experienced andj
udicious, when they least need a thing, seek and cherish it withmost avidity.(Of the Ditch.)Many will be busied in takin
g away from a thing, which will grow inproportion as it is diminished.(Of a Weight placed on a Feather-pillow.)And it wi
ll be seen in many bodies that by raising the head theyswell visibly; and by laying the raised head down again, their si
zewill immediately be diminished.(Of catching Lice.)And many will be hunters of animals, which, the fewer there are them
ore will be taken; and conversely, the more there are, the fewerwill be taken.(Of Drawing Water in two Buckets with a si
ngle Rope.)And many will be busily occupied, though the more of the thing theydraw up, the more will escape at the other
 end.(Of the Tongues of Pigs and Calves in Sausage-skins.)Oh! how foul a thing, that we should see the tongue of one ani
mal inthe guts of another.(Of Sieves made of the Hair of Animals.)We shall see the food of animals pass through their sk
in everywayexcepting through their mouths, and penetrate from the outsidedownwards to the ground.(Of Lanterns.)[Footnote
 35: Lanterns were in Italy formerly made of horn.] Thecruel horns of powerful bulls will screen the lights of nightagai
nst the wild fury of the winds.(Of Feather-beds.)Flying creatures will give their very feathers to support men.(Of Anima
ls which walk on Trees--wearing wooden Shoes.)The mire will be so great that men will walk on the trees of theircountry.
(Of the Soles of Shoes, which are made from the Ox.)And in many parts of the country men will be seen walking on theskin
s of large beasts.(Of Sailing in Ships.)There will be great winds by reason of which things of the East willbecome thing
s of the West; and those of the South, being involved inthe course of the winds, will follow them to distant lands.(Of W
orshipping the Pictures of Saints.)Men will speak to men who hear not; having their eyes open, theywill not see; they wi
ll speak to these, and they will not beanswered. They will implore favours of those who have ears and hearnot; they will
 make light for the blind.(Of Sawyers.)There will be many men who will move one against another, holding intheir hands a
 cutting tool. But these will not do each other anyinjury beyond tiring each other; for, when one pushes forward theothe
r will draw back. But woe to him who comes between them! For hewill end by being cut in pieces.(Of Silk-spinning.)Dismal
 cries will be heard loud, shrieking with anguish, and thehoarse and smothered tones of those who will be despoiled, and
 atlast left naked and motionless; and this by reason of the mover,which makes every thing turn round.(Of putting Bread
into the Mouth of the Oven and taking it outagain.)In every city, land, castle and house, men shall be seen, who forwant
 of food will take it out of the mouths of others, who will notbe able to resist in any way.(Of tilled Land.)The Earth w
ill be seen turned up side down and facing the oppositehemispheres, uncovering the lurking holes of the fiercest animals
.(Of Sowing Seed.)Then many of the men who will remain alive, will throw the victualsthey have preserved out of their ho
uses, a free prey to the birdsand beasts of the earth, without taking any care of them at all.(Of the Rains, which, by m
aking the Rivers muddy, wash away theLand.)[Footnote 81: Compare No. 945.] Something will fall from the skywhich will tr
ansport a large part of Africa which lies under thatsky towards Europe, and that of Europe towards Africa, and that ofth
e Scythian countries will meet with tremendous revolutions[Footnote 84: Compare No. 945.].(Of Wood that burns.)The trees
 and shrubs in the great forests will be converted intocinder.(Of Kilns for Bricks and Lime.)Finally the earth will turn
 red from a conflagration of many daysand the stones will be turned to cinders.(Of boiled Fish.)The natives of the water
s will die in the boiling flood.(Of the Olives which fall from the Olive trees, shedding oil whichmakes light.)And thing
s will fall with great force from above, which will give usnourishment and light.(Of Owls and screech owls and what will
 happen to certain birds.)Many will perish of dashing their heads in pieces, and the eyes ofmany will jump out of their
heads by reason of fearful creaturescome out of the darkness.(Of flax which works the cure of men.)That which was at fir
st bound, cast out and rent by many and variousbeaters will be respected and honoured, and its precepts will belistened
to with reverence and love.(Of Books which teach Precepts.)Bodies without souls will, by their contents give us precepts
 bywhich to die well.(Of Flagellants.)Men will hide themselves under the bark of trees, and, screaming,they will make th
emselves martyrs, by striking their own limbs.(Of the Handles of Knives made of the Horns of Sheep.)We shall see the hor
ns of certain beasts fitted to iron tools, whichwill take the lives of many of their kind.(Of Night when no Colour can b
e discerned.)There will come a time when no difference can be discerned betweencolours, on the contrary, everything will
 be black alike.(Of Swords and Spears which by themselves never hurt any one.)One who by himself is mild enough and void
 of all offence willbecome terrible and fierce by being in bad company, and will mostcruelly take the life of many men,
and would kill many more if theywere not hindered by bodies having no soul, that have come out ofcaverns--that is, breas
tplates of iron.(Of Snares and Traps.)Many dead things will move furiously, and will take and bind theliving, and will e
nsnare them for the enemies who seek their deathand destruction.(Of Metals.)That shall be brought forth out of dark and
obscure caves, whichwill put the whole human race in great anxiety, peril and death. Tomany that seek them, after many s
orrows they will give delight, andto those who are not in their company, death with want andmisfortune. This will lead t
o the commission of endless crimes; thiswill increase and persuade bad men to assassinations, robberies andtreachery, an
d by reason of it each will be suspicious of hispartner. This will deprive free cities of their happy condition;this wil
l take away the lives of many; this will make men tormenteach other with many artifices deceptions and treasons. O monst
rouscreature! How much better would it be for men that every thingshould return to Hell! For this the vast forests will
be devastatedof their trees; for this endless animals will lose their lives.(Of Fire.)One shall be born from small begin
nings which will rapidly becomevast. This will respect no created thing, rather will it, by itspower, transform almost e
very thing from its own nature intoanother.(Of Ships which sink.)Huge bodies will be seen, devoid of life, carrying, in
fierce haste,a multitude of men to the destruction of their lives.(Of Oxen, which are eaten.)The masters of estates will
 eat their own labourers.(Of beating Beds to renew them.)Men will be seen so deeply ungrateful that they will turn upon
thatwhich has harboured them, for nothing at all; they will so load itwith blows that a great part of its inside will co
me out of itsplace, and will be turned over and over in its body.(Of Things which are eaten and which first are killed.)
Those who nourish them will be killed by them and afflicted bymerciless deaths.(Of the Reflection of Walls of Cities in
the Water of theirDitches.)The high walls of great cities will be seen up side down in theirditches.(Of Water, which flo
ws turbid and mixed with Soil and Dust; and ofMist, which is mixed with the Air; and of Fire which is mixed withits own,
 and each with each.)All the elements will be seen mixed together in a great whirlingmass, now borne towards the centre
of the world, now towards thesky; and now furiously rushing from the South towards the frozenNorth, and sometimes from t
he East towards the West, and then againfrom this hemisphere to the other.(The World may be divided into two Hemispheres
 at any Point.)All men will suddenly be transferred into opposite hemispheres.(The division of the East from the West ma
y be made at any point.)All living creatures will be moved from the East to the West; and inthe same way from North to S
outh, and vice versa.(Of the Motion of Water which carries wood, which is dead.)Bodies devoid of life will move by thems
elves and carry with themendless generations of the dead, taking the wealth from thebystanders.(Of Eggs which being eate
n cannot form Chickens.)Oh! how many will they be that never come to the birth!(Of Fishes which are eaten unborn.)Endles
s generations will be lost by the death of the pregnant.(Of the Lamentation on Good Friday.)Throughout Europe there will
 be a lamentation of great nations overthe death of one man who died in the East.(Of Dreaming.)Men will walk and not sti
r, they will talk to those who are notpresent, and hear those who do not speak.(Of a Man's Shadow which moves with him.)
Shapes and figures of men and animals will be seen following theseanimals and men wherever they flee. And exactly as the
 one moves theother moves; but what seems so wonderful is the variety of heightthey assume.(Of our Shadow cast by the Su
n, and our Reflection in the Water atone and the same time.)Many a time will one man be seen as three and all three move
together, and often the most real one quits him.(Of wooden Chests which contain great Treasures.)Within walnuts and tree
s and other plants vast treasures will befound, which lie hidden there and well guarded.(Of putting out the Light when g
oing to Bed.)Many persons puffing out a breath with too much haste, will therebylose their sight, and soon after all con
sciousness.(Of the Bells of Mules, which are close to their Ears.)In many parts of Europe instruments of various sizes w
ill be heardmaking divers harmonies, with great labour to those who hear themmost closely.(Of Asses.)The severest labour
 will be repaid with hunger and thirst, anddiscomfort, and blows, and goadings, and curses, and great abuse.(Of Soldiers
 on horseback.)Many men will be seen carried by large animals, swift of pace, tothe loss of their lives and immediate de
ath.In the air and on earth animals will be seen of divers coloursfuriously carrying men to the destruction of their liv
es.(Of the Stars of Spurs.)By the aid of the stars men will be seen who will be as swift as anyswift animal.(Of a Stick,
 which is dead.)The motions of a dead thing will make many living ones flee withpain and lamentation and cries.(Of Tinde
r.)With a stone and with iron things will be made visible which beforewere not seen.1296.(Of going in Ships.)We shall se
e the trees of the great forests of Taurus and of Sinaiand of the Appenines and others, rush by means of the air, from E
astto West and from North to South; and carry, by means of the air,great multitudes of men. Oh! how many vows! Oh! how m
any deaths! Oh!how many partings of friends and relations! Oh! how many will thosebe who will never again see their own
country nor their native land,and who will die unburied, with their bones strewn in various partsof the world!(Of moving
 on All Saints' Day.)Many will forsake their own dwellings and carry with them all theirbelongings and will go to live i
n other parts.(Of All Souls' Day.)How many will they be who will bewail their deceased forefathers,carrying lights to th
em.(Of Friars, who spending nothing but words, receive great gifts andbestow Paradise.)Invisible money will procure the
triumph of many who will spend it.(Of Bows made of the Horns of Oxen.)Many will there be who will die a painful death by
 means of thehorns of cattle.(Of writing Letters from one Country to another.)Men will speak with each other from the mo
st remote countries, andreply.(Of Hemispheres, which are infinite; and which are divided by aninfinite number of Lines,
so that every Man always has one of theseLines between his Feet.)Men standing in opposite hemispheres will converse and
deride eachother and embrace each other, and understand each other's language.(Of Priests who say Mass.)There will be ma
ny men who, when they go to their labour will put onthe richest clothes, and these will be made after the fashion ofapro
ns [petticoats].(Of Friars who are Confessors.)And unhappy women will, of their own free will, reveal to men alltheir si
ns and shameful and most secret deeds.(Of Churches and the Habitations of Friars.)Many will there be who will give up wo
rk and labour and poverty oflife and goods, and will go to live among wealth in splendidbuildings, declaring that this i
s the way to make themselvesacceptable to God.(Of Selling Paradise.)An infinite number of men will sell publicly and unh
indered thingsof the very highest price, without leave from the Master of it;while it never was theirs nor in their powe
r; and human justice willnot prevent it.(Of the Dead which are carried to be buried.)The simple folks will carry vast qu
antities of lights to light upthe road for those who have entirely lost the power of sight.(Of Dowries for Maidens.)And
whereas, at first, maidens could not be protected against theviolence of Men, neither by the watchfulness of parents nor
 bystrong walls, the time will come when the fathers and parents ofthose girls will pay a large price to a man who wants
 to marry them,even if they are rich, noble and most handsome. Certainly this seemsas though nature wished to eradicate
the human race as being uselessto the world, and as spoiling all created things.(Of the Cruelty of Man.)Animals will be
seen on the earth who will always be fightingagainst each other with the greatest loss and frequent deaths oneach side.
And there will be no end to their malignity; by theirstrong limbs we shall see a great portion of the trees of the vastf
orests laid low throughout the universe; and, when they are filledwith food the satisfaction of their desires will be to
 deal deathand grief and labour and wars and fury to every living thing; andfrom their immoderate pride they will desire
 to rise towards heaven,but the too great weight of their limbs will keep them down. Nothingwill remain on earth, or und
er the earth or in the waters which willnot be persecuted, disturbed and spoiled, and those of one countryremoved into a
nother. And their bodies will become the sepulture andmeans of transit of all they have killed.O Earth! why dost thou no
t open and engulf them in the fissures ofthy vast abyss and caverns, and no longer display in the sight ofheaven such a
cruel and horrible monster.1297.PROPHECIES.There will be many which will increase in their destruction.(The Ball of Snow
 rolling over Snow.)There will be many who, forgetting their existence and their name,will lie as dead on the spoils of
other dead creatures.(Sleeping on the Feathers of Birds.)The East will be seen to rush to the West and the South to the
Northin confusion round and about the universe, with great noise andtrembling or fury.(In the East wind which rushes to
the West.)The solar rays will kindle fire on the earth, by which a thing thatis under the sky will be set on fire, and,
being reflected by someobstacle, it will bend downwards.(The Concave Mirror kindles a Fire, with which we heat the oven,
 andthis has its foundation beneath its roof.)A great part of the sea will fly towards heaven and for a long timewill no
t return. (That is, in Clouds.)There remains the motion which divides the mover from the thingmoved.Those who give light
 for divine service will be destroyed.(The Beeswhich make the Wax for Candles)Dead things will come from underground and
 by their fierce movementswill send numberless human beings out of the world. (Iron, whichcomes from under ground is dea
d but the Weapons are made of it whichkill so many Men.)The greatest mountains, even those which are remote from the sea
shore, will drive the sea from its place.(This is by Rivers which carry the Earth they wash away from theMountains and b
ear it to the Sea-shore; and where the Earth comesthe sea must retire.)The water dropped from the clouds still in motion
 on the flanks ofmountains will lie still for a long period of time without anymotion whatever; and this will happen in
many and divers lands.(Snow, which falls in flakes and is Water.)The great rocks of the mountains will throw out fire; s
o that theywill burn the timber of many vast forests, and many beasts both wildand tame.(The Flint in the Tinder-box whi
ch makes a Fire that consumes allthe loads of Wood of which the Forests are despoiled and with thisthe flesh of Beasts i
s cooked.)Oh! how many great buildings will be ruined by reason of Fire.(The Fire of great Guns.)Oxen will be to a great
 extent the cause of the destruction ofcities, and in the same way horses and buffaloes.(By drawing Guns.)1298.The Lion
tribe will be seen tearing open the earth with their clawedpaws and in the caves thus made, burying themselves together
withthe other animals that are beneath them.Animals will come forth from the earth in gloomy vesture, which willattack t
he human species with astonishing assaults, and which bytheir ferocious bites will make confusion of blood among those t
heydevour.Again the air will be filled with a mischievous winged race whichwill assail men and beasts and feed upon them
 with much noise--filling themselves with scarlet blood.1299.Blood will be seen issuing from the torn flesh of men, and
tricklingdown the surface.Men will have such cruel maladies that they will tear their fleshwith their own nails. (The It
ch.)Plants will be seen left without leaves, and the rivers standingstill in their channels.The waters of the sea will r
ise above the high peaks of themountains towards heaven and fall again on to the dwellings of men.(That is, in Clouds.)T
he largest trees of the forest will be seen carried by the fury ofthe winds from East to West. (That is across the Sea.)
Men will cast away their own victuals. (That is, in Sowing.)1300.Human beings will be seen who will not understand each
other'sspeech; that is, a German with a Turk.Fathers will be seen giving their daughters into the power of manand giving
 up all their former care in guarding them. (When Girlsare married.)Men will come out their graves turned into flying cr
eatures; andthey will attack other men, taking their food from their very handor table. (As Flies.)Many will there be wh
o, flaying their mother, will tear the skinfrom her back. (Husbandmen tilling the Earth.)Happy will they be who lend ear
 to the words of the Dead. (Who readgood works and obey them.)1031.Feathers will raise men, as they do birds, towards he
aven (that is,by the letters which are written with quills.)The works of men's hands will occasion their death. (Swords
andSpears.)Men out of fear will cling to the thing they most fear. (That isthey will be miserable lest they should fall
into misery.)Things that are separate shall be united and acquire such virtuethat they will restore to man his lost memo
ry; that is papyrus[sheets] which are made of separate strips and have preserved thememory of the things and acts of men
.The bones of the Dead will be seen to govern the fortunes of him whomoves them. (By Dice.)Cattle with their horns prote
ct the Flame from its death. (In aLantern [Footnote 13: See note page 357.].)The Forests will bring forth young which wi
ll be the cause of theirdeath. (The handle of the hatchet.)1302.Men will deal bitter blows to that which is the cause of
 their life.(In thrashing Grain.)The skins of animals will rouse men from their silence with greatoutcries and curses. (
Balls for playing Games.)Very often a thing that is itself broken is the occasion of muchunion. (That is the Comb made o
f split Cane which unites the threadsof Silk.)The wind passing through the skins of animals will make men dance.(That is
 the Bag-pipe, which makes people dance.)1303.(Of Walnut trees, that are beaten.)Those which have done best will be most
 beaten, and their offspringtaken and flayed or peeled, and their bones broken or crushed.(Of Sculpture.)Alas! what do I
 see? The Saviour cru- cified anew.(Of the Mouth of Man, which is a Sepulchre.)Great noise will issue from the sepulchre
s of those who died eviland violent deaths.(Of the Skins of Animals which have the sense of feeling what is inthe things
 written.)The more you converse with skins covered with sentiments, the morewisdom will you acquire.(Of Priests who bear
 the Host in their body.)Then almost all the tabernacles in which dwells the Corpus Domini,will be plainly seen walking
about of themselves on the variousroads of the world.1304.And those who feed on grass will turn night into day (Tallow.)
And many creatures of land and water will go up among the stars(that is Planets.)The dead will be seen carrying the livi
ng (in Carts and Ships invarious places.)Food shall be taken out of the mouth of many ( the oven's mouth.)And those whic
h will have their food in their mouth will be deprivedof it by the hands of others (the oven.)1305.(Of Crucifixes which
are sold.)I see Christ sold and crucified afresh, and his Saints sufferingMartyrdom.(Of Physicians, who live by sickness
.)Men will come into so wretched a plight that they will be glad thatothers will derive profit from their sufferings or
from the loss oftheir real wealth, that is health.(Of the Religion of Friars, who live by the Saints who have beendead a
 great while.)Those who are dead will, after a thou- sand years be those who willgive a livelihood to many who are livin
g.(Of Stones converted into Lime, with which prison walls are made.)Many things that have been before that time destroye
d by fire willdeprive many men of liberty.1306.(Of Children who are suckled.)Many Franciscans, Dominicans and Benedictin
es will eat that which atother times was eaten by others, who for some months to come willnot be able to speak.(Of Cockl
es and Sea Snails which are thrown up by the sea and whichrot inside their shells.)How many will there be who, after the
y are dead, will putrefy insidetheir own houses, filling all the surrounding air with a fetidsmell.1307.(Of Mules which
have on them rich burdens of silver and gold.)Much treasure and great riches will be laid upon four-footed beasts,which
will convey them to divers places.1308.(Of the Shadow cast by a man at night with a light.)Huge figures will appear in h
uman shape, and the nearer you get tothem, the more will their immense size diminish.[Footnote page 1307: It seems to me
 probable that this note, whichoccurs in the note book used in 1502, when Leonardo, in the serviceof Cesare Borgia, visi
ted Urbino, was suggested by the famouspillage of the riches of the palace of Guidobaldo, whose treasuresCesare Borgia a
t once had carried to Cesena (see GREGOROVIUS,_Geschichte der Stadt Rom im Mittelalter_. XIII, 5, 4). ]1309.(Of Snakes,
carried by Storks.)Serpents of great length will be seen at a great height in the air,fighting with birds.(Of great guns
, which come out of a pit and a mould.)Creatures will come from underground which with their terrific noisewill stun all
 who are near; and with their breath will kill men anddestroy cities and castles.1310.(Of Grain and other Seeds.)Men wil
l fling out of their houses those victuals which wereintended to sustain their life.(Of Trees, which nourish grafted sho
ots.)Fathers and mothers will be seen to take much more delight in theirstep-children then in their own children.(Of the
 Censer.)Some will go about in white garments with arrogant gesturesthreatening others with metal and fire which will do
 no harm at allto them.1311.(Of drying Fodder.)Innumerable lives will be destroyed and innumerable vacant spaceswill be
made on the earth.(Of the Life of Men, who every year change their bodily substance.)Men, when dead, will pass through t
heir own bowels.1312.(Shoemakers.)Men will take pleasure in seeing their own work destroyed andinjured.1313.(Of Kids.)Th
e time of Herod will come again, for the little innocent childrenwill be taken from their nurses, and will die of terrib
le woundsinflicted by cruel men.V.DRAUGHTS AND SCHEMES FOR THE HUMOROUS WRITINGS.Schemes for fables, etc. (1314-1323).13
14.A FABLE.The crab standing under the rock to catch the fish which crept underit, it came to pass that the rock fell wi
th a ruinous downfall ofstones, and by their fall the crab was crushed.THE SAME.The spider, being among the grapes, caug
ht the flies which werefeeding on those grapes. Then came the vintage, and the spider wascut down with the grapes.The vi
ne that has grown old on an old tree falls with the ruin ofthat tree, and through that bad companionship must perish wit
h it.The torrent carried so much earth and stones into its bed, that itwas then constrained to change its course.The net
 that was wont to take the fish was seized and carried awayby the rush of fish.The ball of snow when, as it rolls, it de
scends from the snowymountains, increases in size as it falls.The willow, which by its long shoots hopes as it grows, to
 outstripevery other plant, from having associated itself with the vine whichis pruned every year was always crippled.13
15.Fable of the tongue bitten by the teeth.The cedar puffed up with pride of its beauty, separated itself fromthe trees
around it and in so doing it turned away towards the wind,which not being broken in its fury, flung it uprooted on the e
arth.The traveller's joy, not content in its hedge, began to fling itsbranches out over the high road, and cling to the
opposite hedge,and for this it was broken away by the passers by.1316.The goldfinch gives victuals to its caged young. D
eath rather thanloss of liberty. [Footnote: Above this text is another note, alsoreferring to liberty; see No. 694.]1317
.(Of Bags.)Goats will convey the wine to the city.1318.All those things which in winter are hidden under the snow, will
beuncovered and laid bare in summer. (for Falsehood, which cannotremain hidden).1319.A FABLE.The lily set itself down by
 the shores of the Ticino, and thecurrent carried away bank and the lily with it.1320.A JEST.Why Hungarian ducats have a
 double cross on them.1321.A SIMILE.A vase of unbaked clay, when broken, may be remoulded, but not abaked one.1322.Seein
g the paper all stained with the deep blackness of ink, it hedeeply regrets it; and this proves to the paper that the wo
rds,composed upon it were the cause of its being preserved.1323.The pen must necessarily have the penknife for a compani
on, and itis a useful companionship, for one is not good for much without theother.Schemes for prophecies (1324-1329).13
24.The knife, which is an artificial weapon, deprives man of his nails,his natural weapons.The mirror conducts itself ha
ughtily holding mirrored in itself theQueen. When she departs the mirror remains there ...1325.Flax is dedicated to deat
h, and to the corruption of mortals. Todeath, by being used for snares and nets for birds, animals andfish; to corruptio
n, by the flaxen sheets in which the dead arewrapped when they are buried, and who become corrupt in thesewinding sheets
.-- And again, this flax does not separate its fibretill it has begun to steep and putrefy, and this is the flower withw
hich garlands and decorations for funerals should be made.1326.(Of Peasants who work in shirts)Shadows will come from th
e East which will blacken with great colourdarkness the sky that covers Italy.(Of the Barbers.)All men will take refuge
in Africa.1327.The cloth which is held in the hand in the current of a runningstream, in the waters of which the cloth l
eaves all its foulness anddirt, is meant to signify this &c.By the thorn with inoculated good fruit is signified those n
atureswhich of themselves were not disposed towards virtue, but by the aidof their preceptors they have the repudation o
f it.1328.A COMMON THING.A wretched person will be flattered, and these flatterers are alwaysthe deceivers, robbers and
murderers of the wretched person.The image of the sun where it falls appears as a thing which coversthe person who attem
pts to cover it.(Money and Gold.)Out of cavernous pits a thing shall come forth which will make allthe nations of the wo
rld toil and sweat with the greatest torments,anxiety and labour, that they may gain its aid.(Of the Dread of Poverty.)T
he malicious and terrible [monster] will cause so much terror ofitself in men that they will rush together, with a rapid
 motion,like madmen, thinking they are escaping her boundless force.(Of Advice.)The man who may be most necessary to him
 who needs him, will berepaid with ingratitude, that is greatly contemned.1329.(Of Bees.)They live together in communiti
es, they are destroyed that we maytake the honey from them. Many and very great nations will bedestroyed in their own dw
ellings.1330.WHY DOGS TAKE PLEASURE IN SMELLING AT EACH OTHER.This animal has a horror of the poor, because they eat poo
r food,and it loves the rich, because they have good living and especiallymeat. And the excrement of animals always reta
ins some virtue of itsorigin as is shown by the faeces ...Now dogs have so keen a smell, that they can discern by their
nosethe virtue remaining in these faeces, and if they find them in thestreets, smell them and if they smell in them the
virtue of meat orof other things, they take them, and if not, they leave them: And toreturn to the question, I say that
if by means of this smell theyknow that dog to be well fed, they respect him, because they judgethat he has a powerful a
nd rich master; and if they discover no suchsmell with the virtue of meet, they judge that dog to be of smallaccount and
 to have a poor and humble master, and therefore theybite that dog as they would his master.1331.The circular plans of c
arrying earth are very useful, inasmuch asmen never stop in their work; and it is done in many ways. By one ofthese ways
 men carry the earth on their shoulders, by another inchests and others on wheelbarrows. The man who carries it on hissh
oulders first fills the tub on the ground, and he loses time inhoisting it on to his shoulders. He with the chests loses
 no time.[Footnote: The subject of this text has apparently no connectionwith the other texts of this section.]Irony (13
32).1332.If Petrarch was so fond of bay, it was because it is of a good tastein sausages and with tunny; I cannot put an
y value on their foolery.[Footnote: Conte Porro has published these lines in the _ArchivioStor. Lombarda_ VIII, IV; he r
eads the concluding line thus: _I noposso di loro gia (sic) co' far tesauro._--This is known to be by acontemporary poet
, as Senatore Morelli informs me.]Tricks (1333-1335).1333.We are two brothers, each of us has a brother. Here the way of
saying it makes it appear that the two brothers have become four.1334.TRICKS OF DIVIDING.Take in each hand an equal numb
er; put 4 from the right hand intothe left; cast away the remainder; cast away an equal number fromthe left hand; add 5,
 and now you will find 13 in this [left] hand;that is-I made you put 4 from the right hand into the left, and castaway t
he remainder; now your right hand has 4 more; then I make youthrow away as many from the right as you threw away from th
e left;so, throwing from each hand a quantity of which the remainder may beequal, you now have 4 and 4, which make 8, an
d that the trick maynot be detec- ted I made you put 5 more, which made 13.TRICKS OF DIVIDING.Take any number less than
12 that you please; then take of mineenough to make up the number 12, and that which remains to me is thenumber which yo
u at first had; because when I said, take any numberless than 12 as you please, I took 12 into my hand, and of that 12yo
u took such a number as made up your number of 12; and what youadded to your number, you took from mine; that is, if you
 had 8 togo as far as to 12, you took of my 12, 4; hence this 4 transferredfrom me to you reduced my 12 to a remainder o
f 8, and your 8 became12; so that my 8 is equal to your 8, before it was made 12.[Footnote 1334: G. Govi _says in the_ '
Saggio' p. 22: _Si dilettLeonarda, di giuochi di prestigi e molti (?) ne descrisse, che sileggono poi riportati dal Paci
olo nel suo libro:_ de ViribusQuantitatis, _e che, se non tutti, sono certo in gran parteinvenzioni del Vinci._]1335.If
you want to teach someone a subject you do not know yourself, lethim measure the length of an object unknown to you, and
 he willlearn the measure you did not know before;--Master Giovanni da Lodi._XXI.__Letters. Personal Records. Dated Note
s.__When we consider how superficial and imperfect are the accounts ofLeonardo's life written some time after his death
by Vasari andothers, any notes or letters which can throw more light on hispersonal circumstances cannot fail to be in t
he highest degreeinteresting. The texts here given as Nos._ 1351--1353, _set hisresidence in Rome in quite a new aspect;
 nay, the picture whichirresistibly dwells in our minds after reading these details of hislife in the Vatican, forms a s
triking contrast to the contemporarylife of Raphael at Rome.__I have placed foremost of these documents the very remarka
bleletters to the Defterdar of Syria. In these Leonardo speaks ofhimself as having staid among the mountains of Armenia,
 and as thebiographies of the master tell nothing of any such distant journeys,it would seem most obvious to treat this
passage as fiction, and sospare ourselves the onus of proof and discussion. But on closeexamination no one can doubt tha
t these documents, with theaccompanying sketches, are the work of Leonardo's own hand. Notmerely is the character of the
 handwriting his, but the spelling andthe language are his also. In one respect only does the writingbetray any marked d
eviation from the rest of the notes, especiallythose treating on scientific questions; namely, in theseobservations he s
eems to have taken particular pains to give themost distinct and best form of expression to all he had to say; wefind er
asures and emendations in almost every line. He proceeded, aswe shall see, in the same way in the sketches for letters t
oGiuliano de' Medici, and what can be more natural, I may ask, thanto find the draft of a letter thus altered and improv
ed when it isto contain an account of a definite subject, and when personalinterests are in the scale? The finished copi
es as sent off are notknown to exist; if we had these instead of the rough drafts, wemight unhesitatingly have declared
that some unknown Italianengineer must have been, at that time, engaged in Armenia in theservice of the Egyptian Sultan,
 and that Leonardo had copied hisdocuments. Under this hypothesis however we should have to statethat this unknown write
r must have been so far one in mind withLeonardo as to use the same style of language and even the samelines of thought.
 This explanation might--as I say--have beenpossible, if only we had the finished letters. But why should theserough dra
fts of letters be regarded as anything else than what theyactually and obviously are? If Leonardo had been a man of our
owntime, we might perhaps have attempted to account for the facts bysaying that Leonardo, without having been in the Eas
t himself, mighthave undertaken to write a Romance of which the scene was laid inArmenia, and at the desire of his publi
sher had made sketches oflandscape to illustrate the text.I feel bound to mention this singular hypothesis as it has act
uallybeen put forward (see No. 1336 note 5); and it would certainly seemas though there were no other possible way of ev
ading the conclusionto which these letters point, and their bearing on the life of themaster,--absurd as the alternative
 is. But, if, on a question ofsuch importance, we are justified in suggesting theories that haveno foundation in probabi
lity, I could suggest another which, ascompared with that of a Fiction by Leonardo, would be neither morenor less plausi
ble; it is, moreover the only other hypothesis,perhaps, which can be devised to account for these passages, if itwere po
ssible to prove that the interpretation that the documentsthemselves suggest, must be rejected a priori; viz may not Leo
nardohave written them with the intention of mystifying those who, afterhis death, should try to decipher these manuscri
pts with a view topublishing them? But if, in fact, no objection that will stand thetest of criticism can be brought aga
inst the simple and directinterpretation of the words as they stand, we are bound to regardLeonardo's travels in the Eas
t as an established fact. There is, Ibelieve nothing in what we know of his biography to negative such afact, especially
 as the details of his life for some few years arewholly unknown; nor need we be at a loss for evidence which mayserve t
o explain--at any rate to some extent--the strangeness of hisundertaking such a journey. We have no information as to Le
onardo'shistory between 1482 and 1486; it cannot be proved that he waseither in Milan or in Florence. On the other hand
the tenor of thisletter does not require us to assume a longer absence than a year ortwo. For, even if his appointment_
(offitio) _as Engineer in Syriahad been a permanent one, it might have become untenable--by thedeath perhaps of the Deft
erdar, his patron, or by his removal fromoffice--, and Leonardo on his return home may have kept silence onthe subject o
f an episode which probably had ended in failure anddisappointment.From the text of No. 1379 we can hardly doubt that Le
onardo intendedto make an excursion secretly from Rome to Naples, although so faras has hitherto been known, his biograp
hers never allude to it. Inanother place (No. 1077) he says that he had worked as an Engineerin Friuli. Are we to doubt
this statement too, merely because nobiographer has hitherto given us any information on the matter? Inthe geographical
notes Leonardo frequently speaks of the East, andthough such passages afford no direct proof of his having beenthere, th
ey show beyond a doubt that, next to the Nile, theEuphrates, the Tigris and the Taurus mountains had a specialinterest i
n his eyes. As a still further proof of the futility ofthe argument that there is nothing in his drawings to show that h
ehad travelled in the East, we find on Pl. CXX a study of orientalheads of Armenian type,--though of course this may hav
e been made inItaly.If the style of these letters were less sober, and the expressionsless strictly to the point through
out, it miglit be possible toregard them as a romantic fiction instead of a narrative of fact.Nay, we have only to compa
re them with such obviously fancifulpassages as No. 1354, Nos. 670-673, and the Fables and Prophecies.It is unnecessary
to discuss the subject any further here; suchexplanations as the letter needs are given in the foot notes.The drafts of
letters to Lodovico il Moro are very remarkable.Leonardo and this prince were certainly far less closely connected,than
has hitherto been supposed. It is impossible that Leonardo canhave remained so long in the service of this prince, becau
se thesalary was good, as is commonly stated. On the contrary, it wouldseem, that what kept him there, in spite of his s
ore need of themoney owed him by the prince, was the hope of some day being able tocarry out the project of casting the_
 'gran cavallo'.Drafts of Letters and Reports referring to Armenia (1336. 1337).1336.To THE DEVATDAR OF SYRIA, LIEUTENAN
T OF THE SACRED SULTAN OFBABYLON.[3] The recent disaster in our Northern parts which I am certainwill terrify not you al
one but the whole world, which[Footnote: Lines 1-52 are reproduced in facsimile on Pl. CXVI.1. _Diodario._ This word is
not to be found in any Italiandictionary, and for a long time I vainly sought an explanation ofit. The youthful reminisc
ences of my wife afforded the desired clue.The chief town of each Turkish Villayet, or province --such asBroussa, for in
stance, in Asia Minor, is the residence of aDefterdar, who presides over the financial affairs of the province._Defterda
r hane_ was, in former times, the name given to theMinistry of Finance at Constantinople; the Minister of Finance tothe
Porte is now known as the _Mallie-Nazri_ and the _Defterdars_are his subordinates. A _Defterdar_, at the present day is
merelythe head of the finance department in each Provincial district. Withregard to my suggestion that Leonardo's _Dioda
rio_ might beidentical with the Defterdar of former times, the late M. C.DEFREMERIE, Arabic Professor, and Membre de l'I
nstitut de Francewrote to me as follows: _Votre conjecture est parfaitement fondee;diodario est Vequivalent de devadar o
u plus exactement devatdar,titre d'une importante dignite en Egypt'e, sous les Mamlouks._The word however is not of Turk
ish, but of Perso-Arabie derivation.[Defter written in arab?] literally _Defter_ (Arabic) meaning_folio_; for _dar_ (Per
sian) Bookkeeper or holder is the Englishequivalent; and the idea is that of a deputy in command. During theMamelook sup
remacy over Syria, which corresponded in date withLeonardo's time, the office of Defterdar was the third in importancein
 the State._Soltano di Babilonia_. The name of Babylon was commonly applied toCairo in the middle ages. For instance BRE
IDENBACH, _ItinerariumHierosolyma_ p. 218 says: "At last we reached Babylon. But this isnot that Babylon which stood on
the further shore of the riverChober, but that which is called the Egyptian Babylon. It is closeby Cairo and the twain a
re but one and not two towns; one half iscalled Cairo and the other Babylon, whence they are called togetherCairo-Babylo
n; originally the town is said to have been namedMemphis and then Babylon, but now it is called Cairo." Compare No.1085,
 6.Egypt was governed from 1382 till 1517 by the Borgite orTcherkessian dynasty of the Mamelook Sultans. One of the most
 famousof these, Sultan Kait Bey, ruled from 1468-1496 during whose reignthe Gama (or Mosque) of Kait Bey and tomb of Ka
it Bey near theOkella Kait Bey were erected in Cairo, which preserve his name tothis day. Under the rule of this great a
nd wise prince manyforeigners, particularly Italians, found occupation in Egypt, as maybe seen in the 'Viaggio di Josaph
at Barbaro', among othertravellers. "Next to Leonardo (so I learn from Prof. Jac. Burckhardtof Bale) Kait Bey's most hel
pful engineer was a German who in about1487, superintended the construction of the Mole at Alexandria.Felix Fabri knew h
im and mentions him in his _Historia Suevorum_,written in 1488."3. _Il nuovo accidente accaduto_, or as Leonardo first w
rote andthen erased, _e accaduto un nuovo accidente_. From the sequel thismust refer to an earthquake, and indeed these
were frequent at thatperiod, particularly in Asia Minor, where they caused immensemischief. See No. 1101 note.]shall be
related to you in due order, showing first the effect andthen the cause. [Footnote 4: The text here breaks off. The foll
owinglines are a fresh beginning of a letter, evidently addressed to thesame person, but, as it would seem, written at a
 later date than theprevious text. The numerous corrections and amendments amply provethat it is not a copy from any acc
ount of a journey by some unknownperson; but, on the contrary, that Leonardo was particularly anxiousto choose such word
s and phrases as might best express his ownideas.]Finding myself in this part of Armenia [Footnote 5: _Partid'Erminia_.
See No. 945, note. The extent of Armenia in Leonardo'stime is only approximately known. In the XVth century the Persians
governed the Eastern, and the Arabs the Southern portions. Arabicauthors--as, for instance Abulfeda--include Cilicia and
 a part ofCappadocia in Armenia, and Greater Armenia was the tract of thatcountry known later as Turcomania, while Armen
ia Minor was theterritory between Cappadocia and the Euphrates. It was not till1522, or even 1574 that the whole country
 came under the dominion ofthe Ottoman Turks, in the reign of Selim I.The Mamelook Sultans of Egypt seem to have taken a
 particularinterest in this, the most Northern province of their empire, whichwas even then in danger of being conquered
 by the Turks. In theautumn of 1477 Sultan Kait Bey made a journey of inspection,visiting Antioch and the valleys of the
 Tigris and Euphrates with anumerous and brilliant escort. This tour is briefly alluded to by_Moodshireddin_ p. 561; and
 by WEIL, _Geschichte der Abbasiden_ V,p. 358. An anonymous member of the suite wrote a diary of theexpedition in Arabic
, which has been published by R. V. LONZONE(_'Viaggio in Palestina e Soria di Kaid Ba XVIII sultano della IIdinastia mam
elucca, fatto nel 1477. Testo arabo. Torino 1878'_,without notes or commentary). Compare the critique on this edition,by
 J. GILDEMEISTER in _Zeitschrift des Deutschen Palaestina Vereins_(Vol. Ill p. 246--249). Lanzone's edition seems to be
no more thanan abridged copy of the original. I owe to Professor Sche'fer,Membre de l'Institut, the information that he
is in possession of amanuscript in which the text is fuller, and more correctly given.The Mamelook dynasty was, as is we
ll known, of Circassian origin,and a large proportion of the Egyptian Army was recruited inCircassia even so late as in
the XVth century. That was a period ofpolitical storms in Syria and Asia Minor and it is easy to supposethat the Sultan'
s minister, to whom Leonardo addresses his report ashis superior, had a special interest in the welfare of thosefrontier
 provinces. Only to mention a few historical events ofSultan Kait Bey's reign, we find that in 1488 he assisted theCirca
ssians to resist the encroachments of Alaeddoulet, an Asiaticprince who had allied himself with the Osmanli to threaten
theprovince; the consequence was a war in Cilicia by sea and land,which broke out in the following year between the cont
ending powers.Only a few years earlier the same province had been the scene of theso-called Caramenian war in which the
united Venetian, Neapolitanand Sclavonic fleets had been engaged. (See CORIALANO CIPPICO,_Della guerra dei Veneziani nel
l' Asia dal_ 1469--1474. Venezia1796, p. 54) and we learn incidentally that a certain LeonardoBoldo, Governor of Scutari
 under Sultan Mahmoud,--as his name wouldindicate, one of the numerous renegades of Italian birth--played animportant pa
rt in the negotiations for peace._Tu mi mandasti_. The address _tu_ to a personage so high in officeis singular and sugg
ests personal intimacy; Leonardo seems to havebeen a favourite with the Diodario. Compare lines 54 and 55.I have endeavo
ured to show, and I believe that I am also in aposition to prove with regard to these texts, that they are draughtsof le
tters actually written by Leonardo; at the same time I must notomit to mention that shortly after I had discoveredthese
texts in the Codex Atlanticus and published a paper on thesubject in the _Zeitschrift fur bildende Kunst (Vol. XVI)_, Pr
of.Govi put forward this hypothesis to account for their origin:_"Quanto alle notizie sul monte Tauro, sull'Armenia e su
ll' Asiaminore che si contengono negli altri frammenti, esse vennero preseda qualche geografro o viaggiatore contemporan
eo. Dall'indiceimperfetto che accompagna quei frammenti, si potrebbe dedurre cheLeonardo volesse farne un libro, che poi
 non venne compiuto. A ognimodo, non e possibile di trovare in questi brani nessun indizio diun viaggio di Leonardo in o
riente, ne della sua conversione allareligione di Maometto, come qualcuno pretenderebbe. Leonardo amavacon passione gli
studi geografici, e nel suoi scritti s'incontranspesso itinerart, indicazioni, o descrizioni di luoghi, schizzi dicarte
e abbozzi topografici di varie regioni, non e quindi stranoche egli, abile narratore com'era, si fosse proposto di scriv
ere unaspecie di Romanzo in forma epistolare svolgendone Pintreccionell'Asia Minore, intorno alla quale i libri d'allora
, e forsequalche viaggiatore amico suo, gli avevano somministrato alcunielementi piu o meno_ fantastici. (See Transunti
della RealeAccademia dei Lincei Voi. V Ser. 3).It is hardly necessary to point out that Prof. Govi omits to namethe sour
ces from which Leonardo could be supposed to have drawn hisinformation, and I may leave it to the reader to pronounce ju
dgmenton the anomaly which is involved in the hypothesis that we have herea fragment of a Romance, cast in the form of a
 correspondence. Atthe same time, I cannot but admit that the solution of thedifficulties proposed by Prof. Govi is, und
er the circumstances,certainly the easiest way of dealing with the question. But weshould then be equally justified in s
upposing some more ofLeonardo's letters to be fragments of such romances; particularlythose of which the addresses can n
o longer be named. Still, asregards these drafts of letters to the Diodario, if we accept theRomance theory, as pro- pos
ed by Prof. Govi, we are also compelledto assume that Leonardo purposed from the first to illustrate histale; for it nee
ds only a glance at the sketches on PI. CXVI to CXIXto perceive that they are connected with the texts; and of coursethe
 rest of Leonardo's numerous notes on matters pertaining to theEast, the greater part of which are here published for th
e firsttime, may also be somehow connected with this strange romance.7. _Citta de Calindra (Chalindra)_. The position of
 this city is soexactly determined, between the valley of the Euphrates and theTaurus range that it ought to be possible
 to identify it. But it canhardly be the same as the sea port of Cilicia with a somewhatsimilar name Celenderis, Kelandr
ia, Celendria, Kilindria, now theTurkish Gulnar. In two Catalonian Portulans in the BibliothequeNatio- nale in Paris-one
 dating from the XV'h century, by Wilhelmvon Soler, the other by Olivez de Majorca, in l584-I find this placecalled Cala
ndra. But Leonardo's Calindra must certainly have lainmore to the North West, probably somewhere in Kurdistan. The factt
hat the geographical position is so care- fully determined byLeonardo seems to prove that it was a place of no great imp
ortanceand little known. It is singular that the words first written in 1.8 were divisa dal lago (Lake Van?), altered af
terwards todall'Eitfrates.Nostri confini, and in 1. 6 proposito nostro. These refer to thefrontier and to the affairs of
 the Mamelook Sultan, Lines 65 and 66throw some light on the purpose of Leonardo's mission.8. _I_ corni del gra mote Tau
ro. Compare the sketches PI.CXVI-CXVIII. So long as it is im- possible to identify the situationof Calindra it is most d
ifficult to decide with any certainty whichpeak of the Taurus is here meant; and I greatly regret that I had noforeknowl
edge of this puzzling topographical question when, in 1876,I was pursuing archaeological enquiries in the Provinces of A
leppoand Cilicia, and had to travel for some time in view of the imposingsnow-peaks of Bulghar Dagh and Ala Tepessi.9-10
. The opinion here expressed as to the height of the mountainwould be unmeaning, unless it had been written before Leona
rdo movedto Milan, where Monte Rosa is so conspicuous an object in thelandscape. 4 _ore inanzi_ seems to mean, four hour
s before the sun'srays penetrate to the bottom of the valleys.]to carry into effect with due love and care the task for
which yousent me [Footnote: ][6]; and to make a beginning in a place whichseemed to me to be most to our purpose, I ente
red into the city ofCalindrafy[7], near to our frontiers. This city is situated at thebase of that part of the Taurus mo
untains which is divided from theEuphrates and looks towards the peaks of the great Mount Taurus [8]to the West [9]. The
se peaks are of such a height that they seem totouch the sky, and in all the world there is no part of the earth,higher
than its summit[10], and the rays of the sun always fall uponit on its East side, four hours before day-time, and being
of thewhitest stone [Footnote 11:_Pietra bianchissima_. The TaurusMountains consist in great part of limestone.] it shin
esresplendently and fulfils the function to these Armenians which abright moon-light would in the midst of the darkness;
 and by itsgreat height it outreaches the utmost level of the clouds by a spaceof four miles in a straight line. This pe
ak is seen in many placestowards the West, illuminated by the sun after its setting the thirdpart of the night. This it
is, which with you [Footnote 14:_Appresso di voi_. Leonardo had at first written _noi_ as though hismeaning had,been: Th
is peak appeared to us to be a comet when youand I observed it in North Syria (at Aleppo? at Aintas?). Thedescription of
 the curious reflection in the evening, resembling the"Alpine-glow" is certainly not an invented fiction, for in the nex
tlines an explanation of the phenomenon is offered, or at leastattempted.] we formerly in calm weather had supposed to b
e a comet,and appears to us in the darkness of night, to change its form,being sometimes divided in two or three parts,
and sometimes longand sometimes short. And this is caused by the clouds on the horizonof the sky which interpose between
 part of this mountain and thesun, and by cutting off some of the solar rays the light on themountain is intercepted by
various intervals of clouds, andtherefore varies in the form of its brightness.THE DIVISIONS OF THE BOOK [Footnote 19: T
he next 33 lines areevidently the contents of a connected Report or Book, but not of onewhich he had at hand; more proba
bly, indeed, of one he purposedwriting.].The praise and confession of the faith [Footnote 20: _Persuasione difede_, of t
he Christian or the Mohammedan faith? We must suppose thelatter, at the beginning of a document addressed to so high aMo
hammedan official. _Predica_ probably stands as an abbreviationfor _predicazione_ (lat. _praedicatio_) in the sense of p
raise orglorification; very probably it may mean some such initial doxologyas we find in Mohammedan works. (Comp. 1. 40.
)].The sudden inundation, to its end.[23] The destruction of the city.[24]The death of the people and their despair.The
preacher's search, his release and benevolence [Footnote 28: Thephraseology of this is too general for any conjecture as
 to itsmeaning to be worth hazarding.]Description of the cause of this fall of the mountain [Footnote 30:_Ruina del mont
e_. Of course by an earthquake. In a catalogue ofearthquakes, entitled _kechf aussalssaleb an auasf ezzel-zeleh_, andwri
tten by Djelal eddin].The mischief it did.[32] Fall of snow.The finding of the prophet [33].His prophesy.[35] The inunda
tion of the lower portion of Eastern Armenia, thedraining of which was effected by the cutting through the TaurusMountai
ns.How the new prophet showed [Footnote 40:_Nova profeta, 1. 33,profeta_. Mohammed. Leonardo here refers to the Koran:In
 the name of the most merciful God.--When the earth shall beshaken by an earthquake; and the earth shall cast forth her
burdens;and a man shall say, what aileth her? On that day the earth shalldeclare her tidings, for that thy Lord will ins
pire her. On that daymen shall go forward in distinct classes, that they may behold theirworks. And whoever shall have w
rought good of the weight of an ant,shall behold the same. And whoever shall have wrought evil of theweight of an ant, s
hall behold the same. (The Koran, translated byG. Sale, Chapter XCIX, p. 452).] that this destruction would happenas he
had foretold.Description of the Taurus Mountains [43] and the river Euphrates.Why the mountain shines at the top, from h
alf to a third of thenight, and looks like a comet to the inhabitants of the West afterthe sunset, and before day to tho
se of the East.Why this comet appears of variable forms, so that it is now roundand now long, and now again divided into
 two or three parts, and nowin one piece, and when it is to be seen again.OF THE SHAPE OF THE TAURUS MOUNTAINS [Footnote
 53-94: The facsimileof this passage is given on Pl. CXVII.].I am not to be accused, Oh Devatdar, of idleness, as your c
hidingsseem to hint; but your excessive love for me, which gave rise to thebenefits you have conferred on me [Footnote 5
5] is that which hasalso compelled me to the utmost painstaking in seeking out anddiligently investigating the cause of
so great and stupendous aneffect. And this could not be done without time; now, in order tosatisfy you fully as to the c
ause of so great an effect, it isrequisite that I should explain to you the form of the place, andthen I will proceed to
 the effect, by which I believe you will beamply satisfied.[Footnote 36: _Tagliata di Monte Tauro_. The Euphrates flows
throughthe Taurus range near the influx of the Kura Shai; it rushes througha rift in the wildest cliffs from 2000 to 300
0 feet high and runs onfor 90 miles in 300 falls or rapids till it reaches Telek, nearwhich at a spot called Gleikash, o
r the Hart's leap, it measuresonly 35 paces across. Compare the map on Pl. CXIX and theexplanation for it on p. 391.][Fo
otnote 54: The foregoing sketch of a letter, lines 5. 18, appearsto have remained a fragment when Leonardo received pres
sing orderswhich caused him to write immediately and fully on the subjectmentioned in line 43.][Footnote 59: This passag
e was evidently intended as an improvementon that immediately preceding it. The purport of both is essentiallythe same,
but the first is pitched in a key of ill-disguisedannoyance which is absent from the second. I do not see how thesetwo v
ersions can be reconciled with the romance-theory held by Prof.Govi.] Do not be aggrieved, O Devatdar, by my delay in re
sponding toyour pressing request, for those things which you require of me areof such a nature that they cannot be well
expressed without somelapse of time; particularly because, in order to explain the causeof so great an effect, it is nec
essary to describe with accuracy thenature of the place; and by this means I can afterwards easilysatisfy your above-men
tioned request. [Footnote 62: This passage wasevidently intended as an improvement on that immediately precedingit. The
purport of both is essentially the same, but the first ispitched in a key of ill-disguised annoyance which is absent fro
m thesecond. I do not see how these two versions can be reconciled withthe romance-theory held by Prof. Govi.]I will pas
s over any description of the form of Asia Minor, or as towhat seas or lands form the limits of its outline and extent,b
ecause I know that by your own diligence and carefulness in yourstudies you have not remained in ignorance of these matt
ers [65];and I will go on to describe the true form of the Taurus Mountainwhich is the cause of this stupendous and harm
ful marvel, and whichwill serve to advance us in our purpose [66]. This Taurus is thatmountain which, with many others i
s said to be the ridge of MountCaucasus; but wishing to be very clear about it, I desired to speakto some of the inhabit
ants of the shores of the Caspian sea, whogive evidence that this must be the true Caucasus, and that thoughtheir mounta
ins bear the same name, yet these are higher; and toconfirm this in the Scythian tongue Caucasus means a very high[Footn
ote 68: Caucasus; Herodot Kaoxaais; Armen. Kaukaz.] peak, andin fact we have no information of there being, in the East
or in theWest, any mountain so high. And the proof of this is that theinhabitants of the countries to the West see the r
ays of the sunilluminating a great part of its summit for as much as a quarter ofthe longest night. And in the same way,
 in those countries which lieto the East.OF THE STRUCTURE AND SIZE OF MOUNT TAURUS.[Footnote 73: The statements are of c
ourse founded on those of the'inhabitants' spoken of in 1. 67.] The shadow of this ridge of theTaurus is of such a heigh
t that when, in the middle of June, the Sunis at its meridian, its shadow extends as far as the borders ofSarmatia, twel
ve days off; and in the middle of December it extendsas far as the Hyperborean mountains, which are at a month's journey
to the North [75]. And the side which faces the wind is always freefrom clouds and mists, because the wind which is part
ed in beatingon the rock, closes again on the further side of that rock, and inits motion carries with it the clouds fro
m all quarters and leavesthem where it strikes. And it is always full of thunderbolts fromthe great quantity of clouds w
hich accumulate there, whence the rockis all riven and full of huge debris [Footnote 77: Sudden storms areequally common
 on the heights of Ararat. It is hardly necessary toobserve that Ararat cannot be meant here. Its summit is formed liket
he crater of Vesuvius. The peaks sketched on Pl. CXVI-CXVIII areprobably views of the same mountain, taken from differen
t sides.Near the solitary peak, Pl. CXVIII these three names are written_goba, arnigasar, caruda_, names most likely of
different peaks. Pl.CXVI and CXVII are in the original on a single sheet folded down themiddle, 30 centimetres high and
43 1/2 wide. On the reverse of onehalf of the sheet are notes on _peso_ and _bilancia_ (weight andbalance), on the other
 are the 'prophecies' printed under Nos. 1293and 1294. It is evident from the arrangement that these were writtensubsequ
ently, on the space which had been left blank. These pagesare facsimiled on Pl. CXVIII. In Pl. CXVI-CXVIII the size is s
mallerthan in the original; the map of Armenia, Pl. CXVIII, is on Pl. CXIXslightly enlarged. On this map we find the fol
lowing names,beginning from the right hand at the top: _pariardes mo_ (forParyadres Mons, Arm. Parchar, now Barchal or K
olai Dagh; Trebizondis on its slope)._Aquilone_ --North, _Antitaurus Antitaurus psis mo_ (probably meantfor Thospitis =
Lake Van, Arm. Dgov Vanai, Tospoi, and the Mountainrange to the South); _Gordis mo_ (Mountains of Gordyaea), the birthpl
ace of the Tigris; _Oriente_ --East; _Tigris_, and then, to theleft, _Eufrates_. Then, above to the left _Argeo mo_ (now
 Erdshigas,an extinct volcano, 12000 feet high); _Celeno mo_ (no doubt SultanDagh in Pisidia). Celeno is the Greek town
of KeAouvat-- see ArianI, 29, I--now the ruins of Dineir); _oriente_ --East; _africolibezco_ (for libeccio--South West).
 In the middle of the Euphratesriver on this small map we see a shaded portion surrounded bymountains, perhaps to indica
te the inundation mentioned in l. 35.The affluent to the Euphrates shown as coming with many windingsfrom the high land
of 'Argeo' on the West, is the Tochma Su, whichjoins the main river at Malatie. I have not been able to discoverany map
of Armenia of the XVth or XVIth century in which the courseof the Euphrates is laid down with any thing like the correct
nessdisplayed in this sketch. The best I have seen is the CatalonianPortulan of Olivez de Majorca, executed in 1584, and
 it is farbehind Leonardo's.]. This mountain, at its base, is inhabited by avery rich population and is full of most bea
utiful springs andrivers, and is fertile and abounding in all good produce,particularly in those parts which face to the
 South. But aftermounting about three miles we begin to find forests of great firtrees, and beech and other similar tree
s; after this, for a space ofthree more miles, there are meadows and vast pastures; and all therest, as far as the begin
ning of the Taurus, is eternal snows whichnever disappear at any time, and extend to a height of aboutfourteen miles in
all. From this beginning of the Taurus up to theheight of a mile the clouds never pass away; thus we have fifteenmiles,
that is, a height of about five miles in a straight line; andthe summit of the peaks of the Taurus are as much, or about
 that.There, half way up, we begin to find a scorching air and never feela breath of wind; but nothing can live long the
re; there nothing isbrought forth save a few birds of prey which breed in the highfissures of Taurus and descend below t
he clouds to seek their prey.Above the wooded hills all is bare rock, that is, from the cloudsupwards; and the rock is t
he purest white. And it is impossible towalk to the high summit on account of the rough and perilous ascent.1337.[Footno
te: 1337. On comparing this commencement of a letter l. 1-2with that in l. 3 and 4 of No. 1336 it is quite evident that
bothrefer to the same event. (Compare also No. 1337 l. 10-l2 and 17 withNo. 1336 l. 23, 24 and 32.) But the text No. 133
6, including thefragment l. 3-4, was obviously written later than the draft herereproduced. The _Diodario_ is not direct
ly addressed--the personaddressed indeed is not known--and it seems to me highly probablethat it was written to some oth
er patron and friend whose name andposition are not mentioned.]Having often made you, by my letters, acquainted with the
 thingswhich have happened, I think I ought not to be silent as to theevents of the last few days, which--[2]...Having s
everal times--Having many times rejoiced with you by letters over your prosperousfortunes, I know now that, as a friend
you will be sad with me overthe miserable state in which I find myself; and this is, that duringthe last few days I have
 been in so much trouble, fear, peril andloss, besides the miseries of the people here, that we have beenenvious of the
dead; and certainly I do not believe that since theelements by their separation reduced the vast chaos to order, theyhav
e ever combined their force and fury to do so much mischief toman. As far as regards us here, what we have seen and gone
 throughis such that I could not imagine that things could ever rise to suchan amount of mischief, as we experienced in
the space of ten hours.In the first place we were assailed and attacked by the violence andfury of the winds [10]; to th
is was added the falling of greatmountains of snow which filled up all this valley, thus destroying agreat part of our c
ity [Footnote 11: _Della nostra citta_ (Leonardofirst wrote _di questa citta_). From this we may infer that he hadat som
e time lived in the place in question wherever it might be.].And not content with this the tempest sent a sudden flood o
f waterto submerge all the low part of this city [12]; added to which therecame a sudden rain, or rather a ruinous torre
nt and flood of water,sand, mud, and stones, entangled with roots, and stems and fragmentsof various trees; and every ki
nd of thing flying through the airfell upon us; finally a great fire broke out, not brought by thewind, but carried as i
t would seem, by ten thousand devils, whichcompletely burnt up all this neighbourhood and it has not yetceased. And thos
e few who remain unhurt are in such dejection andsuch terror that they hardly have courage to speak to each other, asif
they were stunned. Having abandoned all our business, we stayhere together in the ruins of some churches, men and women
mingledtogether, small and great [Footnote 17: _Certe ruine di chiese_.Either of Armenian churches or of Mosques, which
it was not unusualto speak of as churches._Maschi e femmini insieme unite_, implies an infringement of theusually strict
 rule of the separation of the sexes.], just likeherds of goats. The neighbours out of pity succoured us withvictuals, a
nd they had previously been our enemies. And if[Footnote 18: _I vicini, nostri nimici_. The town must then havestood qui
te close to the frontier of the country. Compare 1336. L.7. _vicini ai nostri confini_. Dr. M. JORDAN has already publis
hedlines 4-13 (see _Das Malerbuch, Leipzig_, 1873, p. 90:--his readingdiffers from mine) under the title of "Description
 of a landscapenear Lake Como". We do in fact find, among other loose sheets in theCodex Atlanticus, certain texts refer
ring to valleys of the Alps(see Nos. 1030, 1031 and note p. 237) and in the arrangement of theloose sheets, of which the
 Codex Atlanticus has been formed, thesehappen to be placed close to this text. The compiler stuck both onthe same folio
 sheet; and if this is not the reason for Dr. JORDAN'Schoosing such a title (Description &c.) I cannot imagine what it c
anhave been. It is, at any rate, a merely hypothetical statement. Thedesignation of the population of the country round
a city as "theenemy" (_nemici_) is hardly appropriate to Italy in the time ofLeonardo.]it had not been for certain peopl
e who succoured us with victuals,all would have died of hunger. Now you see the state we are in. Andall these evils are
as nothing compared with those which arepromised to us shortly.I know that as a friend you will grieve for my misfortune
s, as I, informer letters have shown my joy at your prosperity ...Notes about events observed abroad (1338-1339).1338.BO
OK 43. OF THE MOVEMENT OF AIR ENCLOSED IN WATER.I have seen motions of the air so furious that they have carried,mixed u
p in their course, the largest trees of the forest and wholeroofs of great palaces, and I have seen the same fury bore a
 holewith a whirling movement digging out a gravel pit, and carryinggravel, sand and water more than half a mile through
 the air.[Footnote: The first sixteen lines of this passage which treat ofthe subject as indicated on the title line hav
e no place in thisconnexion and have been omitted.][Footnote 2: _Ho veduto movimenti_ &c. Nothing of the kind happenedin
 Italy during Leonardo's lifetime, and it is therefore extremelyprobable that this refers to the natural phenomena which
 are sofully described in the foregoing passage. (Compare too, No. 1021.)There can be no doubt that the descriptions of
the Deluge in theLibro di Pittura (Vol. I, No. 607-611), and that of the fall of amountain No. 610, l. 17-30 were writte
n from the vivid impressionsderived from personal experience. Compare also Pl. XXXIV-XL.]1339.[Footnote: It may be infer
red from the character of the writing,which is in the style of the note in facsimile Vol. I, p. 297, thatthis passage wa
s written between 1470 and 1480. As the figure 6 atthe end of the text indicates, it was continued on another page, butI
 have searched in vain for it. The reverse of this leaf is colouredred for drawing in silver point, but has not been use
d for thatpurpose but for writing on, and at about the same date. The passagesare given as Nos. 1217, 1218, 1219, 1162 a
nd No. 994 (see note page218). The text given above is obviously not a fragment of a letter,but a record of some persona
l experience. No. 1379 also seems torefer to Leonardo's journeys in Southern Italy.]Like a whirling wind which rushes do
wn a sandy and hollow valley,and which, in its hasty course, drives to its centre every thingthat opposes its furious co
urse ...No otherwise does the Northern blast whirl round in its tempestuousprogress ...Nor does the tempestuous sea bell
ow so loud, when the Northern blastdashes it, with its foaming waves between Scylla and Charybdis; norStromboli, nor Mou
nt Etna, when their sulphurous flames, having beenforcibly confined, rend, and burst open the mountain, fulminatingstone
s and earth through the air together with the flames theyvomit.Nor when the inflamed caverns of Mount Etna [Footnote 13:
 Mongibellois a name commonly given in Sicily to Mount Etna (from Djebel,Arab.=mountain). Fr. FERRARA, _Descrizione dell
' Etna con la storiadelle eruzioni_ (Palermo, 1818, p. 88) tells us, on the authority ofthe _Cronaca del Monastero Bened
ettino di Licordia_ of an eruptionof the Volcano with a great flow of lava on Sept. 21, 1447. The nextrecords of the mou
ntain are from the years 1533 and 1536. A. Percyneither does mention any eruptions of Etna during the years to whichthis
 note must probably refer _Memoire des tremblements de terre dela peninsule italique, Vol. XXII des Memoires couronnees
et Memoiresdes savants etrangers. Academie Royal de Belgique_).A literal interpretation of the passage would not, howeve
r, indicatean allusion to any great eruption; particularly in the connectionwith Stromboli, where the periodical outbrea
ks in very shortintervals are very striking to any observer, especially at nighttime, when passing the island on the way
 from Naples to Messina.],rejecting the ill-restained element vomit it forth, back to its ownregion, driving furiously b
efore it every obstacle that comes in theway of its impetuous rage ...Unable to resist my eager desire and wanting to se
e the great ... ofthe various and strange shapes made by formative nature, and havingwandered some distance among gloomy
 rocks, I came to the entrance ofa great cavern, in front of which I stood some time, astonished andunaware of such a th
ing. Bending my back into an arch I rested myleft hand on my knee and held my right hand over my down-cast andcontracted
 eye brows: often bending first one way and then theother, to see whether I could discover anything inside, and thisbein
g forbidden by the deep darkness within, and after havingremained there some time, two contrary emotions arose in me, fe
arand desire--fear of the threatening dark cavern, desire to seewhether there were any marvellous thing within it ...Dra
fts of Letters to Lodovico il Moro (1340-1345).1340.[Footnote: The numerous corrections, the alterations in the figures(
l. 18) and the absence of any signature prove that this is merelythe rough draft of a letter to Lodovico il Moro. It is
one of thevery few manuscripts which are written from left to right--see thefacsimile of the beginning as here reproduce
d. This is probably thefinal sketch of a document the clean of which copy was written inthe usual manner. Leonardo no do
ubt very rarely wrote so, and thisis probably the reason of the conspicuous dissimilarity in thehandwriting, when he did
. (Compare Pl. XXXVIII.) It is noteworthytoo that here the orthography and abbreviations are alsoexceptional. But such s
uperficial peculiarities are not enough tostamp the document as altogether spurious. It is neither a forgerynor the prod
uction of any artist but Leonardo himself. As to thispoint the contents leave us no doubt as to its authenticity,particu
larly l. 32 (see No. 719, where this passage is repeated).But whether the fragment, as we here see it, was written fromL
eonardo's dictation--a theory favoured by the orthography, theerasures and corrections--or whether it may be a copy made
 for or byMelzi or Mazenta is comparatively unimportant. There are in theCodex Atlanticus a few other documents not writ
ten by Leonardohimself, but the notes in his own hand found on the reverse pages ofthese leaves amply prove that they we
re certainly in Leonardo'spossession. This mark of ownership is wanting to the text inquestion, but the compilers of the
 Codex Atlanticus, at any rate,accepted it as a genuine document.With regard to the probable date of this projected lett
er see Vol.II, p. 3.]Most illustrious Lord, Having now sufficiently considered thespecimens of all those who proclaim th
emselves skilled contrivers ofinstruments of war, and that the invention and operation of the saidinstruments are nothin
g different to those in common use: I shallendeavour, without prejudice to any one else, to explain myself toyour Excell
ency showing your Lordship my secrets, and then offeringthem to your best pleasure and approbation to work with effect a
topportune moments as well as all those things which, in part, shallbe briefly noted below.1) I have a sort of extremely
 light and strong bridges, adapted tobe most easily carried, and with them you may pursue, and at anytime flee from the
enemy; and others, secure and indestructible byfire and battle, easy and convenient to lift and place. Also methodsof bu
rning and destroying those of the enemy.2) I know how, when a place is besieged, to take the water out ofthe trenches, a
nd make endless variety of bridges, and covered waysand ladders, and other machines pertaining to such expeditions.3) It
em. If, by reason of the height of the banks, or the strengthof the place and its position, it is impossible, when besie
ging aplace, to avail oneself of the plan of bombardment, I have methodsfor destroying every rock or other fortress, eve
n if it were foundedon a rock, &c.4) Again I have kinds of mortars; most convenient and easy to carry;and with these can
 fling small stones almost resembling a storm; andwith the smoke of these causing great terror to the enemy, to hisgreat
 detriment and confusion.9) [8] And when the fight should be at sea I have kinds of manymachines most efficient for offe
nce and defence; and vessels whichwill resist the attack of the largest guns and powder and fumes.5) Item. I have means
by secret and tortuous mines and ways, madewithout noise to reach a designated [spot], even if it were neededto pass und
er a trench or a river.6) Item. I will make covered chariots, safe and unattackable which,entering among the enemy with
their artillery, there is no body ofmen so great but they would break them. And behind these, infantrycould follow quite
 unhurt and without any hindrance.7) Item. In case of need I will make big guns, mortars and lightordnance of fine and u
seful forms, out of the common type.8) Where the operation of bombardment should fail, I would contrivecatapults, mangon
els, _trabocchi_ and other machines of marvellousefficacy and not in common use. And in short, according to thevariety o
f cases, I can contrive various and endless means ofoffence and defence.10) In time of peace I believe I can give perfec
t satisfaction andto the equal of any other in architecture and the composition ofbuildings public and private; and in g
uiding water from one place toanother.Item: I can carry out sculpture in marble, bronze or clay, and alsoin painting wha
tever may be done, and as well as any other, be hewhom he may.[32] Again, the bronze horse may be taken in hand, which i
s to be tothe immortal glory and eternal honour of the prince your father ofhappy memory, and of the illustrious house o
f Sforza.And if any one of the above-named things seem to any one to beimpossible or not feasible, I am most ready to ma
ke the experimentin your park, or in whatever place may please your Excellency--towhom I commend myself with the utmost
humility &c.1341.To my illustrious Lord, Lodovico, Duke of Bari, Leonardo da Vinci ofFlorence-- Leonardo.[Footnote: Evid
ently a note of the superscription of a letter to theDuke, and written, like the foregoing from left to right. Themanusc
ript containing it is of the year 1493. Lodovico was notproclaimed and styled Duke of Milan till September 1494. The Duk
edomof Bari belonged to the Sforza family till 1499.]1342.You would like to see a model which will prove useful to you a
nd tome, also it will be of use to those who will be the cause of ourusefulness.[Footnote: 1342. 1343. These two notes o
ccur in the same not veryvoluminous MS. as the former one and it is possible that they arefragments of the same letter.
By the _Modello_, the equestrianstatue is probably meant, particularly as the model of this statuewas publicly exhibited
 in this very year, 1493, on tne occasion ofthe marriage of the Emperor Maximilian with Bianca Maria Sforza.]1343.There
are here, my Lord, many gentlemen who will undertake thisexpense among them, if they are allowed to enjoy the use ofadmi
ssion to the waters, the mills, and the passage of vessels andwhen it is sold to them the price will be repaid to them b
y thecanal of Martesana.1344.I am greatly vexed to be in necessity, but I still more regret thatthis should be the cause
 of the hindrance of my wish which is alwaysdisposed to obey your Excellency.Perhaps your Excellency did not give furthe
r orders to MesserGualtieri, believing that I had money enough.I am greatly annoyed that you should have found me in nec
essity, andthat my having to earn my living should have hindered me ...[12] It vexes me greatly that having to earn my l
iving has forced meto interrupt the work and to attend to small matters, instead offollowing up the work which your Lord
ship entrusted to me. But Ihope in a short time to have earned so much that I may carry it outquietly to the satisfactio
n of your Excellency, to whom I commendmyself; and if your Lordship thought that I had money, your Lordshipwas deceived.
 I had to feed 6 men for 56 months, and have had 50ducats.1345.And if any other comission is given me
         by any ...of the reward of my service. Because I am                            not [able] to be ...things assig
ned because meanwhile they                have ... to them ...... which they well may settle rather than I ...not my art
 which I wish to change and ...given some clothing if I dare a sum ...My Lord, I knowing your Excellency's
 mind to be occupied ...to remind your Lordship of my small matters                  and the arts put to silencethat my
silence might be the cause of making                  your Lordship scorn ...my life in your service. I hold myself ever
                 in readiness to obey ...[Footnote 11: See No. 723, where this passage is repeated.]Of the horse I will
say nothing because              I know the times [are bad]to your Lordship how I had still to receive              two
years' salary of the ...with the two skilled workmen who are constantlyin my pay and at my costthat at last I found myse
lf advanced the             said sum about 15 lire ...works of fame by which I could show to    those who shall see it t
hat I have beeneverywhere, but I do not know where Icould bestow my work [more] ...[Footnote 17: See No. 1344 l. 12.]I,
having been working to gain my                       living ...I not having been informed what it is, I find
             myself ...[Footnote 19: In April, 1498, Leonardo was engaged inpainting the Saletta Nigra of the Castello a
t Milan.(See G. MONGERI, _l'Arte in Milano_, 1872, p. 417.)]remember the commission to paint the                       r
ooms ...I conveyed to your Lordship only requesting                            you ...[Footnote: The paper on which this
 is written is torn down themiddle; about half of each line remains.]Draft of letter to be sent to Piacenza (1346. 1347)
.[Footnote: 1346. 1347. Piacenza belonged to Milan. The Lord spokenof in this letter, is no doubt Lodovico il Moro. One
may infer fromthe concluding sentence (No. 1346, l. 33. 34 and No. 1347), thatLeonardo, who no doubt compiled this lette
r, did not forward it toPiacenza himself, but gave it to some influential patron, underwhose name and signature a copy o
f it was sent to the Commission.]1346.Magnificent Commissioners of Buildings I, understanding that yourMagnificencies ha
ve made up your minds to make certain great worksin bronze, will remind you of certain things: first that you shouldnot
be so hasty or so quick to give the commission, lest by thishaste it should become impossible to select a good model and
 a goodmaster; and some man of small merit may be chosen, who by hisinsufficiency may cause you to be abused by your des
cendants,judging that this age was but ill supplied with men of good counseland with good masters; seeing that other cit
ies, and chiefly thecity of the Florentines, has been as it were in these very days,endowed with beautiful and grand wor
ks in bronze; among which arethe doors of their Baptistery. And this town of Florence, likePiacenza, is a place of inter
course, through which many foreignerspass; who, seeing that the works are fine and of good quality, carryaway a good imp
ression, and will say that that city is well filledwith worthy inhabitants, seeing the works which bear witness totheir
opinion; and on the other hand, I say seeing so much metalexpended and so badly wrought, it were less shame to the city
if thedoors had been of plain wood; because, the material, costing solittle, would not seem to merit any great outlay of
 skill...Now the principal parts which are sought for in cities are theircathedrals, and of these the first things which
 strike the eye arethe doors, by which one passes into these churches.Beware, gentlemen of the Commission, lest too grea
t speed in yourdetermination, and so much haste to expedite the entrusting of sogreat a work as that which I hear you ha
ve ordered, be the causethat that which was intended for the honour of God and of men shouldbe turned to great dishonour
 of your judgments, and of your city,which, being a place of mark, is the resort and gathering-place ofinnumerable forei
gners. And this dishonour would result if by yourlack of diligence you were to put your trust in some vaunter, who byhis
 tricks or by favour shown to him here should obtain such workfrom you, by which lasting and very great shame would resu
lt to himand to you. Thus I cannot help being angry when I consider what menthose are who have conferred with you as wis
hing to undertake thisgreat work without thinking of their sufficiency for it, not to saymore. This one is a potter, tha
t one a maker of cuirasses, this oneis a bell-founder, another a bell ringer, and one is even abombardier; and among the
m one in his Lordship's service, whoboasted that he was the gossip of Messer Ambrosio Ferrere [Footnote26: Messer Ambrog
io Ferrere was Farmer of the Customs under theDuke. Piacenza at that time belonged to Milan.], who has some powerand who
 has made him some promises; and if this were not enough hewould mount on horseback, and go to his Lord and obtain such
lettersthat you could never refuse [to give] him the work. But considerwhere masters of real talent and fit for such wor
k are brought whenthey have to compete with such men as these. Open your eyes and lookcarefully lest your money should b
e spent in buying your owndisgrace. I can declare to you that from that place you will procurenone but average works of
inferior and coarse masters. There is nocapable man,--[33] and you may believe me,--except Leonardo theFlorentine, who i
s making the equestrian statue in bronze of theDuke Francesco and who has no need to bring himself into notice,because h
e has work for all his life time; and I doubt, whetherbeing so great a work, he will ever finish it [34].The miserable p
ainstakers ... with what hope may they expect areward of their merit?1347.There is one whom his Lordship invited from Fl
orence to do this workand who is a worthy master, but with so very much business he willnever finish it; and you may ima
gine that a difference there is tobe seen between a beautiful object and an ugly one. Quote Pliny.Letter to the Cardinal
 Ippolito d' Este.1348.[Footnote: This letter addressed to the Cardinal Ippolito d'Este ishere given from Marchese G. CA
MPORI'S publication: _Nuovi documentiper la Vita di Leonardo da Vinci. Atti e Memorie delle R. R.Deputazioni di Storia p
atria per la provincie modenesi e parmenesi,Vol. III._ It is the only text throughout this work which I have notmyself e
xamined and copied from the original. The learned discovererof this letter--the only letter from Leonardo hitherto known
 ashaving been sent--adds these interesting remarks: _Codesto Cardinalenato ad Ercole I. nel 1470, arcivescovo di Strigo
nia a sette anni,poi d'Agra, aveva conseguito nel 1497 la pingue ed ambita cattedradi Milano, la dove avra conosciuto il
 Vinci, sebbene il poco amorech'ei professava alle arti lasci credere che le proteste di servitudi Leonardo piu che a gr
atitudine per favori ricevuti e per opere alui allogate, accennino a speranza per un favore che si aspetta.Notabile e an
cora in questo prezioso documento la ripetuta signaturadel grande artista 'che si scrive Vincio e Vincius, non da Vincic
ome si tiene comunemente, sebbene l'una e l'altra possano valere asignificare cosi il casato come il paese; restando a s
apere se ilnome del paese di Vinci fosse assunto a cognome della famiglia diLeonardo nel qual supposto piu propriamento
avrebbe a chiamarsiLeonardo Vinci, o Vincio (latinamente Vincius) com'egli stesso amosegnarsi in questa lettera, e come
scrissero parecchi contenporaneidi lui, il Casio, il Cesariano, Geoffrey Tory, il Gaurico, ilBandello, Raffaelle Maffei,
 il Paciolo. Per ultimo non lascerod'avvertire come la lettera del Vinci e assai ben conservata, dinitida e larga scritt
ura in forma pienemente corrispondente a quelladei suoi manoscritti, vergata all'uso comune da sinistra a destra,anziche
 contrariamente come fu suo costume; ma indubbiamenteautentica e fornita della menzione e del suggello che fresca ancora
conserva l'impronta di una testa di profilo da un picciolo anticocammeo._ (Compare No. 1368, note.)]Most Illustrious and
 most Reverend Lord.  The Lord Ippolito, Cardinal of Este                          at Ferrare.Most Illustrious and most
Reverend Lord.I arrived from Milan but a few days since and finding that my elderbrother refuses tocarry into effect a w
ill, made three years ago when my fatherdied--as also, and no less, because I would not fail in a matter Iesteem most im
portant--I cannot forbear to crave of your mostReverend Highness a letter of recommendation and favour to SerRaphaello H
ieronymo, at present one of the illustrious members ofthe Signoria before whom my cause is being argued; and moreparticu
larly it has been laid by his Excellency the Gonfaloniereinto the hands of the said Ser Raphaello, that his Worship may
haveto decide and end it before the festival of All Saints. Andtherefore, my Lord, I entreat you, as urgently as I know
how and amable, that your Highness will write a letter to the said SerRaphaello in that admirable and pressing manner wh
ich your Highnesscan use, recommending to him Leonardo Vincio, your most humbleservant as I am, and shall always be; req
uesting him and pressinghim not only to do me justice but to do so with despatch; and I havenot the least doubt, from ma
ny things that I hear, that SerRaphaello, being most affectionately devoted to your Highness, thematter will issue _ad v
otum_. And this I shall attribute to yourmost Reverend Highness' letter, to whom I once more humbly commendmyself. _Et b
ene valeat_.Florence XVIIIa 7bris 1507.E. V. R. D.your humble servantLeonardus Vincius, pictor.Draft of Letter to the Go
vernor of Milan.1349.I am afraid lest the small return I have made for the greatbenefits, I have received from your Exce
llency, have not made yousomewhat angry with me, and that this is why to so many letterswhich I have written to your Lor
dship I have never had an answer. Inow send Salai to explain to your Lordship that I am almost at anend of the litigatio
n I had with my brother; that I hope to findmyself with you this Easter, and to carry with me two pictures oftwo Madonna
s of different sizes. These were done for our mostChristian King, or for whomsoever your Lordship may please. I shouldbe
 very glad to know on my return thence where I may have to reside,for I would not give any more trouble to your Lordship
. Also, as Ihave worked for the most Christian King, whether my salary is tocontinue or not. I wrote to the President as
 to that water which theking granted me, and which I was not put in possession of because atthat time there was a dearth
 in the canal by reason of the greatdroughts and because [Footnote:Compare Nos. 1009 and 1010. Leonardohas noted the pay
ment of the pension from the king in 1505.] itsoutlets were not regulated; but he certainly promised me that whenthis wa
s done I should be put in possession. Thus I pray yourLordship that you will take so much trouble, now that these outlet
sare regulated, as to remind the President of my matter; that is, togive me possession of this water, because on my retu
rn I hope tomake there instruments and other things which will greatly pleaseour most Christian King. Nothing else occur
s to me. I am alwaysyours to command. [Footnote:1349. Charles d'Amboise, Marechal deChaumont, was Governor of Milan unde
r Louis XII. Leonardo was inpersonal communication with him so early as in 1503. He was absentfrom Milan in the autumn o
f 1506 and from October l5l0--when hebesieged Pope Julius II. in Bologna--till his death, which tookplace at Correggio,
February 11, 1511. Francesco Vinci, Leonardo'suncle, died--as Amoretti tells us--in the winter of l5l0-11 (oraccording t
o Uzielli in 1506?), and Leonardo remained in Florencefor business connected with his estate. The letter written withref
erence to this affair, No. 1348, is undoubtedly earlier than theletters Nos. 1349 and 1350. Amoretti tells us, _Memorie
Storiche_,ch. II, that the following note existed on the same leaf in MS. C.A. I have not however succeeded in finding i
t. The passage runsthus: _Jo sono quasi al fine del mio letizio che io o con miefratetgli ... Ancora ricordo a V. Excia
la facenda che o cum SerJuliana mio Fratello capo delli altri fratelli ricordandoli come seofferse di conciar le cose no
stre fra noi fratelli del comune dellaeredita de mio Zio, e quelli costringa alla expeditione, qualeconteneva la lettera
 che lui me mando._]Drafts of Letters to the Superintendent of Canals and to Fr. Melzi.1350.Magnificent President, I am
sending thither Salai, my pupil, who isthe bearer of this, and from him you will hear by word of mouth thecause of my...
Magnificent President, I...Magnificent President:--Having ofttimes remembered the proposalsmade many times to me by your
 Excellency, I take the liberty ofwriting to remind your Lordship of the promise made to me at my lastdeparture, that is
 the possession of the twelve inches of watergranted to me by the most Christian King. Your Lordship knows that Idid not
 enter into possession, because at that time when it wasgiven to me there was a dearth of water in the canal, as well by
reason of the great drought as also because the outlets were notregulated; but your Excellency promised me that as soon
as this wasdone, I should have my rights. Afterwards hearing that the canal wascomplete I wrote several times to your Lo
rdship and to MesserGirolamo da Cusano,who has in his keeping the deed of this gift; andso also I wrote to Corigero and
never had a reply. I now sendthither Salai, my pupil, the bearer of this, to whom your Lordshipmay tell by word of mouth
 all that happened in the matter aboutwhich I petition your Excellency. I expect to go thither this Eastersince I am nea
rly at the end of my lawsuit, and I will take with metwo pictures of our Lady which I have begun, and at the present tim
ehave brought them on to a very good end; nothing else occurs to me.My Lord the love which your Excellency has always sh
own me and thebenefits that I have constantly received from you I have hitherto...I am fearful lest the small return I h
ave made for the greatbenefits I have received from your Excellency may not have made yousomewhat annoyed with me. And t
his is why, to many letters which Ihave written to your Excellency I have never had an answer. I nowsend to you Salai to
 explain to your Excellency that I am almost atthe end of my litigation with my brothers, and that I hope to bewith you
this Easter and carry with me two pictures on which are twoMadonnas of different sizes which I began for the most Christ
ianKing, or for whomsoever you please. I should be very glad to knowwhere, on my return from this place, I shall have to
 reside, becauseI do not wish to give more trouble to your Lordship; and then,having worked for the most Christian King,
 whether my salary is tobe continued or not. I write to the President as to the water thatthe king granted me of which I
 had not been put in possession byreason of the dearth in the canal, caused by the great drought andbecause its outlets
were not regulated; but he promised me certainlythat as soon as the regulation was made, I should be put inpossession of
 it; I therefore pray you that, if you should meet thesaid President, you would be good enough, now that the outlets are
regulated, to remind the said President to cause me to be put inpossession of that water, since I understand it is in gr
eat measurein his power. Nothing else occurs to me; always yours to command.Good day to you Messer Francesco. Why, in Go
d's name, of all theletters I have written to you, have you never answered one. Now waittill I come, by God, and I shall
 make you write so much that perhapsyou will become sick of it.Dear Messer Francesco. I am sending thither Salai to lear
n from HisMagnificence the President to what end the regulation of the waterhas come since, at my departure this regulat
ion of the outlets ofthe canal had been ordered, because His Magnificence the Presidentpromised me that as soon as this
was done I should be satisfied. Itis now some time since I heard that the canal was in order, as alsoits outlets, and I
immediately wrote to the President and to you,and then I repeated it, and never had an answer. So you will havethe goodn
ess to answer me as to that which happened, and as I am notto hurry the matter, would you take the trouble, for the love
 of me,to urge the President a little, and also Messer Girolamo Cusano, towhom you will commend me and offer my duty to
his Magnificence.[Footnote: 1350. 28-36. Draft of a letter to Francesco Melzi, bornl493--a youth therefore of about 17 i
n 1510. Leonardo addresses hisyoung friend as "Messer", as being the son of a noble house. Melzipractised art under Leon
ardo as a dilettante and not as a pupil,like Cesare da Sesto and others (See LERMOLIEFF, _Die Galerien_ &c.,p. 476).]Dra
fts of a letter to Giuliano de' Medici (1351-1352).135l.[Most illustrious Lord. I greatly rejoice most Illustrious Lord
atyour...]I was so greatly rejoiced, most illustrious Lord, by the desiredrestoration of your health, that it almost had
 the effect that [myown health recovered]--[I have got through my illness]--my ownillness left me-- --of your Excellency
's almost restored health. ButI am extremely vexed that I have not been able completely to satisfythe wishes of your Exc
ellency, by reason of the wickedness of thatdeceiver, for whom I left nothing undone which could be done for himby me an
d by which I might be of use to him; and in the first placehis allowances were paid to him before the time, which I beli
eve hewould willingly deny, if I had not the writing signed by myself andthe interpreter. And I, seeing that he did not
work for me unless hehad no work to do for others, which he was very careful insolliciting, invited him to dine with me,
 and to work afterwardsnear me, because, besides the saving of expense, he[Footnote 1351. 1353: It is clear from the con
tents of this notesthat they refer to Leonardo's residence in Rome in 1513-1515. Norcan there be any doubt that they wer
e addressed to Leonardo's patronat the time: Giuliano de' Medici, third son of Lorenzo theMagnificent and brother of Pop
e Leo X (born 1478). In 1512 he becamethe head of the Florentine Republic. The Pope invited him to Rome,where he settled
; in 1513 he was named patrician with much splendidceremonial. The medal struck in honour of the event bears the wordsMA
G. IVLIAN. MEDICES. Leonardo too uses the style "Magnifico", inhis letter. Compare also No. 1377.GlNO CAPPONI (_Storia d
ella Repubblica di Firenze_, Vol. III, p.139) thus describes the character of Giuliano de' Medici, who diedin 1516: _Era
 il migliore della famiglia, di vita placida, grandespenditore, tenendo intorno a se uomini ingegnosi, ed ogni nuovacosa
 voleva provare._See too GREGOROVIUS, _Geschichte der Stadi Rom_, VIII (book XIV.III, 2): _Die Luftschlosser furstlicher
 Grosse, wozu ihn der Papsthatte erheben wollen zerfielen. Julian war der edelste allerdamaligen Medici, ein Mensch von
innerlicher Richtung, unbefriedigtdurch das Leben, mitten im Sonnenglanz der Herrlichkeit Leo's X.eine dunkle Gestalt di
e wie ein Schatten voruberzog._ Giuliano livedin the Vatican, and it may be safely inferred from No. 1352 l. 2,and No. 1
353 l. 4, that Leonardo did the same.From the following unpublished notice in the Vatican archives, whichM. Eug. Muntz,
librarian of the Ecole des Beaux arts, Paris, hasdone me the favour to communicate to me, we get a more accurate viewof
Leonardo's relation to the often named GIORGIO TEDESCO:_Nota delle provisione_ (sic) _a da pagare per me in nome del nos
troill. S. Bernardo Bini e chompa di Roma, e prima della illma suachonsorte ogni mese d. 800.A Ldo da Vinci per sua prov
isione d. XXXIII, e piu d. VII al dettoper la provisione di Giorgio tedescho, che sono in tutto d. 40.From this we learn
, that seven ducats formed the German's monthlywages, but according to No. 1353 l. 7 he pretended that eight ducatshad b
een agreed upon.]would acquire the Italian language. He always promised, but wouldnever do so. And this I did also, beca
use that Giovanni, the Germanwho makes the mirrors, was there always in the workshop, and wantedto see and to know all t
hat was being done there and made it knownoutside ... strongly criticising it; and because he dined with thoseof the Pop
e's guard, and then they went out with guns killing birdsamong the ruins; and this went on from after dinner till theeve
ning; and when I sent Lorenzo to urge him to work he said that hewould not have so many masters over him, and that his w
ork was foryour Excellency's Wardrobe; and thus two months passed and so itwent on; and one day finding Gian Niccolo of
the Wardrobe and askingwhether the German had finished the work for your Magnificence, hetold me this was not true, but
only that he had given him two gunsto clean. Afterwards, when I had urged him farther, be left theworkshop and began to
work in his room, and lost much time in makinganother pair of pincers and files and other tools with screws; andthere he
 worked at mills for twisting silk which he hid when any oneof my people went in, and with a thousand oaths and mutterin
gs, sothat none of them would go there any more.I was so greatly rejoiced, most Illustrious Lord, by the desiredrestorat
ion of your health, that my own illness almost left me. ButI am greatly vexed at not having been able to completely sati
sfyyour Excellency's wishes by reason of the wickedness of that Germandeceiver, for whom I left nothing undone by which
I could have hopeto please him; and secondly I invited him to lodge and board withme, by which means I should constantly
 see the work he was doing andwith greater ease correct his errors while, besides this, he wouldlearn the Italian tongue
, by means of which be could with more easetalk without an interpreter; his moneys were always given him inadvance of th
e time when due. Afterwards he wanted to have themodels finished in wood, just as they were to be in iron, and wishedto
carry them away to his own country. But this I refused him,telling him that I would give him, in drawing, the breadth, l
ength,height and form of what he had to do; and so we remained inill-will.The next thing was that he made himself anothe
r workshop and pincersand tools in his room where he slept, and there he worked forothers; afterwards he went to dine wi
th the Swiss of the guard,where there are idle fellows, in which he beat them all; and mosttimes they went two or three
together with guns, to shoot birdsamong the ruins, and this went on till evening.At last I found how this master Giovann
i the mirror-maker was he whohad done it all, for two reasons; the first because he had said thatmy coming here had depr
ived him of the countenance and favour ofyour Lordship which always... The other is that he said that hisiron-workers' r
ooms suited him for working at his mirrors, and ofthis he gave proof; for besides making him my enemy, he made himsell a
ll he had and leave his workshop to him, where he works with anumber of workmen making numerous mirrors to send to the f
airs.1352.I was so greatly rejoiced, most Illustrious Lord, by the wished forrecovery of your health, that my own ills h
ave almost left me; and Isay God be praised for it. But it vexes me greatly that I have notbeen able completely to satis
fy your Excellency's wishes by reasonof the wickedness of that German deceiver, for whom I left nothingundone by which I
 could hope to please him; and secondly I invitedhim to lodge and board with me, by which means I should seeconstantly t
he work he was doing, for which purpose I would have atable fixed at the foot of one of these windows, where he could wo
rkwith the file and finish the things made below; and so I shouldconstantly see the work he might do, and it could be co
rrected withgreater ease.Draft of letter written at Rome.1353.This other hindered me in anatomy, blaming it before the P
ope; andlikewise at the hospital; and he has filled [4] this whole Belvederewith workshops for mirrors; and he did the s
ame thing in MaestroGiorgio's room. He said that he had been promised [7] eight ducatsevery month, beginning with the fi
rst day, when he set out, or atlatest when he spoke with you; and that you agreed.Seeing that he seldom stayed in the wo
rkshop, and that he ate agreat deal, I sent him word that, if he liked I could deal with himseparately for each thing th
at he might make, and would give himwhat we might agree to be a fair valuation. He took counsel with hisneighbour and ga
ve up his room, selling every thing, and went tofind...Miscellaneous Records (1354. 1355).1354.[Footnote: A puzzling pas
sage, meant, as it would seem, for a jest.Compare the description of Giants in Dante, _Inf_. XXI and XXII.Perhaps Leonar
do had the Giant Antaeus in his mind. Of him the mythrelates that he was a son of Ge, that he fed on lions; that hehunte
d in Libya and killed the inhabitants. He enjoyed thepeculiarity of renewing his strength whenever he fell and came inco
ntact with his mother earth; but that Hercules lifted him up andso conquered and strangled him. Lucan gives a full accou
nt of thestruggle. Pharsalia IV, 617. The reading of this passage, which isvery indistinctly written, is in many places
doubtful.]Dear Benedetto de' Pertarti. When the proud giant fell because ofthe bloody and miry state of the ground it wa
s as though a mountainhad fallen so that the country shook as with an earthquake, andterror fell on Pluto in hell. From
the violence of the shock he layas stunned on the level ground. Suddenly the people, seeing him asone killed by a thunde
rbolt, turned back; like ants running wildlyover the body of the fallen oak, so these rushing over his amplelimbs.......
... them with frequent wounds; by which, the giant beingroused and feeling himself almost covered by the multitude, hesu
ddenly perceives the smarting of the stabs, and sent forth a roarwhich sounded like a terrific clap of thunder; and plac
ing his handson the ground he raised his terrible face: and having lifted onehand to his head he found it full of men an
d rabble sticking to itlike the minute creatures which not unfrequently are found there;wherefore with a shake of his he
ad he sends the men flying throughthe air just as hail does when driven by the fury of the winds. Manyof these men were
found to be dead; stamping with his feet.And clinging to his hair, and striving to hide in it, they behavedlike sailors
in a storm, who run up the ropes to lessen the force ofthe wind [by taking in sail].News of things from the East.Be it k
nown to you that in the month of June there appeared a Giant,who came from the Lybian desert... mad with rage like ants.
...struck down by the rude.This great Giant was born in Mount Atlas and was a hero ... and hadto fight against the Egypt
ians and Arabs, Medes and Persians. Helived in the sea on whales, grampuses and ships.Mars fearing for his life took ref
uge under the... of Jove.And at the great fall it seemed as though the whole province quaked.1355.This spirit returns to
 the brain whence it had departed, with a loudvoice and with these words, it moved...And if any man though he may have w
isdom or goodness .........[Footnote: This passage, very difficult to decipher, is on thereverse of a drawing at Windsor
, Pl. CXXII, which possibly has someconnection with it. The drawing is slightly reduced in thisreproduction; the origina
l being 25 cm. high by 19 cm. wide.]O blessed and happy spirit whence comest thou? Well have I knownthis man, much again
st my will. This one is a receptacle ofvillainy; he is a perfect heap of the utmost ingratitude combinedwith every vice.
 But of what use is it to fatigue myself with vainwords? Nothing is to be found in them but every form of sin ... Andif
there should be found among them any that possesses any good,they will not be treated differently to myself by other men
; and infine, I come to the conclusion that it is bad if they are hostile,and worse if they are friendly.Miscellaneous d
rafts of letters and personal records (1356--1368).1356.All the ills that are or ever were, if they could be set to work
 byhim, would not satisfy the desires of his iniquitous soul; and Icould not in any length of time describe his nature t
o you, but Iconclude...1357.I know one who, having promised me much, less than my due, beingdisappointed of his presumpt
uous desires, has tried to deprive me ofall my friends; and as he has found them wise and not pliable to hiswill, he has
 menaced me that, having found means of denouncing me,he would deprive me of my benefactors. Hence I have informed yourL
ordship of this, to the end [that this man who wishes to sow theusual scandals, may find no soil fit for sowing the thou
ghts anddeeds of his evil nature] so that he, trying to make your Lordship,the instrument of his iniquitous and maliceou
s nature may bedisappointed of his desire.1358.[Footnote: Below this text we read gusstino--Giustino and in anotherpassa
ge on the same page Justin is quoted (No. 1210, 1. 48). The twohave however no real connection.]And in this case I know
that I shall make few enemies seeing that noone will believe what I can say of him; for they are but few whomhis vices h
ave disgusted, and he only dislikes those men whosenatures are contrary to those vices. And many hate their fathers,and
break off friendship with those who reprove their vices; and hewill not permit any examples against them, nor any advice
.If you meet with any one who is virtuous do not drive him from you;do him honour, so that he may not have to flee from
you and bereduced to hiding in hermitages, or caves or other solitary placesto escape from your treachery; if there is s
uch an one among you dohim honour, for these are our Saints upon earth; these are they whodeserve statues from us, and i
mages; but remember that their imagesare not to be eaten by you, as is still done in some parts of India[Footnote 15: In
 explanation of this passage I have received thefollowing communication from Dr. G. W. LEITNER of Lahore: "So far asIndi
an customs are known to us, this practice spoken of by Leonardoas 'still existing in some parts of India' is perfectly u
nknown; andit is equally opposed to the spirit of Hinduism, Mohammedanism andSikhism. In central Thibet the ashes of the
 dead, when burnt, aremixed with dough, and small figures--usually of Buddha--are stampedout of them and some are laid i
n the grave while others aredistributed among the relations. The custom spoken of by Leonardomay have prevailed there bu
t I never heard of it." Possibly Leonardorefers here to customs of nations of America.] where, when theimages have accor
ding to them, performed some miracle, the priestscut them in pieces, being of wood, and give them to all the peopleof th
e country, not without payment; and each one grates his portionvery fine, and puts it upon the first food he eats; and t
husbelieves that by faith he has eaten his saint who then preserves himfrom all perils. What do you think here, Man, of
your own species?Are you so wise as you believe yourselves to be? Are these things tobe done by men?1359.As I told you i
n past days, you know that I am without any....Francesco d'Antonio. Bernardo di Maestro Jacopo.1360.Tell me how the thin
gs happened.1361.j lorezo\\\ 2 inbiadali\\\ 3 inferri de\\\ 4in lorezo\\\ 5[innoabuil]\\ 6 in acocatu\\\ 7 per la sella\
\\ 8colte di lor\\\ 9vcavallott\\\ I0el uiagg\\\ IIal\\\ I2a lurez\\\ 13in biada\\\14inferri\\\ 15abuss\\\ 16in viagg\\\
 17alorz\\\ [Footnote: Thisseems to be the beginning of a letter, but only the first words ofthe lines have been preserv
ed, the leaf being torn down the middle.No translation is possible.]1362.And so may it please our great Author that I ma
y demonstrate thenature of man and his customs, in the way I describe his figure.[Footnote: A preparatory note for the p
assage given as No. 798, 11.41--42.]1363.This writing distinctly about the kite seems to be my destiny,because among the
 first recollections of my infancy, it seemed to methat, as I was in my cradle, a kite came to me and opened my mouthwit
h its tail, and struck me several times with its tail inside mylips.[Footnote: This note probably refers to the text No.
 1221.]1364.[When I did well, as a boy you used to put me in prison. Now if I doit being grown up, you will do worse to
me.]1365.Tell me if anything was ever done.1366.Tell me if ever I did a thing which me ....1367.Do not reveal, if libert
y is precious to you; my face is the prisonof love.[Footnote: This note seems to be a quotation.]1368.Maestro Leonardo o
f Florence.[Footnote: So Leonardo writes his name on a sheet with sundry shortnotes, evidently to try a pen. Compare the
 signature with those inNos. 1341, 1348 and 1374 (see also No. 1346, l. 33). The form"Lionardo" does not occur in the au
tographs. The Portrait of theMaster in the Royal Library at Turin, which is reproduced--slightlydiminished--on Pl. I, ha
s in the original two lines of writingunderneath; one in red chalk of two or three words is partlyeffaced: _lionardo it.
.. lm_ (or _lai_?); the second written inpencil is as follows: _fatto da lui stesso assai vecchio_. In bothof these the
writing is very like the Master's, but is certainlyonly an imitation.]Notes bearing Dates (1369--1378).1369.The day of S
anta Maria _della Neve_ [of the Snows] August the 2nd1473. [Footnote: W. An. I. 1368. 1369. This date is on a drawing of
a rocky landscape. See _Chronique des Arts_ 1881 no. 23: _Leonard deVinci a-t-il ete au Righi le 5 aout 1473_? letter by
 H. deGeymuller. The next following date in the MSS. is 1478 (see No.663).1370.On the 2nd of April 1489, book entitled '
Of the human figure'.[Footnote: While the letters in the MS. notes of 1473 and 1478 arevery ornate, this note and the te
xts on anatomy on the same sheet(for instance No. 805) are in the same simple hand as we see on Pl.CXVI and CXIX. No 137
0 is the only dated note of the years between1480 and 1489, and the characters are in all essential pointsidentical with
 those that we see in the latest manuscripts writtenin France (compare the facsimiles on Pl. CXV and p. 254), so that it
is hardly possible to determine exactly the date of a manuscriptfrom the style of the handwriting, if it does not betray
 thepeculiarities of style as displayed in the few notes dated previousto l480.--Compare the facsimile of the manuscript
s 1479 on Pl.LXII,No. 2; No. 664, note, Vol. I p. 346. This shows already a markedsimplicity as compared with the callig
raphy of I478.The text No. 720 belongs to the year 1490; No. 1510 to the year1492; No. 1459, No. 1384 and No. 1460 to th
e year 1493; No. 1463,No. 1517, No. 1024, 1025 and 1461 to the year 1494; Nos. 1523 and1524 to the year 1497.1371.On the
 1st of August 1499, I wrote here of motion and of weight.[Footnote:1371. _Scrissi qui_. Leonardo does not say where; st
ill wemay assume that it was not in Milan. Amoretti writes, _MemorieStoriche_, chap. XIX: _Sembra pertanto che non nel 1
499 ma nel 1500,dopo il ritorno e la prigionia del duca, sia da qui partito Lionardoper andare a Firenze; ed e quindi pr
obabile, che i mesi di governonuovo e incerto abbia passati coll' amico suo Francesco Melzi aVaprio, ove meglio che altr
ove studiar potea la natura, esoprattutta le acque, e l'Adda specialmente, che gia era statol'ogetto delle sue idrostati
che ricerche_. At that time Melzi wasonly six years of age. The next date is 1502; to this year belongNo. 1034, 1040, 10
42, 1048 and 1053. The note No. 1525 belongs tothe year 1503.]1372.On the 9th of July 1504, Wednesday, at seven o'clock,
 died Ser Pieroda Vinci, notary at the Palazzo del Podesta, my father, --at seveno'clock, being eighty years old, leavin
g behind ten sons and twodaughters.[Footnote: This statement of Ser Piero's age contradicts that of the_Riassunto della
portata di Antonio da Vinci_ (Leonardo'sgrandfather), who speaks of Ser Piero as being thirty years old in1457; and that
 of the _Riassunto della portata di Ser Piero eFrancesco_, sons of Antonia da Vinci, where Ser Piero is mentionedas bein
g forty in 1469. These documents were published by G.UZIELLI, _Ricerche intorno a L. da Vinci, Firenze_, 1872, pp. 144an
d 146. Leonardo was, as is well known, a natural son. His mother'La Catarina' was married in 1457 to Acchattabriga di Pi
ero delVaccha da Vinci. She died in 1519. Leonardo never mentions her inthe Manuscripts. In the year of Leonardo's birth
 Ser Piero marriedAlbiera di Giovanni Amadoci, and after her death at the age ofthirty eight he again married, Francesca
, daughter of Ser GiovanniLanfredi, then only fifteen. Their children were Leonardo'shalfbrothers, Antonio (b. 1476), Se
r Giuliano (b. 1479), Lorenzo (b.1484), a girl, Violante (b. 1485), and another boy Domenico (b.1486); Domenico's descen
dants still exist as a family. Ser Pieromarried for the third time Lucrezia di Guglielmo Cortigiani by whomhe had six ch
ildren: Margherita (b. 1491), Benedetto (b. 1492),Pandolfo (b. 1494), Guglielmo (b. 1496), Bartolommeo (b. 1497), andGio
vanni) date of birth unknown). Pierino da Vinci the sculptor(about 1520-1554) was the son of Bartolommeo, the fifth of t
hesechildren. The dates of their deaths are not known, but we may inferfrom the above passage that they were all still l
iving in 1505.]1373.On Wednesday at seven o'clock died Ser Piero da Vinci on the 9th ofJuly 1504.[Footnote: This and the
 previous text it may be remarked are theonly mention made by Leonardo of his father; Nos. 1526, 1527 and No.1463 are of
 the year 1504.]1374.Begun by me, Leonardo da Vinci, on the l2th of July 1505.[Footnote: Thus he writes on the first pag
e of the MS. The title ison the foregoing coversheet as follows: _Libro titolatodisstrafformatione coe_ (cioe) _d'un cor
po nvn_ (in un) _altro sanzadiminuitione e acresscemento di materia._]1375.Begun at Milan on the l2th of September 1508.
[Footnote: No. 1528 and No. 1529 belong to the same year. The textVol. I, No. 4 belongs to the following year 1509 (1508
 old style);so also does No. 1009.-- Nos. 1022, 1057 and 1464 belong to 1511.]1376.On the 9th of January 1513.[Footnote:
 No. 1465 belongs to the same year. No. 1065 has the nextdate 1514.]1377.The Magnifico Giuliano de' Medici left Rome on
the 9th of January1515, just at daybreak, to take a wife in Savoy; and on the same dayfell the death of the king of Fran
ce.[Footnote: Giuliano de Medici, brother to Pope Leo X.; see note toNos. 1351-1353. In February, 1515, he was married t
o Filiberta,daughter of Filippo, Duke of Savoy, and aunt to Francis I, LouisXII's successor on the throne of France. Lou
is XII died on Jan. 1st,and not on Jan. 9th as is here stated.-- This addition is written inpaler ink and evidently at a
 later date.]1378.On the 24th of June, St John's day, 1518 at Amboise, in the palaceof...[Footnote: _Castello del clli_.
 The meaning of this word is obscure;it is perhaps not written at full length.]_XXII.__Miscellaneous Notes.__The inciden
tal memoranda scattered here and there throughout theMSS. can have been for the most part intelligible to the writeronly
; in many cases their meaning and connection are all the moreobscure because we are in ignorance about the persons with
whomLeonardo used to converse nor can we say what part he may haveplayed in the various events of his time. Vasari and o
ther earlybiographers give us a very superficial and far from accurate pictureof Leonardo's private life. Though his own
 memoranda, referring forthe most part to incidents of no permanent interest, do not go fartowards supplying this defici
ency, they are nevertheless of someimportance and interest as helping us to solve the numerousmysteries in which the his
tory of Leonardo's long life remainsinvolved. We may at any rate assume, from Leonardo's havingcommitted to paper notes
on more or less trivial matters on hispupils, on his house-keeping, on various known and unknownpersonages, and a hundre
d other trifies--that at the time they musthave been in some way important to him.__I have endeavoured to make these 'Mi
scellaneous Notes' as completeas possible, for in many cases an incidental memorandum will help toexplain the meaning of
 some other note of a similar kind. The firstportion of these notes (Nos. l379--l457), as well as those referringto his
pupils and to other artists and artificers who lived in hishouse (1458--1468,) are arranged in chronological order. Acon
siderable proportion of these notes belong to the period between1490 and 1500, when Leonardo was living at Milan under t
he patronageof Lodovico il Moro, a time concerning which we have otherwise onlyvery scanty information. If Leonardo did
really--as has always beensupposed,--spend also the greater part of the preceding decade inMilan, it seems hardly likely
 that we should not find a single noteindicative of the fact, or referring to any event of that period, onthe numerous l
oose leaves in his writing that exist. Leonardo's lifein Milan between 1489 and 1500 must have been comparativelyunevent
ful. The MSS. and memoranda of those years seem to prove thatit was a tranquil period of intellectual and artistic labou
r ratherthan of bustling court life. Whatever may have been the fate of theMSS. and note books of the foregoing years--w
hether they weredestroyed by Leonardo himself or have been lost--it is certainlystrange that nothing whatever exists to
inform us as to his life anddoings in Milan earlier than the consecutive series of manuscriptswhich begin in the year 14
89.__There is nothing surprising in the fact that the notes regardinghis pupils are few and meagre. Excepting for the re
cord of moneytransactions only very exceptional circumstances would have promptedhim to make any written observations on
 the persons with whom he wasin daily intercourse, among whom, of course, were his pupils. Ofthem all none is so frequen
tly mentioned as Salai, but the characterof the notes does not--as it seems to me--justify us in supposingthat he was an
y thing more than a sort of factotum of Leonardo's(see 1519, note).__Leonardo's quotations from books and his lists of t
itles supplynothing more than a hint as to his occasional literary studies orrecreations. It was evidently no part of hi
s ambition to be deeplyread (see Nrs. 10, 11, 1159) and he more than once expressly states(in various passages which wil
l be found in the foregoing sections)that he did not recognise the authority of the Ancients, onscientific questions, wh
ich in his day was held paramount.Archimedes is the sole exception, and Leonardo frankly owns hisadmiration for the illu
strious Greek to whose genius his own was somuch akin (see No. 1476). All his notes on various authors,excepting those w
hich have already been inserted in the previoussection, have been arranged alphabetically for the sake ofconvenience (14
69--1508).__The passages next in order contain accounts and inventoriesprincipally of household property. The publicatio
n of these--oftenvery trivial entries--is only justifiable as proving that thewealth, the splendid mode of life and lavi
sh expenditure which havebeen attributed to Leonardo are altogether mythical; unless we putforward the very improbable h
ypothesis that these notes as to moneyin hand, outlay and receipts, refer throughout to an exceptionalstate of his affai
rs, viz. when he was short of money.__The memoranda collected at the end (No. 1505--1565) are, in theoriginal, in the us
ual writing, from left to right. Besides, thestyle of the handwriting is at variance with what we should expectit to be,
 if really Leonardo himself had written these notes. Mostof them are to be found in juxtaposition with undoubtedly authe
nticwriting of his. But this may be easily explained, if we take intoaccount the fact, that Leonardo frequently wrote on
 loose sheets. Hemay therefore have occasionally used paper on which others had madeshort memoranda, for the most part a
s it would seem, for his use. Atthe end of all I have given Leonardo's will from the copy of itpreserved in the Melzi Li
brary. It has already been printed byAmoretti and by Uzielli. It is not known what has become of theoriginal document._M
emoranda before 1500 (1379-l413).1379.Find Longhi and tell him that you wait for him at Rome and will gowith him to Napl
es; make you pay the donation [Footnote 2: _Libro diVitolone_ see No. 1506 note.] and take the book by Vitolone, and the
measurements of the public buildings. [3] Have two covered boxesmade to be carried on mules, but bed-covers will be best
; this makesthree, of which you will leave one at Vinci. [4] Obtainthe.............. from Giovanni Lombardo the linen dr
aper of Verona.Buy handkerchiefs and towels,.... and shoes, 4 pairs of hose, ajerkin of... and skins, to make new ones;
the lake of Alessandro.[Footnote: 7 and fol. It would seem from the text that Leonardointended to have instructions in p
ainting on paper. It is hardlynecessary to point out that the Art of illuminating was quiteseparate from that of paintin
g.]Sell what you cannot take with you. Get from Jean de Paris themethod of painting in tempera and the way of making whi
te [Footnote:The mysterious looking words, quite distinctly written, in line 1:_ingol, amor a, ilopan a_ and on line 2:
_enoiganod al_ areobviously in cipher and the solution is a simple one; by readingthem backwards we find for _ingol_: lo
gni-probably _longi_,evidently the name of a person; for _amor a_: _a Roma_, for _ilopana_: _a Napoli_. Leonardo has don
e the same in two passages treatingon some secrets of his art Nos. 641 and 729, the only other placesin which we find th
is cipher employed; we may therefore concludethat it was for the sake of secrecy that he used it.There can be no doubt,
from the tenor of this passage, that Leonardoprojected a secret excursion to Naples. Nothing has hitherto beenknown of t
his journey, but the significance of the passage will beeasily understood by a reference to the following notes, from wh
ichwe may infer that Leonardo really had at the time plans fortravelling further than Naples. From lines 3, 4 and 7 it i
s evidentthat he purposed, after selling every thing that was not easilyportable, to leave a chest in the care of his re
lations at Vinci.His luggage was to be packed into two trunks especially adapted fortransport by mules. The exact meanin
g of many sentences in thefollowing notes must necessarily remain obscure. These brief remarkson small and irrelevant af
fairs and so forth are however of nohistorical value. The notes referring to the preparations for hisjourney are more in
telligible.]salt, and how to make tinted paper; sheets of paper folded up; andhis box of colours; learn to work flesh co
lours in tempera, learn todissolve gum lac, linseed ... white, of the garlic of Piacenza; take'de Ponderibus'; take the
works of Leonardo of Cremona. Remove thesmall furnace ... seed of lilies and of... Sell the boards of thesupport. Make h
im who stole it, give you the ... learn levelling andhow much soil a man can dig out in a day.1380.This was done by Leon
e in the piazza of the castle with a chain andan arrow. [Footnote: This note must have been made in Milan; as weknow fro
m the date of the MS.]1381.NAMES OF ENGINEERS.Callias of Rhodes, Epimachus the Athenian, Diogenes, a philosopher,of Rhod
es, Calcedonius of Thrace, Febar of Tyre, Callimachus thearchitect, a master of fires. [Footnote: Callias, Architect ofA
radus, mentioned by Vitruvius (X, 16, 5).--Epimachus, of Athens,invented a battering-enginee for Demetrius Poliorketes (
Vitruvius X,16, 4).--Callimachus, the inventor of the Corinthian capital (Vitr.IV, I, 9), and of the method of boring ma
rble (Paus. I, 26, 7), wasalso famous for his casts in bronze (Plin. XXXIV, 8, 19). Heinvented a lamp for the temple of
Athene Polias, on the Acropolis ofAthens (Paus. I, 26, 7)--The other names, here mentioned, cannot beidentified.]1382.As
k maestro Lodovico for 'the conduits of water'. [Footnote:Condotti d'acqua. Possibly a book, a MS. or a map.]1383.... at
 Pistoja, Fioravante di Domenico at Florence is my mostbeloved friend, as though he were my [brother]. [Footnote: On the
same sheet is the text No. 663.]1384.On the 16th day of July.Caterina came on 16th day of July, 1493.Messer Mariolo's Mo
rel the Florentin, has a big horse with a fineneck and a beautiful head.The white stallion belonging to the falconer has
 fine hind quarters;it is behind the Comasina Gate.The big horse of Cermonino, of Signor Giulio. [Footnote: CompareNos.
1522 and 1517. Caterina seems to have been his housekeeper.]1385.OF THE INSTRUMENT.Any one who spends one ducat may take
 the instrument; and he willnot pay more than half a ducat as a premium to the inventor of theinstrument and one grosso
to the workman every year. I do not wantsub-officials. [Footnote: Refers perhaps to the regulation of thewater in the ca
nals.]1386.Maestro Giuliano da Marliano has a fine herbal. He lives opposite toStrami the Carpenters. [Footnote: Compare
 No. 616, note. 4.legnamiere (milanese dialect) = legnajuolo.]1387.Christofano da Castiglione who lives at the Pieta has
 a fine head.1388.Work of ... of the stable of Galeazzo; by the road of Brera[Footnote 4: Brera, see No. 1448, II, 13];
benefice of Stanghe[Footnote 5:Stanghe, see No. 1509.]; benefice of Porta Nuova;benefice of Monza; Indaco's mistake; giv
e first the benefices; thenthe works; then ingratitude, indignity and lamentations.1389.Chiliarch--captain of 1000.Prefe
cts--captains.A legion, six thousand and                             sixty three men.1390.A nun lives at La Colomba at C
remona; she works good straw plait,and a friar of Saint Francis. [Footnote: _La Colomba_ is to this daythe name of a sma
ll house at Cremona, decorated with frescoes.]1391.Needle,--Niccolao,--thread,--Ferrando, -lacopoAndrea,--canvas,--stone
,--colours, --brushes,--pallet,--sponge,--thepanel of the Duke.1392.Messer Gian Domenico Mezzabarba and Messer Giovanni
FrancesoMezzabarba. By the side of Messer Piero d'Anghiera.1393.Conte Francesco Torello.1394.Giuliano Trombetta,--Antoni
o di Ferrara, --Oil of .... [Footnote:Near this text is the sketch of a head drawn in red chalk.]1395.Paul was snatched
up to heaven. [Footnote: See the facsimile of thisnote on Pl. XXIII No. 2.]1396.Giuliano da Maria, physician, has a stew
ard without hands.1397.Have some ears of corn of large size sent from Florence.1398.See the bedstead at Santa Maria. Sec
ret.1399.Arrigo is to have 11 gold Ducats. Arrigo is to have 4 gold ducats inthe middle of August.1400.Give your master
the instance of a captain who does not himself winthe victory, but the soldiers do by his counsels; and so he stilldeser
ves the reward.1401.Messer Pier Antonio.1402.Oil,--yellow,--Ambrosio,--the mouth, --the farmhouse.1403.My dear Alessandr
o from Parma, by the hand of ...1404.Giovannina, has a fantastic face,--is at Santa Caterina, at theHospital. [Footnote:
 Compare the text on the same page: No. 667.]1405.24 tavole make 1 perch. 4 trabochi make 1 tavola. 4 braccia and ahalf
make a trabocco. A perch contains 1936 square braccia, or 1944.1406.The road of Messer Mariolo is 13 1/4 braccia wide; t
he House ofEvangelista is 75.It enters 7 1/2 braccia in the house of Mariolo. [Footnote: On thispage and that which face
s it, MS.I2 7la, are two diagrams withnumerous reference numbers, evidently relating to the measurementsof a street.]140
7.I ask at what part of its curved motion the moving cause will leavethe thing moved and moveable.Speak to Pietro Monti
of these methods of throwing spears.1408.Antonio de' Risi is at the council of Justice.1409.Paolo said that no machine t
hat moves another .... [Footnote: Thepassage, of which the beginning is here given, deals with questionsin mechanics. Th
e instances in which Leonardo quotes the opinions ofhis contemporaries on scientific matters are so rare as to be worthn
oticing. Compare No. 901. ]1410.Caravaggio. [Footnote: _Caravaggio_, a village not far from the Addabetween Milan and Br
escia, where Polidoro and Michelangelo daCaravaggio were born. This note is given in facsimile on Pl. XIII,No. I (above,
 to the left). On Pl. XIII, No. 2 above to the right weread _cerovazo_.]1411.Pulleys,--nails,--rope,--mercury,--cloth, M
onday.1412.MEMORANDUM.Maghino, Speculus of Master Giovanni the Frenchman; Galenus onutility.1413.Near to Cordusio is Pie
r Antonio da Tossano and his brotherSerafino. [Footnote: This note is written between lines 23 and 24 ofthe text No. 710
. Corduso, Cordusio (_curia ducis_) = Cordus in theMilanese dialect, is the name of a Piazza between the Via delBroletto
 and the Piazza de' Mercanti at Milan.. In the time of ilMoro it was the centre of the town. The persons here named were
members of the noble Milanese family de'Fossani; Ambrogio daPossano, the contemporary painter, had no connection with th
em.]1414.Memoranda after 1500 (1414--1434)1414.Paul of Vannochio at Siena ... The upper chamber for the apostles.[4] Bui
ldings by Bramante.The governor of the castle made a prisoner.[6] Visconti carried away and his son killed. [Footnote 6:
 Visconti._Chi fosse quel Visconte non sapremmo indovinare fra tanti di questonome. Arluno narra che allora atterrate fu
rono le case de' Viconti,de' Castiglioni, de' Sanseverini, e de' Botta e non ├ρ improbabileche ne fossero insultati e mo
rti i padroni. Molti Visconti annoveralo stesso Cronista che per essersi rallegrati del ritorno del ducain Milano furono
 da' Francesi arrestati, e strascinati in Franciacome prigionieri di stato; e fra questi Messer Francesco Visconti, esuo
 figliuolo Battista_. (AMORETTI, Mem. Stor. XIX.).]Giovanni della Rosa deprived of his money.Borgonzio began ....; and m
oreover his fortunes fled. [Footnote 8:Borgonzio o Brugonzio Botta fu regolatore delle ducali entrate sottoil Moro, alla
 cui fuga la casa sua fu pur messa a sacco da'partitanti francesi. (AMORETTI, l. c.)]The Duke has lost the state, proper
ty and liberty and none of hisentreprises was carried out by him.[Footnote: l. 4--10 This passage evidently refers to ev
ents in Milanat the time of the overthrow of Ludovico il Moro. Amoretti publishedit in the '_Memorie Storiche_' and adde
d copious notes.]1415.Ambrosio Petri, St. Mark, 4 boards for the window, 2 ..., 3 thesaints of chapels, 5 the Genoese at
 home.1416.Piece of tapestry,--pair of compasses,-- Tommaso's book,--the bookof Giovanni Benci,--the box in the custom-h
ouse,--to cut thecloth,--the sword-belt,--to sole the boots, --a light hat,--the canefrom the ruined houses,--the debt f
or the table linen,--swimming-belt,--a book of white paper for drawing,--charcoal.--Howmuch is a florin ...., a leather
bodice.1417.Borges shall get for you the Archimedes from the bishop of Padua,and Vitellozzo the one from Borgo a San Sep
olcro [Footnote 3: Borgoa San Sepolcro, where Luca Paciolo, Leonardo's friend, was born.][Footnote: Borges. A Spanish na
me.]1418.Marzocco's tablet.1419.Marcello lives in the house of Giacomo da Mengardino.1420.Where is Valentino?--boots,--b
oxes in thecustom-house,...,--[Footnote 5: Carmine. A church and monastery atFlorence.] the monk at the Carmine,--square
s,--[Footnotes 7 and 8:Martelli, Borgherini; names of Florentine families. See No. 4.]Piero Martelli,--[8] Salvi Borgher
ini,--send back the bags,--asupport for the spectacles,--[Footnote 11: San Gallo; possiblyGiuliano da San Gallo, the Flo
rentine architect.] the nude study ofSan Gallo,--the cloak. Porphyry,--groups,--square,--[Footnote 16:Pandolfini, see No
. 1544 note.] Pandolfino. [Footnote: Valentino.Cesare Borgia is probably meant. After being made Archbishop ofValence by
 Alexander VI he was commonly called Valentinus orValentino. With reference to Leonardo's engagements by him see pp.224
and 243, note.]1421.Concave mirrors; philosophy of Aristotle;[Footnote 2: _Avicenna_(Leonardo here writes it Avinega) th
e Arab philosopher, 980-1037,for centuries the unimpeachable authority on all medical questions.Leonardo possibly points
 here to a printed edition: _Avicennaecanonum libri V, latine_ 1476 _Patavis._ Other editions are, Padua1479, and Venice
 1490.] the books of Avicenna Italian and Latinvocabulary; Messer Ottaviano Palavicino or his Vitruvius [Footnote3: _Vit
ruvius._ See Vol. I, No. 343 note.]. bohemian knives;Vitruvius[Footnote 6: _Vitruvius._ See Vol. I, No. 343 note.]; goev
ery Saturday to the hot bath where you will see naked men;'Meteora' [Footnote 7: _Meteora._ See No. 1448, 25.],Archimede
s, on the centre of gravity; [Footnote 9: The works ofArchimedes were not printed during Leonardo's life-time.] anatomy[
Footnote 10: Compare No. 1494.] Alessandro Benedetto; The Dante ofNiccolo della Croce; Inflate the lungs of a pig and ob
serve whetherthey increase in width and in length, or in width diminishing inlength.[Footnote 14: _Johannes Marliani sua
 etate philosophorum etmedicorum principis et ducalis phisic. primi de proportione motuumvelocitate questio subtilissima
 incipit ex ejusdem Marlianioriginali feliciter extracta, M(ilano)_ 1482.Another work by him has the title: _Marlianus m
ediolanensis. Questiode caliditate corporum humanorum tempore hiemis ed estatis et deantiparistasi ad celebrem philosoph
orum et medicorum universitatemticinensem._ 1474.] Marliano, on Calculation, to Bertuccio.Albertus, on heaven and earth
[Footnote 15: See No. 1469, 1. 7.],[from the monk Bernardino]. Horace has written on the movements ofthe heavens.[Footno
te: _Filosofia d'Aristotele_ see No. 1481 note.]1422.Of the three regular bodies as opposed to some commentators whodisp
arage the Ancients, who were the originators of grammar and thesciences and ...1423.The room in the tower of Vaneri.[Foo
tnote: This note is written inside the sketch of a plan of ahouse. On the same page is the date 1513 (see No. 1376).]142
4.The figures you will have to reserve for the last book on shadowsthat they may appear in the study of Gerardo the illu
minator at SanMarco at Florence.[Go to see Melzo, and the Ambassador, and Maestro Bernardo].[Footnote: L. 1-3 are in the
 original written between lines 3 and 4of No. 292. But the sense is not clear in this connection. It isscarcely possible
 to devine the meaning of the following sentence.2. 3. _Gherardo_ Miniatore, a famous illuminator, 1445-1497, to whomVas
ari dedicated a section of his Lives (Vol. II pp. 237-243, ed.Sansoni 1879).5. _Bernardo_, possibly the painter Bernardo
 Zenale.]1425.Hermes the philosopher.1426.Suisset, viz. calculator,--Tisber, --Angelo Fossobron,--Alberto.1427.The struc
ture of the drawbridge shown me by Donnino, and why _c_ and_d_ thrust downwards.[Footnote: The sketch on the same page a
s this text represents twopoles one across the other. At the ends of the longest are theletter _c_ and _d_. The sense of
 the passage is not rendered anyclearer.]1428.The great bird will take its first flight;-- on the back of hisgreat swan,
--filling the universe with wonders; filling all writingswith his fame and bringing eternal glory to his birthplace.[Foo
tnote: This seems to be a speculation about the flying machine(compare p. 271).]1429.This stratagem was used by the Gaul
s against the Romans, and sogreat a mortality ensued that all Rome was dressed in mourning.[Footnote: Leonardo perhaps a
lludes to the Gauls under Brennus, wholaid his sword in the scale when the tribute was weighed.]1430.Alberto da Imola;--
Algebra, that is, the demonstration of theequality of one thing to another.1431.Johannes Rubicissa e Robbia.1432.Ask the
 wife of Biagio Crivelli how the capon nurtures and hatchesthe eggs of the hen,--he being drunk.1433.The book on Water t
o Messer Marco Antonio.[Footnote: Possibly Marc-Antonio della Torre, see p. 97.]1434.Have Avicenna's work on useful inve
ntions translated; spectacleswith the case, steel and fork and...., charcoal, boards, and paper,and chalk and white, and
 wax;.... .... for glass, a saw for boneswith fine teeth, a chisel, inkstand ........ three herbs, and AgnoloBenedetto.
Get a skull, nut,--mustard.Boots,--gloves, socks, combs, papers, towels, shirts,....shoe-tapes,--..... shoes, penknife,
pens. A skin for the chest.[Footnote: 4. Lapis. Compare Condivi, _Vita di MichelagnoloBuonarotti_, Chap. XVIII.: _Ma egl
i_ (Michelangelo) _non avendo chemostrare, prese una penna (percioche in quel tempo il lapis non erain uso) e con tal le
ggiadria gli dipinse una mano ecc._ The incidentis of the year l496.--Lapis means pencil, and chalk (_matita_).Between l
ines 7 and 8 are the texts given as Nos. 819 and No. 7.]Undated memoranda (1435-1457).1435.The book of Piero Crescenze,-
-studies from the nude by GiovanniAmbrosio,--compasses, --the book of Giovanni Giacomo.1436.MEMORARDUM.To make some prov
isions for my garden, --Giordano, _DePonderibus_[Footnote 3: _Giordano_. Jordanus Nemorarius, amathematician of the begi
nning of the XIIIth century. No particularsof his life are known. The title of his principal work is:_Arithmetica decem
libris demonstrata_, first published at Paris1496. In 1523 appeared at Nuremberg: _Liber Jordani Nemorarii deponderibus,
 propositiones XIII et earundem demonstrationes,multarumque rerum rationes sane pulcherrimas complectens, nunc inlucem e
ditus._],--the peacemaker, the flow and ebb of the sea,--havetwo baggage trunks made, look to Beltraffio's [Footnote 6:_
Beltraffio_, see No. 465, note 2.There are sketches by the side of lines 8 and 10.] lathe and havetaken the stone,--out
leave the books belonging to Messer Andrea theGerman,-- make scales of a long reed and weigh the substance whenhot and a
gain when cold. The mirror of Master Luigi; _A b_ the flowand ebb of the water is shown at the mill of Vaprio,--a cap.14
37.Giovanni Fabre,--Lazaro del Volpe,-- the common,--Ser Piero.[Footnote: These names are inserted on a plan of plots of
 landadjoining the Arno.]1438.[Lactantius], [the book of Benozzo], groups,--to bind the book,--alantern,--Ser Pecantino,
--Pandolfino.--[Rosso]--a square, --smallknives,--carriages,--curry combs-- cup.1439.Quadrant of Carlo Marmocchi,--Messe
r Francesco Araldo,--SerBenedetto d'Accie perello,--Benedetto on arithmetic,--Maestro Paulo,physician,--Domenico di Mich
elino,-- ...... of the Alberti,--MesserGiovanni Argimboldi.1440.Colours, formula,--Archimedes,--Marcantonio.Tinned iron,
--pierced iron.1441.See the shop that was formerly Bartolommeo's, the stationer.[Footnote: 6. _Marc Antonio_, see No. 14
33.]1442.The first book is by Michele di Francesco Nabini; it treats onscience.1443.Messer Francesco, physician of Lucca
, with the Cardinal Farnese.[Footnote: _Alessandro Farnese_, afterwards Pope Paul III wascreated in 1493 Cardinal di San
 Cosimo e San Damiano, by AlexanderVI.]1444.Pandolfino's book [Footnote 1: _Pandolfino, Agnolo_, of Florence. Itis to th
is day doubtful whether he or L. B. Alberti was the authorof the famous work '_Del Governo della Famiglia_'. It is the m
oreprobable that Leonardo should have meant this work by the words _illibro_, because no other book is known to have bee
n written byPandolfino. This being the case this allusion of Leonardo's is animportant evidence in favour of Pandolfino'
s authorship (compare No.1454, line 3).],--knives,--a pen for ruling,--to have the vestdyed,--The library at St.-Mark's,
--The library at SantoSpirito,--Lactantius of the Daldi [Footnote 7: The works ofLactantius were published very often in
 Italy during Leonardo'slifetime. The first edition published in 1465 "_in monasterosublacensi_" was also the first book
 printed in Italy.],--AntonioCovoni,--A book by Maestro Paolo Infermieri, --Boots, shoes andhose,--(Shell)lac, --An appr
entice to do the models for me. Grammar,by Lorenzo de Medici,--Giovanni del Sodo,--Sansovino, [Footnote 15:_Sansovino_,
Andrea--the _sculptor_; 1460-1529.]--a ruler,--a verysharp knife,--Spectacles,--fractions....,--repair.........,--Tomaso
's book,-- Michelagnolo's little chain;Learn the multiplication of roots from Maestro Luca;--my map of theworld which Gi
ovanni Benci has [Footnote 25: Leonardo here probablyalludes to the map, not executed by him (See p. 224), which is with
the collection of his MSS. at Windsor, and was published in the_Archaeologia_ Vol. XI (see p. 224).];-Socks,--clothes fr
om thecustomhouse-officier,--Red Cordova leather,--The map of the world,of Giovanni Benci,--a print, the districts about
 Milan--Market book.Get the Friar di Brera to show you [the book] '_de Ponderibus_'[Footnote 11: _Brera_, now _Palazzo d
elle Scienze ed Arti. Until1571 it was the monastery of the order of the Umiliati andafterwards of the Jesuits._De ponde
ribus_, compare No. 1436, 3.],--Of the measurement of San Lorenzo,--I lent certain groups to Fra Filippo de Brera, [Foot
note 13:_Brera_, now _Palazzo delle Scienze ed Arti. Until 1571 it was themonastery of the order of the Umiliati and aft
erwards of theJesuits._De ponderibus_, compare No. 1436, 3.]--Memorandum: to ask Maestro Giovannino as to the mode in wh
ich thetower of Ferrara is walled without loopholes,--Ask Maestro Antonio how mortars are placed on bastions by day or b
ynight,--Ask Benedetto Portinari how the people go on the ice in Flanders,--On proportions by Alchino, with notes by Mar
liano, from MesserFazio,--The measurement of the sun, promised me by Maestro Giovanni, theFrenchman,--The cross bow of M
aestro Gianetto,--The book by Giovanni Taverna that Messer Fazio,--You will draw Milan [21],--The measurement of the can
al, locks and supports, and large boats;and the expense,--Plan of Milan [Footnote 23: _Fondamento_ is commonly used byLe
onardo to mean ground-plan. See for instance p. 53.],--Groups by Bramante [Footnote 24: _Gruppi_. See Vol. I p. 355, No.
600, note 9.],--The book on celestial phenomena by Aristoteles, in Italian [Footnote25: _Meteora_. By this Leonardo mean
s no doubt the four books. Hemust refer here to a MS. translation, as no Italian translation isknown to have been publis
hed (see No. 1477 note).],--Try to get Vitolone, which is in the library at Pavia [Footnote 26:_Vitolone_ see No. 1506,
note._Libreria di Pavia_. One of the most famous of Italian libraries.After the victory of Novara in April 1500, Louis X
II had it conveyedto France, '_come trofeo di vittoria_'!] and which treats ofMathematics,--He had a master [learned] in
 waterworks and get him toexplain the repairs and the costs, and a lock and a canal and a millin the Lombard fashion.A g
randson of Gian Angelo's, the painter has a book on water whichwas his fathers.Paolino Scarpellino, called Assiolo has g
reat knowledge of waterworks.[Footnote 12: _Sco Lorenzo_. A church at Milan, see pp. 39, 40 and50.][Footnote 13. 24: _Gr
uppi_. See Vol. I p. 355, No. 600, note 9.][Footnote 16: The _Portinari_ were one of the great merchant-families of Flor
ence.]1449.Francesco d'Antonio at Florence.1450.Giuliano Condi[1],--Tomaso Ridolfi,-- Tomaso Paganelli,--Nicolo delNero,
--Simone Zasti,--Nasi,--the heir of Lionardo Manelli,--Guglielmo di Ser Martino,--Bartolomeo del Tovaglia,--AndreaArrigu
cci,-- Nicolo Capponi,--Giovanni Portinari.[Footnote: I. _Guiliano Gondi_. Ser Piero da Vinci, Leonardo'sfather, lived t
ill 1480, in a house belonging to Giuliano Gondi. In1498 this was pulled down to make room for the fine Palazzo built on
the Piazza San Firenze by Giuliano di San Gallo, which still exists.In the _Riassunto del Catasto di Ser Piero da Vinci_
, 1480, Leonardois not mentioned; it is evident therefore that he was livingelsewhere. It may be noticed incidentally th
at in the _Catasto diGiuliano Gondi_ of the same year the following mention is made ofhis four eldest sons:_Lionardo mio
 figliuolo d'eta d'anni 29, non fa nulla, Giovambatistad'eta d'anni 28 in Ghostantinopoli, Billichozo d'eta d'anni 24 aN
apoli, Simone d'eta d'anni 23 in Ungheria._He himself was a merchant of gold filigree (_facciamo lavorare unabottegha d'
arte di seta ... facciamo un pocho di trafico a Napoli_}.As he was 59 years old in 1480, he certainly would not have bee
nalive at the time of Leonardo's death. But Leonardo must have beenon intimate terms with the family till the end of his
 life, for in aletter dated June 1. 1519, in which Fr. Melzi, writing from Amboise,announces Leonardo's death to Giulian
o da Vinci at Florence (see p.284), he says at the end "_Datemene risposta per i Gondi_" (seeUZIELLI, _Ricerche_, passim
).Most of the other names on the list are those of well-knownFlorentine families.]1451.Pandolfino.1452.Vespuccio will gi
ve me a book of Geometry.[Footnote: See No. 844, note, p. 130.]1453.Marcantonio Colonna at Santi Apostoli.[Footnote: In
July 1506 Pope Julius II gave Donna Lucrezia dellaRovere, the daughter of his sister Lucchina, in marriage to theyouthfu
l Marcantonio Colonna, who, like his brothers Prospero andFabrizio, became one of the most famous Captains of his family
. Hegave to him Frascati and made him a present of the palazzo he hadbuilt, when Cardinal, near the church of Santi Apos
toli which is nowknown as the Palazzo Colonna (see GREGOROVIUS, _Gesch. der StadtRom._ Vol. VIII, book XIV I, 3. And COP
PI, _Mem. Colonnesi_ p.251).]1454.A box, a cage,-- A square, to make the bird [Footnote 2: Vasaristates that Leonardo in
vented mechanical birds which moved throughthe air. Compare No. 703.],-- Pandolfino's book, mortar [?],-- Smallknives, V
enieri for the[Footnote: Much of No. 1444 is repeated in this memorandum.]Pen for ruling,        stone,--star,--To have
the vest dyed, Alfieri's tazza,--The Libraries,         the book on celestial                       phenomena,--Lactanti
us of the      go to the house ofDaldi,--               the Pazzi,Book from Maestro      small box,--Paolo Infermieri,--
Boots, shoes and       small gimlet,--hose,Lac,                   .......,--An apprentice for      .....,--models,Gramma
r of Lo-         the amount of therenzo de' Medici,      ...Giovanni del Sodo      .....for...,--the brokenSansovino,
          the....Piero di Cosino        the wings,--[Footnote 16: _Pier di Cosimo_ the well known Florentine painter1462
-1521. See VASARI, _Vite_ (Vol. IV, p. 134 ed. Sansoni 1880)about Leonardo's influence on Piero di Cosimo's style of pai
nting.]Filippo and Lorenzo [Footnote 17: _Filippo e Lorenzo_; probably thepainters Filippino Lippi and Lorenzo di Credi.
 L. di Credi'spictures and Vasari's history of that painter bear ample evidence tohis intimate relations with Leonardo.]
,--A ruler-,-- Spectacles,--todo the..... again,--Tomaso's book,--Michelagnolo's chain,--Themultiplication of roots,--Of
 the bow and strinch,--The map of theworld from Benci,-- Socks,--The clothes from the custom-houseofficier,--Cordova lea
ther,--Market books, --waters ofCronaca,--waters of Tanaglino..., --the caps,--Rosso's mirror; tosee him make it,--1/3 o
f which I have 5/6,--on the celestialphenomena, by Aristotle [Footnote 36: _Meteora_. See No. 1448,25.],--boxes of Loren
zo di Pier Francesco [Footnote 37: _Lorenzo diPier Francesco_ and his brother _Giovanni_ were a lateral branch ofthe _Me
dici_ family and changed their name for that ofPopolani.],--Maestro Piero of the Borgo,--To have my bookbound,--Show the
 book to Serigatto,-- and get the rule of the clock[Footnote 41: Possibly this refers to the clock on the tower of thePa
lazzo Vecchio at Florence. In February 1512 it had been repaired,and so arranged as to indicate the hours after the Fren
ch manner(twelve hours a. m. and as many p. m.).],--ring,--nutmeg,--gum,--the square,--Giovan' Batista at the piazza,de'
 Mozzi,--Giovanni Benci has my book and jaspers,--brass for thespectacles.1455.Search in Florence for......1456.Bernardo
 da Ponte ... Val di Lugano ... many veins for anatomicaldemonstration.[Footnote: This fragmentary note is written on th
e margin of adrawing of two legs.]1457.Paolo of Tavechia, to see the marks in the German stones.[Footnote: This note occ
urs on a pen and ink drawing made byLeonardo as a sketch for the celebrated large cartoon in thepossession of the Royal
Academy of Arts, in London. This cartoon iscommonly supposed to be identical with that described and lauded byVasari, wh
ich was exhibited in Florence at the time and which nowseems to be lost. Mr. Alfred Marks, of Long Ditton, in his valuab
lepaper (read before the Royal Soc. of Literature, June 28, 1882) "Onthe St. Anne of Leonardo da Vinci", has adduced pro
of that thecartoon now in the Royal Academy was executed earlier at Milan. Thenote here given, which is written on the s
heet containing the studyfor the said cartoon, has evidently no reference to the drawing onwhich it is written but is ob
viously of the same date. Though I havenot any opening here for discussing this question of the cartoon, itseemed to me
important to point out that the character of thewriting in this note does not confirm the opinion hitherto held thatthe
Royal Academy cartoon was the one described by Vasari, but, onthe contrary, supports the hypothesis put forward by Mr. M
arks.]Notes on pupils (1458-1468.)1458.Giacomo came to live with me on St.-Mary Magdalen's[Footnote: _Il didella Maddale
na._ July 22.] day, 1490, aged 10 years. The second dayI had two shirts cut out for him, a pair of hose, and a jerkin, a
ndwhen I put aside some money to pay for these things he stole 4_lire_ the money out of the purse; and I could never mak
e himconfess, though I was quite certain of the fact.--Thief, liar,obstinate, glutton.The day after, I went to sup with
Giacomo Andrea, and the saidGiacomo supped for two and did mischief for four; for he brake 3cruets, spilled the wine, an
d after this came to sup where I ....Item: on the 7th day of September he stole a silver point of thevalue of 22 soldi f
rom Marco[Footnote 6: _Marco_, probablyLeonardo's pupil Marco d'Oggionno; 1470 is supposed to be the dateof his birth an
d 1540 of his death._Che stava con meco._ We may infer from this that he left the mastershortly after this, his term of
study having perhaps expired.] whowas living with me, 4 _lire_ this being of silver; and he took itfrom his studio, and
when the said Marco had searched for it a longwhile he found it hidden in the said Giacomo's box 4 _lire_.Item: on the 2
6th January following, I, being in the house of MesserGaleazzo da San Severino [Footnote 9: Galeazzo. See No. 718 note.]
,was arranging the festival for his jousting, and certain footmenhaving undressed to try on some costumes of wild men fo
r the saidfestival, Giacomo went to the purse of one of them which lay on thebed with other clothes, 2 lire 4 S, and too
k out such money as wasin it.Item: when I was in the same house, Maestro Agostino da Pavia gaveto me a Turkish hide to h
ave (2 lire.) a pair of short boots made ofit; this Giacomo stole it of me within a month and sold it to acobbler for 20
 soldi, with which money, by his own confession, hebought anise comfits.Item: again, on the 2nd April, Giovan Antonio [F
ootnote 16: GiovanAntonio, probably Beltraffio, 1467 to 1516.] having left a silverpoint on a drawing of his, Giacomo st
ole it, and this was of thevalue of 24 soldi (1 lira 4 S.)The first year-A cloak, 2 lire,6 shirts, 4 lire,3 jerkins, 6 l
ire,4 pairs of hose, 7 lire 8 soldi,1 lined doublet, 5 lire,24 pairs of shoes, 6 lire 5 soldi,A cap, 1 lira,laces, 1 lir
a.[Footnote: Leonardo here gives a detailed account not only of theloss he and others incurred through Giacomo but of th
e wild tricksof the youth, and we may therefore assume that the note was not mademerely as a record for his own use, but
 as a report to be forwardedto the lad's father or other responsible guardian.]1459.On the last day but one of September
;Thursday the 27th day of September Maestro Tommaso came back andworked for himself until the last day but one of Februa
ry. On the18th day of March, 1493, Giulio, a German, came to live withme,--Lucia, Piero, Leonardo.On the 6th day of Octo
ber.1460.1493. On the 1st day of November we settled accounts. Giulio had topay 4 months; and Maestro Tommaso 9 months;
Maestro Tommasoafterwards made 6 candlesticks, 10 days' work; Giulio somefire-tongs 15 days work. Then he worked for him
self till the 27thMay, and worked for me at a lever till the 18th July; then forhimself till the 7th of August, and for
one day, on the fifteenth,for a lady. Then again for me at 2 locks until the 20th of August.1461.On the 23rd day of Augu
st, 12 lire from Pulisona. On the 14th ofMarch 1494, Galeazzo came to live with me, agreeing to pay 5 lire amonth for hi
s cost paying on the l4th day of each month.His father gave me 2 Rhenish florins.On the l4th of July, I had from Galeazz
o 2 Rhenish florins.1462.On the 15th day of September Giulio began the lock of my studio1494.1463.Saturday morning the 3
rd of August 1504 Jacopo the German came tolive with me in the house, and agreed with me that I should chargehim a carli
no a day.1464.1511. On the 26th of September Antonio broke his leg; he must rest40 days.[Footnote: This note refers poss
ibly to Beltraffio.]1465.I left Milan for Rome on the 24th day of September, 1513, withGiovanni [Footnote 2: _Giovan;_ i
t is not likely that Leonardoshould have called Giovan' Antonio Beltraffio at one time Giovanni,as in this note and anot
her time Antonio, as in No. 1464 while inNo. 1458 l. 16 we find _Giovan'Antonio_, and in No. 1436, l.6_Beltraffio_. Poss
ibly the Giovanni here spoken of is Leonardo'sless known pupil Giovan Pietrino (see No. 1467, 5).], Francesco diMelzi [F
ootnote 2,3: _Francesco de' Melzi_ is often mentioned, seeNos. 1350.], Salai [Footnote 3: _Salai_. See No. 1519 note.],L
orenzo and il Fanfoia.[Footnote 4: _Lorenzo_. See No. 1351, l. 10 (p. 408). Amoretti givesthe following note in _Mem. St
or. XXIII:_ 1505. _Martedi--sera a di14 d'aprile. Venne Lorenzo a stare con mecho: disse essere d'etad'anni 17 .. a di 1
5 del detto aprile ebbi scudi 25 d'oro dalchamerlingo di Santa Maria nuova._ This, he asserts is derived froma MS. marke
d S, in quarto. This MS. seems to have vanished and leftno trace behind; Amoretti himself had not seen it, but copied fr
om aselection of extracts made by Oltrocchi before the Leonardo MSS.were conveyed to Paris on the responsibility of the
first FrenchRepublic. Lorenzo, by this, must have been born in 1487. Thesculptor Lorenzetto was born in 1490. Amoretti h
as been led by theabove passage to make the following absurd observations:_Cotesto Lorenzo, che poi gli fu sempre compag
no, almeno sin chestette in Italia, sarebb' egli Lorenzo Lotto bergamasco? Sappiamoessere stato questo valente dipintore
 uno de'bravi scolari delVinci_ (?)._Il Fafoia_, perhaps a nickname. Cesare da Sesto, Leonardo's pupil,seems to have bee
n in Rome in these years, as we learn from adrawing by him in the Louvre.1466.On the 3rd day of January.Benedetto came o
n the 17th of October; he stayed with me two monthsand 13 days of last year, in which time he earned 38 lire, 18 soldian
d 8 dinari; he had of this 26 lire and 8 soldi, and there remainsto be paid for the past year 12 lire 10 soldi.Giodatti
(?) came on the 8th day of September, at 4 soldi a month,and stayed with me 3 months and 24 days, and earned 59 lire 14
soldiand 8 dinari; he has had 43 lire, 4 soldi, there remains to pay 16lire, 10 soldi and 8 dinari.Benedetto, 24 grosson
i.[Footnote: This seems to be an account for two assistants. The nameof the second is scarcely legible. The year is not
given. The noteis nevertheless of chronological value. The first line tells us thedate when the note was registered, Jan
uary 3d, and the observationsthat follow refer to events of the previous month 'of last year'_(dell'anno passato)_. Leon
ardo cannot therefore have written thusin Florence where the year was, at that period, calculated asbeginning in the mon
th of March (see Vol. I, No. 4, note 2). He mustthen have been in Milan. What is more important is that we thuslearn how
 to date the beginning of the year in all the notes writtenat Milan. This clears up Uzielli's doubts: _A Milano facevasi
cominciar l'anno ab incarnatione, cioe il 25 Marzo e a nativitate,cioe il 25 Decembre. Ci sembra probabile che Leonardo
dovesseprescegliere lo stile che era in uso a Firenze._ (_Ricerche_, p. 84,note.)]1467.Gian Maria 4,Benedetto 4,Gian Pie
tro [5] 3,Salai 3,Bartolomeo 3,Gherardo 4.1468.Salai, 20 lire,Bonifacio, 2 lire,Bartolomeo, 4 lire,Arrigo [Harry], 15 li
re.Quotations and notes on books and authors (1469-1508).1469.Book on Arithmetic [Footnote 1: _"La nobel opera de arithm
ethica nela qual se tracta tute cosse amercantia pertinente facta & compilataper Piero borgi da Veniesia", in-40. In fin
e: "Nela inclita cita diVenetia a corni. 2 augusto. 1484. fu imposto fine ala presenteopera." Segn. a--p. quaderni. V'ha
 pero un' altra opera simile diFilippo Calandro, 1491. E da consultarsi su quest' ultimo, Federici:Memorie Trevigiane, F
iore di virtu: pag. 73. "Libricciuolo compostodi bello stile verso il 1320 e piu volte impresso nel secolo XV(ristampato
 poi anche piu tardi). Gli accademici della Crusca loammettono nella serie dei testi di lingua. Vedasi Gamba, Razzolini,
Panzer, Brunet, Lechi, ecc._ (G. D'A.)], 'Flowers of Virtue',Pliny [Footnote 2: _"Historia naturale di C. Plinio Secondo
,tradocta di lingua latina in fiorentina per Christophoro Laudino &Opus Nicolai Jansonis gallici imp. anno salutis M.CCC
C.LXXVI.Venetiis" in-fol.--Diogene Laertio. Incomincia: "El libro de la vitade philosophi etc.: Impressum Venetiis" per
Bernardinum Celerium deLuere, 1480", in-40_ (G. D'A.).], 'Lives of the Philosophers',The Bible [Footnote 3: _"La Bibia v
olgare historiata (per Nicolo diMallermi) Venecia ... M.CCCC.LXXI in kalende di Augusto (perVindelino de Spira)" 2 vol.
in-fol. a 2 col. di 50 lin,; od altraediz. della stessa versione del Mallermi, Venetia 1471, e sempre:"Venecia per Gabri
el de Piero 1477," in-fol.; 2 vol.; Ottavio Scottoda Modoetia 1481," "Venetia 1487 per Joan Rosso Vercellese," "1490Giov
anni Ragazo di Monteferato a instantia di Luchanthonio diGiunta, ecc."--Lapidario Teofrasto? Mandebille: "Le grandlapida
ire," versione italiana ms.?... Giorgio Agricola non puoessere, perche nato nel 1494, forse Alberto Magno: de mineralibu
s.Potrebbe essere una traduzione del poema latino (Liber lapidum seude gemmis) di Marbordio Veterio di Rennes (morto nel
 1123 da luistesso tradotto in francese dal greco di Evao re d'Arabia celebremedico che l'aveva composto per l'imperator
e Tiberio. Marbodioscrisse il suo prima per Filippo Augusto re di Francia. Vi sonoanche traduzioni in prosa. "Il lapidar
io o la forza e la virtu dellepietre preziose, delle Erbe e degli Animali."_ (G. D'A.)],'Lapidary','On warfare' [Footnot
e 4: _Il Vegezio? ... Il Frontino? ... IlCornazzano?... Noi crediamo piuttosto il Valturio. Questo librodoveva essere un
o de'favoriti di Leonardo poiche libro di scienza ed'arte nel tempo stesso._], 'Epistles of Filelfo',[Footnote: The late
 Marchese Girolamo d'Adda published a highlyvaluable and interesting disquisition on this passage under thetitle: _Leona
rdo da Vinci e la sua Libreria, note di un bibliofilo(Milano 1873. Ed. di soli 75 esemplari_; privately printed). In the
autumn of 1880 the Marchese d'Adda showed me a considerable mass ofadditional notes prepared for a second edition. This,
 as he thenintended, was to come out after the publication of this work ofmine. After the much regretted death of the el
der Marchese, his son,the Marchese Gioachino d'Adda was so liberal as to place these MS.materials at my disposal for the
 present work, through the kindintervention of Signor Gustavo Frizzoni. The following passages,with the initials G. d'A.
 are prints from the valuable notes in thatpublication, the MS. additions I have marked. I did not howeverthink myself j
ustified in reproducing here the acute and interestingobservations on the contents of most of the rare books hereenumera
ted.][Footnote: 1467. 5. See No. 1465, 2.]The first decade, [5] 'On the preservation of health', The thirddecade, [6] Ci
echo d'Ascoli, The fourth decade, [7] Albertus Magnus,Guido, [8] New treatise on rhetorics, Piero Crescentio, [9]Cibaldo
ne, 'Quadriregio', [10] Aesop,Donato, [Footnote 11: "_Donatus latine & italice: Impressum Venetiisimpensis Johannis Bapt
istae de Sessa anno_ 1499, _in_-4┬░".-- "_ElPsalterio de David in lingua volgare (da Malermi Venetia nelM.CCCC.LXXVI,_"
in-fol. s. n._ (G. D'A.)] Psalms,Justinus, [Footnote 12: Compare No. 1210, 48.--_La versione diGirolamo Squarzafico:_ "_
Il libro di Justino posto diligentemente inmaterna lingua. Venetia ale spesse (sic) di Johane de Colonia &Johane Gheretz
e_ ... l477," _in-fol._--"_Marsilii Ficini, Theologiaplatonica, sive de animarum immortalitate, Florentine, per Ant.Misc
onimum_ 1482," _in-fol., ovvero qualche versione italiana diquesto stesso libro, ms._ (G. D'A.)] 'On the immortality of
thesoul,Guido [Footnote 13: _Forse_ "_la Historia Trojana Guidonis_" _od il_"_manipulus_" _di_ "_Guido da Monterocherii_
"_ ma piu probabilmente_"_Guido d'Arezzo_"_ il di cui libro: _"_Micrologus, seu disciplinaartis musicae_"_ poteva da Leo
nardo aversi ms.; di questi neesistono in molto biblioteche, e fu poi impresso nel 1784 dalGerbert.__Molte sono le edizi
one dei sonetti di Burchiello Fiorentino,impresse nel secolo XV. La prima e piu rara e recercata:_"_Incominciano li sone
tti, ecc. (per Christoforo Arnaldo)_"_, in_-4┬░_senza numeri, richiami o segnature, del_ 1475, _e fors' anche del_1472,
_secondo Morelli e Dibdin, ecc._ (G. D'A.)] Burchiello,'Doctrinale' [Footnote 14: _Versione italiana det "Doctrinal deSa
pience" di Guy de Roy, e foris'anche l'originale in linguafrancese.--__Di Pulci Luigi, benche nell' edizione:_ "_Florent
iae_ 1479" _in_-4┬░si dica: _"_Il Driadeo composto in rima octava per Lucio Pulcro_"_Altre ediz, del secolo XV, _"_Flore
ntie Miscomini_ 1481, _in_-40,_Firenze, apud S. Jacob, de Ripoli,_ 1483,_" _in_-4┬░ _e "Antoni deFrancesco,_ 1487," _in_
-4┬░ _e Francesco di Jacopo_ 1489,_in_-4┬░ _edaltre ancora di Venezia e senza alcuna nota ecc._ (G. D'A.)]Driadeo,Morgan
te [Footnote 15: _Una delle edizioni del Morgante impresse nelsecolo XV, ecc.--__Quale delle opere di Francesco Petrarca
, sarebbe malagevolel'indovinare, ma probabilmente il Canzoniere._ (G. D'A.)] Petrarch.John de Mandeville [Footnote 16:
_Sono i viaggi del cavaliere_"_Mandeville_" _gentiluomo inglese. Scrisse il suo libro in linguafrancese. Fu stampato rep
licatamente nel secolo XV in francese, ininglese ed in italiano ed in tedesco; del secolo XV ne annoveranoforse piu di 2
7 edizioni, di cui ne conosciamo_ 8 _in francese,quattro in latino, sei in tedesco e molte altre in volgare._ (G.D'A.)]'
On honest recreation' [Footnote 17: _Il Platina (Bartolomeo Sacchi)la versione italiana_ "_de la honesta voluptate, & va
letudine (& deli obsonnii) Venetia (senza nome di tipografo)_ 1487," _piccoloin_-4┬░ _gotico._ (G. D'A.)--Compare No. 84
4, 21.]Manganello, [Footnote 18: _Il Manganello: Satira eccessivamentevivace contro le donne ad imitazione della Sesta d
i Giovenale.Manganello non e soltanto il titolo del libricino, sua ben anche ilnome dell'autore ch'era un_ "_milanese_".
 _Di questo libercolorarissimo, che sembra impresso a Venezia dallo Zoppino (Nicolod'Aristotile detto il), senza data, m
a dei primissimi anni delsecolo XVI, e forse piu antico, come vedremo in appresso, non se neconoscono fra biblioteche pu
bbliche e private che due soli esemplariin Europa._ (G. D'A.)]The Chronicle of Isidoro, [Footnote 19: "_Cronica desidero
_",_sembra si deggia leggere piuttosto_ "_cronico disidoro_"_; ed inquesto caso s'intenderebbe la_ "_cronica d'Isidoro_"
 _tanto in vogaa quel tempo_ "_Comenza la Cronica di Sancto Isidoro menore conalchune additione cavate del testo & istor
ie de la Bibia & del librodi Paulo Oroso .... Impresso in Ascoli in casa del reverendo misserPascale ..... per mano di G
uglielmo de Linis de AlamaniaM.CCCC.LXXVII_" _in_-4┬░ _di_ 157 _ff. E il primo libro impresso adAscoli e l'edizione prin
cipe di questa cronica in oggi assai rara.Non lo e meno l'edizione di Cividal del Friuli_, 1480, _e quella benanche di A
quila_, 1482, _sempre in-_4┬░. _Vedasi Panzer, Hain, Brunete P. Dechamps._ (G. D'A.)]The Epistles of Ovid, [Footnote 20:
 "_Le pistole di Ovidio tradottein prosa. Napoli Sixt. Riessinger_", _in_-4┬░, _oppure:_ "_Epistolevolgarizzate_ 1489,"
_in_-4┬░ _a due col._ "_impresse ne la cita(sic) di Bressa per pre: Baptista de Farfengo,_" _(in ottave) o:_"_El libro d
ele Epistole di Ovidio in rima volgare per messereDominico de Monticelli toschano. Brescia Farfengo_," _in_-4┬░ _got.(in
 rima volgare)_, 1491, _ed anche la versione di Luca Pulci.Firenze, Mischomini_, 1481, _in_-4┬░. (G. D'A.) ]Epistles of
Filelfo, [Footnote 21: See l. 4.]Sphere, [Footnote 22: "_Jo: de Sacrobusto_," _o_ "_Goro Dati_," _o_"_Tolosano da Colle_
" _di cui molteplici edizioni del secolo XV._(G. D'A.)]The Jests of Poggio, [Footnote 23: _Tre edizioni delle facezie de
lPoggio abbiamo in lingua italiana della fine del secolo XV, tuttesenza data. "Facetie de Poggio fiorentino traducte de
latino invulgare ornatissimo," in-40, segn. a--e in caratteri romani;l'altra: "Facetie traducte de latino in vulgare," i
n-40, caratterigotici, ecc._ (G. D'A.)] Chiromancy, [Footnote 24: "_Die KunstCyromantia etc, in tedesco. 26 ff. di testo
 e figure il tutteeseguito su tavole di legno verso la fine del secolo XV da GiorgioSchapff". Dibdin, Heinecken, Sotheby
 e Chatto ne diedero una lungadescrizione; i primi tre accompagnati da fac-simili. La data 1448che si legge alla fine de
l titolo si riferisce al periodo dellacomposizione del testo, non a quello della stampa del volume benchetabellario. Alt
ri molti libri di Chiromanzia si conoscono di queltempo e sarebbe opera vana il citarli tutti._ (G. D'A.)]Formulary of l
etters, [Footnote 25: _Miniatore Bartolomeo."Formulario de epistole vulgare missive e responsive, & altri fioride ornali
 parlamenti al principe Hercule d'Esti ecc. composto ecc.Bologna per Ugo di Rugerii," in-40, del secolo XV. Altra edizio
ne di"Venetia Bernardino di Novara, 1487" e "Milano per Joanne AngeloScinzenzeler 1500," in-40._ (G. D'A.)Five books out
 of this list are noted by Leonardo in another MS.(Tr. 3): _donato, -- lapidario, -- plinio, -- abacho, -- morgante._]14
70.Nonius Marcellus, Festus Pompeius, Marcus Varro.[Footnote: Nonius Marcellus and Sextus Pompeius Festus were Romangram
marians of about the fourth century A. D. Early publications ofthe works of Marcellus are: _De proprietate sermonis, Rom
ae_ (about1470), and 1471 (place of publication unknown). _Compendiosadoctrina, ad filium, de proprietate sermonum._ Ven
ice, 1476. BRUNET,_Manuel du libraire_ (IV, p. 97) notes: _Le texte de cet anciengrammairien a ete reimprime plusieurs f
ois a la fin du XVe siecle,avec ceux de Pomponius Festus et de Terentius Varro. La plusancienne edition qui reunisse ces
 trois auteurs est celle de Parme,1480 ... Celles de Venise, 1483, 1490, 1498, et de Milan, 1500,toutes in-fol., ont peu
 de valeur._]1471.Map of Elephanta in India which Antonello Merciaio has from maestroMaffeo;--there for seven years the
earth rises and for seven yearsit sinks;--Enquire at the stationers about Vitruvius.1472.See 'On Ships' Messer Battista,
 and Frontinus 'On Acqueducts'[Footnote 2: 2. _Vitruvius de Arch., et Frontinus de Aquedoctibus._Florence, 1513.--This i
s the earliest edition of Frontinus.--Thenote referring to this author thus suggests a solution of theproblem of the dat
e of the Leicester Manuscript.].[Footnote: Compare No. 1113, 25.]1473.Anaxagoras: Every thing proceeds from every thing,
 and every thingbecomes every thing, and every thing can be turned into every thingelse, because that which exists in th
e elements is composed of thoseelements.1474.The Archimedes belonging to the Bishop of Padua.[Footnote: See No. 1421, 1.
 3, 6 and Vol. I, No. 343.]1475.Archimedes gave the quadrature of a polygonal figure, but not of thecircle. Hence Archim
edes never squared any figure with curved sides.He squared the circle minus the smallest portion that the intellectcan c
onceive, that is the smallest point visible.[Footnote: Compare No. 1504.]1476.If any man could have discovered the utmos
t powers of the cannon, inall its various forms and have given such a secret to the Romans,with what rapidity would they
 have conquered every country and havevanquished every army, and what reward could have been great enoughfor such a serv
ice! Archimedes indeed, although he had greatlydamaged the Romans in the siege of Syracuse, nevertheless did notfail of
being offered great rewards from these very Romans; and whenSyracuse was taken, diligent search was made for Archimedes;
 and hebeing found dead greater lamentation was made for him by the Senateand people of Rome than if they had lost all t
heir army; and theydid not fail to honour him with burial and with a statue. At theirhead was Marcus Marcellus. And afte
r the second destruction ofSyracuse, the sepulchre of Archimedes was found again by Cato[25],in the ruins of a temple. S
o Cato had the temple restored and thesepulchre he so highly honoured.... Whence it is written that Catosaid that he was
 not so proud of any thing he had done as of havingpaid such honour to Archimedes.[Footnote: Where Leonardo found the st
atement that Cato had foundand restored the tomb of Archimedes, I do not know. It is a meritthat Cicero claims as his ow
n (Tusc. V, 23) and certainly with afull right to it. None of Archimedes' biographers --not even thediligent Mazzucchell
i, mentions any version in which Cato is named.It is evidently a slip of the memory on Leonardo's part. Besides,accordin
g to the passage in Cicero, the grave was not found _'nelleruine d'un tempio'_--which is highly improbable as relating t
o aGreek--but in an open spot (H. MULLER-STRUBING).--See too, as toArchimedes, No. 1417.Leonardo says somewhere in MS. C
.A.: _Architronito e una macchina difino rame, invenzlon d' Archimede_ (see _'Saggio'_, p. 20).]1477.Aristotle, Book 3 o
f the Physics, and Albertus Magnus, and ThomasAquinas and the others on the rebound of bodies, in the 7th onPhysics, on
heaven and earth.1478.Aristotle says that if a force can move a body a given distance in agiven time, the same force wil
l move half the same body twice as farin the same time.1479.Aristotle in Book 3 of the Ethics: Man merits praise or blam
e solelyin such matters as lie within his option to do or not to do.1480.Aristotle says that every body tends to maintai
n its nature.1481.On the increase of the Nile, a small book by Aristotle. [Footnote:_De inundatione Nili_, is quoted her
e and by others as a work ofAristotle. The Greek original is lost, but a Latin version of thebeginning exists (Arist. Op
p. IV p. 213 ed. Did. Par.).In his quotations from Aristotle Leonardo possibly refers to one ofthe following editions: _
Aristotelis libri IV de coelo et mundo; deanima libri III; libri VIII physi- corum; libri de generatione etcorruptione;
de sensu et sensato... omnia latine, interpreteAverroe, Venetiis 1483_ (first Latin edition). There is also aseparate ed
ition of _Liber de coelo et mundo_, dated 1473.]1482.Avicenna will have it that soul gives birth to soul as body to body
,and each member to itself.[Footnote: Avicenna, see too No. 1421, 1. 2.]1483.Avicenna on liquids.1484.Roger Bacon, done
in print. [Footnote: The earliest printed editionknown to Brunet of the works of Roger Bacon, is a Frenchtranslation, wh
ich appeared about fourty years after Leonardo'sdeath.]1485.Cleomedes the philosopher.[Footnote: Cleomede. A Greek mathe
matician of the IVth century B. C.We have a Cyclic theory of Meteorica by him. His works were notpublished before Leonar
do's death.]1486.CORNELIUS CELSUS.The highest good is wisdom, the chief evil is suffering in the body.Because, as we are
 composed of two things, that is soul and body, ofwhich the first is the better, the body is the inferior; wisdombelongs
 to the better part, and the chief evil belongs to the worsepart and is the worst of all. As the best thing of all in th
e soulis wisdom, so the worst in the body is suffering. Therefore just asbodily pain is the chief evil, wisdom is the ch
ief good of the soul,that is with the wise man; and nothing else can be compared with it.[Footnote: _Aulus Cornelius Cel
sus_, a Roman physician, known as theRoman Hippocrates, probably contemporary with Augustus. Only hiseight Books 'De Med
icina', are preserved. The earliest editions are:_Cornelius Celsus, de medicina libr. VIII._, Milan 1481 Venice 1493and
1497.]1487.Demetrius was wont to say that there was no difference between thespeech and words of the foolish and ignoran
t, and the noises andrumblings of the wind in an inflated stomach. Nor did he say sowithout reason, for he saw no differ
ence between the parts whencethe noise issued; whether their lower parts or their mouth, sinceone and the other were of
equal use and importance.[Footnote: Compare Vol. I, No. 10.]1488.Maestro Stefano Caponi, a physician, lives at the pisci
na, and hasEuclid _De Ponderibus_.1489.5th Book of Euclid. First definition: a part is a quantity of lessmagnitude than
the greater magnitude when the less is contained acertain number of times in the greater.A part properly speaking is tha
t which may be multiplied, that iswhen, being multiplied by a certain number, it forms exactly thewhole. A common aggreg
ate part ...Second definition. A greater magnitude is said to be a multiple of aless, when the greater is measured by th
e less.By the first we define the lesser [magnitude] and by the second thegreater is defined. A part is spoken1490.of in
 relation to the whole; and all their relations lie betweenthese two extremes, and are called multiples.1491.Hippocrates
 says that the origin of men's sperm derives from thebrain, and from the lungs and testicles of our parents, where thefi
nal decocture is made, and all the other limbs transmit theirsubstance to this sperm by means of expiration, because the
re are nochannels through which they might come to the sperm.[Footnote: The works of Hippocrates were printed first afte
rLeonardo's death.]1492.Lucretius in his third [book] 'De Rerum Natura'. The hands, nailsand teeth were (165) the weapon
s of ancient man.They also use for a standard a bunch of grass tied to a pole (167).[Footnote: _Lucretius, de rerum natu
ra libri VI_ were printed firstabout 1473, at Verona in 1486, at Brescia in 1495, at Venice in 1500and in 1515, and at F
lorence in 1515. The numbers 165 and 167 notedby Leonardo at the end of the two passages seem to indicate pages,but if s
o, none of the editions just mentioned can here be meant,nor do these numbers refer to the verses in the poems of Lucret
ius.]1493.Ammianus Marcellinus asserts that seven hundred thousand volumes ofbooks were burnt in the siege of Alexandria
 in the time of JuliusCesar.[Footnote: _Ammiani Marcellini historiarum libri qui extant XIII_,published at Rome in 1474.
]1494.Mondino says that the muscles which raise the toes are in theoutward side of the thigh, and he adds that there are
 no muscles inthe back [upper side] of the feet, because nature desired to makethem light, so as to move with ease; and
if they had been fleshythey would be heavier; and here experience shows ...[Footnote: _"Mundini anatomia. Mundinus, Anot
homia (sic). Mundinipraestantissimorum doctorum almi studii ticiensis (sic) curadiligentissime emendata. Impressa Papiae
 per magistrum Antonium deCarfano 1478," in-fol.; ristampata: "Bononiae Johan. de Noerdlingen,1482," in-fol.; "Padova pe
r Mattheum Cerdonis de Vuindischgretz,1484," in-40; "Lipsia, 1493," in-40; "Venezia, 1494," in-40 e ivi"1498," con fig.
Queste figure per altro non sono, come si epreteso, le prime che fossero introdotte in un trattato di Notamia.Nel 'fasci
culus Medicinae' di Giovanni Ketham, che riproducel''Anatomia' del Mundinus, impresso pure a Venezia da J. e G. deGregor
iis, 1491, in-fol., contengonsi intagli in legno (si voglionodisegnati non gia incisi da Andrea Mantegna) di grande dime
nsione, eche furono piu volte riprodotti negli anni successivi. Quest'edizione del "fasciculus" del 1491, sta fra nostri
 libri e potrebbebenissimo essere il volume d'Anatomia notato da Leonardo._ (G.D'A.)]1495.Of the error of those who prac
tice without knowledge;--[3] See firstthe 'Ars poetica' of Horace [5].[Footnote: A 3-5 are written on the margin at the
side of the titleline of the text given, entire as No. 19]1496.The heirs of Maestro Giovanni Ghiringallo have the works
ofPelacano.1497.The catapult, as we are told by Nonius and Pliny, is a machinedevised by those &c.[Footnote: _Plinius_,
see No. 946.]1498.I have found in a history of the Spaniards that in their wars withthe English Archimedes of Syracuse w
ho at that time was living atthe court of Ecliderides, King of the Cirodastri. And in maritimewarfare he ordered that th
e ships should have tall masts, and thaton their tops there should be a spar fixed [Footnote 6: Compare No.1115.] of 40
feet long and one third of a foot thick. At one end ofthis was a small grappling iron and at the other a counterpoise; a
ndthere was also attached 12 feet of chain; and, at the end of thischain, as much rope as would reach from the chain to
the base of thetop, where it was fixed with a small rope; from this base it randown to the bottom of the mast where a ve
ry strong spar was attachedand to this was fastened the end of the rope. But to go on to theuse of his machine; I say th
at below this grappling iron was a fire[Footnote 14: Compare No. 1128.] which, with tremendous noise, threwdown its rays
 and a shower of burning pitch; which, pouring down onthe [enemy's] top, compelled the men who were in it to abandon the
top to which the grappling-iron had clung. This was hooked on to theedges of the top and then suddenly the cord attached
 at the base ofthe top to support the cord which went from the grappling iron, wascut, giving way and drawing in the ene
my's ship; and if theanchor--was cast ...[Footnote: Archimedes never visited Spain, and the names herementioned cannot b
e explained. Leonardo seems to quote here from abook, perhaps by some questionable mediaeval writer. Prof. C. Justiwrite
s to me from Madrid, that Spanish savants have no knowledge ofthe sources from which this story may have been derived.]1
499.Theophrastus on the ebb and flow of the tide, and of eddies, and onwater. [Footnote: The Greek philosophers had no o
pportunity to studythe phenomenon of the ebb and flow of the tide and none of themwrote about it. The movement of the wa
ters in the Euripus howeverwas to a few of them a puzzling problem.]1500.Tryphon of Alexandria, who spent his life at Ap
ollonia, a city ofAlbania (163). [Footnote: Tryphon of Alexandria, a Greek Grammarianof the time of Augustus. His treati
se TtaOY Aeijecu appeared firstat Milan in 1476, in Constantin Laskaris's Greek Grammar.]1501.Messer Vincenzio Aliprando
, who lives near the Inn of the Bear, hasGiacomo Andrea's Vitruvius.1502.Vitruvius says that small models are of no avai
l for ascertainingthe effects of large ones; and I here propose to prove that thisconclusion is a false one. And chiefly
 by bringing forward the verysame argument which led him to this conclusion; that is, by anexperiment with an auger. For
 he proves that if a man, by a certainexertion of strength, makes a hole of a given diameter, andafterwards another hole
 of double the diameter, this cannot be madewith only double the exertion of the man's strength, but needs muchmore. To
this it may very well be answered that an auger1503.of double the diameter cannot be moved by double the exertion, be-ca
use the superficies of a body of the same form but twice as largehas four times the extent of the superficies of the sma
ller, as isshown in the two figures a and n.1504.OF SQUARING THE CIRCLE, AND WHO IT WAS THAT FIRST DISCOVERED IT BYACCID
ENT.Vitruvius, measuring miles by means of the repeated revolutions ofthe wheels which move vehicles, extended over many
 Stadia the linesof the circumferences of the circles of these wheels. He becameaware of them by the animals that moved
the vehicles. But he did notdiscern that this was a means of finding a square equal to a circle.This was first done by A
rchimedes of Syracuse, who by multiplyingthe second diameter of a circle by half its circumference produced arectangular
 quadrilateral equal figure to the circle [Footnote 10:Compare No. 1475.].[Footnote: _Vitruvius_, see also Nos. 1113 and
 343.]1505.Virgil says that a blank shield is devoid of merit because among thepeople of Athens the true recognition con
firmed by testimonies ...[Footnote: The end of the text cannot be deciphered.]1506.In Vitolone there are 805 conclusions
 [problems] in perspective.[Footnote: _(Witelo, Vitellion, Vitellon) Vitellione. E da vedersisu questo ottico prospettic
o del secolo XIII Luca Pacioli, PaoloLomazzo, Leonardo da Vinci, ecc. e fra i moderni il Graesse, ilLibri, il Brunet, e
le Memorie pubblicate dal principe Boncompagni,e 'Sur l' orthographe du nom et sur la patrie de Witelo (Vitellion)note d
e Maximilien Curtze, professeur a Thorn', ove sono descritti imolti codici esistenti nelle biblioteche d' Europa. Bernar
dino Baldinelle sue 'Vite de'matematici', manoscritto presso il principeBoncompagni, ha una biografia del Vitellione. Qu
esto scritto delBaldi reca la data 25 agosto 1588. Discorsero poi di lui FederigoRisnerio e Giovanni di Monteregio nella
 prefazione dell' Alfagrano,Giovanni Boteone, Girolamo Cardano, 'De subtilitate', che nota glierrori di Vitellione. Viss
e, secondo il Baldi, intorno all' anno1269, ma secondo il Reinoldo fioriva nel 1299, avendo dedicata lasua opera ad un f
rate Guglielmo di Monteca, che visse di que' tempi.Intorno ad un manoscritto dell' ottica di Vitellione, citato da LucaP
acioli v'ha un secondo esemplare del Kurlz, con aggiunte delprincipe Boncompagni, e le illustrazioni del cav. Enrico Nar
ducci.Nel 'Catalogo di manoscritti' posseduti da D. Baldassare de'principi Boncompagni, compilato da esso Narducci, Roma
, 1862, sottoal n. 358, troviamo citato: Vitellio, 'Perspectiva', manoscritto delsecolo XIV. La 'Prospettiva di Vitelleo
ne' (sic) Thuringo-poloni ecitata due volte da Paolo Lomazzo nel Trattato dell' arte dellapittura. Vitellio o Vitello o
Witelo. Il suo libro fu impresso infoglio a Norimberga nel 1535; la secondo edizione e del 1551, sempredi Norimberga, ed
 una terza di Basilea, 1572._ (See _IndaginiStoriche ... sulla Libreria-Visconteo-Sforzesca del Castello diPavia ... per
 cura di_ G. D'A., _Milano 1879. P. I. Appendice p.113. 114)._]1507.Vitolone, at Saint Mark's.[Footnote: _Altro codice d
i cotesta 'Prospettiva' del Vitolonetroviamo notato nel 'Canone bibliographico di Nicolo V', conservatoalla, Magliabecch
iana, in copia dell' originale verosimilmenteinviato dal Parentucelli a Cosimo de' Medici (Magliab. cod. segn. 1VII, 30
carte da 193 a 198). Proviene dal Convento di San Marco e loaveva trascritto frate Leonardo Scruberti fiorentino, dell'
ordinedei predicatori che fu anche bibliotecario della Medicea pubblica inSan Marco_ (See _Indagini Storiche ... per cur
a di_ G. D'A. _ParteI, p. 97)._]1508.How this proposition of Xenophon is false.If you take away unequal quantities from
unequal quantities, but inthe same proportion, &c. [Footnote: Xenophon's works were publishedseveral times during Leonar
do's lifetime.]Inventories and accounts (1509--1545).1509.On the 28th day of April I received from the Marchesino 103 li
re and12 dinari. [Footnote: Instead of the indication of the year there isa blank space after _d'aprile_.--Marchesino St
ange was one ofLodovico il Moro's officials.--Compare No. 1388.]1510.On the 10th day of July 1492 in 135Rhenish florins
         1. 445in dinari of 6 soldi     1. 112 S 16in dinari of 5 1/2 soldi 1.  29 S 139 in gold and 3 scudi    1.  53
       -----------------------------                         1. 811 in all1511.On the first day of February, lire 1200.1
512.The hall towards the court is 126 paces long and 27 braccia wide.1513.The narrow cornice above the hall lire 30.The
cornice beneath that, being one for each picture, lire 7, andfor the cost of blue, gold, white, plaster, indigo and glue
 3 lire;time 3 days.The pictures below these mouldings with their pilasters, 12 lireeach.I calculate the cost for smalt,
 blue and gold and other colours at 11/2 lire.The days I calculate at 3, for the invention of the composition,pilasters
and other things.1514.Item for each vault 7 lireoutlay for blue and gold 3 1/2time, 4 daysfor the windows 1 1/2The corni
ce below the windows 16 soldi per braccioitem for 24 pictures of Roman history 14 lire eachThe philosophers 10 lirethe p
ilasters, one ounce of blue 10 soldifor gold 15 soldiTotal 2 and 1/2 lire.1515.The cornice above lire 30The cornice belo
w lire 7The compositions, one with another lire 131516.Salai, 6 lire ... 4 soldi ... 10 soldi for a chain;--On the l4th
of March I had 13 lire S. 4; 16 lire remain.1517.How many braccia high is the level of the walls?--123 bracciaHow large
is the hall?How large is the garland?30 ducats.On the 29th day of January, 1494cloth for hose lire 4 S 3lining S 16makin
g S 8to Salai S 3a jasper ring S 13a sparkling stone S 11to Caterina S 10to Caterina S 101518.The wheel lire 7the tire l
ire 10the shield lire 4the cushion lire 8the ends of the axle-tree lire 2bed and frame lire 30conduit lire 10S.K.M.II.2
4a]1519.Parsley 10 partsmint 1 partthyme 1 partVinegar ... and a little salt two pieces of canvas for Salai.[Footnote: T
his note, of about the year 1494, is the earliestmention of Salai, and the last is of the year 1513 (see No. 1465,3). Fr
om the various notes in the MSS. he seems to have beenLeonardo's assistant and keeper only, and scarcely himself apainte
r. At any rate no signed or otherwise authenticated picture byhim is known to exist. Vasari speaks somewhat doubtfully o
n thispoint.]1520.On Tuesday I bought wine for morning [drinking]; on Friday the 4thday of September the same.[Footnote:
 This note enables us to fix the date of the Manuscript,in which it is to be found. In 1495 the 4th of September fell on
 aFriday; the contents of the Manuscript do not permit us to assign itto a much earlier or later date (Compare No. 1522,
 and Note).]1521.The cistern ... at the Hospital, --2 ducats, --beans, --white maize,--red maize, --millet, --buckwheat,
 --kidney beans, --beans, --peas.1522.EXPENSES OF THE INTERMENT OF CATERINA.For the 3 lbs of tapers 27 SFor the bier 8 S
A pall over the bier 12 SFor bearing and placing the cross 4 SFor bearing the body 8 SFor 4 priests and 4 clerks 20 SBel
l, book and sponge 2 SFor the gravediggers 16 STo the senior 8 SFor a license from the authorities 1 S106 SThe doctor 2
SSugar and candles 12 S120 S[Footnote:  See Nos. 1384 and 1517.]1523.Salai's cloak, the 4th of April 1497.4 braccia of s
ilver cloth l. 15 S 4green velvet to trim it l. 9 S --binding l.-- S 9loops l.-- S 12the making l. 1 S 5binding for the
front l.-- S 5stitching _________here are 13 grossoni of his l. 26 S 5Salai stole the soldi.1524.On Monday I bought 4 br
accia of cloth lire 13 S 14 1/2 on the 17thof, October 1497.1525.Memorandum. That on the 8th day of April 1503, I, Leona
rdo da Vinci,lent to Vante, miniature painter 4 gold ducats, in gold. Salaicarried them to him and gave them into his ow
n hand, and he said hewould repay within the space of 40 days.Memorandum. That on the same day I paid to Salai 3 gold du
cats whichhe said he wanted for a pair of rose-coloured hose with theirtrimming; and there remain 9 ducats due to him--e
xcepting that heowes me 20 ducats, that is 17 I lent him at Milan, and 3 at Venice.Memorandum. That I gave Salai 21 brac
cia of cloth to make a shirt,at 10 soldi the braccio, which I gave him on the 20th day of April1503.[Footnote: With rega
rd to Vante or Attavante, the miniature painter(not Nanni as I formerly deciphered this name, which is difficult toread;
 see _Zeitschrift fur Bild. Kunst_, 1879, p. 155), and Vasari,Lives of Frate Giovanni da Fiesole, of Bartolommeo della G
atta, andof Gherardo, _miniatore._ He, like Leonardo, was one of thecommittee of artists who, in 1503, considered the er
ection andplacing of Michel Angelo's David. The date of his death is notknown; he was of the same age as Leonardo. Furth
er details will befound in '_Notizie di Attavante miniatore, e di alcuni suoi lavori_'(Milanese's ed. of Vasari, III, 23
1-235).]1526.On the morning of San Peter's day, June 29th, 1504, I took ioducats, of which I gave one to Tommaso my serv
ant to spend.On Monday morning 1 florin to Salai to spend on the house.On Thursday I took 1 florin for my own spending.W
ednesday evening 1 florin to Tommaso, before supper.Saturday morning 1 florin to Tommaso.Monday morning 1 florin less 10
 soldi.Thursday to Salai 1 florin less 10 soldi.For a jerkin, 1 florin.For a jerkin And a cap 2 florins.To the hosier, 1
 florin.To Salai, 1 florin.Friday morning, the 19th of July, 1 florin, less 6 soldi. I have 7fl. left, and 22 in the box
.Tuesday, the 23th day of July, 1 florin to Tommaso.Monday morning, to Tommaso 1 florin.[Wednesday morning 1 fl. to Tomm
aso.]Thursday morning the 1st day of August 1 fl. to Tommaso.Sunday, the 4th of August, 1 florin.Friday, the 9th day of
August 1504, I took 10 ducats out of the box.1527.1504. On the 9th day of August, 1504, I took 10 florins in gold[2]...
[3] on Friday the 9th day of August fifteen grossoni that is fl.5 S 5 ... given to me 1 florin in gold on the 12th day o
f August [4]... on the 14th of August, 32 grossoni to Tommaso. On the 18th ofthe same 5 grossoni to Salai. On the 8th of
 September 6 grossoni tothe workman to spend; that is on the day of our Lady's birth. On the16th day of September I gave
 4 grossoni to Tommaso: on a Sunday.[Footnote: In the original, the passage given as No. 1463 is writtenbetween lines 2
and 3 of this text, and it is possible that theentries in lines 3 and 4 refer to the payments of Jacopo Tedesco,who is t
here mentioned. The first words of these lines are veryillegible.][Footnote 7: _Al fattore._ Il Fattore, was, as is well
 known, thenick-name of Giovanni Franceso Penni, born in Florence in 1486, andsubsequently a pupil of Raphael's. Accordi
ng to Vasari he was knownby it even as a boy. Whether he is spoken of in this passage, orwhether the word Fattore should
 be translated literally, I will notundertake to decide. The latter seems to me more probably right.]1528.On the day of
October, 1508, I had 30 scudi; 13 I lent to Salai tomake up his sister's dowry, and 17 I have left.1529.Memorandum of th
e money I have had from the King as my salary fromJuly 1508 till April next 1509. First 100 scudi, then 70, then 50,then
 20 and then 200 florins at 48 soldi the florin. [Footnote:Compare No. 1350 and 1561.]1530.Saturday the 2nd day of March
 I had from Santa Maria Novella 5 goldducats, leaving 450. Of these I gave 2 the same day to Salai, whohad lent them to
me. [Footnote: See '_Conto corrente di Leonardo daVinci con lo Spedale di S. Maria Nuova_' [1500 a 1507, 1513-1520]publi
shed by G. UZIELLI, _Ricerche intorno a Leonardo da Vinci,Firenze,_ 1872, pp. 164, 165, 218 and 219. The date here given
 byLeonardo does not occur in either of the accounts.]1531.Thursday, the eighth day of June, I took 17 grossoni, 18 sold
i; onthe same Thursday in the morning I gave to Salai 22 soldi for theexpenses.1532.To Salai 4 grossoni, and for one bra
ccio of velvet, 5 lire, and 1/2;viz. 10 soldi for loops of silver; Salai 14 soldi for binding, themaking of the cloak 25
 soldi. [Footnote: Compare No. 1523.]1533.I gave to Salai 93 lire 6 soldi, of which I have had 67 lire andthere remain 2
6 lire 6 soldi.1534.To Salai S 422 dozen of laces S 8for papers S 3 d 8a pair of shoes S 14for velvet S 14a sword and kn
ife S 21to the barber S 11to Paolo for a ... S 20For having his fortune told S 61535.On Friday morning,one florin to Sal
ai tospend; 3 soldi receivedbread S.. dwine S.. dgrapes S.. dmushrooms S.. dfruit S.. d[Footnote 6: Compare Nos. 1545, l
. 4 and 5,with similar entries for horse's fodder.]bran S.. dat the barber's S.. dfor shoes S.. d1536.On Thursday mornin
g one florin.1537.On Saint Ambrose's day from the morning to Thursday 36 soldi.1538.The moneys I have had from Ser Matte
o;first 20 grassoni, then on 13 occasions 3 f.and then 61 grassoni, then 3, and then 33;46 soldi 12 grossoni.1539.For pa
per S 18for canvas S 30for paper S 10 d 19Total S 731540.20 pounds of Germanblue, at one ducat the pound lire 80 S  d60
pounds of white, S..the pound lire 15 S  d1 1/2 pound at 4 S the pound lire 6 S  d2 pounds of cinnabar atS 18 the pound
lire 1 S 16 d6 pounds of green at S 12the pound lire 3 S 12 d4 pounds of yellow at S 12the pound lire 2 S 8 d1 pound of
minium at S 8the pound lire 0 S 8 d4 pounds of ... at S 2the pound lire 0 S 8 d6 pounds of ochre at S 1the pound lire 0
S 6 dblack ... at S 2 the poundfor 20 lire 2 S 0 dwax to make the stars29 pounds at S--the pound lire 0 S 0 d40 pounds o
f oil for paintingat 5 soldi the pound lire 10 S 0 dAltogether lire 120 d 18without the gold. 18tin for putting on the g
old 120 18581541.Two large hatchets and one very small one, 8 brass spoons, 4tablecloths, 2 towels, 15 small napkins, 2
coarse napkins, 2 coarsecloths, 2 wrappers, 3 pairs of sheets, 2 pairs new and 1 old.1542.Bed 7 0 Sring 7 0crockery 2 5g
ardener 1 2..... 2 8porters 2 1glasses 1fuel 3 6a lock 1Section title: Miscellaneous Notes.1543.New tin-ware          3
pairs of sheets6 small bowls,          each of 4 breadths,6 bowls,              2 small sheets,2 large dishes,       2 t
ablecloths and 1/2,2 dishes medium size, 16 coarse cloths,2 small ones          8 shirts,  Old tin-ware        9 napkins
,3 small bowls,        2 hand-towels.4 bowls,3 square stones,2 small bowls,1 large bowl,1 platter,4 candlesticks,1 small
 candlestick.1544.Hose        S 40straw       S 60wheat       S 42wine        S 54bread       S 18meat        S 54eggs
      S  5salad       S  3the Barber  S 2 d 6horses      S 11545.   Sundaymeat        S 10 dwine        S 12 dbran
  S  5 d 4herbs       S 10 dbuttermilk  S  4 d 4melon       S  3 dbread       S  3 d 1____________________   Monday   S
 9   8____________________.....       S  6 dwine        S 12 dbran        S  9 d 4buttermilk  S  4 d 4herbs       S  8 d
____________________     Tuesday S    d_____________________meat         S  0 d 8wine         S 12 dbread        S  3 dm
eal         S  5 d 4herbs        S  8 d_____________________    Wednesday_____________________wine         S  5 dmelon
      S  2 dmeal         S  5 d 4vegetables   S  8Notes by unknown persons among the MSS. (1546-1565).1546.Miseracione d
ivina sacro sancte Romane ecclesie tituli n cardinalis2wulgariter nuncupatus venerabili religioso fratri Johanni Maird'N
ustorf 3ordinis praedicatorum provintie teutonie (?) conventusWiennensis capellano 4 nostro commensali salutem in dno se
mpiternamReligione zelus rite ac in [ferite?] 5honestas aliarumquelaudabilium probitatis et virtutum merita quibus apud
nos fide6digno commendationis testimonio Magistri videlicet ordinis felicisrecordacionis Leonardi de 7Mansuetis de Perus
io sigillo suo ... usdans tibi ad ... opera virtutum comen(salem)? 8 locum et tempussuccess(ores) cujus similiter offici
um ministratus quipraedecessoris sui donum (?) 9confirmavit et de novo deditaliorumque plurima [laudatis] qui opera tua
laudant 10nos inducuntut tibi (?) reddamus ad gratiam liberalem hinc est quod noscupientes. [Footnote: The meaning of th
is document, which is verydifficult to decipher, and is written in unintelligible Latin, is,that Leonardo di Mansuetis r
ecommends the Rev. Mair of Nusdorf,chaplain at Vienna, to some third person; and says also thatsomething, which had to b
e proved, has been proved. The rest of thepassages on the same leaf are undoubtedly in Leonardo's hand. (Nos.483, 661, 5
19, 578, 392, 582, 887 and 894.)]1547.Johannes Antonius di Johannes Ambrosius de Bolate. He who lets timepass and does n
ot grow in virtue, the more I think of it the more Igrieve. No man has it in him to be virtuous who will give up honourf
or gain. Good fortune is valueless to him who knows not toil. Theman becomes happy who follows Christ. There is no perfe
ct giftwithout great suffering. Our glories and our triumphs pass away.Foul lust, and dreams, and luxury, and sloth have
 banished everyvirtue from the world; so that our Nature, wandering and perplexed,has almost lost the old and better tra
ck. Henceforth it were well torouse thyself from sleep. The master said that lying in down willnot bring thee to Fame; n
or staying beneath the quilts. He who,without Fame, burns his life to waste, leaves no more vestige ofhimself on earth t
han wind-blown smoke, or the foam upon the sea.[Footnote: From the last sentence we may infer that this text is bythe ha
nd of a pupil of Leonardo's.-- On the same sheet are the notesNos.1175 and 715 in Leonardo's own handwriting.]1548.On th
e morning of Santo Zanobio the29th of May 1504, I had from Lionardo Vinci15 gold ducats and began to spend them.to Mona
Margarita   S  62 d 4to remake the ring  S  19 d 8clothes             S  13good beef           S   4eggs
S   6debt at the bank    S   7velvet              S  12wine                S  6 d 4meat                S  4mulberries
       S  2 d 4mushrooms           S  3 d 4salad               S  1fruit               S  1 d 4candles             S  3.
..                 S  1flour               S  2    Sunday           198   8bread               S  6wine                S
  9 d 4meat                S  7soup                S  2fruit               S  3 d 4candles             S  3 dMonday
           31bread               S  6 d 4meat                S 10 d 8wine                S  9 d 4fruit               S
4soup                S  1 d 8                      321549.Tuesdaybread              S  6meat               S 11wine
          S  7fruit              S  9soup               S  2salad              S  1[Footnote 1548 and 1549: On the same
sheet is the text No. 1015 in Leonardo's own handwriting.]1550.To Monna Margarita          S  5to Tomaso
   S 14to Monna Margarita     d  5 S  2on the day of San Zanobileft ... afterpayment                d 13 S  2 d 4of Monn
a Margarita     altogether        d 14 S 5 d 41551.On Monday, the l3th of February, I lent lire S 7 to Lionardo tospend,
 Friday d 7.[Footnote: This note is followed by an account very like the onegiven as No. 1549.]1552.Stephano Chigi, Cano
nico ..., servant of the honorable Count Grimaniat S. Apostoli.[Footnote: Compare No. 674, 21-23.]1553.Having become anx
ious ... Bernardo di Simone, Silvestro di Stefano,Bernardo di Jacopo, Francesco di Matteo Bonciani, Antonio diGiovanni R
uberti, Antonio da Pistoia.... Antonio; He who has timeand waits for time, will lose his friends and his money.1554.Reve
rend Maestro, Domino Giovanni, I spoke to Maestro Zacaria as abrother about this business, and I made him satisfied with
 thearrangement that I had wished; that is, as regards the commissionthat I had from the parties and I say that between
us there is noneed to pay money down, as regard the pictures of the ...1555.Of things seen through a mist that which is
nearest its farthestlimit will be least visible, and all the more so as they are moreremote.1556.Theodoricus Rex Semper
Augustus.1557.Either you say Hesperia alone, and it will mean Italy, or you addultima, and it will mean Spain. Umbria, p
art of Tuscany.[Footnote: The notes in Greek, Nos. 1557, 1558 and 1562 stand inclose connection with each other, but the
 meaning of some words isvery doubtful, and a translation is thus rendered impossible.]1558.[Footnote: Greek Characters]
1559.Canonica of ... on the 5th of July 1507; my dearly beloved mother,sisters and cousin I herewith inform you that tha
nks to God I am ...about the sword which I ... bring it to Maso at the piazza ... and Iwill settle the business of Piero
 so that ...[Footnote: AMORETTI, _Mem. Stor. XXIV_, quotes the first three linesof this letter as by Leonardo. The chara
cter of the writing howeverdoes not favour this hypothesis, and still less the contents. Ishould regard it rather a roug
h draft of a letter by young Melzi. Ihave not succeeded in deciphering completely the 13 lines of thistext. Amoretti rea
ds at the beginning _Canonica di Vaprio_, but_Vaprio_ seems to me a very doubtful reading.]1560.  Ut bene respondet Natu
rae ars docta! dedisset    Vincius, ut tribuit cetera - sic animam -  Noluit ut similis magis haec foret: altera sic est
:    Possidet illius Maurus amans animam.[Footnote: These three epigrams on the portrait of LucreziaCrivelli, a picture
by Leonardo which must have been lost at a veryearly date, seem to have been dedicated to Leonardo by the poet.Leonardo
used the reverse of the sheet for notes on geometry.]Hujus quam cernis nomen Lucretia, Divi Omnia cui larga contribuerem
anu. Rara huic forma data est; pinxit Leonardos, amavit Maurus,pictorum primus hic, ille ducum.Naturam, ac superas hac l
aesit imagine Divas Pictor: tantum hominisposse manum haec doluit, Illae longa dari tam magnae tempera formae,Quae spati
o fuerat deperitura brevi.1561.Egidius Romanus on the formation of the human body in the mother'swomb [Footnote 1: _Libe
r magistri Egidii de pulsibus matriceconipositus (cum commentario Gentilis de Fulgineo)_ published in1484 at Padova, in
1494 and in 1514 at Venice, and in 1505 atLyons.].[Footnote 2:2. This text appears to be in a handwriting differentfrom
that in the note, l. 1. Here the reading is not so simple asAMORETTI gave it, _Mem. Star. XXV: A Monsieur Lyonard Peintr
e du Roypour Amboyse_. He says too that this address is of the year 1509,and Mr. Ravaisson remarks: "_De cette suscripti
on il semble qu'onpeut inferer que Leonard etait alors en France, a la cour de LouisXII ... Pour conclure je crois qu'il
 n'est pas prouve que Leonard deVinci n'ait pas fait un voyage de quelques mois en France sous LouisXII, entre le printe
mps de 1509 et l'automne de_ 1510."--I mustconfess that I myself have not succeeded in deciphering completelythis French
 writing of which two words remain to me doubtful. But somuch seems to be quite evident that this is not an address of a
letter at all, but a certificate or note. _Amboise_[l. 6] I believeto be the signature of Charles d'Amboise the Governor
 of Milan. Ifthis explanation is the right one, it can be easily explained by thecontents of Nos. 1350 and 1529. The not
e, line 1, was perhaps addedlater by another hand; and Leonardo himself wrote afterwards on thesame sheet some geometric
al explanations. I must also point out thatthe statement that this sheet belongs to the year 1509 hasabsolutely no found
ation in fact. There is no clue whatever forgiving a precise date to this note.] To Monsieur le Vinci,--thehorses of the
 king's equerry.... Continue the payment to Ms.Lyonard, Painter to the King.[6] Amboise.1562.[Footnote: Greek Characters
]1563.Memorandum to Maestro Lionardo to have ... the state of Florence.1564.To remind your Excellency that Ridolfo Manin
i brought to Florence aquantity of crystal besides other stones such as are ...1565.XVI C. 6 de Ciuitate Dei, se Antipod
es.[Footnote: A facsimile of this note, which refers to a well knownbook by St. Augustin, is given on page 254.]1566.Leo
nardo's Will.Be it known to all persons, present and to come that at the court ofour Lord the King at Amboise before our
selves in person, MesserLeonardo da Vinci painter to the King, at present staying at theplace known as Cloux near Ambois
e, duly considering the certainty ofdeath and the uncertainty of its time, has acknowledged and declaredin the said cour
t and before us that he has made, according to thetenor of these presents, his testament and the declaration of hislast
will, as follows. And first he commends his soul to our Lord,Almighty God, and to the Glorious Virgin Mary, and to our l
ord SaintMichael, to all the blessed Angels and Saints male and female inParadise.Item. The said Testator desires to be
buried within the church ofSaint Florentin at Amboise, and that his body shall be borne thitherby the chaplains of the c
hurch.Item. That his body may be followed from the said place to the saidchurch of Saint Florentin by the _collegium_ of
 the said church,that is to say by the rector and the prior, or by their vicars andchaplains of the church of Saint Deni
s of Amboise, also the lesserfriars of the place, and before his body shall be carried to thesaid church this Testator d
esires, that in the said church of SaintFlorentin three grand masses shall be celebrated by the deacon andsub-deacon and
 that on the day when these three high masses arecelebrated, thirty low masses shall also be performed at SaintGregoire.
Item. That in the said church of Saint Denis similar services shallbe performed, as above.Item. That the same shall be d
one in the church of the said friarsand lesser brethren.Item. The aforesaid Testator gives and bequeaths to Messer Franc
escoda Melzo, nobleman, of Milan, in remuneration for services andfavours done to him in the past, each[Footnote: See pa
ge 420.]and all of the books the Testator is at present possessed of, andthe instruments and portraits appertaining to h
is art and calling asa painter.Item. The same Testator gives and bequeaths henceforth for ever toBattista de Vilanis his
 servant one half, that is the moity, of hisgarden which is outside the walls of Milan, and the other half ofthe same ga
rden to Salai his servant; in which garden aforesaidSalai has built and constructed a house which shall be and remainhen
ceforth in all perpetuity the property of the said Salai, hisheirs and successors; and this is in remuneration for the g
ood andkind services which the said de Vilanis and Salai, his servants havedone him in past times until now.Item. The sa
id Testator gives to Maturina his waiting woman a cloakof good black cloth lined with fur, a ... of cloth and two ducats
paid once only; and this likewise is in remuneration for goodservice rendered to him in past times by the said Maturina.
Item. He desires that at his funeral sixty tapers shall be carriedwhich shall be borne by sixty poor men, to whom shall
be given moneyfor carrying them; at the discretion of the said Melzo, and thesetapers shall be distributed among the fou
r above mentioned churches.Item. The said Testator gives to each of the said churches ten lbs.of wax in thick tapers, wh
ich shall be placed in the said churchesto be used on the day when those said services are celebrated.Item. That alms sh
all be given to the poor of the Hotel-Dieu, to thepoor of Saint Lazare d'Amboise and, to that end, there shall begiven a
nd paid to the treasurers of that same fraternity the sum andamount of seventy soldi of Tours.Item. The said Testator gi
ves and bequeaths to the said MesserFrancesco Melzo, being present and agreeing, the remainder of hispension and the sum
s of money which are owing to him from the pasttime till the day of his death by the receiver or treasurer-generalM. Joh
an Sapin, and each and every sum of money that he has alreadyreceived from the aforesaid Sapin of his said pension, and
in casehe should die before the said Melzo and not otherwise; which moneysare at present in the possession of the said T
estator in the saidplace called Cloux, as he says. And he likewise gives and bequeathsto the said Melzo all and each of
his clothes which he at presentpossesses at the said place of Cloux, and all in remuneration forthe good and kind servic
es done by him in past times till now, aswell as in payment for the trouble and annoyance he may incur withregard to the
 execution of this present testament, which however,shall all be at the expense of the said Testator.And he orders and d
esires that the sum of four hundred scudi delSole, which he has deposited in the hands of the treasurer of SantaMaria Nu
ova in the city of Florence, may be given to his brothersnow living in Florence with all the interest and usufruct that
mayhave accrued up to the present time, and be due from the aforesaidtreasurer to the aforesaid Testator on account of t
he said fourhundred crowns, since they were given and consigned by the Testatorto the said treasurers.Item. He desires a
nd orders that the said Messer Francesco de Melzoshall be and remain the sole and only executor of the said will ofthe s
aid Testator; and that the said testament shall be executed inits full and complete meaning and according to that which
is herenarrated and said, to have, hold, keep and observe, the said MesserLeonardo da Vinci, constituted Testator, has o
bliged and obliges bythese presents the said his heirs and successors with all his goodsmoveable and immoveable present
and to come, and has renounced andexpressly renounces by these presents all and each of the thingswhich to that are cont
rary. Given at the said place of Cloux in thepresence of Magister Spirito Fieri vicar, of the church of SaintDenis at Am
boise, of M. Guglielmo Croysant priest and chaplain, ofMagister Cipriane Fulchin, Brother Francesco de Corion, and ofFra
ncesco da Milano, a brother of the Convent of the Minorites atAmboise, witnesses summoned and required to that end by th
eindictment of the said court in the presence of the aforesaid M.Francesco de Melze who accepting and agreeing to the sa
me haspromised by his faith and his oath which he has administered to uspersonally and has sworn to us never to do nor s
ay nor act in anyway to the contrary. And it is sealed by his request with the royalseal apposed to legal contracts at A
mboise, and in token of goodfaith.Given on the XXIIIrd day of April MDXVIII, before Easter.And on the XXIIIrd day of thi
s month of April MDXVIII, in thepresence of M. Guglielmo Borian, Royal notary in the court of thebailiwick of Amboise, t
he aforesaid M. Leonardo de Vinci gave andbequeathed, by his last will and testament, as aforesaid, to thesaid M. Baptis
ta de Vilanis, being present and agreeing, the rightof water which the King Louis XII, of pious memory lately deceasedga
ve to this same de Vinci, the stream of the canal of SantoCristoforo in the duchy of Milan, to belong to the said Vilani
s forever in such wise and manner that the said gentleman made him thisgift in the presence of M. Francesco da Melzo, ge
ntleman, of Milanand in mine.And on the aforesaid day in the said month of April in the said yearMDXVIII the same M. Leo
nardo de Vinci by his last will and testamentgave to the aforesaid M. Baptista de Vilanis, being present andagreeing, ea
ch and all of the articles of furniture and utensils ofhis house at present at the said place of Cloux, in the event of
thesaid de Vilanis surviving the aforesaid M. Leonardo de Vinci, in thepresence of the said M. Francesco Melzo and of me
 Notary &c. Borean.*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, THE NOTEBOOKS OF LEONARDO DA    VINCI, COMPLETE ***This file
should be named 8ldvc10.txt or 8ldvc10.zipCorrected EDITIONS of our eBooks get a new NUMBER, 8ldvc11.txtVERSIONS based o
n separate sources get new LETTER, 8ldvc11a.txtProject Gutenberg eBooks are often created from several printededitions,
all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the USunless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we usually do notkeep
 eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.We are now trying to release all our eBooks one year in advanceo
f the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.Please be encouraged to tell us about any error or correct
ions,even years after the official publication date.Please note neither this listing nor its contents are final tilmidni
ght of the last day of the month of any such announcement.The official release date of all Project Gutenberg eBooks is a
tMidnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  Apreliminary version may often be posted for suggestion,
commentand editing by those who wish to do so.Most people start at our Web sites at:http://gutenberg.net orhttp://promo.
net/pgThese Web sites include award-winning information about ProjectGutenberg, including how to donate, how to help pro
duce our neweBooks, and how to subscribe to our email newsletter (free!).Those of you who want to download any eBook bef
ore announcementcan get to them as follows, and just download by date.  This isalso a good way to get them instantly upo
n announcement, as theindexes our cataloguers produce obviously take a while after anannouncement goes out in the Projec
t Gutenberg Newsletter.http://www.ibiblio.org/gutenberg/etext04 orftp://ftp.ibiblio.org/pub/docs/books/gutenberg/etext04
Or /etext03, 02, 01, 00, 99, 98, 97, 96, 95, 94, 93, 92, 92, 91 or 90Just search by the first five letters of the filena
me you want,as it appears in our Newsletters.Information about Project Gutenberg (one page)We produce about two million
dollars for each hour we work.  Thetime it takes us, a rather conservative estimate, is fifty hoursto get any eBook sele
cted, entered, proofread, edited, copyrightsearched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.   Ourprojected aud
ience is one hundred million readers.  If the valueper text is nominally estimated at one dollar then we produce $2milli
on dollars per hour in 2002 as we release over 100 new textfiles per month:  1240 more eBooks in 2001 for a total of 400
0+We are already on our way to trying for 2000 more eBooks in 2002If they reach just 1-2% of the world's population then
 the totalwill reach over half a trillion eBooks given away by year's end.The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away
1 Trillion eBooks!This is ten thousand titles each to one hundred million readers,which is only about 4% of the present
number of computer users.Here is the briefest record of our progress (* means estimated):eBooks Year Month    1  1971 Ju
ly   10  1991 January  100  1994 January 1000  1997 August 1500  1998 October 2000  1999 December 2500  2000 December 30
00  2001 November 4000  2001 October/November 6000  2002 December* 9000  2003 November*10000  2004 January*The Project G
utenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been createdto secure a future for Project Gutenberg into the next millennium.W
e need your donations more than ever!As of February, 2002, contributions are being solicited from peopleand organization
s in: Alabama, Alaska, Arkansas, Connecticut,Delaware, District of Columbia, Florida, Georgia, Hawaii, Illinois,Indiana,
 Iowa, Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Maine, Massachusetts,Michigan, Mississippi, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New
Hampshire, New Jersey, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina, Ohio,Oklahoma, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Ca
rolina, SouthDakota, Tennessee, Texas, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Washington, WestVirginia, Wisconsin, and Wyoming.We have
 filed in all 50 states now, but these are the only onesthat have responded.As the requirements for other states are met
, additions to this listwill be made and fund raising will begin in the additional states.Please feel free to ask to che
ck the status of your state.In answer to various questions we have received on this:We are constantly working on finishi
ng the paperwork to legallyrequest donations in all 50 states.  If your state is not listed andyou would like to know if
 we have added it since the list you have,just ask.While we cannot solicit donations from people in states where we aren
ot yet registered, we know of no prohibition against acceptingdonations from donors in these states who approach us with
 an offer todonate.International donations are accepted, but we don't know ANYTHING abouthow to make them tax-deductible
, or even if they CAN be madedeductible, and don't have the staff to handle it even if there areways.Donations by check
or money order may be sent to:Project Gutenberg Literary Archive FoundationPMB 1131739 University Ave.Oxford, MS 38655-4
109Contact us if you want to arrange for a wire transfer or paymentmethod other than by check or money order.The Project
 Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been approved bythe US Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) organization w
ith EIN[Employee Identification Number] 64-622154.  Donations aretax-deductible to the maximum extent permitted by law.
 As fund-raisingrequirements for other states are met, additions to this list will bemade and fund-raising will begin in
 the additional states.We need your donations more than ever!You can get up to date donation information online at:http:
//www.gutenberg.net/donation.html***If you can't reach Project Gutenberg,you can always email directly to:Michael S. Har
t <hart@pobox.com>Prof. Hart will answer or forward your message.We would prefer to send you information by email.**The
Legal Small Print**(Three Pages)***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS**START***Why is this "Small Print!"
 statement here? You know: lawyers.They tell us you might sue us if there is something wrong withyour copy of this eBook
, even if you got it for free fromsomeone other than us, and even if what's wrong is not ourfault. So, among other thing
s, this "Small Print!" statementdisclaims most of our liability to you. It also tells you howyou may distribute copies o
f this eBook if you want to.*BEFORE!* YOU USE OR READ THIS EBOOKBy using or reading any part of this PROJECT GUTENBERG-t
meBook, you indicate that you understand, agree to and acceptthis "Small Print!" statement. If you do not, you can recei
vea refund of the money (if any) you paid for this eBook bysending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the perso
nyou got it from. If you received this eBook on a physicalmedium (such as a disk), you must return it with your request.
ABOUT PROJECT GUTENBERG-TM EBOOKSThis PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBook, like most PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBooks,is a "public dom
ain" work distributed by Professor Michael S. Hartthrough the Project Gutenberg Association (the "Project").Among other
things, this means that no one owns a United States copyrighton or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
distribute it in the United States without permission andwithout paying copyright royalties. Special rules, set forthbel
ow, apply if you wish to copy and distribute this eBookunder the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.Please do not use the "PR
OJECT GUTENBERG" trademark to marketany commercial products without permission.To create these eBooks, the Project expen
ds considerableefforts to identify, transcribe and proofread public domainworks. Despite these efforts, the Project's eB
ooks and anymedium they may be on may contain "Defects". Among otherthings, Defects may take the form of incomplete, ina
ccurate orcorrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or otherintellectual property infringement, a defective or dam
ageddisk or other eBook medium, a computer virus, or computercodes that damage or cannot be read by your equipment.LIMIT
ED WARRANTY; DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGESBut for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,[1] Michael Hart and the
Foundation (and any other party you mayreceive this eBook from as a PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm eBook) disclaimsall liability t
o you for damages, costs and expenses, includinglegal fees, and [2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE ORUNDER STRICT L
IABILITY, OR FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT,INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVEOR INCIDEN
TAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THEPOSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.If you discover a Defect in this eBook within 90
days ofreceiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)you paid for it by sending an explanatory note within
 thattime to the person you received it from. If you received iton a physical medium, you must return it with your note,
 andsuch person may choose to alternatively give you a replacementcopy. If you received it electronically, such person m
aychoose to alternatively give you a second opportunity toreceive it electronically.THIS EBOOK IS OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO
YOU "AS-IS". NO OTHERWARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU ASTO THE EBOOK OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE
ON, INCLUDING BUT NOTLIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR APARTICULAR PURPOSE.Some states do not allo
w disclaimers of implied warranties orthe exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so theabove disclaimers and
exclusions may not apply to you, and youmay have other legal rights.INDEMNITYYou will indemnify and hold Michael Hart, t
he Foundation,and its trustees and agents, and any volunteers associatedwith the production and distribution of Project
Gutenberg-tmtexts harmless, from all liability, cost and expense, includinglegal fees, that arise directly or indirectly
 from any of thefollowing that you do or cause:  [1] distribution of this eBook,[2] alteration, modification, or additio
n to the eBook,or [3] any Defect.DISTRIBUTION UNDER "PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm"You may distribute copies of this eBook electr
onically, or bydisk, book or any other medium if you either delete this"Small Print!" and all other references to Projec
t Gutenberg,or:[1]  Only give exact copies of it.  Among other things, this     requires that you do not remove, alter o
r modify the     eBook or this "small print!" statement.  You may however,     if you wish, distribute this eBook in mac
hine readable     binary, compressed, mark-up, or proprietary form,     including any form resulting from conversion by
word     processing or hypertext software, but only so long as     *EITHER*:     [*]  The eBook, when displayed, is clea
rly readable, and          does *not* contain characters other than those          intended by the author of the work, a
lthough tilde          (~), asterisk (*) and underline (_) characters may          be used to convey punctuation intende
d by the          author, and additional characters may be used to          indicate hypertext links; OR     [*]  The eB
ook may be readily converted by the reader at          no expense into plain ASCII, EBCDIC or equivalent          form b
y the program that displays the eBook (as is          the case, for instance, with most word processors);          OR
  []*  You provide, or agree to also provide on request at          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
       eBook in its original plain ASCII form (or in EBCDIC          or other equivalent proprietary form).[2]  Honor th
e eBook refund and replacement provisions of this     "Small Print!" statement.[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the F
oundation of 20% of the     gross profits you derive calculated using the method you     already use to calculate your a
pplicable taxes.  If you     don't derive profits, no royalty is due.  Royalties are     payable to "Project Gutenberg L
iterary Archive Foundation"     the 60 days following each date you prepare (or were     legally required to prepare) yo
ur annual (or equivalent     periodic) tax return.  Please contact us beforehand to     let us know your plans and to wo
rk out the details.WHAT IF YOU *WANT* TO SEND MONEY EVEN IF YOU DON'T HAVE TO?Project Gutenberg is dedicated to increasi
ng the number ofpublic domain and licensed works that can be freely distributedin machine readable form.The Project grat
efully accepts contributions of money, time,public domain materials, or royalty free copyright licenses.Money should be
paid to the:"Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."If you are interested in contributing scanning equipment ors
oftware or other items, please contact Michael Hart at:hart@pobox.com[Portions of this eBook's header and trailer may be
 reprinted onlywhen distributed free of all fees.  Copyright (C) 2001, 2002 byMichael S. Hart.  Project Gutenberg is a T
radeMark and may not beused in any sales of Project Gutenberg eBooks or other materials bethey hardware or software or a
ny other related product withoutexpress permission.]*END THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS*Ver.02/11/02*END*
